L. RON HUBBARD
DIANETIC
The Modern Science of Mental Health
PUBLICATIONS, INC.
Important Note
In reading this book, be very certain you never go past a word you do not fully understand.
The only reason a person gives up a study or becomes confused or unable to learn is because he or she has gone past a word that was not understood.
The confusion or inability to grasp or learn comes AFTER a word that the person did not have defined and understood.
Have you ever had the experience of coming to the end of a page and realizing you didn't know what you had read? Well, somewhere earlier on that page you went past a word that you had no definition for or an incorrect definition for.
Here's an example. "It was found that when the crepuscule arrived the children were quieter and when it was not present, they were much livelier." You see what happens. You think you don't understand the whole idea, but the inability to understand came entirely from the one word you could not define, crepuscule, which means twilight or darkness.
It may not only be the new and unusual words that you will have to look up. Some commonly used words can often be misdefined and so cause confusion.
This datum about not going past an undefined word is the most important fact in the whole subject of study. Every subject you have taken up and abandoned had its words which you failed to get defined.
Therefore, in studying this book be very, very certain you never go past a word you do not fully understand. If the material becomes confusing or you can't
seem to grasp it, there will be a word just earlier that you have not understood. Don't go any further, but go back to BEFORE you got into trouble, find the misunderstood word and get it defined.
Definitions
As an aid to the reader, words most likely to be misunderstood have been defined in footnotes the first time they occur in the text. Words sometimes have several meanings. The footnote definitions in this book only give the meaning that the word has as it is used in the text. Other definitions for the word can be found in a dictionary.
A glossary including all the footnote definitions is at the back of this book.
Contents
How to Read This Book	1
Book One:	The Goal of Man
Chapter One	The Scope of Dianetics                     9
Chapter Two	The Clear                                         16
Chapter Three	The Goal of Man                            31
Chapter Four	The Four Dynamics                         51
Chapter Five	Summary                                         57
Book Two:         The Single Source of
All Inorganic Mental and Organic Psychosomatic Ills
Chapter One       The Analytical Mind and the
Standard Memory Banks	65 Chapter Two The Reactive Mind 73 Chapter Three The Cell and the Organism 101 Chapter Four The "Demons" 120 Chapter Five Psychosomatic Illness 131 Chapter Six Emotion and the Dynamics 158 Chapter Seven Prenatal Experience and Birth 176 Chapter Eight Contagion of Aberration 193 Chapter Nine Keying In the Engram 203 Chapter Ten Preventive Dianetics 219
Book Three:      Therapy
Chapter One The Mind's Protection	235 Chapter Two Release or Clear 242 Chapter Three The Auditor's Role 247 Chapter Four Diagnosis 255 Chapter Five Returning, the File Clerk and
the Time Track	276 Chapter Six The Laws of Returning 293 Chapter Seven Emotion and the Life Force 319 Chapter Eight Some Types of Engrams 367 Chapter Nine Mechanisms and Aspects
of Therapy-Part 1	386
Mechanisms and Aspects of Therapy-Part 2	439 Chapter Ten       Dianetics—Past and Future           553
Appendix:	Dianetics: The Bridge to Clear 568 About the Author 581
For More Information
Glossary
Index
Bibliography
587
599
640
659
xi
How to Read This Book
Dianetics is an adventure. It is an exploration into terra incognita,1 the human mind, that vast and hitherto unknown realm half an inch back of our foreheads.
The discoveries and developments which made the formulation of Dianetics possible occupied many years of exact research and careful testing. This was exploration, it was also consolidation. The trail is blazed, the routes are sufficiently mapped for you to voyage in safety into your own mind and recover there your full inherent potential, which is not, we now know, low but very, very high.
As you progress in therapy, the adventure is yours to know why you did what you did when you did it, to know what caused those dark and unknown fears which came in nightmares as a child, to know where your moments of pain and pleasure lay. There is much which an individual does not know about himself, about his parents, about his "motives." Some of the things you will find may astonish you, for the most important data of your life may be not memory but engrams2 in the
1. terra incognita: an unknown land; a region or subject of which nothing is known.
2. engrain: a mental image picture which is a recording of an experience containing pain, unconsciousness, and a real or fancied threat to survival. It is a recording in the reactive mind of something which actually happened to an individual in the past and which contained pain and unconsciousness, both of which are recorded in the mental image picture called an engram. It must, by definition, have impact or injury as part of its content. These engrams are a complete recording, down to the last accurate detail, of every perception present in a moment of partial or full unconsciousness.
L. RON HUBBARD
hidden depths of your mind, not articulate3 but only destructive.
You will find many reasons why you "cannot get well" and you will know at length, when you find the dictating lines in the engrams, how amusing those reasons are, especially to you.
Dianetics is no solemn adventure. For all that it has to do with suffering and loss, its end is always laughter, so foolish, so misinterpreted were the things which caused the woe.
Your first voyage into your own terra incognita will be through the pages of this book. You will find as you read that many things "you always knew were so" are articulated here. You will be gratified to know that you held not opinions but scientific facts in many of your concepts of existence. You will find, too, many data that have long been known by all, and you will possibly consider them far from news and be prone to under-evaluate them: be assured that underevaluation of these facts kept them from being valuable, no matter how long they were known, for a fact is never important without a proper evaluation of it and its precise relationship to other facts. You are following here a vast network of facts which, reaching out, can be seen to embrace the whole field of man in all his works. Fortunately you do not have to concern yourself with following far any one of these lines until you are done. And then these horizons will stretch wide enough to satisfy anyone.
Dianetics is a large subject, but that is only because man is himself a large subject. The science of his thought cannot but embrace all his actions. By careful compart-menting and relating of data, the field has been kept narrow enough to be easily followed. Mostly this handbook will tell you, without any specific mention, about
3. articulate: well formulated; clearly presented.
2
How TO READ THIS BOOK
yourself and your family and friends, for you will meet them here and know them.
This volume has made no effort to use resounding or thunderous phrases, frowning polysyllables4 or professorial detachment. When one is delivering answers which are simple, he need not make the communication any more difficult than is necessary to convey the ideas. "Basic language" has been used, much of the nomenclature5 is colloquial;6 the pedantic7 has not only not been employed, it has also been ignored. This volume communicates to several strata of life and professions; the favorite nomenclatures of none have been observed since such a usage would impede the understanding of others. And so bear with us, psychiatrist, when your structure is not used, for we have no need for structure here; and bear with us, doctor, when we call a cold a cold and not a catarrhal8 disorder of the respiratory tract. For this is, essentially, engineering, and these engineers are liable to say anything. And "scholar," you would not enjoy being burdened with the summation signs and the Lorentz-FitzGerald-Einstein equations,' so
4. polysyllables: words having several, especially four or more, syllables.
5. nomenclature: the set of terms used to describe things in a particular subject.
6. colloquial: characteristic of or appropriate to ordinary or familiar conversation rather than formal speech or writing; informal.
7. pedantic: having unnecessary stress on minor or trivial points of learning; displaying a scholarship lacking in judgment or sense of proportion.
8. catarrhal: having to do with inflammation of a mucous membrane, especially of the nose or throat, causing an increased flow of mucus.
9. Lorentz-FitzGerald-Einstein equations: mathematical equations developed by Hendrik Lorentz and George Francis FitzGer-ald, closely related to the work of Einstein. These formulas, also known as the Lorentz-FitzGerald contraction, contain the hypothesis that a moving body exhibits a contraction in the direction of motion when its velocity is close to the speed of light.
L. RON HUBBARD
we shall not burden the less puristic reader with scientifically impossible Hegelian10 grammar which insists that absolutes exist in fact.
The plan of the book might be represented as a cone which starts with simplicity and descends into wider application. This book follows, more or less, the actual steps of the development of Dianetics. First there was the dynamic principle of existence," then its meaning, then the source of aberration,12 and finally the application of all as therapy and the techniques of therapy. You won't find any of this very difficult. It was the originator who had the difficulty. You should have seen the
10. Hegelian: of Hegel (Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel [1770-1831], German philosopher) or his philosophy. Hegel put forth a philosophy based on the principle that an idea or event (thesis) generates its opposite (antithesis) leading to the reconciliation of opposites.
11. dynamic principle of existence: survival. The goal of life can be considered to be infinite survival. Man, as a life form, can be demonstrated to obey in all his actions and purposes the one command "Survive!" It is not a new thought that man is surviving. It is a new thought that man is motivated only by survival.
12. aberration: a departure from rational thought or behavior. From the Latin, aberrare, to wander from; Latin, ab, away, errare, to wander. It means basically to err, to make mistakes, or more specifically to have fixed ideas which are not true. The word is also used in its scientific sense. It means departure from a straight line. If a line should go from A to B, then if it is "aberrated" it would go from A to some other point, to some other point, to some other point, to some other point, to some other point and finally arrive at B. Taken in its scientific sense, it would also mean the lack of straightness or to see crookedly as, in example, a man sees a horse but thinks he sees an elephant. Aberrated conduct would be wrong conduct, or conduct not supported by reason. When a person has engrams, these tend to deflect what would be his normal ability to perceive truth and bring about an aberrated view of situations which then would cause an aberrated reaction to them. Aberration is opposed to sanity, which would be its opposite. This is the most fundamental level of aberration: "If the food smells good, go away from it!" This is directly against the survival intention of the organism.
How TO READ THIS BOOK
first equations and postulates" of Dianetics! As research progressed and as the field developed, Dianetics began to simplify. That is a fair guarantee that one is on a straight trail of science. Only things which are poorly known become more complex the longer one works upon them.
It is suggested that you read straight on through. By the time you get into the Appendix, you should have an excellent command of the subject. The book is arranged that way. Every fact related to Dianetic therapy is stated in several ways and is introduced again and again. In this way, the important facts have been pointed up to your attention. When you have finished the book you can come back to the beginning and look through it and study what you think you need to know.
Almost all the basic philosophy and certainly all the derivations of the master subject of Dianetics were excluded here, partly because this volume had to stay under half a million words and partly because they belong in a separate text where they can receive full justice. Nevertheless, you have the scope of the science with this volume in addition to therapy itself.
You are beginning an adventure. Treat it as an adventure. And may you never be the same again.
13. postulates: things assumed to be true, especially as a basis for reasoning.
Book One
The Goal of Man
CHAPTER ONE
The Scope of Dianetics
A science of mind is a goal which has engrossed thousands of generations of man. Armies, dynasties' and whole civilizations have perished for the lack of it. Rome went to dust for the want of it. China swims in blood for the need of it. And down in the arsenal is an atom bomb,2 its hopeful nose full-armed in ignorance of it.
No quest has been more relentlessly pursued or has been more violent. No primitive tribe, no matter how ignorant, has failed to recognize the problem as a problem, nor has it failed to bring forth at least an attempted formulation. Today one finds the aborigine3 of Australia substituting for a science of mind a "magic healing crystal." The shaman4 of British Guyana5 makes shift6 for actual mental laws with his monotonous song and consecrated7 cigar. The throbbing drum of the
1. dynasties: successions of rulers who are members of the same family.
2. atom bomb: a bomb that uses the energy from the splitting of atoms to cause an explosion of tremendous force, accompanied by a blinding light.
3. aborigine: any of the first or earliest known inhabitants of a region; native.
4. shaman: a priest or witch doctor among certain peoples, claiming to have sole contact with the gods, etc.
5. British Guyana: country in northeastern South America: formerly a British colony, it became independent and a member of the Commonwealth in 1966.
6. makes shift: manages or does the best one can (with whatever means are at hand).
7. consecrated: set apart or declared as holy.
L. RON HUBBARD
Goldi" medicine man serves in the stead of an adequate technique to alleviate the lack of serenity in patients.
The enlightened and golden age9 of Greece yet had but superstition in its principal sanitaria10 for mental ills, the Aesculapian" temple. The most the Roman could do for peace of mind for the sick was to appeal to the penates, the household divinities, or sacrifice to Febris, goddess of fevers. And an English king, centuries after, could have been found in the hands of exorcists who sought to cure his deliriums by driving the demons from him.
From the most ancient times to the present, in the crudest primitive tribe or the most magnificently ornamented civilization, man has found himself in a state of awed helplessness when confronted by the phenomena of strange illnesses or aberrations. His desperation, in his efforts to treat the individual, has been but slightly altered during his entire history; and until this twentieth century passed midterm, the percentages of his alleviations, in terms of individual mental derangements,12 compared evenly with the successes of the shamans confronted with the same problems. According to a modern writer, the single advance of psychotherapy was clean quarters for the madman. In terms of brutality in treatment of the insane, the methods of the shaman or
8. Goldi: a people, traditionally hunters and fishermen, who inhabit the valley of the Amur River in southeastern Siberia and northeastern Manchuria (a region and former administrative division of northeast China).
9. golden age: the period in which a nation, etc., is at its highest state of prosperity, or in which some human art or activity is at its most excellent.
10. sanitaria: establishments for treating chronic diseases.
11. Aesculapian: of Aesculapius, the god of medicine and healing in ancient Greek and Roman mythology.
12. derangements: disturbances of the functions of the mind; mental disorders; insanities.
10
THE SCOPE OF DIANETICS
Bedlam13 have been far exceeded by the "civilized" techniques of destroying nerve tissues with the violence of shock and surgery—treatments which were not warranted by the results obtained and which would not have been tolerated in the meanest primitive society, since they reduce the victim to mere zombiism,'4 destroying most of his personality and ambition and leaving him nothing more than a manageable animal. Far from an indictment of the practices of the "neurosurgeon" and the ice pick which he thrusts and twists into insane minds, they are brought forth only to demonstrate the depths of desperation man can reach when confronted with the seemingly unsolvable problem of deranged minds.
In the larger sphere of societies and nations, the lack of such a science of mind was never more evident; for the physical sciences, advancing thoughtlessly far in advance of man's ability to understand man, have armed him with terrible and thorough weapons which await only another outburst of the social insanity of war.
These problems are not mild ones; they lie across every man's path; they wait in company with his future. As long as man has recognized that his chief superiority over the animal kingdom was a thinking mind, so long as he understood that his mind alone was his weapon, he has searched and pondered and postulated in efforts to find a solution.
Like a jigsaw puzzle spilled by a careless hand, the equations which would lead to a science of the mind and, above that, to a master science of the universe, were stirred round and round. Sometimes two fragments would be united; sometimes, as in the case of the golden
13. Bedlam: an old insane asylum (in full, St. Mary of Bethlehem) in London, infamous for the brutal ill-treatment inflicted upon the insane.
14. zombiism: existence as a person who seems to have no mind or will, taken from the voodoo word for a corpse said to have been animated by some power and made to obey commands.
11
L. RON HUBBARD
age of Greece, a whole section would be built. Philosopher, shaman, medicine man, mathematician: each looked at the pieces. Some saw they must all belong to different puzzles. Some thought they all belonged to the same puzzle. Some said there were really six puzzles in it, some said two. And the wars went on and the societies sickened or were dispersed, and learned tomes'5 were written about ever-increasing hordes of madmen.
With the methods of Bacon,16 with the mathematics of Newton,17 the physical sciences went on, consolidating and advancing their frontiers. And, like a derelict18 battalion, careless of how many allied ranks it exposed to destruction by the enemy, studies of the mind lagged behind.
But after all, there are just so many pieces in any puzzle. Before and after Francis Bacon, Herbert Spencer" and a very few more, many of the small sections had been put together, many honest facts had been observed.
To adventure into the thousands of variables of which that puzzle was composed, one had only to know right from wrong, true from false, and use all man and nature as his test tube.20
Of what must a science of mind be composed?
1.    An answer to the goal of thought.
15. tomes: large or scholarly books.
16. Bacon: Francis Bacon (1561-1626), English philosopher and essayist who insisted that investigation should begin with observable facts rather than with theories.
17. Newton: Sir Isaac Newton (1642-1727), English mathematician and natural philosopher. One of the greatest geniuses the world has known, he made three scientific discoveries of fundamental importance: first, the method of change in varying quantities, which forms the basis of modern calculus; second, the law of the composition of light; third, the law of gravity.
18. derelict: neglectful of duty; delinquent; negligent.
19. Herbert Spencer: (1820-1903), English philosopher. One of the few modern thinkers to attempt a systematic account of all cosmic phenomena, including mental and social principles.
20. test tube: a tube of thin, transparent glass closed at one end, used in chemical experiments, etc. Used figuratively.
12
THE SCOPE OF DIANETICS
2.    A single source of all insanities, psychoses,21 neuroses,22 compulsions,23 repressions24 and social derangements.
3.    Invariant scientific evidence as to the basic nature and functional background of the human mind.
4.    Techniques, the art of application, by which the discovered single source could be invariably cured; ruling out, of course, the insanities of malformed, deleted or pathologically25 injured brains or nervous systems and, particularly, iatro-genic psychoses (those caused by doctors and involving the destruction of the living brain itself).
5.    Methods of prevention of mental derangement.
6.    The cause and cure of all psychosomatic26 ills, which number, some say, 70 percent of man's listed ailments.
Such a science would exceed the severest terms previously laid down for it in any age, but any computation on the subject should discover that a science of mind ought to be able to be and do just these things.
A science of the mind, if it were truly worthy of that name, would have to rank, in experimental precision, with physics and chemistry. There could be no "special cases" to its laws. There could be no recourse27 to
21. psychoses: severe forms of mental disorder; insanities.
22. neuroses: emotional states containing conflicts and emotional data inhibiting the abilities or welfare of the individual.
23. compulsions: irresistible, repeated, irrational impulses to perform some act.
24. repressions: commands that the organism must not do something.
25. pathologically: in a manner caused by or having to do with disease. See also pathology in the glossary.
26. psychosomatic: psycho refers to mind and somatic refers to body; the term psychosomatic means the mind making the body ill or illnesses which have been created physically within the body by derangement of the mind.
27. recourse: a turning or seeking for aid, safety, etc.
13
L. RON HUBBARD
authority. The atom bomb bursts whether Einstein28 gives it permission or not. Laws native to nature regulate the bursting of that bomb. Technicians, applying techniques derived from discovered natural laws, can make one or a million atom bombs, all alike.
After the body of axioms and technique was organized and working as a science of mind, in rank with the physical sciences, it would be found to have points of agreement with almost every school of thought about thought which had ever existed. This is again a virtue and not a fault.
Simple though it is, Dianetics does and is these things:
1. It is an organized science of thought built on definite axioms (statements of natural laws on the order of those of the physical sciences).
2. It contains a therapeutic technique with which can be treated all inorganic mental ills and all organic psychosomatic ills, with assurance of complete cure in unselected cases.
3. It produces a condition of ability and rationality for man well in advance of the current norm, enhancing rather than destroying his vigor and personality.
4. Dianetics gives a complete insight into the full potentialities of the mind, discovering them to be well in excess of past supposition.
5. The basic nature of man is discovered in Dianetics rather than hazarded29 or postulated, since that basic nature can be brought into action in any individual completely. And that basic nature is discovered to be good.
28. Einstein: Albert Einstein (1879-1955), German physicist, US citizen from 1940; formulated the theory of the conversion of mass into energy, opening the way for the development of the atomic bomb.
29. hazarded: offered (a statement, conjecture, etc.) with the possibility of facing criticism, disapproval, failure or the like; ventured.
14
THE SCOPE OF DIANETICS
6. The single source of mental derangement is discovered and demonstrated, on a clinical or laboratory basis, by Dianetics.
7. The extent, storage capacity and recallability of the human memory is finally established by Dianetics.
8. The full recording abilities of the mind are discovered by Dianetics with the conclusion that they are quite dissimilar to former suppositions.
9. Dianetics brings forth the nongerm theory of disease, complementing biochemistry30 and Pasteur's31 work on the germ theory to embrace the field.
10. With Dianetics ends the "necessity" of destroying the brain by shock or surgery to effect "trac-tability"32 in mental patients and "adjust" them.
11. A workable explanation of the physiological effects of drugs and endocrine33 substances exists in Dianetics, and many problems posed by endocrinology are answered.
12. Various educational, sociological, political, military and other human studies are enhanced by Dianetics.
13. The field of cytology34 is aided by Dianetics, as well as other fields of research.
This, then, is a skeletal sketch of what would be the scope of a science of mind and of what is the scope of Dianetics.
30. biochemistry: the chemistry of living organisms.
31. Pasteur: Louis Pasteur (1822-1895), French chemist and bacteriologist; he proved that decay and putrefaction are caused by bacteria and developed serums and vaccines for such diseases as cholera and rabies.
32. tractability: state of being easy to manage or deal with; docility.
33. endocrine: designating or of any gland producing one or more internal secretions that are introduced directly into the bloodstream and carried to other parts of the body whose functions they regulate or control.
34. cytology: the scientific study of cells.
15
CHAPTER Two
The Clear
Dianetically, the optimum individual is called the Clear. One will hear much of that word, both as a noun and a verb, in this volume, so it is well to spend time here at the outset setting forth exactly what can be called a Clear, the goal of Dianetic therapy.
A Clear can be tested for any and all psychoses, neuroses, compulsions and repressions (all aberrations) and can be examined for any autogenetic (self-generated) diseases referred to as psychosomatic ills. These tests confirm the Clear to be entirely without such ills or aberrations. Additional tests of his intelligence indicate it to be high above the current norm. Observation of his activity demonstrates that he pursues existence with vigor and satisfaction.
Further, these results can be obtained on a comparative basis. A neurotic' individual, possessed also of psychosomatic ills, can be tested for those aberrations and illnesses, demonstrating that they exist. He can then be given Dianetic therapy to the end of clearing these neuroses and ills. Finally, he can be examined, with the above results. This, in passing, is an experiment which has been performed many times with invariable results. It is a matter of laboratory test that all individuals who have organically complete nervous systems respond in this fashion to Dianetic clearing.
Further, the Clear possesses attributes, fundamental and inherent but not always available in an uncleared
1. neurotic: one who is insane or disturbed on some subject (as opposed to a psychotic person, who is just insane in general).
16
THE CLEAR
state, which have not been suspected of man and are not included in past discussions of his abilities and behavior.
First there is the matter of perceptions. Even so-called normal people do not always see in full color, hear in full tone or sense at the optimum with their organs of smell, taste, tactile2 and organic sensation.
These are the main lines of communication to the finite world which most people recognize as reality. It is an interesting commentary that while past observers felt that the facing of reality was an absolute necessity if the aberrated individual wished to be sane, no definition of how this was to be done was set forth. To face reality in the present, one would certainly have to be able to sense it along those channels of communication most commonly used by man in his affairs.
Any one of man's perceptions can be aberrated by psychic3 derangements which refuse to permit the received sensations to be realized by the analytical portion of the individual's mind. In other words, while there may be nothing wrong with the mechanisms of color reception, circuits4 can exist in the mind which delete color before the consciousness is permitted to see the object. Colorblindness can be discovered to be relative or in degrees in such a way that colors appear to be less brilliant, dull or, at the maximum, entirely absent. Anyone is acquainted with persons to whom "loud"5 colors are detestable and with persons who find
2. tactile: of or using the sense of touch.
3. psychic: of or pertaining to the human soul or mind; mental (opposed to physical).
4. circuit: a part of an individual's bank (a colloquial name for the reactive mind) that behaves as though it were someone or something separate from him and that either talks to him or goes into action of its own accord, and may even, if severe enough, take control of him while it operates.
5. "loud": (colloquial) too vivid; flashy.
17
L. RON HUBBARD
them insufficiently "loud" to notice. This varying degree of colorblindness has not been recognized as a psychic factor but has been nebulously6 assumed to be some sort of a condition of mind when it was noticed at all.
There are those persons to whom noises are quite disturbing, to whom, for instance, the insistent whine of a violin is very like having a brace and bit7 applied to the eardrum; and there are those to whom fifty violins, played loudly, would be soothing; and there are those who, in the presence of a violin, express disinterest and boredom; and, again, there are persons to whom the sound of a violin, no matter if it be playing the most intricate melody, is a monotone. These differences of sonic (hearing) perception have, like color and other visual errors, been attributed to inherent nature or organic deficiency or assigned no place at all.
In a like manner, from person to person, smells, tactile sensations, organic perceptions, pain and gravity vary widely and wildly. A cursory check around amongst his friends will demonstrate to a man that there exist enormous differences of perception of identical stimuli.8 One smells a turkey in the oven as wonderful, one smells it with indifference, another may not smell it at all. And somebody else may maintain that roasting turkey smells exactly like hair oil—to be extreme.
Until we obtain Clears it remains obscure why such differences should exist. For in the largest measure, such wild quality and quantity of perception is due to aberration. Because of pleasurable experiences in the past and inherent sensitivity, there will be some difference
6. nebulously: hazily, vaguely, indistinctly or confusedly.
7. brace and bit: a tool for boring, consisting of a removable drill (bit) in a rotating handle (brace).
8. stimuli: things that rouse a person or thing into activity or energy or that produce a reaction in an organ or tissue of the body.
18
THE CLEAR
amongst Clears; and a Clear response should not be assumed automatically to be a standardized, adjusted middle ground, that pallid9 and obnoxious goal of past doctrines. The Clear gets a maximum response compatible with his own desire for the response. Burning cordite10 still smells dangerous to him, but it does not make him ill. Roasting turkey smells good to him if he is hungry and likes turkey, at which time it smells very, very good. Violins play melodies, not monotones, bring no pain and are enjoyed to a fine, full limit if the Clear likes violins as a matter of taste—if he doesn't, he likes kettledrums, saxophones or, indeed, suiting his mood, no music at all.
In other words, there are two variables at work. One, the wildest, is the variable caused by aberrations. The other, and quite rational and understandable, is caused by the personality.
Thus, the perceptions of an aberree (noncleared individual) vary greatly from those of the cleared (un-aberrated) individual.
Now there are the differences of the actual organs of perception and the errors occasioned" by these. Some of these errors, a minimum, are organic: punctured eardrums are not competent sound-recording mechanisms. The majority of perceptic (sense message) errors in the organic sphere are caused by psychosomatic errors.
Glasses are seen on noses everywhere around, even on children. The majority of these spectacles are perched on the face in an effort to correct a condition which the body itself is fighting to uncorrect again. Eyesight, when the stage of glasses is entered (not because of
9. pallid: lacking in spirit or vitality; dull.
10. cordite: a smokeless explosive used as a propellant in bullets and shells.
11. occasioned: given occasion or cause for; brought about.
19
L. RON HUBBARD
glasses), is deteriorating on the psychosomatic principle. And this observation is about as irresponsible as a statement that when apples fall out of trees they usually obey gravity. One of the incidental things which happen to a Clear is that his eyesight, if it had been bad as an aberree, generally improves markedly, and with some slight attention will recover optimum perception in time. (Far from an optician's argument against Dianetics, this assures rather good business, for Clears have been known, at treatment's end, to have to buy, in rapid succession, five pairs of glasses to compensate adjusting eyesight; and many aberrees, cleared late in life, settle down ocularly12 at a maximum a little under optimum.)
The eyesight was reduced in the aberree on an organic basis by his aberrations so that the perceptic organ itself was reduced from optimum operating function. With the removal of aberrations, repeated tests have proven that the body makes a valiant effort to reconstruct back to optimum.
Hearing, in addition to other perceptics, varies organically over a wide range. Calcium deposits, for instance, can make the ears "ring" incessantly. The removal of aberrations permits the body to readjust toward its reachable optimum; the calcium deposit disappears, and the ears stop ringing. But far and beyond this very specific case, there are great differences in hearing on the organic basis. Organically, as well as aberrationally, hearing can become remarkably extended or closely inhibited so that one person may hear footsteps a block away as a normal activity and another would not hear a bass drum thundering on the porch.
That the various perceptions differ widely from individual to individual on an aberrational and psychosomatic basis is the least of the discoveries outlined
12. ocularly: of or relating to the sense of sight.
20
THE CLEAR
here. Ability to recall is far more fantastic in its variation from person to person.
An entirely new recall process which was inherent in the mind but which had not been noticed came to light in the process of observing Clears and aberrees. This recall process is possible in only a small proportion of aberrees in its fullest sense. It is standard, however, in a Clear. Naturally, no intimation13 is made here that the scholars of past ages have been unobservant. We are dealing here with an entirely new and hitherto nonexistent object of inspection, the Clear. What a Clear can do easily, quite a few people have, from time to time, been partially able to do in the past.
An inherent, not a taught, ability of the remembering mechanisms of the mind can be termed, as a technical word of Dianetics, returning. It is used in its dictionary sense, with the addition of the fact that the mind has it as a normal remembering function, as follows: The person can "send" a portion of his mind to a past period on either a mental or combined mental and physical basis and can reexperience incidents which have taken place in his past in the same fashion and with the same sensations as before. Once upon a time, an art known as hypnotism used what was called "regression" on hypnotized subjects, the hypnotist sending the subject back, in one of two ways, to incidents in his past. This was done with trance techniques, drugs and considerable technology. The hypnotic subject could be sent back to a moment "entirely" so that he gave every appearance of being the age to which he was returned with only the apparent faculties and recollections he had at that moment: this was called revivification (reliving). Regression was a technique by which part of the individual's self remained in the present and
13. intimation: hint; indirect suggestion.
21
L. RON HUBBARD
part went back to the past. These abilities of the mind were supposed native only in hypnotism and were used only in hypnotic technique. The art is very old, tracing back some thousands of years and existing today in Asia as it has existed, apparently, from the dawn of time.
Returning is substituted for regression here because it is not a comparable thing and because regression, as a word, has some bad meanings which would interrupt its use. Reliving is substituted for revivification in Dia-netics because, in Dianetics, the principles of hypnotism can be found explained and hypnotism is not used in Dianetic therapy, as will be explained later.
The mind, then, has another ability to remember. Part of the mind can "return" even when a person is wide awake and reexperience past incidents in full. If you want to test this, try it on several people until one is discovered who does it easily. Wide awake, he can "return" to moments in his past. Until asked to do so, he probably will not know he has such an ability. If he had it, he probably thought everybody could do it (the type of supposition which has kept so much of this data from coming to light before). He can go back to a time when he was swimming and swim with full recall of hearing, sight, taste, smell, organic sensation, tactile, etc.
A "learned" gentleman once spent some hours demonstrating to a gathering that the recall of a smell as a sensation, for instance, was quite impossible since "neurology14 had proven that the olfactory15 nerves were not connected to the thalamus."16 Two people in the gathering discovered this ability to return and despite this evidence, the learned gentleman continued the
14. neurology: the science of the nerves and the nervous system, especially the diseases affecting them.
15. olfactory: of or relating to the sense of smell.
16. thalamus: the interior region of the brain where sensory nerves originate.
22
THE CLEAR
dispute that olfactory recall was impossible. A check amongst the gathering on this faculty," independent of returning, brought forth the fact that one-half of those present remembered smell by smelling it again.
Returning is the full performance of imagery recall. The entire memory is able to make the organ areas resense the stimuli in a past incident. Partial recall is common, not common enough to be normal, but certainly common enough to have merited considerable study. For it, again, is a wide variable.
Perception of the present would be one method of facing reality. But if one cannot face the reality of the past, then, in some part, he is not facing some portion of reality. And if it is agreed that facing reality is desirable, then one would have to face yesterday's reality as well if he were to be considered entirely "sane" by contemporary definition. To "face yesterday" requires a certain condition of recall to be available. One would have to be able to remember. But how many ways are there of remembering?
First there is the return. That is new. It gives the advantage of examining the moving pictures and other sense perceptions recorded at the time of the event with all senses present. He can also return to his past conclusions and imaginings. It is of considerable aid in learning, in research, in ordinary living, to be able to be again at the place where the data desired was first inspected.
Then there are the more usual recalls. Optimum recall is by the return method of single or multiple senses, the individual himself remaining in present time.18 In other
17. faculty: an ability, natural or acquired, for a particular kind of action.
18. present time: the time which is now and becomes the past as rapidly as it is observed. It is a term loosely applied to the environment existing in now.
23
L. RON HUBBARD
words, some people, when they think of a rose, see one, smell one, feel one. They see in full color, vividly—with the "mind's eye" to use an old colloquialism. They smell it vividly. And they can feel it even to the thorns. They are thinking about roses by actually recalling a rose.
These people, thinking about a ship, would see a specific ship, feel the motion of her if they thought of being aboard her, smell the pine tar19 or even less savory odors and hear whatever sounds there were about her. They would see the ship in full color-motion and hear it in full tone-audio.
These faculties vary widely in the aberree. Some, when told to think of a rose, can merely visualize one. Some can smell one but not see it. Some see it without color or in very pale color. When told to think of a ship some aberrees only see a flat, colorless, still picture, such as a painting of a ship or the photograph of one. Some perceive a vessel in motion without color but with sound. Some hear the sound of a ship but fail to see any picture whatever. Some merely think of a ship as a concept that ships exist and that they know about them, and fail to see, feel, hear, smell or otherwise sense anything on a recall basis.
Some past observers have called this "imagery" but the term is so inapplicable to sound and touch, organic sensation and pain that recall is used uniformly as the technical Dianetic term. The value of recall in this business of living has occupied such scant attention that the entire concept has never been formulated previously. It is therefore detailed at some length here, as above.
It is quite simple to test recalls. If one will ask his fellows what their abilities are, he will gain a remarkable
19. pine tar: a thick, dark liquid obtained by destructive distillation (decomposition by heat in the absence of air) of pine wood, used in ointments, tar paints, etc.
24
THE CLEAR
idea of how widely varied this ability is from individual to individual. Some have this recall, some have that, some have none but operate on concepts of recall only. And remember, if you make a test on those around you, that any perception is filed in the memory and therefore has a recall which is to include pain, temperature, rhythm, taste and weight with the above-mentioned sight, sound, tactile and smell.
The Dianetic names for these recalls are visio (sight), sonic (sound), tactile (touch), olfactory (smell), rhythmic, kinesthetic (weight and motion), somatic (pain), thermal (temperature) and organic (internal sensations and, by new definition, emotion).
Then there is another set of mental activities which can be sum mated under the headings of imagination and creative imagination. Here again is abundant material for testing.
Imagination is the recombination of things one has sensed, thought or intellectually computed into existence, which do not necessarily have existence. This is the mind's method of envisioning desirable goals or forecasting futures. Imagination is extremely valuable as a part of essential solutions in any mental problem and in everyday existence. That it is recombination in no sense deprives it of its vast and wonderful complexity.
A Clear uses imagination in its entirety. There is an imagination impression for sight, smell, taste, sound—in short, for each one of the possible perceptions. These are manufactured impressions on the basis of models in the memory banks combined by conceptual ideas and construction. New physical structures, tomorrow in terms of today, next year in terms of last year, pleasure to be gained, deeds to be done, accidents to avoid: all these are imaginational functions.
The Clear has full color-visio, tone-sonic, tactile, olfactory, rhythmic, kinesthetic, thermal and organic
25
L. RON HUBBARD
imagination in kind.20 Asked to envision himself riding in a gilded coach-and-four,2' he "sees" the equipage,22 moving, in full color, he "hears" all the noises which should be present, he "smells" the smells he thinks should be there and he "feels" the upholstery, the motion and the presence in the coach of himself.
In addition to standard imagination there is creative imagination. This is a very wide undimensional23 ability, quite variable from individual to individual, possessed in enormous quantity by some. It is included here, not as a portion of the operation of the mind treated as a usual part of Dianetics, but to isolate it as an existing entity. In a Clear who possessed creative imagination, even if inhibited as an aberree, it is present and demonstrable. It is inherent. It can be aberrated only by prohibition of its general practice, which is to say, by aberrating the persistence in its application or encysting24 the whole mind. But creative imagination, that possession by which works of art are done, states built and man enriched, can be envisioned as a special function, independent in operation and in no way dependent for its existence upon an aberrated condition in the individual, since the examination of its activity in and use by a Clear possessing it adequately demonstrates its inherent character. It is rarely absent in any individual.
Finally, there is the last but most important activity of the mind. Man is to be regarded as a sentient25 being.
20. in kind: in proper or good condition.
21. coach-and-four: a coach pulled by four horses.
22. equipage: a carriage drawn by horses and attended by servants.
23. undimensional: without measurable extent or limit.
24. encysting: enclosing in or as if in a cyst or sac.
25. sentient: of, having or capable of feeling or perception; conscious.
26
CLEAR
His sentience depends upon his ability to resolve problems by perceiving or creating and understanding situations. This rationality is the primary, high-echelon function of that part of the mind which makes him a man, not just another animal. Remembering, perceiving, imagining, he has the signal26 ability of resolving conclusions and of using conclusions resolved to resolve further conclusions. This is rational man.
Rationality, as divorced from aberration, can be studied in a cleared person only. The aberrations of the aberree give him the appearance of irrationality. Though such irrationality may be given the gentler names of "eccentricity"27 or "human error" or even "personal idiosyncrasy,"28 it is, nevertheless, irrationality. The personality does not depend upon how irrationally a man may act. It is not a personality trait, for instance, to drive while drunk and kill a child on a crosswalk—or even to risk killing a child by driving while drunk. Irrationality is simply that—the inability to get right answers from data.
Now, it is a curious thing that although "everybody knows" (and what a horrible amount of misinformation that statement lets circulate) it is "human to err," the sentient portion of the mind, which computes the answers to problems and which makes man man, is utterly incapable of error.
This was a startling discovery when it was made, but it need not have been. It could have been deduced some time before. For it is quite simple and easy to understand. The actual computing ability of man is never in error even in a very severely aberrated person. Observing
26. signal: not average or ordinary; remarkable; notable.
27. eccentricity: unusual or odd behavior, or a peculiar habit.
28. idiosyncrasy: a characteristic, habit, mannerism or the like that is peculiar to an individual.
27
L. RON HUBBARD
the activity of such an aberrated person, one might thoughtlessly suppose that that person's computations were wrong. But that would be an observer error. Any person, aberrated or Clear, computes perfectly on the data stored and perceived.
Take any common calculating machine (and the mind is an exceptionally magnificent instrument far, far superior to any machine it will invent for ages to come) and put a problem on it for solution. Multiply seven times one. It will answer, properly, seven. Now multiply six times one but continue to hold down the seven. Six times one is six but the answer you will get is forty-two. Continue to hold down seven and put other problems on the machine. They are wrong, not as problems, but as answers. Now fix seven so that it stays down no matter what keys are touched and try to give the machine away. Nobody will want it because, obviously, the machine is crazy. It says ten times ten is seven hundred. But is the calculating portion of the machine really wrong or is it merely being fed the wrong data?
In the same way, the human mind, being called upon to resolve problems of a magnitude and with enough variables to confound any mere calculating machine a thousand times an hour, is prey to incorrect data. Incorrect data gets into the machine. The machine gives wrong answers. Incorrect data enters the human memory banks, the person reacts in an "abnormal manner." Essentially, then, the problem of resolving aberration is the problem of finding a "held-down seven." But of that, much, much more later. Right now we have accomplished our immediate ends.
These are the various abilities and activities of the human mind in its constant task of resolving and putting into solution a multitude of problems. It perceives, it recalls or returns, it imagines, it conceives and then resolves. Served by its extensions—the perceptics and
28
THE CLEAR
the memory banks and the imaginations—the mind brings forth answers which are invariably accurate, the solutions modified only by observation, education and viewpoint.
And the basic purposes of that mind and the basic nature of man, as discoverable in the Clear, are constructive and good, uniformly constructive and uniformly good, modified only by observation, education and viewpoint.
Man is good.
Take away his basic aberrations and with them go the evil of which the scholastic29 and the moralist were so fond. The only detachable portion of him is the "evil" portion. And when it is detached, his personality and vigor intensify. And he is glad to see the "evil" portion go because it was physical pain.
Later there are experiments and proofs for these things and they can be measured with the precision so dear to the heart of the physical scientist.
The Clear, then, is not an "adjusted" person, driven to activity by his repressions now thoroughly encysted. He is an unrepressed person, operating on self-determinism.30 And his abilities to perceive, recall, return, imagine, create and compute are outlined as we have seen.
The Clear is the goal in Dianetic therapy, a goal which some patience and a little study and work can bring about. Any person can be cleared unless he has been so unfortunate as to have had a large portion of his brain removed or to have been born with a grossly malformed nervous structure.
29. scholastic: one who narrowly adheres to traditional teachings, doctrines or methods.
30. self-determinism: the state wherein the individual can or cannot be controlled by his environment according to his own choice. He is confident in his interpersonal relationships. He reasons but does not need to react.
29
L. RON HUBBARD
We have seen the goal of Dianetics here. Let us now inspect the goal of man.
Editor's Note: Live demonstrations of Dianetics procedure and public lectures given by L. Ron Hubbard have been reproduced on cassette, providing real examples of the practice and results of these techniques. See page 590.
30
CHAPTER THREE
The Goal of Man
The goal of man, the lowest common denominator of all his activities, the dynamic principle of his existence, has long been sought. Should such an answer be discovered, it is inevitable that from it many answers would flow. It would explain all phenomena of behavior; it would lead toward a solution of man's major problems; and, most of all, it should be workable.
Consider all knowledge to fall above or below a line of demarcation. Everything above this line is not necessary to the solution of man's aberrations and general shortcomings and is inexactly known. Such a field of thought could be considered to embrace such things as metaphysics1 and mysticism.2 Below this line of demarcation could be considered to lie the finite universe. All things in the finite universe, whether known or as yet unknown, can be sensed, experienced or measured. The known data in the finite universe can be classified as scientific truth when it has been sensed, experienced and measured. All factors necessary to the resolution of a science of the mind were found within the finite universe and were discovered, sensed, measured and experienced and became scientific truth. The finite universe contains time, space, energy and life. No other factors were found necessary in the equation.
Time, space, energy and Me have a single denominator
1. metaphysics: a branch of philosophy that deals with the nature of existence and of truth and knowledge.
2. mysticism: the beliefs or practices of those who claim to have experiences based on intuition, meditation, etc., of a spiritual nature, by which they learn truths not known by ordinary people.
31
L. RON HUBBARD
in common. As an analogy3 it could be considered that time, space, energy and life began at some point of origin and were commanded to continue to some nearly infinite destination. They were told nothing but what to do. They obey a single order and that order is "Survive!"
The Dynamic Principle of Existence Is Survival
The goal of life can be considered to be infinite survival. Man, as a life form, can be demonstrated to obey in all his actions and purposes the one command: "Survive!"
It is not a new thought that man is surviving. It is a new thought that man is motivated only by survival.
That his single goal is survival does not mean that he is the optimum survival mechanism which life has attained or will develop. The goal of the dinosaur was also survival and the dinosaur isn't extant anymore.
Obedience to this command, "Survive!" does not mean that every attempt to obey is uniformly successful. Changing environment, mutation and many other things militate4 against any one organism attaining infallible survival techniques or form.
Life forms change and die as new life forms develop just as surely as one life organism, lacking immortality in itself, creates other life organisms, then dies as itself. An excellent method, should one wish to cause life to survive over a very long period, would be to establish means by which it could assume many forms, and death itself would be necessary in order to facilitate the survival of the life force itself, since only death and decay could clear away older forms when new changes in the environment necessitated new forms. Life, as a force, existing over a nearly infinite period, would need
3. analogy: explanation of something by comparing it point by point with something similar.
4. militate: are directed (against)', operate or work (against or, rarely, for): said of facts, evidence, actions, etc.
32
THE GOAL OF MAN
a cyclic aspect in its unit organisms and forms.
What would be the optimum survival characteristics of various life forms? They would have to have various fundamental characteristics, differing from one species to the next just as one environment differs from the next.
This is important, since it has been but poorly considered in the past that a set of survival characteristics in one species would not be survival characteristics in another.
The methods of survival can be summed under the headings of food, protection (defensive and offensive) and procreation.5 There are no existing life forms which lack solutions to these problems. Every life form errs, one way or another, by holding a characteristic too long or developing characteristics which may lead to its extinction. But the developments which bring about successfulness of form are far more striking than their errors. The naturalist and biologist are continually resolving the characteristics of this or that life form by discovering that need rather than whim governs such developments. The hinges of the clamshell, the awesome face on the wings of the butterfly, have survival value.
Once survival was isolated as the only dynamic* of
* In order to establish nomenclature in Dianetics which would not be too complex for the purpose, words normally considered as adjectives or verbs have occasionally been pressed into service as nouns. This has been done on the valid principle that existing terminology, meaning so many different things, could not be used by Dianetics without making it necessary to explain away an old meaning to bring forth a new. To remove the step of explaining the old meaning and saying then that one doesn't mean that, thus entangling our communications inextricably, and to obviate the ancient custom of compounding ponderous and thundering syllables from the Greek and Roman tongues, this principle and some others have been adopted for nomenclature. Dynamic is here used as a noun and will so continue to be used throughout this volume. Somatic, perceptic and some others will be noted, defined when used. — LRH
5. procreation: bringing living things into existence by the natural process of reproduction.
33
L. RON HUBBARD
a life form which would explain all its activities, it was necessary to study further the action of survival. And it was discovered that when one considered pain and pleasure, he had at hand all the necessary ingredients with which to formulate the action life takes in its effort to survive.
As will be seen in the accompanying graph, a spectrum of life has been conceived to span from the zero of death or extinction toward the infinity of potential immortality. This spectrum was considered to contain an infinity of lines, extending ladderlike toward the potential of immortality. Each line as the ladder mounted was spaced a little wider than the last, in a geometric progression.6
The thrust of survival is away from death and toward immortality. The ultimate pain could be conceived as existing just before death and the ultimate pleasure could be conceived as immortality.
Immortality could be said to have an attractive type of force and death a repelling force in the consideration of the unit organism or the species. But as survival rises higher and higher toward immortality, wider and wider spaces are encountered until the gaps are finitely impossible to bridge. The urge is away from death, which has a repelling force, and toward immortality, which has an attracting force; the attracting force is pleasure, the repelling force is pain.	j
For the individual, the length of the arrow could be        j considered to be at a high potential within the fourth zone. Here the survival potential would be excellent and the individual would enjoy existence.	I
From left to right could be graphed the years.	f ———————————————————————————————       i
6. geometric progression: a sequence of terms, such as 1, 3, 9,	j 27, 81, etc., each of which is a constant multiple of the immediately preceding term.
34
D n	POTENTIAL						
!;I	1						
H ^	I						
~^ > H n	1			f.			
D		>H	^	u	—————	•	
>	C •<	3W1 C		J /	(A O) C   C		
7	a 0!	i.		/	5 < ^ <•		
	E	.s	/		CD a>_		
	c	^			(A		
				/	O		
		^/		'I			
				X			
			1	\			
			1	X			
			\	\			
	F			7^ 1        y-			
							
					•Jt \		
					X		
			/ 1		1 JC		
			\ (		/		
Z3			/ /		1 X		
Q.		•			\		
< ^        3-					y.		
					V		
r  i  £							
m    w'					1		
1    0    GO					X		
r   g^   c					/		
•   9"   ^					Jf		
S   ?,					/		
3      Si					-y		
|                 N   N   N            N                  N o o o       o          o							
1                Z   Z   Z           Z                 Z							
i            m m m        fn             rn							
1                    O    ->>    IO              CO                     •**							
Tl O
o   --
33        VJ
> s ? °
m
fc   (/>
L. RON HUBBARD
The urge toward pleasure is dynamic. Pleasure is the reward, and the seeking of the reward—survival goals —would be a pleasurable act. And to ensure that survival is accomplished under the mandate "Survive!" it seems to have been provided that reduction from a high potential would bring pain.
Pain is provided to repel the individual from death, pleasure is provided to call him toward optimum life. The search for and the attainment of pleasure is not less valid in survival than the avoidance of pain. In fact, on some observed evidence, pleasure seems to have a much greater value in the cosmic scheme than pain.
Now, it would be well to define what is meant by pleasure, aside from its connection with immortality. The dictionary states that pleasure is "gratification; agreeable emotions, mental or physical; transient enjoyment; opposed to pain." Pleasure can be found in so many things and activities that a catalog of all the things and activities man has, does and may consider pleasurable alone could round out the definition.
And what do we mean by pain? The dictionary states: "physical or mental suffering; penalty."
These two definitions, in passing, are demonstrative of an intuitive type of thought which runs through the language. Once one has a thing which leads to the resolution of hitherto unsolved problems, even the dictionaries are found to have "always known it."
If we wished to make this graph for a life-form cycle, it would be identical except that the value of the years would be increased to measure eons. For there is no difference, it seems, except magnitude, in the scope of the individual and the scope of the species. This inference could be drawn even without such remarkable evidence as the fact that a human being, growing from
36
THE GOAL OF MAN
zygote7 to adult, evolutes8 through all the forms which the whole species is supposed to have evolved through.
Now, there is more in this graph than has been remarked as yet. The physical and mental state of the individual varies from hour to hour, day to day, year to year. Therefore, the level of survival would form either a daily curve or the curve of a life on a measure of hourly or yearly position in the zones. And there would be two curves made possible by this, the physical curve and the mental curve. When we get toward the back of the book, the relationships between these two curves will be found vital and it will also be seen that, ordinarily, a sag in the mental curve will precede a sag in the physical curve.
The zones, then, can apply to two things: the physical being and the mental being. Therefore, these four zones can be called zones of the states of being. If a person is happy mentally, the survival level can be placed in zone 4. If the person is extremely ill physically, he might be plotted, on estimation of his illness, in zone 1 or close to death.
Very unprecise, but nevertheless descriptive, names have been assigned to these zones. Zone 3 is one of general happiness and well-being. Zone 2 is a level of bearable existence. Zone 1 is one of anger. Zone 0 is the zone of apathy. These zones can be used as a Tone Scale9 by which a state of mind can be graded. Just above death, which is 0, would be the lowest mental apathy or lowest level of physical life, 0.1. A tone 1,
7. zygote: the first cell of a new individual.
8. evolutes: evolves; develops.
9. Tone Scale: a scale which shows the emotional tones of a person. These, ranged from the highest to the lowest, are, in part, serenity (the highest level), enthusiasm (as we proceed downward), conservatism, boredom, antagonism, anger, covert hostility, fear, grief, apathy.
37
L. RON HUBBARD
where the body is fighting physical pain or illness or where the being is fighting in anger, could be graded from 1.0, which would be resentment or hostility, through tone 1.5, which would be a screaming rage, to a 1.9, which would be merely a quarrelsome inclination. From tone 2.0 to tone 3.0 there would be an increasing interest in existence, and so forth.
It so happens that the state of physical being or mental being does not long remain static. Therefore, there are various fluctuations. In the course of a single day an aberree may run from 0.5 to 3.5, up and down, as a mental being. An accident or illness could cause a similar fluctuation in a day.
These are, then, figures which can be assigned to four things: the mental state on an acute10 basis and the mental state on a general, average basis, and the physical being on an acute basis and the physical being on a general basis. In Dianetics, we do not much employ the physical Tone Scale. The mental Tone Scale, however, is of vast and vital importance!
These values of happiness, bearable existence, anger and apathy are not arbitrary" values. They are deduced from observation of the behavior of emotional states. A Clear is usually found varying around tone 4, plus or minus, in an average day. He is a general tone 4, which is one of the inherent conditions of being Clear. A norm in current society, at a wild guess, is probably around a general tone 2.8.
In this descriptive graph, which is two-dimensional, the vital data for the solution of the problem of the life dynamic are workably combined. The horizontal lines are in terms of geometric progression beginning with
10. acute: brief and severe.
11. arbitrary: based on one's preference, notion, whim, etc.; capricious.
38
GOAL OF MAN
the zero line immediately above death. There are ten lines for each zone and each zone denotes a mental or physical state of being, as noted. Geometric progression, so used, leaves ever-increasing spaces between the lines. The width of this space is the survival potential existing at the moment the top point of the survival dynamic arrow is within that space. The further away from death the top point of the survival dynamic arrow is, the better chance the individual has of survival. Geometric progression reaches up toward the impossible of infinity and cannot, of course, reach infinity. The organism is surviving through time from left to right. Survival optimum—immortality—lies in terms of time to the right. Potential only is measured vertically.
The survival dynamic actually resides within the organism as inherited from the species. The organism is part of the species as a railroad tie might be said to be part of a railroad as seen by an observer on a train, the observer being always in now—although this analogy is not perhaps the best.
Within itself the organism possesses a repulsive force toward pain sources. The source of the pain is not a driving force any more than the thorn bush which tears the hand was a driving force; the organism repulses the potential pain of a thorn.
At the same time the organism has at work a force which attracts it to the sources of pleasure. Pleasure does not magnetize the organism into drawing near. It is the organism which possesses the attraction force. It is inherent.
The repulsion of pain sources adds to the attraction for pleasure sources to operate as a combined thrust away from death and toward immortality. The thrust away from death is no more powerful than the thrust toward immortality. In other words, in terms of the survival
39
L. RON HUBBARD
dynamic, pleasure has as much validity as pain.
It should not be read here that survival is always a matter of keeping an eye on the future. Contemplation of pleasure, pure enjoyment, contemplation of past pleasures: all combine into harmonies which, while they operate automatically as a rise toward the survival potential, by their action within the organism physically, do not demand the future as an active portion of the mental computation in such contemplation.
A pleasure which reacts to injure the body physically, as in the case of debauchery,12 discovers at work a ratio between the physical effect (which is depressed toward pain) and the mental effect of experienced pleasure. There is a consequent lowering of the survival dynamic. Averaging out, the future possibility of strain because of the act, added to the state of being at the moment the debauchery was experienced, again depresses the survival dynamic. Because of this, various kinds of debauchery have been in indifferent odor'3 with man throughout his history. This is the equation of "immoral pleasures." And any action which has brought about survival suppression or which can bring it about, when pursued as a pleasure, has been denounced at some time or another in man's history. Immorality is originally hung as a label upon some act or class of actions because they depress the level of the survival dynamic. Future enforcement of moral stigma14 may depend largely upon prejudice and aberration and there is, consequently, a continuous quarrel over what is moral and what is immoral.
Because certain things practiced as pleasures are
12. debauchery: indulgence in harmful or immoral pleasures.
13. odor: repute; esteem.
14. stigma: a mark of shame, a stain on a person's good reputation.
40
THE GOAL OF MAN
actually pains—and how easy it will be to trace out why when you've finished this volume—and because of the moral equation as above, pleasure itself, in any aberrated society, can become decried.15 A certain kind of thinking, of which more later, permits poor differentiation between one object and another. Confusing a dishonest politician with all politicians would be an example of this. In ancient times, the Roman was fond of his pleasures and some of the things he called pleasure were a trifle strenuous on other species, such as Christians. When the Christian overthrew the pagan16 state, the ancient order of Rome was in a villain's role. Anything, therefore, which was Roman was villainous. This went to such remarkable lengths that the Roman love of bathing made bathing so immoral that Europe went unwashed for some fifteen hundred years. The Roman had become a pain source so general that everything Roman was evil and it stayed evil long after Roman paganism perished. Immorality, in such a fashion, tends to become an involved subject. In this case it became so involved that pleasure itself was stigmatized.
When half the survival potential is struck from the list of lawful things, there is a considerable reduction in survival indeed. Considering this graph on a racial scale, the reduction of survival potential by one-half would forecast that direful17 things lay in wait for the race. Actually, because man is after all man, no set of laws, however enforced, can completely wipe away the attraction of pleasure. But in this case enough was removed and banned to occasion precisely what
15. decried: spoken out against strongly and openly; denounced.
16. pagan: non-Christian; refers to those peoples who worshipped many gods, such as the Greeks and the Romans.
17. direful: dreadful; awful; terrible.
41
L. RON HUBBARD
happened: the Dark Ages18 and the recession of society. Society brightened only in those periods such as the Renaissance,19 in which pleasure became less unlawful.
When a race or an individual drops into the second zone, as marked on the chart, and the general tone ranges from the first zone barely into the third, a condition of insanity ensues. Insanity is irrationality. It is also a state in which nonsurvival has been so closely approached continually that the race or the organism engages in all manner of wild solutions.
In further interpretation of this descriptic20 graph there is the matter of the survival suppressor. This, it will be seen, is a thrust downward out of potential immortality at the race or organism represented as the survival dynamic. The survival suppressor is the combined and variable threats to the survival of the race or organism. These threats come from other species, from time, from other energies. These are also engaged in the contest of survival to potential immortality in terms of their own species or identities. Thus there is a conflict involved. Every other form of life or energy could be plotted in a descriptic as the survival dynamic. If we were to use a duck's survival dynamic in a descriptic graph, we would see the duck seeking a high survival level and man would be a part of the duck's suppressor.
18. Dark Ages: the Middle Ages, especially the earlier part from about A.D. 476 to about the end of the 10th century: so called from the idea that this period in Europe was characterized by intellectual stagnation, widespread ignorance and poverty, and cultural decline.
19. Renaissance: the great revival of art, literature and learning in Europe in the 14th, 15th and 16th centuries, based on classical (Greek and Roman) sources. It began in Italy and spread gradually to other countries and marked the transition from the medieval world (from about A.D. 500 to 1450) to the modern.
20. descriptic: representing or delineating by a picture or figure.
42
THE GOAL OF MAN
The balance and nature of things do not permit the infinity of the goal of immortality to be reached. In fluctuating balance and in almost unlimited complexity, life and energies ebb and flood, out of the nebulous, into forms and, through decay, into the nebulous once more.* Many equations could be drawn concerning this, but it is outside the sphere of our present interest.
In terms of the zones of the descriptic, it is of relative concern what the extent of the force of the suppressor is against the survival dynamic. The dynamic is inherent in individuals, groups and races, evolved to resist the suppressor through the eons. In the case of man, he carries with him another level of offensive and defensive techniques, his cultures. His primary technology of survival is mental activity governing physical action in the sentient echelon. But every life form has its own technology, formed to resolve the problems of food, protection and procreation. The degree of workability of the technology any life form develops (armor or brains, f leetness of foot or deceptive form) is a direct index of the survival potential, the relative immortality, of that form. There have been vast upsets in the past; man, when he developed into the world's most dangerous animal (he can and does kill or enslave any life form, doesn't he?), overloaded the suppressor on many other life forms and they dwindled in number or vanished.
* The Veda;1' also Lucretius'22 Nature of Things. —LRH
21. Veda: the most ancient sacred writings of the Hindus.
22. Lucretius: (987-55 B.C.) Roman poet who was the author of the unfinished On the Nature of Things, a didactic (instructional) poem in six books, setting forth in outline a complete science of the universe. The purpose of the work was to prove, by investigating the nature of the world in which man lives, that all things— including man—operate according to their own laws and are not in any way influenced by supernatural powers.
43
L. RON HUBBARD
A great climatic change, such as the one which packed so many mammoths in Siberian23 ice, may overload the suppressor on a life form. A long drought in the American Southwest in not too ancient times wiped out the better part of an Indian civilization.
A cataclysm24 such as an explosion of the core of the Earth, if that were possible, or the atom bomb or the sudden cessation of burning on the sun would wipe out all life forms on Earth.
And a life form can even overload the suppressor on itself. A dinosaur destroys all his food and so destroys the dinosaur. A bubonic plague25 bacillus26 attacks its hosts with such thorough appetite that the whole generation of Pasteurella pestis27 vanishes. Such things are not intended by the suicide to be suicide; the life form has run up against an equation which has an unknown variable, and the unknown variable unfortunately contained enough value to overload the suppressor. This is the "didn't know the gun was loaded" equation.
And if the bubonic plague bacillus overloads its own suppressor in an area and then ceases to trouble its food and shelter—the animals—then the animals consider themselves benefited.
Reckless and clever and well-nigh28 indestructible, man has led a course which is a far cry29 from "tooth
23. Siberian: of Siberia, a part of the Soviet Union in north Asia, extending from the Ural Mountains to the Pacific.
24. cataclysm: any great upheaval that causes sudden and violent changes, as an earthquake, war, etc.
25. bubonic plague: a very dangerous contagious disease, accompanied by fever, chills and swelling of the lymphatic glands. It is carried to humans by fleas from rats or squirrels.
26. bacillus: loosely, any of the bacteria, especially those causing a disease.
27. Pasteurella pestis: organism causing bubonic plague.
28. well-nigh: very nearly; almost.
29. a far cry: only remotely related; very different.
44
THE GOAL OF MAN
and claw" in every sphere. And so have the redwood tree and the shark. Just as a life form, man, like every life form, is "symbiotic."30 Life is a group effort. Lichens" and plankton32 and algae33 may do very well on sunlight and minerals alone, but they are the building blocks. Above such existence, as the forms grow more complex, a tremendous interdependence exists.
It is very well for a forester to believe that certain trees willfully kill all other varieties of trees around them and then conclude a specious34 "attitude" of trees. Let him look again. What made the soil? What provides the means of keeping the oxygen balance? What makes it possible for rain to fall in other areas? These willful and murderous trees. And squirrels plant trees. And man plants trees. And trees shelter trees of another kind. And animals fertilize trees. And trees shelter animals. And trees hold the soil so less well-rooted plants can grow. Look anywhere and everywhere and we see life as an assist for life. The multitude of the complexities of life as affinities35 for life is not dramatic. But they are the steady, practical, important reason life can continue to exist at all.
30. symbiotic: having to do with the living together of similar or dissimilar organisms for mutual benefit.
31. lichens: any of a large group of plants that look somewhat like moss and grow in patches on trees, rocks, etc.
32. plankton: the small animal and plant organisms that float or drift in water, especially at or near the surface. Plankton serves as an important source of food for larger animals, such as fish.
33. algae: a group of plants, either one-celled or many-celled, often growing in colonies. Algae contain chlorophyll (the green coloring matter of plants) and other pigments, but have no true root, stem or leaf. They are found in water or damp places and include seaweed, pond scum, etc.
34. specious: seeming to be good, sound, correct, logical, etc., without really being so; plausible but not genuine.
35. affinities: the attractions which exist between two human beings, or between human beings and other life organisms.
45
L. RON HUBBARD
A redwood tree may be first out for redwood trees and although it does an excellent job of seeming to exist as redwood alone, a closer glance will show it has dependencies and is depended upon.
Therefore, the dynamic of any life form can be seen to be assisted by many other dynamics and combines with them against the suppressive factors. None survive alone.
Necessity has been declared to be a very wonderful thing. But necessity is a word which has been taken rather loosely for granted. Opportunism36 seems to have been read largely into necessity. What is necessity? Besides being the "mother of invention," is it a dramatic, sudden thing which excuses wars and murders, which touches a man only when he is about to starve? Or is necessity a much gentler and less dramatic quantity? "Everything," according to Leucippus,37 "is driven by necessity." This is a keynote of much theorizing down through the ages. Driven: that is the key to the error. Driven, things are driven. Necessity drives. Pain drives. Necessity and pain, pain and necessity.
Recalling the dramatic and overlooking the important, man has conceived himself, from time to time, to be an object of chase by necessity and pain. These were two anthropomorphic (manlike) things which, in full costume, stuck spears at him. It can be said to be a wrong concept merely because it does not work to produce more answers.
Whatever there is of necessity is within him. Nothing is driving him except his original impetus to survive. And he carries that within himself or his group. Within
36. opportunism: the policy or practice, as in politics, business or one's personal affairs, of adapting actions, decisions, etc., to expediency or effectiveness regardless of the sacrifice of ethical principles.
37. Leucippus: Greek philosopher of the 5th century B.C.
46
THE GOAL OF MAN
him is the force with which he fends off pain. Within him is the force with which he attracts pleasure.
It chances to be a scientific fact that man is a self-determined organism to the outermost limit that any form of life can be, for he still depends upon other forms of life and his general environment. But he is self-determined. This is a matter which will be covered later. But right here it is necessary to indicate that he is not inherently a determined organism in the sense that he is driven on this wonderful stimulus-response basis which looks so neat in certain textbooks, and works so completely unworkably in the world of man. The happy little illustrations about rats do not serve when we are talking about man. The more complex the organism, the less reliably the stimulus-response equation works. And when one reaches that highest complexity, man, he has reached a fine degree of variability in terms of stimulus-response. The more sentient, the more rational an organism, the more that organism is self-determined. Self-determinism, like all things, is relative. Compared to a rat, however, man is very self-determined indeed. This is only a scientific fact because it can easily be proven.
The more sentient the man, the less he is a "pushbutton" instrument. Aberrated and reduced, he can, of course, in a limited degree, be made to perform like a marionette; but then it is understood that the more aberrated a person is, the closer he approaches the intelligence quotient of an animal.
Given this self-determinism, it is interesting to observe what a man does with it. While he can never escape the "didn't know it was loaded" equation in terms of cataclysm or the unexpected gain of some other life form, he operates in a high zone level of survival potential. But here he is, self-determined, rational, his primary weapon—his mind—in excellent
47
L. RON HUBBARD
working order. What are his necessity instincts?
Necessity, according to that very sentient if rapidly subject-changing article, the dictionary, is "the state of being necessary; that which is unavoidable; compulsion." It also adds that necessity is "extreme poverty," but we don't want that. We are talking about survival.
The compulsion mentioned can be reevaluated in terms of the survival dynamic. That is interior in the organism and the race. And what is "necessary" to survival?
We have seen and can prove clinically that there are two factors at work. The necessity of avoiding pain is a factor because degree by degree, little things, not much in themselves, can amount to large pains which, compounded in that rapid geometric progression, bring on death. Pain is the sadness of being bawled out38 for poor work, because that may lead to being fired, which may lead to starvation, which may lead to death. Run any equation into which pain has entered and it can be seen that it reduces down to possible nonsurvival. And if this were all there were to surviving and if necessity were a vicious little gnome39 with a pitchfork, it seems rather obvious that there would be scant reason to go on living. But there is the other part of the equation: pleasure. That is a more stable part than pain, Stoics40 to the contrary, as clinical tests in Dianetics prove.
There is therefore a necessity for pleasure, for working, as happiness can be defined, toward known goals over not unknowable obstacles. And the necessity for
38. bawled out: (slang) scolded angrily.
39. gnome: (folklore) any of a race of small, misshapen, dwarf-like beings, supposed to dwell in the earth and guard its treasures.
40. Stoics: people who maintain or affect the mental attitude advocated by the Stoics, a Greek school of philosophy, founded by Zeno about 308 B.C. , holding that human beings should be free from passion and calmly accept all occurrences as the unavoidable result of divine will.
48
THE GOAL OF MAN
pleasure is such that a great deal of pain can be borne to attain it. Pleasure is the positive commodity. It is enjoyment of work, contemplation of deeds well done; it is a good book or a good friend; it is taking all the skin off one's knees climbing the Matterhorn;41 it is hearing the kid first say "Daddy"; it is a brawl on the Bund42 at Shanghai or the whistle of amour43 from a doorway; it's adventure and hope and enthusiasm and "someday I'll learn to paint"; it's eating a good meal or kissing a pretty girl or playing a stiff game of bluff on the stock exchange. It's what man does that he enjoys doing; it's what man does that he enjoys contemplating; it's what man does that he enjoys remembering; and it may be just the talk of things he knows he'll never do.
Man will endure a lot of pain to obtain a little pleasure. Out in the laboratory of the world, it takes very little time to confirm that.
And how does necessity fit this picture? There is a necessity for pleasure, a necessity as live and quivering and vital as the human heart itself. He who said that a man who had two loaves of bread should sell one to buy white hyacinth,44 spoke sooth.45 The creative, the constructive, the beautiful, the harmonious, the adventurous, yes, and even escape from the maw46 of oblivion: these things are pleasure and these things are necessity. There was a man once who had walked a thousand miles just to see an orange tree and another who was a
41. Matterhorn: a mountain on the border of Switzerland and Italy.
42. Bund: a street running along the waterfront in Shanghai (a seaport in eastern China).
43. amour: (French) love.
44. hyacinth: a plant of the lily family, widely cultivated for its cylindrical cluster of fragrant flowers in a variety of colors.
45. sooth: truth.
46. maw: anything thought of as consuming, devouring, etc., without end.
49
L. RON HUBBARD
mass of scars and poor-set bones who was eager just to get a chance to "fan47 another bronc."
It is very well to dwell in some Olympian48 height and write a book of penalties and very well to read to find what writers said that other writers said, but it is not very practical.
The pain-drive theory49 does not work. If some of these basics of Dianetics were only poetry about the idyllic50 state of man, they might be justified in that, but it happens that out in the laboratory of the world, they work.
Man, in affinity with man, survives, and that survival is pleasure.
47. fan: (Western US, chiefly cowboy use) slap the flanks (of a horse or other animal) repeatedly with a hat to get it to move or move faster.
48. Olympian: of, resembling, characteristic of or suitable to the gods of Olympus (mountain in northeastern Greece); majestic or aloof.
49. pain-drive theory: the theory that pain, deprivation or other unpleasant consequence imposed on or experienced by an organism responding incorrectly under specific conditions establishes, through avoidance, the desired learning or behavior.
50. idyllic: pleasing and simple; pastoral (characteristic of rural life, idealized as peaceful, simple and natural) or picturesque.
50
CHAPTER FOUR
The Four Dynamics
In the original equations of Dianetics, when the research was young, it was believed that survival could be envisioned in personal terms alone and still answer all conditions. A theory is only as good as it works. And it works as well as it explains observed data and predicts new material which will be found, in fact, to exist.
Survival in personal terms was computed until the whole activity of man could be theoretically explained in terms of self alone. The logic looked fairly valid. But then it was applied to the world. Something was wrong: it did not solve problems. In fact, the theory of survival in personal terms alone was so unworkable that it left a majority of behavior phenomena unexplained. But it could be computed and it still looked good.
Then it was that a nearly intuitive idea occurred. Man's understanding developed in ratio to his recognition of his brotherhood with the universe. That was high-flown but it yielded results.
Was man himself a brotherhood of man? He had evolved and become strong as a gregarious' being, an animal that hunted in packs. It seemed possible that all his activities could be computed in terms of the survival of the group. That computation was made. It looked good. Man survived, it was postulated, solely in terms of the survival of his group. It looked good but it left a majority of observed phenomena unexplained.
1. gregarious: living in herds or flocks.
51
L. RON HUBBARD
It was attempted, then, to explain man's behavior in terms of mankind alone; which is to say, it was assumed that mankind survived for mankind in a highly altruistic2 way. This was straight down the sylvan3 path of Jean Jacques Rousseau.4 It could be computed that man lived alone for the survival of all mankind. But when addressed to the laboratory—the world—it did not work.
Finally, it was recalled that some had thought that man's entire activity and all his behavior could be explained by assuming that he lived for sex alone. This was not an original assumption. But some original computations were made upon it and it is true that, by a few quick twists of the equation, his survival activity can be made to resolve on only the sexual basis. But when this was applied to observed data, again it failed to explain every phenomenon.
An examination was made of what had been attempted. It had been assumed that man survived only for himself as an individual; it had been computed that he survived only for the group, the pack, for society; it had been postulated that he survived only for mankind; and finally, it had been theorized that he lived only for sex. None worked alone.
A new computation was made on the survival dynamic. Exactly for what was man surviving? All four of these factors—self, sex, group and mankind—were entered into a new equation. And now it was found, a theory was in hand which worked. It explained all observed phenomena and it predicted new phenomena
2. altruistic: having unselfish concern for the welfare of others.
3. sylvan: of or characteristic of the woods or forests. Used figuratively, as Rousseau's philosophy of the "natural man."
4. Jean Jacques Rousseau: (1712-1778) Swiss-born French philosopher, author, political theorist and composer, who argued that nature is good and civilization bad.
52
THE FOUR DYNAMICS
which were discovered to exist. It was a scientific equation, therefore!
From the survival dynamic, in this fashion, were evolved the four dynamics. By survival dynamic was meant the basic command Survive! which underlay all activity. By dynamic was meant one of the four purpose divisions of the entire dynamic principle. The four dynamics were not new forces; they were subdivisions of the primary force.
Dynamic one is the urge toward ultimate survival on the part of the individual and for himself. It includes his immediate symbiotes,* the extension of culture for his own benefit and name immortality.
Dynamic two is the urge of the individual toward ultimate survival via the sex act, the creation of and the rearing of children. It includes their symbiotes, the extension of culture for them and their future provision.
Dynamic three is the urge of the individual toward ultimate survival for the group. It includes the symbiotes of the group and the extension of its culture.
Dynamic four includes the urge of the individual toward ultimate survival for all mankind. It includes the symbiotes of mankind and the extension of its culture.
Life, the atom and the universe and energy itself are included under the symbiotic classification.
It will be seen immediately that these four dynamics are actually a spectrum without sharp division lines. The survival dynamic can be seen to sweep out from the individual to embrace the entire species and its symbiotes.
None of these dynamics is necessarily stronger than any of the others. Each is strong. They are the four
* The Dianetic meaning of symbiote is extended beyond the dictionary definition to mean "any or all life or energy forms which are mutually dependent for survival." The atom depends on the universe, the universe on the atom. —LRH
53
L. RON HUBBARD
roads a man takes to survival. And the four roads are actually one road. And the one road is actually a spectrum of thousands of roads contained within the four. They are all in terms of past, present and future in that the present may be a sum of the past and the future may be the product of the past and present.
All the purposes of man can be considered to lie within this spectrum and all behavior becomes explained.
That man is selfish is a valid statement when one means an aberrated man. That man is antisocial is an equally valid statement if one adds the modifier, aberration. And other such statements resolve equally.
Now, it happens that these four dynamics can be seen to compete, one with another, in their operation within an individual or a society. There is a rational reason for this. The phrase "social competition" is a compound of aberrated behavior and sentient difficulties.
Any man, group or race may be in contest with any race, group or man and even in contest with sex on an entirely rational level.
The equation of the optimum solution would be that a problem has been well resolved which portends* the maximum good for the maximum number of dynamics. That is to say that any solution, modified by the time available to put the solution into effect, should be creative or constructive for the greatest possible number of dynamics. The optimum solution for any problem would be a solution which achieved the maximum benefit in all the dynamics. This means that a man, determining upon some project, would fare best if he benefited everything concerned in the four dynamics as his project touched them. He would then have to benefit himself as well for the solution to be optimum. In other words, the
5. portends: is an indication of; signifies.
54
THE FOUR DYNAMICS
benefiting of the group and mankind dynamics but the blocking of the sex dynamic and the self dynamic would be much poorer than the best solution. The survival conduct pattern is built upon this equation of the optimum solution. It is the basic equation of all rational behavior and is the equation on which a Clear functions. It is inherent in man.
In other words, the best solution to any problem is that which will bring the greatest good to the greatest number of beings, including self, progeny,6 family associates, political and racial groups, and at length to all mankind. The greatest good may require, as well, some destruction, but the solution deteriorates in a ratio to the destructiveness employed. Self-sacrifice and selfishness are alike reductive of the optimum action equation and alike have been suspected and should be.
This is entirely a matter of does it work? Even on an unaberrated basis there are times when one or another of these dynamics have to be dropped from the computation of some activity or other and indeed, few problems are so entirely intense that they must take into account all the dynamics. But when a problem achieves such intensity, and time is not an important factor, serious errors can follow the omission of one or another of the dynamics from the factors considered.
In the case of a Napoleon7 "saving France" at the expense of the remainder of mankind in Europe, the equation of the optimum solution was so far neglected that all the revolutionary gains of the French people
6. progeny: children, descendants or offspring collectively.
7. Napoleon: Napoleon Bonaparte (1769-1821), French military leader and emperor of France (1804-1815). He led a brilliant campaign of French domination in Europe but ended in ruin, spending the last years of his life as a prisoner on a lonely British island.
55
L. RON HUBBARD
were lost. In the case of Caesar8 "saving Rome," the equation was so poorly done that the survival of Rome was impeded.
But there are special cases when the equation of the optimum solution becomes so involved with time that certain dynamics must be neglected to permit other dynamics to persist. The case of a sailor giving his own life to save his ship answers the group dynamic. Such an action is a valid solution to a problem. But it violates the optimum solution because it did not answer for dynamic one: self.
Many examples of various kinds could be cited where one or another of the dynamics must, of necessity, receive priority, all on an entirely rational basis.
On an aberrated basis, the equation is still valid but complicated by irrationalities which have no part of the situation. Many solutions are bad merely because of false educational data or no data at all. But these are still solutions. In the case of aberrated solutions, the dynamics are actually and actively impeded, as will later be outlined in full.
8. Caesar: Julius Caesar (1007-44 B.C.), Roman general and statesman. As part of his military conquests, he invaded Britain in 55 and 54 B.C. Became Roman dictator in 49 B.C.
56
CHAPTER FIVE
Summary
The dynamic principle of existence is survival.
This survival can be graduated into four zones, each one progressively portending a better opportunity of reaching the potential of immortality. Zone 0 borders from death and includes apathy; zone 1 borders from apathy and includes violent effort; zone 2 borders from violence into mediocre, but not entirely satisfactory, success; zone 3 borders from the mediocre to the excellent chance. These zones are each occasioned by the ratio of the suppressor to the survival dynamic. In apathy, zone 0, the suppressor appears too great to be overcome. In the area of violence, zone 1, the suppressor more or less overbalances the survival dynamic, requiring enormous effort which, when expended without result, drops the organism into the zero zone. In the area of mediocrity, zone 2, the suppressor and the survival dynamic are more or less evenly balanced. In the area of zone 3, the survival dynamic has overcome the suppressor and, the chances of survival being excellent, is the area of high response to problems. These four zones might be classed as the zone of no hope, the zone of violent action, the area of balance and the area of high hope. Clinical experiment is the basis of these zones since they follow a progress of mental or physical being as it rises from the death area into high existence.
The four dynamics are subdivisions of the survival dynamic and are, in mankind, the thrust toward potential survival in terms of entities. They embrace all the purposes, activities and behavior of mankind. They
57
L. RON HUBBARD
could be said to be a survival conduct pattern. The first of these, but not necessarily the most important nor yet the one which will receive priority in various efforts, is the individual dynamic, Dynamic one, which includes the personal survival of the individual as a living person and the survival of his personal symbiotes. Dynamic two is the thrust toward potential immortality through children and includes all sexual activity as well as the symbiotes of the children. Dynamic three is survival in terms of the group, which term may include such things as a club, a military company, a city, a state, a nation; this would include the symbiotes of the group. Dynamic four is the thrust toward potential immortality of mankind as a species and the symbiotes of mankind. Embraced within these classifications are any part of existence, any form of matter and, indeed, the universe.
Any problem or situation discoverable within the activities or purposes of mankind is embraced within these dynamics.
The equation of the optimum solution is inherent within the organism and, modified by education or viewpoint and modified further by time, is the operating method of unaberrated individuals, groups or mankind. The equation of the optimum solution is always present even in severely aberrated individuals and is used as modified by their education, viewpoint and available time. The aberration does not remove activity from the dynamics of survival. Aberrated conduct is irrational survival conduct and is fully intended to lead to survival. That the intent is not the act does not eradicate the intent.
These Are the Fundamental Axioms of Dianetics:
The dynamic principle of existence—Survive!
58
SUMMARY
Survival, considered as the single and sole purpose, subdivides into four dynamics.
Dynamic one is the urge of the individual toward survival for the individual and his symbiotes. (By symbiote is meant all entities and energies which aid survival.)
Dynamic two is the urge of the individual toward survival through procreation; it includes both the sex act and the raising of progeny, the care of children and their symbiotes.
Dynamic three is the urge of the individual toward survival for the group or the group for the group and includes the symbiotes of that group.
Dynamic four is the urge of the individual toward survival for mankind or the urge toward survival of mankind for mankind as well as the group for mankind, etc., and includes the symbiotes of mankind.
The absolute goal of survival is immortality or infinite survival. This is sought by the individual in terms of himself as an organism, as a spirit or as a name or as his children, as a group of which he is a member or as mankind and the progeny and symbiotes of others as well as his own.
The reward of survival activity is pleasure.
The ultimate penalty of destructive activity is death or complete nonsurvival, and is pain.
Successes raise the survival potential toward infinite survival.
Failures lower the survival potential toward death.
The human mind is engaged upon perceiving and retaining data, composing or computing conclusions
59
L. RON HUBBARD
and posing and resolving problems related to organisms along all four dynamics; and the purpose of perception, retention, concluding and resolving problems is to direct its own organism and symbiotes and other organisms and symbiotes along the four dynamics toward survival.
Intelligence is the ability to perceive, pose and resolve problems.
The dynamic is the tenacity to life and vigor and persistence in survival.
Both the dynamic and intelligence are necessary to persist and accomplish and neither is a constant quantity from individual to individual, group to group.
The dynamics are inhibited by engrams, which lie across them and disperse life force.
Intelligence is inhibited by engrams which feed false or improperly graded data into the analyzer.1
Happiness is the overcoming of not unknown obstacles toward a known goal and, transiently, the contemplation of or indulgence in pleasure.
The analytical mind is that portion of the mind which perceives and retains experience data to compose and resolve problems and direct the organism along the four dynamics. It thinks in differences and similarities.
The reactive mind is that portion of the mind which files and retains physical pain and painful emotion and seeks to direct the organism solely on a stimulus-response basis. It thinks only in identities.
The somatic mind is that mind which, directed by the analytical or reactive mind, places solutions into effect on the physical level.
1. analyzer: see analytical mind in the glossary.
60
SUMMARY
A training pattern is that stimulus-response mechanism resolved by the analytical mind to care for routine activity or emergency activity. It is held in the somatic mind and can be changed at will by the analytical mind.
Habit is that stimulus-response reaction dictated by the reactive mind from the content of engrams and put into effect by the somatic mind. It can be changed only by those things which change engrams.
Aberrations, under which is included all deranged or irrational behavior, are caused by engrams. They are stimulus-response, pro- and contrasurvival.
Psychosomatic ills are caused by engrams.
The engram is the single source of aberrations and psychosomatic ills.
Moments of "unconsciousness," when the analytical mind is attenuated2 in greater or lesser degree, are the only moments when engrams can be received.
The engram is a moment of "unconsciousness" containing physical pain or painful emotion and all perceptions, and is not available to the analytical mind as experience.
Emotion is three things: engramic response to situations, endocrine metering of the body to meet situations on an analytical level, and the inhibition or the furtherance of life force.
The potential value of an individual or a group may be expressed by the equation
PV = ID" where I is Intelligence and D is Dynamic.
2. attenuated: weakened or reduced in force, intensity, effect, quantity or value.
61
L. RON HUBBARD
The worth of an individual is computed in terms of the alignment, on any dynamic, of his potential value with optimum survival along that dynamic. A high PV may, by reversed vector,3 result in a negative worth as in some severely aberrated persons, A high PV on any dynamic assures a high worth only in the unaberrated person.
3. vector: a physical quantity with both magnitude and direction, such as a force or velocity.
62
Book Two
The Single Source of All Inorganic Mental
and Organic Psychosomatic Ills
CHAPTER ONE
The Analytical Mind and the Standard Memory Banks
This chapter begins the search for human error and tells where it is not.
The human mind can be considered to have three major divisions. First, there is the analytical mind; second, there is the reactive mind; and third, there is the somatic mind.
Consider the analytical mind as a computing machine. This is analogy because the analytical mind, while it behaves like a computing machine, is yet more fantastically capable than any computing machine ever constructed and infinitely more elaborate. It could be called the "computational mind" or the "egsusheyftef." But for our purposes, the analytical mind, as a descriptive name, will do. This mind may live in the prefrontal lobes'—there is some hint of that—but this is a problem of structure, and nobody really knows about structure. So we shall call this computational part of the mind the "analytical mind" because it analyzes data.
The monitor can be considered part of the analytical mind. The monitor could be called the center of awareness of the person. It, inexactly speaking, is the person. It has been approximated by various names for thousands of years, each one reducing down to "I." The monitor is in control of the analytical mind. It is not in control because it has been told to be but only because it is, inherently. It is not a demon who lives in the skull nor a little man who vocalizes one's thoughts. It is "I."
1. prefrontal lobes: portion of the brain directly behind the forehead.
65
L. RON HUBBARD
No matter how many aberrations a person may have, "I" is always "I." No matter how "clear" a person becomes, "I" is still "I." "I" may be submerged now and then in an aberree, but it is always present.
The analytical mind shows various evidences of being an organ, but as we know in this age so little of structure, the full structural knowledge of the analytical mind must come after we know what it does. And in Dianetics we know precisely that for the first time. It is known and can be proven with ease that the analytical mind, be it one organ of the body or several, behaves as you would expect any good computing machine to behave.
What would you want in a computing machine? The action of the analytical mind—or analyzer—is everything anyone could want from the best computer available. It can and does do all the tricks of a computer. And over and above that, it directs the building of computers. And it is as thoroughly right as any computer ever was. The analytical mind is not just a good computer, it is a perfect computer. It never makes a mistake. It cannot err in any way so long as a human being is reasonably intact (unless something has carried away a piece of his mental equipment).
The analytical mind is incapable of error, and it is so certain that it is incapable of error that it works out everything on the basis that it cannot make an error. If a person says, "I cannot add," he either means that he has never been taught to add or that he has an aberration about adding. It does not mean that there is anything wrong with the analytical mind.
While the whole being is, in an aberrated state, grossly capable of error, still the analytical mind is not. For a computer is just as good as the data on which it operates and no better. Aberration, then, arises from the nature of the data offered to the analytical mind as a problem to be computed.
66
THE ANALYTICAL MIND AND THE STANDARD MEMORY BANKS
The analytical mind has its standard memory banks. Just where these are located structurally is again no concern of ours at this time. To operate, the analytical mind has to have percepts2 (data), memory (data) and imagination (data).
There are another data storage bank and another part of the human mind which contain aberrations and are the source of insanities. These will be fully covered later and should not be confused with either the analytical mind or the standard memory banks.
Whether the data contained in the standard memory banks is evaluated correctly or not, it is all there. The various senses receive information and this information files straight into the standard memory banks. It does not go through the analyzer first. It is filed and the analyzer then has it from the standard banks.
There are several of these standard banks and they may be duplicated in themselves so that there are several of each kind of bank. Nature seems generous in such things. There is a bank, or set of banks, for each perception. These can be considered racks of data filed in a cross-index system which would make an intelligence officer3 purple with envy. Any single percept is filed as a concept. The sight of a moving car, for instance, is filed in the visio-bank in color and motion, at the time seen; cross-indexed to the area in which seen; cross-indexed to all data about cars; cross-indexed to thoughts about cars; and so forth and so forth, with the additional filing of conclusions (thought stream) of the moment and thought streams of the past with all their conclusions. The sound of that car is similarly filed from the ears straight into the audio-bank, and
2. percepts: recognizable sensations or impressions received by the mind through the senses.
3. intelligence officer: a military officer responsible for collecting and processing data on hostile forces, weather and terrain.
67
L. RON HUBBARD
cross-indexed multitudinously as before. The other sensations of that moment are also filed in their own banks.
Now, it may be that the whole filing is done in one bank. It would be simpler that way. But this is not a matter of structure but mental performance. Eventually somebody will discover just how they are filed. Right now the function of filing is all that interests us.
Every percept—sight, sound, smell, feeling, taste, organic sensation, pain, rhythm, kinesthesia (weight and muscular motion) and emotion—is each properly and neatly filed in the standard banks in full. It does not matter how many aberrations a physically intact person has or whether he thinks he can or cannot contain this data or recall it; the file is there and is complete.
This file begins at a very early period, of which more later. It then runs consecutively, whether the individual is asleep or awake, except in moments of "unconsciousness,"* for an entire lifetime. It apparently has an infinite capacity.
The numbers of these concepts (concept means "that which is retained after something has been perceived") would stagger an astronomer's computer. The existence and profusion of memories retained were discovered and studied in a large number of cases, and they can be examined in anyone by certain processes.
Everything in this bank is correct insofar as the single action of perception is concerned. There may be organic errors in the organs of perception, such as blindness or deafness (when physical, not aberrational), which would leave blanks in the banks; and there may
* Unconsciousness throughout this work means a greater or lesser reduction of awareness on the part of "I"—an attenuation of working power of the analytical mind.
-LRH
68
THE ANALYTICAL MIND AND THE STANDARD MEMORY BANKS
be organic impairment, such as partial organic deafness, which would leave partial blanks. But these things are not errors in the standard memory banks; they are simply absence of data. Like the computer, the standard memory banks are perfect, recording faithfully and reliably.
Now, part of the standard banks is audio-semantic,4 which is to say, the recordings of words heard. And part of the banks is visio-semantic, which is to say, the recordings of words read. These are special parts of the sound and sight files. A blind man who has to read with his fingers develops a tactile-semantic file. The content of the speech files is exactly as heard without alteration.
Another interesting part of the standard memory banks is that they apparently file the original and hand forward exact copies to the analyzer. They will hand out as many exact copies as are demanded without diminishing the actual file original. And they hand out these copies each in kind with color-motion sight, tone-audio, etc.
The amount of material which is retained in the average standard memory banks would fill several libraries. But the method of retention is invariable. And the potentiality of recall is perfect.
The primary source of error in "rational" computation comes under the headings of insufficient data and erroneous data. The individual, daily facing new situations, is not always in possession of all the material he requires to make a decision. And he may have been told something on "good authority" which was not true and yet which did not find counterevidence in the banks.
Between the standard banks, which are perfect and reliable, and the computer—the analytical mind—which
4. semantic:  of,  pertaining to or arising from the different meanings of words or other symbols.
69
L. RON HUBBARD
is perfect and reliable, there is no irrational concourse.5 The answer is always as right as it can be made to be in the light of data at hand, and that is all anyone can ask of a computing device or a recording device.
The analytical mind goes even further in its efforts to be right than one would suppose. It constantly checks and weighs new experience in the light of old experience, forms new conclusions in the light of old conclusions, changes old conclusions, and generally is very busy being right.
The analytical mind might be considered to have been given a sacred post of trust by the cells to safeguard the colony, and it does everything within its power to carry out that mission. It has correct data, as correct as possible; and it does correct computations on them, as correct as they can be made. When one considers the enormous number of factors which one handles, for instance, in the action of driving a car ten blocks, he can appreciate how very, very busy on how very many levels that analytical mind can be.
Now, before we introduce the villain of this piece, the reactive mind, it is necessary to understand something about the relation of the analytical mind to the organism itself.
The analytical mind, charged with full responsibility, is far from without authority to carry out its actions and desires. Through the mechanisms of the life function regulator (which handles all the mechanical functions of living), the analytical mind can affect any function of the body it desires to affect.
In excellent working order—which is to say, when the organism is not aberrated—the analytical mind can influence the heartbeat, the endocrines (such things as
5. concourse: concurrence in action or causation, cooperation; combined action.
70
THE ANALYTICAL MIND AND THE STANDARD MEMORY BANKS
calcium and sugar in the blood, adrenaline," etc.), selective blood flow (stopping it in the limbs or starting it at will), urine, excreta,7 etc. All glandular, rhythm and fluid functions of the body can be at the command of the analytical mind. This is not to say that in a cleared person they always are. That would be very uncomfortable and bothersome. But it does say that the analytical mind can effect changes at desire when it skills itself to do so. This is a matter of laboratory proof, very easy to do.
People have long been intuitive about the "full power of the mind." Well, the full power of the mind would be the analytical mind working with the standard memory banks, the life function regulator and one other thing.
The last and most important thing is, of course, the organism. It is in the charge of the analytical mind. And the analytical mind controls it in other ways than life function. All muscles and the remainder of the organism can be under the full command of the analytical mind.
In order to keep it and its circuits free of bric-a-brac and minor activities, the analytical mind is provided with a learned training pattern regulator. Into this, by education, it can place the stimulus-response patterns necessary for the performance of tasks like talking, walking, piano playing, etc. These learned patterns are not unchangeable. Because they are selected by the analytical mind after thought and effort, there is seldom any need to change them; if new situations arise, a new pattern is trained into the muscles. None of these are "conditionings"; they are simply training patterns
6. adrenaline: a hormone secreted by the adrenal gland, that stimulates the heart, increases muscular strength, etc.
7. excreta: waste matter excreted from the body, as sweat or urine.
71
L. RON HUBBARD
which the organism can use without attention of any magnitude from the analyzer. An uncountable number of such patterns can be laid into the organism by this method. And they are not the source of any trouble since they file by time and situation, and a very little thought will serve to annul old ones in favor of new ones.
All muscles, voluntary and "involuntary," can be at the command of the analytical mind.
Here, then, is the composite of a sentient being. There is no chance for error beyond the errors incident to insufficient data and erroneous but accepted data (and the last will be used by the analyzer just once if that once proves the data to be wrong). Here is the realm of pleasure, emotion, creation and construction and even destruction, if the computation on the optimum solution says something has to be destroyed.
The dynamics underlie the activities of the analytical mind. The urge toward survival explains all its actions. That we can understand the fundamental simplicity of the functional mechanism does not, however, mean that a man operating this way alone is cold or calculating or intent on "tooth and claw." The nearer man approaches this optimum, in an individual or in a whole society, the quicker and warmer is that society, the more honest may be its moods and actions.
Sanity depends upon rationality. Here is optimum rationality and therefore optimum sanity. And here also are all the things man likes to think man should be like or, for that matter, what he has represented his better gods to be like. This is the Clear.
This is sanity. This is happiness. This is survival.
Where is the error?
72
CHAPTER Two
The Reactive Mind
It is fairly well accepted in these times that life in all forms evolved from the basic building blocks: the virus1 and the cell. Its only relevance to Dianetics is that such a proposition works—and actually that is all we ask of Dianetics. There is no point to writing here a vast tome on biology and evolution. We can add some chapters to those things, but Charles Darwin did his job well and the fundamental principles of evolution can be found in his and other works.
The proposition on which Dianetics was originally entered was evolution. It was postulated that the cells themselves had the urge to survive and that that urge was common to life. It was further postulated that organisms—individuals—were constructed of cells and were in fact aggregations2 of colonies of cells.
As went the building block, so went the organism. In the finite realms and for any of our purposes, man could be considered to be a colonial aggregation of cells and it could be assumed that his purpose was identical with the purpose of his building blocks.
The cell is a unit of life which is seeking to survive and only to survive.
Man is a structure of cells which are seeking to survive and only to survive.
Man's mind is the command post of operation and is
1. virus: a microscopic agent that can reproduce only within the cells of living hosts—mainly bacteria, plants and animals.
2. aggregations: groups or masses of distinct things or individuals.
73
L. RON HUBBARD
constructed to resolve problems and pose problems related to survival and only to survival.
The action of survival, if optimum, would lead to survival.
The optimum survival conduct pattern was formulated and then studied for exceptions, and there were no exceptions found.
The survival conduct pattern was discovered to be far from sterile and barren but was full of rich and most pleasant activity.
None of these postulates outlawed any concept concerning the human soul or divine or creative imagination. It was understood perfectly that this was a study in the finite universe only and that spheres and realms of thought and action might very well exist above this finite sphere. But it was also discovered that none of these factors were needed to resolve the entire problem of aberration and irrational conduct.
The human mind was discovered to have been most grossly maligned,3 for it was found to be possessed of capabilities far in excess of any heretofore imagined, much less tested.
Basic human character was found to have been pilloried4 because man had not been able to distinguish between irrational conduct derived from poor data and irrational conduct derived from another far more vicious source.
If there ever was a devil, he designed the reactive mind.
This functional mechanism managed to bury itself from view so thoroughly that only inductive5 philosophy,
3. maligned: spoken evil of; defamed; slandered.
4. pilloried: held up to public ridicule or scorn.
5. inductive: of or using induction, logical reasoning that a general law exists because particular cases that seem to be examples of it exist.
74
THE REACTIVE MIND
traveling from effect back to cause, served to uncover it. The detective work which was invested in the location of this archcriminal of the human psyche occupied many years. Its identity can now be certified by any technician in any clinic or in any group of men. Two hundred and seventy-three individuals have been examined and treated, representing all the various types of inorganic mental illness and the many varieties of psychosomatic ills. In each one this reactive mind was found operating, its principles unvaried. This is a long series of cases and will soon become longer.
The reactive mind is possessed by everyone. No human being examined anywhere was discovered to be without one or without aberrative content in his engram bank, the reservoir of data which serves the reactive mind.
What does this mind do? It shuts off hearing recall. It places vocal circuits in the mind. It makes people tone-deaf. It makes people stutter. It does anything and everything that can be found in any list of mental ills: psychoses, neuroses, compulsions, repressions . . .
What can it do? It can give a man arthritis,6 bursi-tis,7 asthma,8 allergies, sinusitis,9 coronary10 trouble, high blood pressure and so on, down the whole catalog of psychosomatic ills, adding a few more which were never specifically classified as psychosomatic, such as the common cold.
And it is the only thing in the human being which
6. arthritis: a condition causing inflammation, pain and stiffness in the joints.
1. bursitis: inflammation of a bursa, a pouch between joints or between muscles or skin, etc., and bones, for lessening friction.
8. asthma: a generally chronic disorder characterized by wheezing, coughing, difficulty in breathing and a suffocating feeling.
9. sinusitis: inflammation of one or more sinus cavities in the skull.
10. coronary: of or pertaining to the human heart, with respect to health.
75
L. RON HUBBARD
can produce these effects. It is the thing which uniformly brings them about.
This is the mind which made Socrates" think he had a "demon" that gave him answers. This is the mind that made Caligula'2 appoint his horse to a government post. This is the mind which made Caesar cut the right hands from thousands of Gauls,13 which made Napoleon reduce the height of Frenchmen one inch.
This is the mind which keeps war a thing of alarm, which makes politics irrational, which makes superior officers snarl, which makes children cry in fear of the dark. This is the mind which makes a man suppress his hopes, which holds his apathies, which gives him irresolution when he should act and kills him before he has begun to live.
If there ever was a devil, he invented it.
Discharge the content of this mind's bank and the arthritis vanishes, myopia14 gets better, heart illness decreases, asthma disappears, stomachs function properly and the whole catalog of ills goes away and stays away.
Discharge the reactive engram bank and the schizophrenic15 faces reality at last, the manic-depressive16
11. Socrates: (ca. 469-399 B.C.) Greek philosopher and teacher who believed in a "demon" whose voice warned him whenever he was about to make a wrong decision.
12. Caligula: (A.D. 12-41) Roman emperor (A.D. 37-41). His reign was marked by extreme cruelty and tyranny.
13. Gauls: any of the Celtic-speaking people of Gaul, ancient region in western Europe consisting of what is now mainly France and Belgium.
14. myopia: inability to see clearly what is far away—nearsighted-ness.
15. schizophrenic: (psychiatry) person suffering from schizophrenia, a mental illness in which an individual is being two people madly inside of himself. It is a psychiatry classification derived from the Latin schizo, meaning "split," and the Greek phren, meaning "mind."
16. manic-depressive: (psychiatry) having a mental disorder marked by alternating extremes of excitement and depression.
76
THE REACTIVE MIND
sets forth to accomplish things, the neurotic stops clinging to books which tell him how much he needs his neuroses and begins to live, the woman stops snapping at her children, and the dipsomaniac17 can drink when he likes and stop.
These are scientific facts. They compare invariably with observed experience.
The reactive mind is the entire source of aberration. It can be proved and has been repeatedly proven that there is no other, for when that engram bank is discharged, all undesirable symptoms vanish and a man begins to operate on his optimum pattern.
If one were looking for something like demons in a human mind—such as those one observes in some inmates of madhouses—he could find them easily enough. Only they are not demons. They are bypass circuits from the engram bank. What prayers and exhortations have been used against these bypass circuits!
If one did not believe in demons, if one supposed that man were good after all (as a postulate, of course), how would the evil get into him? What would be the source of these insane rages? What would be the source of his slips of the tongue?'8 How would he come to know irrational fear?
Why is it that one does not like his boss although his boss has always been pleasant? Why is it that suicides smash their bodies to bits?
Why does man behave destructively, irrationally, fighting wars, killing, ruining whole sections of mankind?
What is the source of all neuroses, psychoses, insanities?
17. dipsomaniac:  a person suffering from an uncontrollable craving for alcohol.
18. slips of the tongue: mistakes in speaking, as inadvertent remarks.
77
L. RON HUBBARD
Let us return to a brief examination of the analytical mind. Let us examine its memory banks. Here we find all the sense concepts on file. Or so it appears at first glance. Let us take another look, a look at the time factor. There is a time sense about these analytical mind banks. It is very accurate, as though the organism were equipped with a fine watch. But there is something wrong here about time—it has gaps in it! There are moments when nothing seems to be filed in these standard banks. These are gaps which take place during moments of "unconsciousness"—that state of being caused by anesthesia, drugs, injury or shock.
This is the only data missing from a standard bank. If in hypnotic trance you examine a patient's memory of an operation, these incidents are the only periods in the banks you will not find. You can find these if you care to look and don't care what happens to your patient—of which more later. But the point is that there is something missing which has always been considered by one and all in any age never to have been recorded.
One and all in every age have never been able to put a finger on insanity either. Are these two data in agreement and do they have relationship? They definitely do.
There are two things which appear to be—but are not—recorded in the standard banks: painful emotion and physical pain.
How would you go about the building of a sensitive machine upon which the life and death affairs of an organism depended, which was to be the chief tool of an individual? Would you leave its delicate circuits prey to every overload, or would you install a fuse19 system?
19. fuse: a wire or strip of easily melted metal, usually set in a plug, placed in a circuit as a safeguard: if the current becomes too strong, the metal melts, thus breaking the circuit.
78
THE REACTIVE MIND
If a delicate instrument is in circuit with a power line, it is protected by several sets of fuses. Any computer would be so safeguarded.
It happens that there is some small evidence to support the electrical theory of the nervous system. In pain there are very heavy overcharges in the nerves. It may well have been—and elsewhere some Dianetic computations have been made about this—that the brain is the absorber for overcharges of power resulting from injury, the power itself being generated by the injured cells in the area of injury. That is theory and has no place here save to serve as an example. We are dealing now only with scientific fact.
The action of the analytical mind during a moment of intense pain is suspended. In fact, the analytical mind behaves just as though it were an organ to which vital supply is shut off whenever shock is present.
As an example, a man struck in the side by a car is knocked "unconscious" and, on regaining "consciousness," has no record of the period when he was "knocked out." This would be a nonsurvival circumstance. It means that there would be no volition on the part of anyone who was injured, and this is the time when the organism most requires volition. So this is nonsurvival if the whole mind cuts out whenever pain appears. Would an organism with more than a billion years of biological engineering behind it leave a problem like this unsolved?
Indeed, the organism solved the problem. Maybe the problem is very difficult, biologically, and maybe the solution is not very good, but large provision has been made for those moments when the organism is "unconscious."
The answer to the problem of making the organism react in moments of "unconsciousness" or near "unconsciousness" is also the answer to insanity and psychosomatic illnesses and all the strange mental quirks to
79
L. RON HUBBARD
which people are liable and which gave rise to that fable "it is human to err."
Clinical tests prove these statements to be scientific facts:
1.    The mind records on some level continuously during the entire life of the organism.
2.    All recordings of the lifetime are available.
3. "Unconsciousness," in which the mind is oblivious of its surroundings, is possible only in death and does not exist as total amnesia in life.
4.    All mental and physical derangements of a psychic nature come about from moments of "unconsciousness."
5.    Such moments can be reached and drained of charge20 with the result of returning the mind to optimum operating condition.
"Unconsciousness" is the single source of aberration. There is no such action as "mental conditioning" except on a conscious training level (where it exists only with the consent of the person).
If you care to make the experiment you can take a man, render him "unconscious," hurt him and give him information. By Dianetic technique, no matter what information you gave him, it can be recovered. This experiment should not be carelessly conducted because you might also render him insane.
A pale shade of this operation can be obtained by hypnosis, either by its usual techniques or drugs. By installing "positive suggestions" in a subject, he can be made to act like an insane person. This test is not a new one. It has been well known that compulsions or repressions can be so introduced into the psyche. The ancient
20. charge: harmful energy or force accumulated and stored in the reactive mind, resulting from the conflicts and unpleasant experiences that a person has had.
80
THE REACTIVE MIND
Greek was quite familiar with it and used it to produce various delusions.
There is what is known as a "posthypnotic suggestion." An understanding of this can assist an understanding of the basic mechanism of insanity. The actions under both circumstances are not identical, but they are similar enough in their essence.
A man is placed in a hypnotic trance by standard hypnotic technique or some hypnotic drug. The operator then may say to him, "When you awaken there is something you must do. Whenever I touch my tie you will remove your coat. When I let go my tie, you will put on your coat. Now you will forget that I have told you to do this."
The subject is then awakened. He is not consciously aware of the command. If told he had been given an order while "asleep," he would resist the idea or shrug, but he would not know. The operator then touches his tie. The subject may make some remark about its being too warm and so take his coat off. The operator then releases his tie. The subject may remark that he is now cold and will put his coat back on. The operator then touches his tie. The subject may say that his coat has been to the tailor's and with much conversation finally explain why he is taking it off, perhaps to see if the back seam had been sewn properly. The operator then releases his tie and the subject says he is satisfied with the tailor and so replaces his coat. The operator may touch his tie many times and each time receive action on the part of the subject.
At last, the subject may become aware, from the expressions on people's faces, that something is wrong. He will not know what is wrong. He will not even know that the touching of the tie is the signal which makes him take off his coat. He will begin to grow uncomfortable. He may find fault with the operator's appearance
81
L. RON HUBBARD
and begin to criticize his clothing. He still does not know the tie is a signal. He will still react and remain in ignorance that there is some strange reason he must take off his coat—all he knows is that he is uncomfortable with his coat on whenever the tie is touched, uncomfortable with his coat off every time the tie is released.
These various actions are very important to an understanding of the reactive mind. Hypnotism is a laboratory tool. It is not used to any extent in Dianetic therapy, but it has served as a means of examining minds and getting their reactions. Hypnotism is a wild variable. A few people can be hypnotized, many cannot be. Hypnotic suggestions will sometimes "take" and sometimes they won't. Sometimes they make persons well and sometimes they make them ill—the same suggestion reacting differently in different people. An engineer knows how to make use of a wild variable. There is something which makes it unpredictable. Finding out the basic reason hypnotism was a variable helped to discover the source of insanity. And understanding the mechanism of the posthypnotic suggestion can aid an understanding of aberration.
No matter how foolish a suggestion is given to a subject under hypnosis, he will carry it out one way or another. He can be told to remove his shoes or call someone at ten the following day or to eat peas for breakfast and he will. These are direct orders and he will comply with them. He can be told that his hats do not fit him and he will believe that they do not. Any suggestion will operate within his mind unbeknownst to his higher levels of awareness.
Very complex suggestions can be given. One such would be to the effect that he was unable to utter the word /. He would omit it from his conversation, using remarkable makeshifts without being "aware" that he was having to avoid the word. Or he could be told that
82
REACTIVE MIND
he must never look at his hands and he will not. These are repressions. Given to the subject when drugged or in a hypnotic sleep, these suggestions operate when he is awake. And they will continue to operate until released by the hypnotic operator.
He can be told that he has an urge to sneeze every time he hears the word rug and that he will sneeze when it is spoken. He can be told that he must jump two feet in the air every time he sees a cat and he will jump. And he will do these things after he has been awakened. These are compulsions.
He can be told that he will think very sexual thoughts about a certain girl but that when he thinks them he will feel his nose itch. He can be told that he has a continual urge to lie down and sleep and that every time he lies down he will feel that he cannot sleep. He will experience these things. These are neuroses.
In further experiments he can be told, when he is in his hypnotic "sleep," that he is the president of the country and that the secret service agents are trying to murder him. Or he can be told that he is being fed poison in every restaurant in which he attempts to eat. These are psychoses.
He can be informed that he is really another person and that he owns a yacht and answers to the name of "Sir Reginald." Or he can be told that he is a thief, that he has a prison record and that the police are looking for him. These would be schizophrenic and paranoid-schizophrenic™ insanities, respectively.
21. paranoid-schizophrenic: (psychiatry) of or concerning a mental condition resembling paranoia (form of psychosis in which a person imagines that he is being persecuted or that he is very great or important) but also characterized by autistic (concerning a state of mind characterized by daydreaming, hallucinations and disregard of external reality) behavior and gradual deterioration of the personality.
83
L. RON HUBBARD
The operator can inform the subject that the subject is the most wonderful person on Earth and that everybody thinks so. Or that the subject is the object of adoration of all women. This would be a manz'c-type insanity.
He can be convinced, while hypnotized, that when he wakes he will feel so terrible that he will hope for nothing but death. This would be the depressive-type insanity.
He can be told that all he can think about is how sick he is and that every malady of which he reads becomes his. This would make him react like a hypochondriac.n
Thus we could go down the catalog of mental ills and by concocting positive suggestions to create the state of mind, we could bring about, in the awakened subject, a semblance to every insanity.
Understood that these are semblances. They are similar to insanity in that the subject would act like an insane person. He would not be an insane person. The moment the suggestion is relieved—the subject being informed that it was a suggestion—the aberration (and all these insanities, etc., are grouped under the heading of aberration) theoretically vanishes.*
* An injunction here. These are tests. They have been made on people who could be hypnotized and people who could not be but who were drugged. They brought forth valuable data for Dianetics. They can be duplicated only when you know Dianetics, unless you want to actually drive somebody insane by accident. For these suggestions do not always vanish. Hypnotism is a wild variable. It is dangerous and belongs in the parlor in the same way you would want an atom bomb there. -LRH
22. hypochondriac: a person who continually shows unnecessary anxiety about his health.
84
THE REACTIVE MIND
The duplication of aberrations of all classes and kinds in subjects who have been hypnotized or drugged has demonstrated that there is some portion of the mind which is not in contact with the consciousness but which contains data.
It was the search for this portion of the mind which led to the resolution of the problem of insanity, psychosomatic ills and other aberrations. It was not approached through hypnotism, and hypnotism is just another tool, a tool which is of only occasional use in the practice of Dianetics and is, indeed, not needed at all.
Here we have an individual who is acting sanely, who is given a positive suggestion and who then temporarily acts insanely. His sanity is restored by the release of the suggestion into his consciousness, at which moment it loses its force upon him. But this is only a semblance of the mechanism involved. The actual insanity, one not laid now by some hypnotist, does not need to emerge into the consciousness to be released. There is this difference and others between hypnotism and the actual source of aberration; but hypnotism is a demonstration of its working parts.
Review the first example of the positive suggestion. The subject was "unconscious," which is to say, he was not in possession of complete awareness or self-determinism. He was given something he must do and the something was hidden from his consciousness. The operator gave him a signal. When the signal occurred, the subject performed an act. The subject gave reasons for the act which were not the real reasons for it. The subject found fault with the operator and the operator's clothing but did not see that it was the tie which signaled the action. The suggestion was released and the subject no longer felt a compulsion to perform the act.
These are the parts of aberration. Once one knows exactly what parts of what are aberrations, the whole
85
L. RON HUBBARD
problem is very simple. It seems incredible at first glance that the source could have remained so thoroughly hidden for so many thousands of years of research. But at second glance, it becomes a wonder that the source was ever discovered. For it is hidden cunningly and well.
"Unconsciousness" of the nonhypnotic variety is a little more rugged. It takes more than a few passes of the hand to cause "unconsciousness" of the insanity-producing variety.
The shock of accidents, the anesthetics used for operations, the pain of injuries and the deliriums of illness are the principal sources of what we call "unconsciousness."
The mechanism, in our analogue23 of the mind, is very simple. In comes a destructive wave of physical pain or a pervading poison such as ether24 and out go some or all of the fuses of the analytical mind. When it goes out, so go what we know as the standard memory banks.
The periods of "unconsciousness" are blanks in the standard memory banks. These missing periods make up what Dianetics calls the reactive mind bank.
The times when the analytical mind is in full operation plus the times when the reactive mind is in operation are a continuous line of consecutive recording for the entire period of life.
During the periods when the analytical mind is cut out of circuit in full or in part, the reactive mind cuts in, in full or in part. In other words, if the analytical mind is unfused so that it is half out of circuit, the reactive mind is half in circuit. No such sharp percentages
23. analogue: thing or part that is similar or comparable in certain respects.
24. ether: a drug used to produce anesthesia, as before surgery.
86
THE REACTIVE MIND
are actually possible, but this is to give an approximation.
When the individual is "unconscious" in full or in part, the reactive mind is cut in, in full or in part. When he is fully conscious, his analytical mind is fully in command of the organism. When his consciousness is reduced, the reactive mind is cut into the circuit just that much.
The moments which contain "unconsciousness" in the individual are contrasurvival moments, by and large. Therefore it is vital that something take over so that the individual can go through motions to save the whole organism. The fighter who fights half out on his feet, the burned man who drags himself out of the fire—these are cases when the reactive mind is valuable.
The reactive mind is very rugged. It would have to be in order to stand up to the pain waves which knock out other sentience in the body. It is not very refined. But it is most awesomely accurate. It possesses a low order of computing ability, an order which is submoron, but one would expect a low order of ability from a mind which stays in circuit when the body is being crushed or fried.
The reactive bank does not store memories as we think of them. It stores engrams.* These engrams are a complete recording, down to the last accurate detail, of every perception present in a moment of partial or full "unconsciousness." They are just as accurate as any other recording in the body. But they have their own force. They are like phonograph records or motion pictures, if these contained all perceptions of sight, sound, smell, taste, organic sensation, etc.
* The word engram, in Dianetics is used in its severely accurate sense as a "definite and permanent trace left by a stimulus on the protoplasm of a tissue." It is considered as a unit group of stimuli impinged solely on the cellular being. — LRH
87
L. RON HUBBARD
The difference between an engram and a memory, however, is quite distinct. An engram can be permanently fused into any and all body circuits and behaves like an entity.
In all laboratory tests on these engrams they were found to possess "inexhaustible" sources of power to command the body. No matter how many times one was reactivated in an individual, it was still powerful. Indeed, it became even more able to exert its power in proportion to its reactivation.
The only thing which could even begin to shake these engrams was the technique which developed into Dianetic therapy, which will be covered in full in the third section of this volume.
This is an example of an engram: A woman is knocked down by a blow. She is rendered "unconscious." She is kicked and told she is a faker, that she is no good, that she is always changing her mind. A chair is overturned in the process. A faucet is running in the kitchen. A car is passing in the street outside. The engram contains a running record of all these perceptions: sight, sound, tactile, taste, smell, organic sensation, kinetic sense, joint position, thirst record, etc. The engram would consist of the whole statement made to her when she was "unconscious": the voice tones and emotion in the voice, the sound and feel of the original and later blows, the tactile of the floor, the feel and sound of the chair overturning, the organic sensation of the blow, perhaps the taste of blood in her mouth or any other taste present there, the smell of the person attacking her and the smells in the room, the sound of the passing car's motor and tires, etc.
These would all be considered something on the order of a "positive suggestion." But there is something else here which is new, something which is not in the standard banks except by context: pain and painful emotion.
THE REACTIVE MIND
These things are what make the difference between the standard banks and the reactive engram banks: physical pain and painful emotion. Physical pain and painful emotion are the difference between an engram, which is the cause of aberration—all aberration—and a memory.*
We all have heard that bad experience is helpful to living and that without bad experience, man never learns. This may be very, very true. But it doesn't embrace the engram. That isn't experience. That is commanded action.
Perhaps before man had a large vocabulary, these engrams were of some use to him. They were survival in ways which will be developed later. But when man acquired a fine, homonymic (words that sound the same but mean different things) language, and indeed, when he acquired any language, these engrams were much more a liability than a help. And now, with man well evolved, these engrams do not protect him at all but make him mad, inefficient and ill.
The proof of any assertion lies in its applicability. When these engrams are deleted from the reactive mind bank, rationality and efficiency are enormously heightened, health is greatly increased and the individual computes rationally on the survival conduct pattern, which is to say, he enjoys himself and the society of those around him and is constructive and creative. He is destructive only when something actually threatens the sphere of his dynamics.
These engrams, then, are entirely negative in value
* In Dianetics, a memory is considered to be any concept of perceptions stored in the standard memory banks which is potentially recallable by the "I." A scene beheld by the eyes and perceived by the other senses becomes a record in the standard memory banks and later may be recalled by "I" for reference. —LRH
89
L. RON HUBBARD
in this stage of man's development. When he was nearer the level of his animal cousins (who have, all of them, reactive minds of this same kind), he might have had use for the data. But language and his changed existence make any engram a distinct liability, and no engram has any constructive value.
The reactive mind was provided to secure survival. It still pretends to act in that fashion. But its wild errors now lead only in the other direction.
There are actually three kinds of engrams, all of them aberrative: First is the contrasurvival engrain. This contains physical pain, painful emotion, all other perceptions and menace to the organism. A child knocked out by a rapist and abused receives this type of engram. The contrasurvival engram contains apparent or actual antagonism to the organism.
The second engram type is the prosurvival engram. A child who has been abused is ill. He is told, while he is partially or wholly "unconscious," that he will be taken care of, that he is dearly loved, etc. This engram is not taken as contrasurvival but prosurvival. It seems to be in favor of survival. Of the two this last is the most aberrative since it is reinforced by the law of affinity which is always more powerful than fear. Hypnotism preys on this characteristic of the reactive mind, being a sympathetic address to an artificially unconscious subject. Hypnotism is as limited as it is because it does not contain, as a factor, physical pain and painful emotion: things which keep an engram out of sight and moored25 below the level of "consciousness."
The third is the painful emotion engram which is similar to the other engrams. It is caused by the shock of sudden loss, such as the death of a loved one.
The reactive mind bank is composed exclusively of
25. moored: fixed firmly; secured.
90
THE. REACTIVE MIND
these engrams. The reactive mind thinks exclusively with these engrams. And it "thinks" with them in a way which would make Korzybski26 swear, for it thinks in terms of full identification, which is to say identities, one thing identical to another.
If the analytical mind did a computation on apples and worms, it could be stated, probably, as follows: some apples have worms in them, others don't; when biting an apple one occasionally finds a worm unless the apple has been sprayed properly; worms in apples leave holes.
The reactive mind, however, doing a computation on apples and worms as contained in its engram bank, would calculate as follows: apples are worms are bites are holes in apples are holes in anything are apples and always are worms are apples are bites, etc.
The analytical mind's computations might embrace the most staggering summations of calculus,27 the shifty turns of symbolic logic,28 the computations requisite to bridge-building or dressmaking. Any mathematical equation ever seen came from the analytical mind and might be used by the analytical mind in resolving the most routine problems.
But not the reactive mind! That's so beautifully,
26. Korzybski: Alfred Korzybski (1879-1950), American scientist and writer; developed the subject of general semantics, a methodology that attempts to improve human behavior through a critical use of words and symbols.
27. calculus: (mathematics) a method of calculation in higher mathematics; a way of making calculations about quantities which are continually changing, such as the speed of a falling stone or the slope of a curved line. Calculus measures little bits of things in order to find out what the whole thing will do. That is the whole theory of calculus.
28. symbolic logic: a modern type of formal logic using special mathematical symbols to stand for propositions and for the relationships among propositions.
91
L. RON HUBBARD
wonderfully simple that it can be stated, in operation, to have just one equation: A = A = A = A = A.
Start any computation with the reactive mind. Start it with the data it contains, of course. Any datum is just the same to it as any other datum in the same experience.
An analytical computation done on the woman being kicked, as mentioned, would be that women get themselves into situations sometimes when they get kicked and hurt and men have been known to kick and hurt women.
A reactive mind computation about this engram, as an engram, would be: the pain of the kick equals the pain of the blow equals the overturning chair equals the passing car equals the faucet equals the fact that she is a faker equals the fact that she is no good equals the fact that she changes her mind equals the voice tones of the man equals the emotion equals a faker equals a faucet running equals the pain of the kick equals organic sensation in the area of the kick equals the overturning chair equals changing one's mind equals . . . But why continue? Every single perception in this engram equals every other perception in this engram. What? That's crazy? Precisely!
Let us further examine our posthypnotic positive suggestion of the touched tie and the removed coat. In this we have the visible factors of how the reactive mind operates.
This posthypnotic suggestion needs only an emotional charge and physical pain to make it a dangerous engram. Actually it is an engram of a sort. It is laid in by sympathy between the operator and subject, which would make it a sympathy engram—prosurvival.
Now, we know that the operator had only to touch his tie to make the awakened subject remove his coat. The subject did not know what it was which caused him
92
THE REACTIVE MIND
to remove his coat and found all manner of explanation for the action, none of which was the right one. The engram, the posthypnotic suggestion in this case, was actually placed in the reactive mind bank. It was below the level of consciousness, it was compulsion springing from below the level of consciousness. And it worked upon the muscles to make the subject remove his coat. It was data fused into the circuits of the body below the command level of the analytical mind and operated not only upon the body but also upon the analytical mind itself.
If this subject took off his coat every time he saw somebody touch a necktie, society would account him slightly mad. And yet there was no power of consent about this. If he had attempted to thwart the operator by refusing to remove the coat, the subject would have experienced great discomfort of one sort or another.
Let us now take an example of the reactive mind's processes in a lower echelon of life: A fish swims into the shallows where the water is brackish,29 yellow and tastes of iron. He has just taken a mouthful of shrimp when a bigger fish rushes at him and knocks against his tail.
The small fish manages to get away but he has been physically hurt. Having negligible analytical powers, the small fish depends upon reaction for much of his choice of activity.
Now he heals his tail and goes on about his affairs. But one day he is attacked by a larger fish and gets his tail bumped. This time he is not seriously hurt, merely bumped. But something has happened. Something within him considers that in his choice of action he is now being careless. Here is a second injury in the same area.
29. brackish: somewhat salty, as the water of some marshes near the sea.
93
L. RON HUBBARD
The computation on the fish reactive level was: shallows equals brackish equals yellow equals iron taste equals pain in tail equals shrimp in mouth, and any one of these equals any other.
The bump in the tail on the second occasion keyed in10 the engram. It demonstrated to the organism that something like the first accident (identity thought) could happen again. Therefore beware!
The small fish, after this, swims into brackish water. This makes him slightly "nervous." But he goes on swimming and finds himself in yellow and brackish water. And still he does not turn back. He begins to get a small pain in his tail. But he keeps on swimming. Suddenly he gets a taste of iron and the pain in his tail turns on heavily. And away he goes like a flash. No fish was after him.
There were shrimp to be had there. But away he went anyway.
Dangerous place! And if he had not turned away, he would have really gotten himself a pain in the tail.
The mechanism is survival activity of a sort. In a fish it may serve a purpose. But in a man, who takes off a coat every time somebody touches a tie, the survival mechanism has long outlived its time. But it is there!
Let us further investigate our young man and the coat. The signal for the coat removal was very precise. The operator touched his tie. This is equivalent to any or all of the perceptions the fish received and which made the fish turn back. The touch of the tie could have been a dozen things. Any one of the dozen might have signaled the removal of the coat.
30. key in: make active. A key-in is a moment when the environment around the awake but fatigued or distressed individual is itself similar to the dormant (inactive) engram. At that moment the engram becomes active.
94
THE REACTIVE MIND
In the case of the woman who was knocked out and kicked, any perception in the engram she received has some quality of restimulation.^ Running water from a faucet might not have affected her greatly. But water running from a faucet plus a passing car might have begun some slight reactivation of the engram, a vague discomfort in the areas where she was struck and kicked, not enough yet to cause her real pain, but there all the same. To the running water and the passing car we add the sharp falling of a chair and she experiences a shock of mild proportion. Add now the smell and voice of the man who kicked her and the pain begins to grow. The mechanism is telling her that she is in dangerous quarters, that she should leave. But she is not a fish, she is a highly sentient being, to our knowledge the most complex mental structure so far evolved on Earth—organism of the species, man. There are many other factors in the problem than this one engram. She stays. The pains in the areas where she was abused become a predisposition32 to illness or are chronic illness in themselves, minor, it is true, in the case of this one incident, but illness just the same. Her affinity with the man who beat her may be so high that the analytical level, being assisted by a normally high general tone, may counter against these pains. But if that level is low, without much to assist it, then the pains can become major.
The fish that was so struck and received an engram did not disavow33 shrimp. Shrimp might have made him
31. restimulation: the reactivation of a past memory due to similar circumstances in the present approximating circumstances of the past.
32. predisposition: a state of mind or body that renders a person liable to act or behave in a certain way or to be subject to certain diseases.
33. disavow: deny any knowledge or approval of, or responsibility for; disclaim; disown.
95
L. RON HUBBARD
a little less enthusiastic afterwards, but the survival potential of shrimp eating made shrimp equal far more pleasure than it did pain.
A pleasant and hopeful life in general—and never think we intimate that the woman stays for food alone, whatever the wits34 say about women—has a high survival potential, and that can overcome a very great deal of pain. As the survival potential diminishes, however, the level of pain (zone 0 and zone 1) is more closely approached and such an engram could begin to be reactivated severely.
There is another factor here, however, besides pain—in fact, several more factors. If the young man with the detachable coat had been given one of the neurotic positive suggestions as listed a few pages back, he would have reacted to it on signal.
The engram this woman has received contains a neurotic positive suggestion quite in addition to the general restimulators,35 such as the faucet and the car and the overturning chair. She has been told that she is a faker, that she is no good and that she is always changing her mind. When the engram is restimulated in one of the great many ways possible, she has a "feeling" that she is no good, a faker and she will change her mind.
There are several cases to hand which peculiarly illustrate the sadness of this. One case in particular which was cleared had been beaten severely many times and told a similar thing each time, all derogatory. The content inferred that she was very loose morally and
34. wits: persons characterized by the ability to make lively, clever remarks in a sharp, amusing way.
35. restimulators: approximations of the reactive mind's content or some part thereof continually perceived in the environment of the organism.
96
THE REACTIVE MIND
would cohabit36 with anyone. She was brought in as a case by her father—she had since been divorced—who complained that she was very loose morally and had cohabited with several men in as many weeks. She herself admitted that she was, she could not see how it could be and it worried her, but she just "could not seem to help it." Examination of the engrams in her reactive mind bank brought forth a long series of beatings with this content. Because this was a matter of research, not treatment—although that was given—her former husband was contacted. An examination, independent of her knowledge, demonstrated his rage dramatization37 to contain these very words. He had beaten his wife into being a morally loose woman because he was afraid of morally loose women.
All cases examined in all this research were checked, the patient's engrams against the engrams in the donor. The contents of the incidents were verified wherever possible and were found uniformly to agree. Every safeguard was made to prevent any other method of communication between donor and patient. Everything found in the "unconscious" periods of every patient, when checked against other sources, was found to be exact.
The analogy between hypnotism and aberration bears out well. Hypnotism plants by positive suggestion one or another form of insanity. It is usually a temporary planting, but sometimes the hypnotic suggestion will not
36. cohabit: live together in a sexual relationship when not legally married.
37. dramatization: the duplication of an engramic content, entire or in part, by an aberree in his present time environment. Aberrated conduct is entirely dramatization. The degree of dramatization is in direct ratio to the degree of restimulation of the engrams causing it. When dramatizing, the individual is like an actor playing his dictated part and going through a whole series of irrational actions.
97
L. RON HUBBARD
"lift" or remove in a way desirable to the hypnotist. The danger of running experiments with hypnosis on uncleared patients is found in another mechanism of the reactive mind.
When an engram such as our example above exists, the woman obviously was "unconscious" at the time she received the engram. She had no standard bank memory (record) of the incident beyond the knowledge that she had been knocked out by the man. The engram was not, then, an experience as we understand the word. It could work from below to aberrate her thinking processes, it could give her strange pains—which she attributed to something else—in the areas injured. But it was not known to her.
The key-in was necessary to activate the engram. But what, precisely, could key it in? At some later time when she was tired the man threatened to strike her again and called her names. This was conscious level experience. It was found to be "mentally painful" by her. And it was "mentally painful" only because there was real, live, physical pain unseen under it which had been "keyed in" by the conscious experience. The second experience was a lock.™ It was a memory but it had a new kind of action in the standard banks. It had too much power and it gained that power from a past physical blow. The reactive mind is not too careful about its time clock. It can't tell one year old from ninety, in fact, when a key-in begins. The actual en-gram moved up under the standard bank.
She thinks she is worried about what he said in the lock experience. She is actually worried about the
38. lock: an analytical moment in which the perceptics of the engram are approximated, thus restimulating the engram or bringing it into action, the present time perceptics being erroneously interpreted by the reactive mind to mean that the same condition which produced physical pain once before is now again at hand.
98
THE REACTIVE MIND
engram. In this way memories become "painful." But pain doesn't store in the standard banks. There is no place in that bank for pain. None. There is a place for the concept of pain and these concepts of what is painful are good enough to keep the sentient organism called man away from all the pain he believes is actually dangerous. In a Clear there are no pain-inducing memories because there is no physical pain record left to ruin the machinery from the reactive mind bank.
The young man with the detachable coat did not know what was worrying him or what made him do what he did. The person with an engram does not know what is worrying him. He thinks it is the lock, and the lock may be a very long way removed from anything resembling the engram. The lock may have similar perceptic content. But it may be on another subject entirely.
It is not very complicated to understand what these engrams do. They are simply moments of physical pain strong enough to throw part or all the analytical machinery out of circuit; they are antagonism to the survival of the organism or pretended sympathy to the organism's survival. That is the entire definition. Great or little "unconsciousness," physical pain, perceptic content and contrasurvival or prosurvival data. They are handled by the reactive mind, which thinks exclusively in identities of everything equals everything. And they enforce their commands upon the organism by wielding the whip of physical pain. If the organism does not do exactly as they say (and believe any Clear, that's impossible!), the physical pain turns on. They steer a person like a keeper steers a tiger—and they can make a tiger out of a man in the process without much trouble, and give him mange39 into the bargain.
39. mange: a skin disease affecting hairy animals, caused by a parasite and characterized by intense itching, scabs and loss of hair.
99
L. RON HUBBARD
If man had not invented language, or, as will be demonstrated, if his languages were a little less homo-nymic and more specific with their personal pronouns, engrams would still be survival data and the mechanism would work. But man has outgrown their use. He chose between language and potential madness and for the vast benefits of the former he received the curse of the latter.
The engram is the single and sole source of aberration and psychosomatic illness.
An enormous quantity of data has been sifted. Not one single exception has been found. In "normal people," in the neurotic and insane, the removal of these engrams wholly or in part, without other therapy, has uniformly brought about a state greatly superior to the current norm. No need was found for any theory or therapy other than those given in this book for the treatment of all psychic or psychosomatic ills.
100
CHAPTER THREE
The Cell and the Organism
The reason the engram so long remained hidden as the single source of aberration and psychosomatic ills is the wide and almost infinitely complex manifestations which can derive from simple engrams.
Several theories could be postulated as to why the human mind evolved exactly as it did, but these are theories, and Dianetics is not concerned with structure. A comment or two as a stimulation to future workers in that field might be made, however, wholly as a postulate, that there is a definite connection between any electriclike energy in the body and the energy effusion' of cells undergoing injury. A theory could be constructed along the lines that injured cells, further injuring their neighbors by a discharge of electriclike energy, forced the development of a special cell which would act as a conduit to "bleed off" this painful charge. The conduits of cells might have become neurons2 and the charge might have been better distributed so through the body with less likelihood of local incapacitation at the point of the injury impact. These conduits-neurons—might have been started in formation by impacts at the extremity of the body toward the direction of locomotion. This would make the skull the greatest mass of neurons. Man, walking upright, might have had another new point of impact, the forehead, and so gained his prefrontal lobes. And maybe not. That is
1. effusion: a pouring forth.
2. neurons: the main units that make up the nerves. They consist of cell bodies with threadlike parts that carry signals to and from the cells.
101
L. RON HUBBARD
just theory, with only a few data to support it which have a scientific value. And it has not been subjected to experiment of any kind whatever.
This much, however, has to be advanced as theory on structure. The cell is one of the basic building blocks of the body. Cells, the better to survive, seem to have become colonies which, in turn, had the primary interest, survival. And the colonies developed or recruited into aggregations which in turn were organisms, also with the sole purpose of survival. And the organisms developed minds to coordinate the muscles and resolve the problems of survival. Again, this is still theory, and even if it was the track of reasoning which led toward Dianetics, it can be completely wrong. It works. It can be pulled away from Dianetics and Dianetics will remain a science and go on working. The concept of the electronic brain was not vital but only useful to Dianetics and it could be swept away as well—Dianetics would still stand. A science is a changing affair as far as its internal theory goes. In Dianetics we have our wedge into an enormous scope of research. As Dianetics stands, it works and it works every time and without exception. The reasons why it works will undoubtedly be mulled over and changed here and there to its betterment—if they aren't, an abiding faith in this generation of scientists and the future generations will not have been justified.
Why we talk about cells will become apparent as we progress. The reason we know that past concepts of structure are not correct is because they don't work as function. All our facts are functional and these facts are scientific facts, supported wholly and completely by laboratory evidence. Function precedes structure. James Clerk Maxwell's3 mathematics were postulated
3. James Clerk Maxwell: (1831-1879) Scottish physicist, responsible for the theory that electricity and light are the same in their fundamental nature.
102
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
and electricity was widely and beneficially used long before anyone had any real idea about the structure of the atom. Function always comes before structure. The astounding lack of progress in the field of the human mind during the past thousands of years is partly attributable to its "organ of thought" lying within a field, medicine, which was and long may be an art, not a science. Basic philosophy to explain life will have to come before that art makes much further progress.
What the capabilities of the cell are, for instance, have been but poorly studied. Some work has been carried on in recent years to find out more, but basic philosophy was absent. The cell was being observed, not predicted.
The studies of cells in man have been largely done from dead tissue. An unknown quality is missing from dead tissue, the important quality—life.
In Dianetics, on the level of laboratory observation, we discover much to our astonishment that cells are evidently sentient in some currently inexplicable way. Unless we postulate a human soul entering the sperm and ovum at conception, there are things which no other postulate will embrace than that these cells are in some way sentient. Entering a new field with postulates which work in all directions—and the basic philosophy of survival is a pilot which leads us on and on into further and further realms, explaining and predicting phenomena on every hand—it is inevitable that data will turn up which does not agree with past theory. When that data is as scientific as the observation that when an apple is dropped under usual conditions on Earth it falls, one cannot help but accept it. Abandoning past theories may do damage to treasured beliefs and one's nostalgic love of the old school tie,4 but a fact is a fact.
4. school tie: a necktie striped in the colors of a specific English public school, especially as worn by a graduate to indicate his educational background.
103
L. RON HUBBARD
The cells as thought units evidently have an influence, as cells, upon the body as a thought unit and an organism. We do not have to untangle this structural problem to resolve our functional postulates. The cells evidently retain engrams of painful events. After all, they are the things which get injured. And they evidently retain a whip hand5 of punishment for every time the analyzer fails them. The story of the engram seems to be a story of a battle between the troops and the general, every time the general gets some of the troops killed off. The less fortunate this general is in protecting these troops, the more power the troops assume. The cells evidently pushed the brain on an upward evolution toward higher sentience. Pain reverses the process as though the cells were sorry they had put so much power in the hands of a central commander.
The reactive mind may very well be the combined cellular intelligence. One need not assume that it is, but it is a handy structural theory in the lack of any real work done in this field of structure. The reactive en-gram bank may be material stored in the cells themselves. It does not matter whether this is credible or incredible just now. Something has to be said about it to give one a mental hold on what happens during moments of "unconsciousness."
The scientific fact, observed and tested, is that the organism, in the presence of physical pain, lets the analyzer get knocked out of circuit so that there is a limited quantity or no quantity at all of personal awareness as a unit organism. It does this either to protect the analyzer or to withdraw its power in the belief that an engram is best in an emergency—with which the analyzer, by the way, on observed experience, does not agree.
5. whip hand: the position of advantage or control.
104
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
Every percept present, including physical pain, is recorded during these nonanalytical moments. Whenever pain is present—physical pain, that is—the analyzer gets shut down to a small or large extent. If the duration of the pain is only an instant, there is still an instant there of analytical reduction. This can be proven very easily—just try to recall the last time you were seriously hurt and see if there isn't at least a momentary blank period. Going to sleep under anesthetic and waking up some time later is a more complicated sort of shutdown in that it includes physical pain but is initially caused by a poison (and all anesthetics are poisons, technically). Then there is the condition of suffocating, as in drowning, and this is a shut-down period to greater or lesser extent. And there is the condition caused by blood, for one cause or another, leaving the area or areas which contain analytical power—wherever they are—and this again causes a greater or lesser degree of analytical shutdown: such incidents include shock (in which the blood tends to lake in the center of the body), the loss of blood by surgery or injury or anemia,6 and the closing of the arteries leading through the throat. Natural sleep causes a reduction of analytical activity but is actually not very deep or serious; by Dianetic therapy any experience occurring during sleep can be recovered with ease.
It can now be seen that there are many ways in which analytical power can be shut down. And it can be seen that there is greater or lesser reduction. When one burns one's finger with a cigarette, there is a small instant of pain and a small amount of reduction. When one undergoes an operation, the duration may be in terms of hours and the amount of shutdown may be
6. anemia: a deficiency in the oxygen-carrying material of the blood resulting in a paleness, generalized weakness, etc.	_>-
105
L. RON HUBBARD
extreme. The duration and the amount of reduction are two different things, related but quite dissimilar. This is not so very important but it is mentioned.
We have seen, reading in Dianetics this far, that the principle of the spectrum has been quite useful to us. And it can be seen that the amount of reduction in analytical power can be described in the same way that survival potential can be described. There can be a very little bit and there can be a very great deal. Going back and taking a look at the survival potential range, one can see that there would be death at the bottom and immortality at the top. There is "infinite" survival. Whether or not there can be infinite analytical power is a matter of mysticism. But that there is a definite relationship between individual tone and the amount of analytical shutdown is a scientific fact. Put it this way: with the individual well and happy and enthusiastic, analytical power can be considered to be high (zones 3 and 4). With the individual under the wheels of a truck, "unconscious" and in agony, the analytical power may be considered to be ranging in zone 0. There is a ratio between potential survival and analytical power. As one goes down, so does the other. There is more data to be concluded from this than one would think at first glance. It is a very important ratio.
All the percepts are included in an engram. Two of these percepts are physical pain and painful emotion. A third is organic sensation, which is to say, the condition of the organism during the moment of the engram. And how was the organism when the engram was received? Greater or lesser "unconsciousness" was present. This meant that there was an organic sensation of reduced analytical power, since analytical power derives, evidently, from an organ or organs in the body. If an engram is reactivated by a restimulator or restimulators—that is to say, if the individual with an engram receives something
106
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
in his environment similar to the perceptions in the engram—the engram puts everything it contains, its percepts such as faucets and words, into greater or lesser operation.
There can be greater or lesser restimulation. An engram can be put into force just a little bit by restimu-lators in the environment of the individual or, with many restimulators present and the body in an already reduced state, the engram can go into a full-force display (which is covered later). But whether the en-gram is slightly restimulated or greatly restimulated, everything in it goes into effect one way or another.
There is just one common denominator of all en-grams, just one thing which every engram has and which is possessed by every other engram. Each contains the datum that the analyzer is more or less shut down. There is a shut-down datum in every engram. Therefore, every time an engram is restimulated, even though physical pain has not been received by the body, some analytical power turns off; the organ or organs which are the analyzer are fused out of circuit in some degree.
This is highly important to an understanding of the mechanics of aberration. It is a scientific fact, susceptible of proof, and it never varies. This always happens: when an engram is received, the analyzer is shut down by the physical pain and emotion; when the engram is restimulated, the analyzer shuts down as part of the commands of the engram. Actually, this is a very mechanical thing. Engram is restimulated, part of the analytical power is shut down. This is as inevitable as turning on and off an electric light. Pull the cord and the light goes off. The reduction of the analyzer is not that sharp—there are grades of light—but it is just as mechanical.
Put a man under ether, hurt him in the chest. He has
107
L. RON HUBBARD
received an engram because his analytical power was turned off first by ether and then by a chest pain. While he was there on the operating table, the reactive mind recorded the click of instruments, everything said, all sounds and smells. Let us suppose that a nurse was holding one of his feet because he was kicking. This is a complete engram.
The engram will be keyed in by something in the future, a similar incident. After this, in greater or lesser degree, whenever he hears clicks like instrument clicks he gets nervous. If he pays attention to what is happening in his body at that minute, he may find that his foot feels slightly as if it were being held. But he is not likely to give any attention to his foot because if he had any attention to give, the chest pain would be found present in some degree. But his analytical ability has been turned off slightly. As the foot felt it was being held, so does the analyzer have the conception of being shut down by ether and pain. The restimulator (the clicking) tended to bring the whole engram slightly into being and part of the engram command is a reduced analytical power.
This is "push button" in its precision. If one knew another's main restimulators (words, voice tones, music, whatever they are—things which are filed in the reactive mind bank as parts of engrams), one could turn another's analytical power almost completely off, actually render him unconscious.
We all know people who make us feel stupid. There can be two causes for that but both of them are from engrams and one of them is the fact that, no matter what engram is brought into restimulation, part of the analytical power is turned off.
Engrams can, if environment is uniform, be held in chronic restimulation! This means a chronic, partial shutdown of analytical power. The recovery of intelligence by
108
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
a Clear and the rise of that intelligence to such fantastic heights results in part from the relief of word commands in engrams that he is stupid and in a larger part from the relief of this chronic shut-down condition.
This is not theory. This is scientific fact. It is strictly test tube. The engram contains the percept of a shut-down analyzer; when it is restimulated the engram puts that datum back into force in some degree.
Engrams, then, being received in "unconsciousness" cause a partial "unconsciousness" to exist every time they are restimulated. The person who has an engram (any aberree) need not receive new physical pain to have a new moment of partial "unconsciousness" take place. Feeling "dopey"7 or "sleepy" or "dull" results in part from a partially shut-down analyzer. Being "nervous" or in a rage or frightened also carries with it partially shut-off analytical power.
The hypnotist has "success" where he does because he is able, by talking to people about "sleep," to put into restimulation some engram which contains the word sleep and shut-down analytical power. This is one of the reasons hypnotism "works."
The whole society, however, is liable to analytical shutdown in greater or lesser degree by the restimulation of engrams.
The number of engrams a person's reactive bank contains may not, however, establish the amount of analytical reduction to which he is subjected. A person may have engrams and they may not have been keyed in. And if they have been keyed in, he might not be in an environment which contains any great number of res-timulators. Under these conditions his survival zone position may be high even though he is possessed of a great many engrams. And again, he might have educated
7. dopey: tired, sleepy, foggy (as though doped).
109
L. RON HUBBARD
himself over and above these engrams to some slight degree.
But a person who has keyed-in engrams and does exist in the area of many restimulators is liable to an enormous amount of restimulation and analytical shutdown. This is a normal condition. If a person has a large number of engrams, and they are keyed in, and he lives around many restimulators, his condition can vary from normal to insane. And in a single day—as in the case of a man who experiences moments of rage or a woman who drops into apathies—the condition of a person may vary from normal to insane and back to normal. We take here the word insane to mean utter irrationality. So there is temporary or chronic insanity.
The court of law which goes through the lugubrious8 process of having a man pronounced sane or insane after that man has murdered somebody is itself being irrational. Of course the man was insane when he committed the murder. What the court is asking now is whether or not the man is chronically insane. This has little bearing on the matter. If a man has gone insane enough to murder once, he will go insane enough in the future to murder again. Chronic, then, means either a chronic cycle or a continuous condition. The law says sanity is the "ability to tell right from wrong." When man is subject to a mechanism (and all men are) which lets him be rational one minute and restimulated the next, none in the society, if uncleared, can be considered able to always tell right from wrong. This is completely aside from what the law means by right and what it means by wrong.
This is an example of the roller-coaster sanity curve of the aberree. All aberrees possess engrams (the
8. lugubrious: very sad or mournful, especially in a way that seems exaggerated or ridiculous.
110
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
normal number is probably in the hundreds per individual). Analytically, people have a wide latitude9 of choice and they can deal even with philosophic rights and wrongs. But in aberrated persons the engram bank is always susceptible of restimulation. The "sanest" aber-ree of Tuesday may be a murderer on Wednesday if the exactly right situation occurs to trip the exact engram. A Clear is not entirely predictable in any given situation—he has such a wide power of choice. But an aberrated person transcends10 all predictability for the following reasons: (1) what engrams an aberree has in his reactive engram bank none know including himself; (2) what situation will contain what restimulators is a matter of chance; and (3) what his power of choice will be with the factors in the engrams on a reactive level cannot be established.
The variety of conduct which one can evolve out of these basic mechanics is so wide that it is no wonder that man was considered to be a rather hopeless case by some philosophies.
The cells, if the engram bank is retained on a cellular level, might be theoretically supposed to have made sure that the analyzer did not get too adventurous in this life-and-death matter of living. They therefore could be considered to have copied down all data contained in every moment of physical pain and emotion' resulting in or contained in "unconsciousness." Then when any data similar to this appeared in the environment they could be wary and, with a large number of restimulators in sight, they could be considered to shut down the analyzer and proceed on reaction. This has a crude safety factor. Obviously, if the organism survived
9. latitude: freedom from narrow restrictions; freedom of opinion, conduct or action.
10. transcends: goes beyond the limits of; oversteps; exceeds.
L. RON HUBBARD
through one period of "unconsciousness," it could be theorized by the cells that the placing of the data and action in effect under circumstances which threatened to be similar would result once more in survival. What's good enough for Grandpa is good enough for me. What was good enough in the bus accident is good enough in a bus.
This moronic "thinking" is typical of the reactive mind. It is just the sort of thinking it does. It is the ultimate in conservatism. It misses the point and important data at every turn, it overloads the body with pain, it is a whirlpool of confusion. If there were just one engram per situation, maybe it would get by. But there may be ten engrams with similar data in them (an engram lock chain") and yet the data may be so contradictory that when a new emergency arises which contains the restimulators of the chain, no proper past conduct can be put forth to meet it.
Obviously the x factor is language. The cells, if this is a problem in cells (for recall, this part is theory based on data in an effort to explain what happens, and a theory can be altered without altering the scientific usefulness of the facts), probably do not understand languages very well. If they did they wouldn't evolve such "solutions."
Take two engrams about baseball bats. In the first, the individual is hit on the head and knocked out and somebody yells, "Run! Run! Run!" In the second, the individual is knocked out by the bat in the same environment and somebody yells, "Stay there! You're safe!" Now, what does he do when he hears a baseball bat or smells one or sees one or hears these words? Run or stay there? He has a similar pain for each action.
11. chain: a series of incidents of similar nature or similar subject matter.
112
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
What actually happens? He gets a headache. This is that thing called conflict. This is anxiety. And anxiety can become very acute indeed on a purely mechanical level when one has ninety engrams pulling him south and eighty-nine pulling him north. Does he go north or south? Or does he have a "nervous breakdown"?
The level of brilliance of the reactive mind is about the same as a phonograph. The needle gets put on the record and the record plays. The reactive mind merely puts on the needle. When it tries to select several records out and play them all at once, things happen.
By intentional construction or accident in design or bypass in evolution—where the old, useless organ is still built—the cells managed to hide this engram bank fairly well. Man is conscious in his analytical mind. When he is "unconscious," his analytical mind is unable to monitor the incoming data and the data is not to be found in the thing we call, by analogue, the standard banks. Therefore, whatever came in passed by consciousness. And having passed by, consciousness cannot (without Dianetic process) recall it, since there is no channel for recall.
The engram enters when consciousness is absent. It thereafter operates directly into the organism. Only by Dianetic therapy can the analyzer come into possession of this data (and the removal of it does not depend upon the analyzer contacting it at all, despite an old belief that the "realization" of something cures it: "realize" an engram and one is in quick trouble, without Dianetic technique). The engram is received by the cellular body. The reactive mind could be the very lowest level of analytical power, of course, but this does not alter the scientific fact that the engram acts as if it were a soldered-in connection to the life function regulator and the organic coordination and the basic level of the analytical mind itself. By soldered-in is meant "permanent
113
L. RON HUBBARD
connection." This keying-in is the hookup of the en-gram as part of the operating machinery of the body. An analytical thought process is not permanently hooked in but can be thrown in and out of circuit at the will of the analyzer. This is not true of the engram. Thus the term, soldered-in.
The analytical mind lays down a training pattern; on a stimulus-response basis, this training pattern will work smoothly and well whenever it will do the organism the most good. An engram is a training pattern, all complete in a package, "permanently" hooked into the circuits (without Dianetic therapy) and it goes into operation like a training pattern without any consent whatever from the analyzer.
Influenced itself by the engram in the several ways of reduced analytical power and positive suggestion in the engram, the analytical mind is unable to discover any truly valid reason for the conduct of the organism. It therefore makes up a reason, for its job is to make sure the organism is always right. Just as the young man with the detachable coat gave forth a number of silly explanations as to why he was detaching his coat, so does the analytical mind—observing the body engaged in irrational actions, including speech, for which there seems to be no accounting—justify the actions. The engram can dictate all the various processes incident to living; it can dictate beliefs, opinions, thought processes or lack of them and actions of all kinds, and can establish conditions remarkable for their complexity as well as their stupidity. An engram can dictate anything it contains and engrams can contain all the combinations of words in the entire language. And the analytical mind is forced, in the light of irrational behavior or conviction, to justify the acts and conditions of the organism, as well as its own strange blunders. This is justified thought.
114
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
There are three kinds of thought, then, of which the organism is capable: (a) analytical thought, which is rational as modified by education and viewpoint; (b) justified thought, analytical thought attempting to explain reactions; and (c) reactive thought, which is wholly in terms of everything in an engram equals everything in an engram equals all the restimulators in the environment and all things associated with those restimulators.
We have all seen somebody make a blunder and then give forth an explanation of just why that blunder had been made. This is justified thought. The blunder was made, unless out of education or viewpoint, by an engram. The analytical mind then had to justify the blunder to make sure that the body was right and that its computations were right.
Now, there are two other conditions which can be caused by engrams. One is dramatization and the other is valence.n
You have seen some child come forth with a tirade, a tantrum. You have seen some man go through a whole rage action. You have seen people go through a whole irrational set of actions. These are dramatizations. They come about when an engram is thoroughly restimu-lated, so thoroughly that its soldered-in aspect takes over the organism. It may come into circuit slightly or wholly, which is to say that there are degrees of dramatization. When it is in full parade, the engram is running off verbatim and the individual is like an actor, puppetlike, playing his dictated part. A person can be given new engrams which will make these old ones take secondary importance. (Society's punishment complex is aimed squarely at giving anti-engram education.)
12. valence: personality. The term is used to denote the borrowing of the personality of another. A valence is a substitute for self taken on after the fact of lost confidence in self. A preclear "in his father's valence" is acting as though he were his father.
115
L. RON HUBBARD
Dramatization is survival conduct—in the silly, reactive mind way of thinking—based on the premise that the organism, in a "similar" situation, lived through it because these actions were present.
The woman who was knocked down and kicked would dramatize her engram, possibly, by doing and saying exactly the same things done and said to her. Her victim may be her child or another woman. It could or would be the person who gave her the engram if she were strong enough to overcome him. Just because she has this engram does not mean she will use it. She may have a hundred other engrams she can use. But when she dramatizes one it is as if the engram, soldered-in, were taking over a puppet. As much analytical power as she has left may be devoted to altering the pattern. Therefore she can make a similar or an identical dramatization .
This aspect of dramatization is strictly "tooth and claw" survival. This is the sort of thing which made observers think that "tooth and claw" was a primary rule.
In went the engram, bypassing rationality and the standard memory banks. Now it is in the organism but the organism does not know it in the level of consciousness. It is keyed in by a conscious level experience. Then it can be dramatized. And far from becoming milder the more it is used, the more an engram is dramatized the more solid is its hold in the circuits. Muscles, nerves, all must comply.
"Tooth and claw" survival. The cells were making sure. And here we come to valence. Valens means "powerful" in Latin. It is a good term because it is the second half of ambivalent (power in two directions) and exists in any good dictionary. It is a good term because it describes (although the dictionary did not mean it to) the intent of the organism when dramatizing an engram.
116
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
Multivalence would mean "many powerfuls." It would embrace the phenomena of split personality, the strange differences of personality in people in one and then another situation. Valence, in Dianetics, means the personality of one of the dramatic personnel in an engram.
In the case of the woman being knocked out and kicked, there were two valences present: herself and her husband. If another person had been present the en-gram would have contained three valences, providing he took any part: herself, her husband and the third person. In an engram, let us say, of a bus accident where ten people speak or act, there would be, in the "unconscious" person, an engram containing eleven valences: the "unconscious" person and the ten who spoke or acted.
Now, in the case of the woman beaten by her husband, the engram contains just two valences. Who won? Here is the law of "tooth and claw," the aspect of survival in engrams. Who won? The husband. Therefore it is the husband who will be dramatized. She didn't win. She got hurt. Aha! When these restimulators are present, the thing to do is to be the winner, the husband, to talk like him, to say what he did, to do what he did. He survived. "Be like him!" say the cells.
Hence, when the woman is restimulated into this engram by some action, let us say, on the part of her child, she dramatizes the winning valence. She knocks the child down and kicks him, tells him he is a faker, that he is HO good, that he is always changing his mind.
What would happen if she dramatized herself? She would have to fall down, knocking over a chair, pass out and believe she was a faker, no good and was always changing her mind, and she would have to feel the pain of all blows!
"Be yourself" is advice which falls on deaf reactive mind ears. Here is the scheme. Every time the organism
117
L. RON HUBBARD
gets punished by life, the analytical mind, according to the reactive mind, has erred. The reactive mind then cuts the analytical mind out of circuit in ratio to the amount of restimulation present (danger) and makes the body react as if it were the person who won in the earlier, but similar, situation where the organism was hurt.
Now what happens if "society" or the husband or some exterior force told this woman, who is dramatizing this engram, that she must face reality? That's impossible. Reality equals being herself, and herself gets hurt. What if some exterior force breaks the dramatization? That is to say, if society objects to the dramatization and refuses to let her kick and yell and shout? The engram is still soldered-in. The reactive mind is forcing her to be the winning valence. Now she can't be. As punishment, the reactive mind, the closer she slides into being herself, approximates the conditions of the other valence in the engram. After all, that valence didn't die. And the pain of the blows turns on and she thinks she is a faker, that she is no good and that she always changes her mind. In other words, she is in the losing valence. Consistent breaking of dramatization will make a person ill just as certainly as there are gloomy days.
A person accumulates, with the engrams, half a hundred valences before he is ten. Which were the winning valences? You will find him using them every time an engram is kicked into restimulation. Multiple personality? Two persons? Make it fifty to a hundred. In Dianetics, you can see valences turn on and off in people and change with a rapidity which would be awesome to a quick-change artist.
Observe these complexities of conduct, of behavior. If one set out to resolve the problem of aberration by a system of cataloging everything he observed, and were
118
THE CELL AND THE ORGANISM
unaware of the basic source, he would end up with as many separate insanities, neuroses, psychoses, compulsions, repressions, obsessions and disabilities as there are combinations of words in the English language. Discovery of fundamentals by classification is never good research. And the unlimited complexities possible from the engrams (and the severest, most thoroughly controlled experiments discovered these engrams to be capable of just such behavior as is listed here) are the whole catalog of aberrated human conduct.
There are a few other basic, fundamental things that engrams do. These will be covered under their own headings: parasite circuits, emotional impaction13 and psychosomatic ills. With the few fundamentals listed here, the problem of aberration can be resolved. These fundamentals are simple, they have given rise to as much trouble as individuals and societies have experienced. The institutions for the insane, the prisons for the criminals, the armaments accumulated by nations, yes, and even the dust which was a civilization of yesterday exist because these fundamentals were not understood.
The cells evolved into an organism and in the evolution created what was once a necessary condition of mind. Man has grown up to a point where he creates now the means of overcoming that evolutionary blunder. Examination of the Clear proves he no longer needs it. He is now in a position where he can take an artificial evolutionary step on his own. The bridge has been built across the canyon.
13. impaction: the action of becoming, or condition of being, impacted (pressed closely into or in something) or firmly fixed in.
119
CHAPTER FOUR
The "Demons"
For a moment let us leave such scientific things as cells and consider some further aspects of the problem of understanding the human mind.
People <have been working on problems related to man's behavior for a good many millennia. Hindu,1 Egyptian, Greek, Roman and our own philosophers and researchers of the past few hundred years have been struggling against a superabundance of complexity.
Dianetics could be evolved only by the philosophic compartmentation of the problem into its elements and the invention of several dozen yardsticks,2 such as "the introduction of an arbitrary," "the law of affinity," "the dynamic," "the equation of the optimum solution," "the laws of the selection of importances," "the science of organizing sciences," "nullification by comparison of authority to authority," and so forth and so forth. All this is fine matter for a tome on philosophy, but here is Dianetics, which is a science. It should be mentioned, however, that one of the first steps taken was not invented but borrowed and modified: that was the "knowable" and "unknowable" of Herbert Spencer.
Absolutism is a fine road to stagnation and I do not think Spencer meant to be so entirely absolute about his "knowable" and "unknowable." Survive! is the demarcation point between those things which can be experienced
1. Hindu: of Hinduism, a religious and social system which developed in India about 1400 B.C., with belief in reincarnation, worship of several gods, and the caste system (rigid, hereditary social classes) as a basis of society.
2. yardsticks: standards of measurement or judgment.
120
THE "DEMONS"
by the senses (our old friends Hume3 and Locke4) and those things which cannot necessarily be known through the senses, but which possibly may be known but which one does not necessarily need to solve the problem.
Amongst those things which one did not necessarily need to know (the Dianetic version of the "unknowable") were the realms of mysticism and metaphysics. Many things, in the evolution of Dianetics, were bypassed solely because they had not yielded solution to anyone else. Therefore mysticism got short shrift5 despite the fact that the author studied it, not in the little-understood, secondhand sources commonly used as authority by some Western mental cults, but in Asia where a mystic who can't make his "astral self"6 get out and run errands for him is strictly a second-rate character indeed. Well aware that there were pieces in this jigsaw puzzle which were orange with yellow spots
3. Hume: David Hume (1711-1776), Scottish philosopher and historian. Hume was known for his skepticism. He maintained that all knowledge was based on either the impressions of the senses or the logical relations of ideas.
4. Locke: John Locke (1632-1704), English philosopher who argued against the belief that human beings are born with certain ideas already in their minds. He claimed that, on the contrary, the mind is a tabula rasa (blank slate) until experience begins to "write" on it.
5. short shrift: little attention or consideration in dealing with a person or matter.
6. astral self: also called astral body: a second body, per some forms of philosophical or religious thought, said to belong to each individual, formed of a substance which is above or beyond perception by the senses and which pervades all space. Per these beliefs, the astral body accompanies the individual through life, is able to leave the human body at will, and survives the individual after death. Astral bodies are actually just somebody's delusion. They are usually mock-ups which the mystic then tries to believe real. He sees the astral body as something else and then seeks to inhabit it in the most common practices of "astral walking."
121
L. RON HUBBARD
and purple with carmine7 stripes, one found it necessary to pick up only those pieces which were germane.8 Someday a large number of pieces—about structure with the rest—will come in and there will be answers to telepathy,9 prescience10 and so on and on. Understand that there are a lot of pieces in the construction of a philosophic universe. But none of the mystic pieces were found necessary to the creation of a uniformly applicable and aberration-resolving science of mind. No opinion will be delivered at this stage of Dianetics about ghosts or the Indian rope trick" beyond the fact they are seen to be multicolored pieces and the only ones we want are white. We have most of the white pieces and it makes a good, solid whiteness where there was blackness before.
Imagine, then, the consternation12 one must have felt when "demons" were discovered. Socrates had a demon, you'll remember. It told him not what to do but whether or not he had made the right decision. Here we had been pursuing a course in the finite universe which would have pleased Hume himself for its tenacity to those things which could be sensed. And up popped "demons."
A thorough examination of a number of subjects (fourteen) revealed that every one apparently had a "demon" of some sort. They were randomly selected subjects in various conditions in society. Therefore the
7. carmine: red or purplish red; crimson.
8. germane: closely or significantly related; relevant; pertinent.
9. telepathy: communication from one mind to another without the use of speech or writing or gestures, etc.
10. prescience: knowledge of events or actions before they happen.
11. Indian rope trick: a magic trick in which the magician makes a rope seem to suspend in midair and either goes up the rope and disappears or sends other things up which disappear.
12. consternation: a sudden, alarming amazement or dread that results in utter confusion; dismay.
122
THE "DEMONS"
"demon" aspect was most alarming. However, unlike some of the cults (or schools, as they call themselves), the temptation to sail off into romantic, inexplicable and confounding labels was resisted. A bridge had to be built across a canyon and demons are darned bad girders.
Out in the Pacific islands—Borneo, the Philippines—I had seen quite a bit of demonology at work. Demonol-ogy is fascinating stuff. A demon gets into a person and makes him sick. Or it gets in and talks in lieu of him. Or he goes crazy because he has a demon in him and runs around with the demon shouting. This is demonology in a narrow sense. The shaman, the medicine man, these people deal pretty heavily in demonology (it pays well). But, while not skeptical particularly, it had always seemed to me that demons could be explained a little more easily than in terms of ectoplasm13 or some such unsensible material.
To find "demons" living in one's civilized fellow countrymen was disturbing. But there they were. At least there were the manifestations which the shaman and medicine man had said were caused by demons. It was found that these "demons" could be cataloged. There were "commanding demons," "critical demons," ordinary "tell-you-what-to-say demons" and "demons" which stood around and yelled or "demons" which simply occluded things and kept them out of sight. These are not all the classes, but they cover the general field of "demonology."
A few experiments with drugged subjects showed that it was possible to set these "demons" up at will. It was even possible to set up the whole analytical mind as a "demon." So there was something wrong with demonology. Without proper ritual, simply by word of
13. ectoplasm: the luminous substance believed to emanate from a spiritualistic medium.
123
L. RON HUBBARD
mouth, one could make new demons appear in people. So there are no real demons in Dianetics (that's underscored in case some mystic runs around telling people that a new science of mind believes in demons).
A Dianetic demon is a parasitic circuit. It has an action in the mind which approximates another entity than self. And it is derived entirely from words contained in engrams.
How this demon gets there is not very hard to understand once you've inspected one, close up. Papa, while baby is unconscious, yells at Mama that she's got to listen to him and nobody else, by God. The baby gets an engram. It is keyed in some time between babyhood and death. And then there's the demon circuit at work.
An electronics engineer can set up demons in a radio circuit to his heart's content. In human terms, it is as if one ran a line from the standard banks toward the analyzer but before it got there he put in a speaker and a microphone and then continued the line to the plane of consciousness. Between the speaker and the microphone would be a section of the analyzer which was an ordinary, working section but compartmented off from the remainder of the analyzer. "I" on a conscious plane wants data. It should come straight from the standard bank, compute on a sublevel and arrive just as data. Not spoken data. Just data.
With the portion of the analyzer compartmented off and the speaker-microphone installation and the en-gram containing the above words "got to listen to me, by God" in chronic restimulation, another thing happens. The "I" in the upper-level attention units14 wants data. He starts to scan the standard banks with a
14. attention units: quantity of awareness. Any organism is aware to some degree. A rational or relatively rational organism is aware of being aware. Attention units could be said to exist in the mind in varying quantity from person to person.
124
THE "DEMONS"
sublevel. The data comes to him spoken. Like a voice inside his head.
A Clear does not have any "mental voices"! He does not think vocally. He thinks without articulation of his thoughts and his thoughts are not in voice terms. This will come as a surprise to many people. The "listen to me" demon is common in the society, which is to say this engram circulates widely. "Stay right there and listen to me" fixes the engram in present time (and fixes the individual in the time of the engram, to some extent). After it is keyed in and from there on, the individual thinks "out loud," which is to say, he puts his thoughts into language. This is very slow. The mind thinks out solutions (in a Clear) at such speed that the word stream of consciousness would be left at the post."
Proving this was very easy. In clearing every case, without exception, one or another of these demons was discovered. Some cases had three or four. Some had ten. Some had one. It is a safe assumption that almost every aberree contains a demon circuit.
The type of engram which makes a critical demon is, "You are always criticizing me." There are dozens of such statements contained in engrams, any one of which will make a critical demon, just as any combination of words resulting in a demand to listen and obey orders will make a commanding demon.
All these demons are parasitic. That is to say, they take a part of the analyzer and compartment it off. A demon can think only as well as the person's mind can think. There is no extra power. No benefit. All loss.
It is possible to set up the whole computer (analyzer) as a demon circuit and leave "I" on a tiny and forlorn shelf. This, on the surface, is a pretty good stunt. It
15. post: the starting gate at a racetrack.
125
L. RON HUBBARD
makes it possible for the whole analytical mind to work out computations undisturbed and relay the answer to the "I." But in practice it is very bad, for "I" is the will, the determining force of the organism, the awareness. And very soon "I" becomes so dependent upon this circuit that the circuit begins to absorb him. Any such circuit, to last, would have to have pain and be chronic. It would have to be, in short, an engram. Therefore, it would have to be reductive of the intellect and would victimize the owner by eventually making him ill one way or another.
Of all the engram demon circuits found and removed, those which contained a seemingly all-powerful exterior entity which would solve all problems and answer every want were the most dangerous. As the engram keyed in further and further and was constantly restimulated, it eventually made a spineless puppet out of "I"; because other engrams existed, the sum of the reduction tended toward insanity of a serious sort. If you want a sample, just imagine what you would have to say to a hypnotized person to make him think that he was in the hands of a powerful being who gave him orders and then imagine this as the phrase spoken when an individual had been knocked unconscious one way or another.
There is another full class of demons, the occlusion demons, the demons who shut things off. These are not properly demons because they don't talk. A bona fide16 demon is one who gives thoughts voice or echoes the spoken word interiorly or who gives all sorts of complicated advice like a real, live voice exteriorly. (People who hear voices have exterior vocal demons—circuits which have tied up their imagination circuits.) The occlusion demon doesn't have anything to say. It is what
16. bona fide: authentic; true.
126
THE "DEMONS"
he doesn't permit to be said or done that makes the mental derangement.
An occlusion demon can exist for a single word. For instance, a child receives an engram by falling off her bicycle and losing consciousness; a policeman tries to assist her; she is still unconscious but moving and mutters that she can't move (an old engram at work); the officer says, cheerfully, "Never say can't!" Some time later she has a conscious-level experience such as another fall but without injury. (We keep mentioning this second necessary step, the lock, because it is the thing old-time mystics thought was causing all the trouble—it is "mental anguish.") Now she has difficulty saying "can't." Dangerous in any event. What if she had that common engram expression, "Never say no!"?
Occlusion demons hide things from "I." It is as easy for one to mask many words. The individual having one will then omit these words or alter them or misspell them and make mistakes with them. The demon is not the only reason words get altered but he is a specific case. An occlusion demon can be of a much higher strength and breadth. He can be created with the phrase, "Don't talk!" or "Never talk back to your elders," or "You can't talk here. Who said you could talk?" Any of these phrases might produce a stammerer.
Other things besides speech can be occluded. Any ability of the mind can be inhibited by a demon specifically designed to obstruct that ability. "You can't see!" will occlude visual recall. "You can't hear!" will occlude audio recall. "You can't feel!" occludes pain and tactile recall (homonymic stuff, English).
Any perception can be occluded in recall. And whenever it is occluded in recall, it affects actual perception and the organ of perception as well. "You
127
L. RON HUBBARD
can't see!" may reduce not only recall but the actual organic ability of the eyes, as in astigmatism" or myopia.
One can imagine, with the entire English language (or in other lands with other tongues, any language) susceptible to inclusion within engrams, just how many abilities of the mind's operation can be occluded. An extremely common one is "You can't think!"
So far now, you has been used in illustrations and examples in order to keep the similarity to hypnotic or drug tests. Actually sentences which contain / are more destructive. "I can't feel anything," "I can't think," "I can't remember." These and their thousands and thousands of variations, when spoken within the hearing of an "unconscious" person, are applicable to himself when he gets the engram keyed into circuit.
You has several effects. The statement, "You are no good," to an awake person makes that person feel very angry perhaps when he has an engram to that effect. Within him he feels, possibly, that people think he is no good. He may have a demon that tells him he is no good. And he will dramatize by telling other people that they are no good. It can be sprayed off by being dramatized. A person who has an engram to the effect that he is sexually sterile, for instance, will tell people that they are sexually sterile. ("Don't do as I do, do as I say.") If he has an engram that says, "You are no good, you have to eat with your knife," he may eat with his knife but he gets excited about people eating with their knives, and he would grow very angry if somebody said he ate with his knife.
Thus, there are "compulsion demons" and "confusion demons" and so forth and so on.
The engram has a command value. There is a power
17. astigmatism: a defect in an eye or lens preventing proper focusing.
128
THE "DEMONS"
of choice exercised in the reactive mind about which and what engrams will be used. But any engram, strongly enough restimulated, will come to the surface to be dramatized. And if dramatization is blocked, it will turn on the individual either temporarily or chronically.
The literalness of this reactive mind, in its interpretation of commands and the literalness of their action within the poor, harassed analytical mind, is a strange thing in itself. "It is too horrible to be borne" might be interpreted to the effect that a baby was in such bad condition that it had better not be born. There are thousands of cliches in any language which, when literally taken, mean quite the opposite from what the speaker intends.
The reactive engram bank takes them, stores them with pain and emotion and "unconsciousness" and with moronic literalness, hands them forth to be law and command to the analytical mind. And when the happy little moron who runs the engram bank sees it possible to use up some analytical mind circuits with some of these confounded18 demons, it is done.
The analytical mind, then, can be seen to be subject to yet another form of attrition." Its circuits, ordinarily intended for smooth, rapid computation, become tied up and overloaded with demon lash-ups. The demons are parasites. They are pieces of analytical mind com-partmented off and denied to larger computation.
Is it any wonder that, when these demons are deleted, IQ soars, as it can be observed to do in a Clear? Add the demon circuits to the shut-down aspect of restimulation, and truth can be seen in the observation that people run on about one-twentieth of their mental
18. confounded: damned; a mild oath.
19. attrition: a wearing down or weakening of resistance, especially as a result of continuous pressure or harassment.
129
L. RON HUBBARD
power. Research and scientific tabulation indicate that with the "unconsciousness" aspect and the demon circuits deleted from the engram bank, and the data restored into the standard bank as experience where it should be, about forty-nine fiftieths of the mind have been placed at the service of "I" which he never could use as an aberree.
130
CHAPTER FIVE
Psychosomatic Illness
Psychosomatic illnesses are those which have a mental origin but which are nevertheless organic. Despite the fact that there existed no precise scientific proof of this before Dianetics, an opinion as to their existence has been strong since the days of Greece, and in recent times various drug preparations have been concocted and sold which were supposed to overcome these sicknesses. Some success was experienced, sufficient to warrant a great deal of work on the part of researchers. Peptic ulcers,1 for instance, have yielded to persuasion and environmental change. A drug called ACTH2 has had astonishing but wildly unpredictable results. Allergies have been found to yield more or less to things which depressed histamine3 in the body.
The problem of psychosomatic illness is entirely embraced by Dianetics, and by Dianetic technique such illness has been eradicated entirely in every case.
About 70 percent of the physician's current roster of diseases fall into the category of psychosomatic illness. How many more can be so classified after Dianetics has been in practice for a few years is difficult to predict, but it is certain that more illnesses are psychosomatic than have been so classified to date. That all illnesses
1. peptic ulcers: open sores in the stomach.
2. ACTH: a hormone that was sometimes used to combat symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis; it stimulates the production of other hormones in the body.
3. histamine: a substance released by the tissues in allergic reactions: it dilates blood vessels, stimulates gastric secretion, etc.
131
L. RON HUBBARD
are psychosomatic is, of course, absurd, for there exist, after all, life forms called germs which have survival as their goals.
The work of Louis Pasteur formulated the germ theory of disease. With Dianetics is gained the non-germ theory of disease. These two, with biochemistry, complement each other to form the whole field of pathology4 so far as can be determined at this time, providing of course that the virus is included under the germ theory.
Dianetics adds an additional leaf to the germ theory in that it includes predisposition. There are three stages of pathology: predisposition, by which is meant the factors which prepared the body for sickness; precipitation, by which is meant the factors which cause the sickness to manifest itself; and perpetuation, by which is meant the factors which cause the sickness to continue.
There are two kinds of illness: the first could be called autogenetic, which means that it originated within the organism and was self-generated; and exo-genetic, which means that the origin of the illness was exterior. Actually, although this is good medicine, it is not quite as precise as Dianetics could desire. Mental illness itself is actually exterior in origin. But medically, we consider that the body can generate its own sicknesses (autogenetic) or that the sickness can come from an exterior source such as bacteria (exogenetic). The Pasteur germ theory would be the theory of exogenetic—exteriorly generated—illness. Psychosomatic illness would be autogenetic, generated by the body itself.
Treatment for accidental injury, surgery for various things such as malformation inherent in the body on a
4. pathology: the science or the study of the origin, nature and course of diseases.
132
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
genetic5 basis, and orthopedics,6 which actually can be classed under both, remain properly outside the field of Dianetics, although it can be remarked in passing that almost all accidents are to be traced to dramatization of engrams and that Clears rarely have accidents.
Psycho, of course, refers to mind and somatic refers to body; the term psychosomatic means the mind making the body ill or illnesses which have been created physically within the body by derangement of the mind. Naturally such diseases, when one has resolved the problem of human aberration, become uniformly susceptible to cure.
Arthritis, dermatitis,7 allergies, asthma, some coronary difficulties, eye trouble, bursitis, ulcers, sinusitis, etc., form a very small section of the psychosomatic catalog. Bizarre aches and pains in various portions of the body are generally psychosomatic. Migraine8 headaches are psychosomatic and, with the others, are uniformly cured by Dianetic therapy. (And the word cured is used in its fullest sense.)
Just how many physical errors are psychosomatic depends upon how many conditions the body can generate out of the factors in the engrams. For example, the common cold has been found to be psychosomatic. Clears do not get colds. Just what, if any, part the virus plays in the common cold is not known, but it is known that when engrams about colds are lifted, no further
5. genetic: of or having to do with genetics, the branch of biology that deals with heredity and the way that animals and plants pass on to their offspring such characteristics as size, color, etc.
6. orthopedics: the branch of surgery dealing with the treatment of deformities, diseases and injuries of the bones, joints, muscles, etc.
7. dermatitis: inflammation of the skin.
8. migraine: a type of intense, periodically returning headache, usually limited to one side of the head and often accompanied by nausea, visual disorders, etc.
133
L. RON HUBBARD
colds appear—which is a laboratory fact not so far contradicted by 270 cases. The common cold comes about, usually, from an engram which suggests it and which is confirmed by actual mucus present in another engram. A number of germ diseases are predisposed and perpetuated by engrams. Tuberculosis9 is one.
The engram itself, as has been covered, follows a cycle of action. The body is predisposed to the conduct and conditions contained in the engram when that en-gram is first received. Then a conscious level experience keys in the engram, and other experience or the content of the engram itself may make it chronic. This is predisposition, precipitation and perpetuation in the mental plane.
Engrams and inherited disabilities and accidents and germs are the four ways an organism can be reduced physically from the optimum. Many conditions which have been called "inherited disabilities" are actually engramic. Engrams predispose people to accidents. Engrams can predispose and perpetuate bacterial infections. Therefore the catalog of ills affected by Dianetics is very long. This is not a book listing effects but a book stating causes, and so the reader is asked to call upon his own knowledge or consult a medical text to understand just how many thousands and thousands of conditions result from engrams to disturb or derange the body.
At the present time, Dianetic research is scheduled to include cancer and diabetes.10 There are a number of reasons to suppose that these may be engramic in cause, particularly malignant" cancer. This is remarked so that
9. tuberculosis: an infectious wasting disease affecting various parts of the body.
10. diabetes: a disease in which sugar and starch are not properly absorbed by the body.
11. malignant: causing or likely to cause death, especially by spreading unchecked through the body.
134
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
attention may be given to the possibility; no tests of any kind have been made on cancer or diabetic patients, and the thought is purely theory and is not to be taken as any kind of an avowal about a cancer cure. Those diseases which were cataloged above, however, have been thoroughly tested and have uniformly yielded to Dianetic therapy.
The mechanism by which the mind is able to cause a physical disability or predispose the body to an illness and perpetuate sickness is, in its basic cause, a very simple thing. The complexity arrives when one begins to combine all the factors possible; then a staggering list of potential illnesses can be written.
A series of simple tests can be made on drugged or hypnotic patients which will prove clinically in other laboratories this basic mechanism. A series of these tests were run in the formulation of Dianetics with uniform success.
Let us take first something which is only mildly psychosomatic and scarcely an illness at all. A patient is hypnotized. He is given the positive suggestion that he will be able to hear much more acutely. This is "extended hearing." Controlling out other means of his gaining data (including safeguards against telepathy between operator and subject) the hearing can be found to be amplifiable many times over. In fact, there exist all around aberrees who have "extended hearing." By suggestion, the power of the hearing can be tuned down or up so that a person is nearly deaf or can hear pins fall at a great distance. When the suggestion is removed, the subject's hearing returns to its previous normal state.
Similarly, experiments can be performed on the eyes, using light sensitivity. The patient's sight is tuned up or down so that his eyes are much more or much less sensitive to light than is normal for him. This is done
135
L. RON HUBBARD
entirely on the word-suggestion basis such as "The light will appear very, very bright to you," or "The light will appear so dim it will be hard for you to see." With the former suggestion the patient can be made to see almost as well as a cat, although other people around might think it impossible to see objects the patient can unerringly point out. In the latter suggestion the patient can be placed under light almost blinding and yet can read through a glare with apparent comfort.
The tactile sense can likewise be tuned up or down by verbal suggestion until touch becomes painfully acute or so dull it scarcely registers.
So with the various senses. Here we have simply the spoken word going into the mind and causing physical function to change.
Let us now address the heart. By deep hypnosis or drugs we take a patient into amnesia trance, a state of being wherein the "I" is not in control but the operator is the "I" (and that's all there is, really, to the function of hypnosis: the transfer of analytical power through the law of affinity from subject to operator, a thing which had a racial development and survival value in animals which ran in packs).
A caution should be observed that a patient who has a very sound heart and no heart trouble history be chosen for this experiment, which, even above any other hypnotic experiment, can make a patient very ill if he has a heart history. And none of these hypnotic tests should be performed until one has finished this book and knows how to get rid of the suggestions; for hypnosis, as practiced, is strictly live-fuse stuff and the hypnotist who is unacquainted with Dianetics has no more idea how to get rid of a suggestion he has made than he has of how to peel an atom. He has thought he had the answer, but Dianetics has treated many, many former hypnotic subjects who were thoroughly, as the
136
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
engineers interested in Dianetics say, "loused up."12 This is no criticism of hypnosis or hypnotists, who are often very able people, but it is a comment that there is more to be known about it.
The heart, by positive suggestion alone, can be speeded up, slowed down or otherwise excited. Here are words spoken into the deep strata of the mind which cause physical action. Further, blood flow can be inhibited in some area of the body by suggestion alone. (This experiment, it is warned, particularly overloads the heart.) Blood can be denied to a hand, for instance, so that if you were to cut a vein in that hand it would bleed slightly if at all. A fine swami13 trick, which most amazed the author in India, was the inhibition of blood flow by the awake individual in himself. On command a cut would bleed or not bleed. It looked fantastic and made very good press-agentry14 that here was a swami who had so associated himself with nirvana15 that he was in control of all material matters. Awe faded when the author learned that, via hypnosis, he could make his own body do the same thing and no nirvana involved. The mechanism fades out rapidly and in a few days would have to be renewed: the body has its own optimum operation, and although such a function can be "analytically" handled, it is not an upper-echelon analytical job to keep the blood going in the hand. The point here is that blood flow can be interrupted by verbal suggestion. Words connect up with the physical being.
12. loused up: botched; spoiled; ruined.
13. swami: lord; master: a Hindu title of respect, especially for a Hindu religious teacher.
14. press-agentry: publicity produced by a press agent's work or skill, especially in making a person or thing seem more desirable, admirable or successful.
15. nirvana: in Buddhism, the highest state of consciousness, in which the soul is freed from all desires and attachments.
137
L. RON HUBBARD
How this can come about can be shown by an analogic explanation, such as a schematic16 diagram, but we are not so much interested in structure as in function at this stage of the science of mind—because by knowing function alone we can cure aberrations and psychosomatic ills every time, predict new ills and conditions, and generally "work miracles," as such actions were once called before man knew anything about the mind.
Excreta are among the easiest things to regulate by suggestion. Constipation can be caused or cured by positive suggestion with remarkable speed and facility. The urine can also be so controlled. And so can the endocrine system.
It is harder to make tests on some of the more poorly understood functions of the endocrines. Glandular research has not progressed very far at this time. But, by removing engrams and watching the endocrine system rebalance, it has been made obvious that the endocrine system is a part of the control mechanism with which the mind handles the body. The glands are easily influenced. These fluids and secretions—testosterone," estro-gen,18 adrenaline, thyroid," parathyroid,20 pituitrin,21 etc.—are the substances the mind uses as one means of controlling the body. They form relay circuits, so to speak. Each one has its own action within the body.
This experiment tends to prove the fallacy of an
16. schematic: of, or having the nature of, a scheme, schema, plan, diagram, etc.
17. testosterone: a male sex hormone.
18. estrogen: a sex hormone or other substance capable of developing and maintaining female characteristics of the body.
19. thyroid: a hormone that regulates the body's growth and development.
20. parathyroid: a hormone important in controlling of the calcium-phosphate balance of the body.
21. pituitrin: the various substances secreted by the pituitary gland, located at the base of the brain, which have important influences on growth and bodily functions.
138
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
ancient assumption that the mind was controlled by the glands. An aberree is given a shot of 25 mg of testosterone in oil twice a week. There may be some improvement in his physical status—for a short time his voice may deepen and he may grow more hair on his chest. Now, without suggestion, we simply delete the engrams from his reactive bank so that they can re-form as experience in the standard bank. Before we have completed this task his body begins to use more of the testosterone. The dose can be markedly reduced and still give more benefit than formerly. Finally, the dose can be eliminated. This experiment has also been performed on people who had not been able to receive benefit from glandular substances such as testosterone and estrogen. And upon people who were made ill by the administration of these hormones. The deletion of the engrams from the reactive bank uniformly brought about a condition where they could receive benefit from the hormones but where such artificial administration was not necessary, save in cases of extreme age. What this means to gerontology (the study of longevity in life) cannot at this time be estimated, but it can be predicted with confidence that the deletion of engrams from the reactive bank has a marked effect upon the extension of life. A hundred years or so from now this data will be available, but no Clears have lived that long as yet.
Just now, to our purpose, it is easy to demonstrate the effect of positive suggestion upon the endocrine system and the lack of effect of artificial hormones upon aberrees.
This sort of an engram has a terribly reductive effect upon testosterone manufacture: "Sex is horrible; it is nasty; I hate it."
The autonomic nervous system,22 which has been
22. autonomic nervous system: a system of nerves in the body which regulates involuntary action, as of the intestines, heart and glands. Autonomic means "self-ruling" or "independent."
139
L. RON HUBBARD
supposed to run without much connection to the mind, can be shown to be influenced in its parts by the mind. There is a dwindling spiral effect (note the lines on the survival potential chart) whereby the engram starts malfunction in the life function regulator; this produces malfunction in the mind, which in turn has further effect on the life function regulator; this again reduces physical activity, and the mind, being part of the organ and, so far as we can tell, organic itself, is further reduced in tone. Mental tone makes body tone go down. Body tone, then being down, makes mental tone go down. This is a matter of inverse geometric progression. A man starts to get sick and, having engrams, he gets sicker. Clears are not subject to this dwindling spiral. Indeed, so entirely superficial is this horrible stuff called psychosomatic illness that it is the first thing which surrenders and can be alleviated without clearing.
Now, the reason why various drug preparations which seek to change psychosomatic illness meet with such uncertain success lies in the fact that the mind, containing these engrams which are "survival" (like a fellow needs a hole in his head), handles the life function regulator to actively produce illnesses. Something comes to take them away (they're "survival," you see, and these confounded cells moronically insist upon it) and the mind has to rapidly reverse the activity and put an illness back in place again. Try to influence the reactive mind by reason or needles and it is not any easier to convince than a drug-crazed man bent on murdering everybody in a bar. He's "surviving," too.
A concoction like ACTH has a slightly different effect. It is too exclusive to have any research done with it, but on reports about it, it seems to affect engrams in the time sense. That is to say, as will be covered under therapy, the individual's reactive location in time is
140
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
shifted by it. ACTH and perhaps many others in its category move the individual from one chronic engram into another. This is about as reliable as changing dictators in Europe. The next one may be twice as bad. It may even be a manic and that's horrible, despite its apparent "euphoria."
Electric shock treatment, the beatings of Bedlam and other things of their ilk,23 including surgical treatment of things psychosomatic in origin, have another effect, but one not dissimilar to drugs like ACTH, in that they give another shock which transfers the engram pattern to another part of the body (and switches around the aberrations; when these things work it is because the new aberration is less violent than the old one). Shocks, blows, surgery and maybe even things like cobra venom change the effect of the engram bank on the body, not necessarily for the worse, not necessarily for the better; they just change them. Like shooting dice: sometimes one gets a seven.24
Then there is the deletion-of-tissue treatment of psychosomatic ills. This simply removes the area which is busy dramatizing in the physical line. This can be the removal of a toe or the removal of a brain. These things are quite commonly used, as this is being written. The removal of the toe is addressed to one part of the engram content, the somatic, and the removal of parts of the brain (as in the transorbital leukotomy25 and the prefrontal lobotomy26 or anything else more recent) is
23. ilk: class; kind; sort.
24. gets a seven: reference to the game of craps (the throwing, or shooting, of dice), in which a first throw of seven wins.
25. transorbital leukotomy: (psychiatry) an operation which, while the patient is being electrically shocked, thrusts an ordinary dime-store ice pick into each eye and reaches up to rip the analyzer apart.
26. prefrontal lobotomy: (psychiatry) an operation in which the white fibers joining the prefrontal and frontal lobes to the interior region of the brain are severed.
141
L. RON HUBBARD
addressed mistakenly to "the removal of" the psycho-aberration. There is a surrender system at work in this as well: the surgeon or the patient has an aberration about "getting rid of it," and so bits of the body are cut up or removed. Some patients surrender anatomy on advice or at their own insistence like old-timers shed blood in a phlebotomy.27 There is a straight parallel between bleeding the patient to make him well and cutting away parts of him to make him well. Both are based on a surrender (get rid of) engram and neither are effective in any way. Barber basin medicine,28 it is hoped, will eventually die out, as did its patients.
These are the five classes of psychosomatic ills: (1) those ills resulting from mentally caused derangement in physical fluid flow, which class subdivides into (a) inhibition of fluid flow and (b) magnification of fluid flow; (2) those ills resulting from mentally caused derangement of physical growth, which class subdivides into (a) inhibition of growth and (b) magnification of growth; (3) those ills resulting from predisposition to disease resulting from a chronic psychosomatic pain in an area; (4) those ills resulting from perpetuation of a disease on account of chronic pain in an area; and (5) those ills caused by the verbal command content of the engrams.
In Class 1 (a) fall such ordinary things as constipation and such extraordinary things as arthritis. Arthritis is a complex mechanism with a simple cause and a relatively simple cure. Remember that there are two things present in an engram: physical pain and verbal
27. phlebotomy: the act or practice of bloodletting as a therapeutic measure.
28. barber basin medicine: reference to the practice of surgery by barbers in earlier centuries. Generally untrained in medical procedures, their "treatments" were very painful with severe infections and often death resulting from unsanitary conditions.
142
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
command. In arthritis both must be present (as in the bulk of psychosomatic ills). There must have been an accident to the joint or area affected, and there must have been a command during the "unconsciousness" which attended the injury which would make the en-gram susceptible to chronic restimulation. (Such commands as "It is always like this" or "It just goes right on hurting" or "I'm stuck" will produce similar results.) Given this engram and given this engram keyed in, there is a chronic pain in the area of the injury. It may be minor, but it is a pain just the same. (It can be a pain but not be felt if the engram contains a command which is anesthetic, such as "He'll never feel this," which produces a similar condition but makes one "unconscious" of the pain there.) This pain in the body probably tells the cells and the blood that this area is dangerous. It is therefore avoided. The command permits the mind to influence, let us say, the parathyroid, which contains the secret of the calcium content in the bloodstream. A mineral deposit then begins to be laid down in the area. The mineral deposit is not necessarily the cause of the pain, but it is an organic restimulator so that the more mineral, the more pain, the more the engram keys in. This is the dwindling spiral. And this is arthritis in action. Understand that the parathyroid and the blood avoidance are theoretical cause; the scientific fact is that when an engram is picked up and deleted about an area containing arthritis, that arthritis vanishes and does not return and this is x-ray plate evidence; it happens every time and does not happen because of any suggestion or medicine; it happens because an engram is picked up and refiled. As the engram goes away, so goes the pain, so vanishes the arthritis. This forms a whole class of ills, of which arthritis is only one. The mechanisms involved vary slightly. All can be headed under "physical derangement caused by reduced body fluid flow."
143
L. RON HUBBARD
Class 1 (b) of psychosomatic ills, magnification of fluid flow, contains such things as high blood pressure, diarrhea, sinusitis, priapism (overactivity of the male sex glands) or any other physical condition resulting from a superabundance of fluid.
Class 2 (a) can cause such things as a withered arm, a foreshortened nose, underdeveloped genital organs or any other underdevelopment of a gland having to do with size (which cross-classes this with 1 [a]), hairless-ness (which also like the rest can be part of the gene pattern and therefore inherent), and, in short, reduction in size of any part of the body.
Class 2 (b) causes such things as oversized hands, a lengthened nose, oversized ears, enlarged organs and other common physical malformations. (Cancer might possibly come under this heading as overheating.)
Class 3 would include tuberculosis (some cases), liver trouble, kidney trouble, rashes, common colds, etc. (cross-classing with others, as do all of these in one way or another).
Class 4 would include those diseases which, arising without psychosomatic influence, yet fix upon, by accident, a previously injured area and, by restimulation, keep an engram keyed in in that area so that a condition becomes chronic. Tuberculosis could be included here. Conjunctivitis,29 all running sores and any condition which refuses to heal, etc.
This fourth class would also include all bizarre pains and sicknesses which cannot be found to have actual pathology.
Class 5 includes an enormously wide catalog of conditions, any one of which may cross-index to other classes or which arise solely out of engrams which
29. conjunctivitis: inflammation of the conjunctiva, the mucous membrane lining the inner eyelid and part of the eye.
144
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
dictate the presence or necessity of an illness. "You always have colds," "I have sore feet," etc., announce a psychosomatic illness and the mechanisms of the body can furnish one.
Any disease whatever can be precipitated by en-grams. The disease may be of germ origin: the individual possesses art engram to the effect that he may become sick and, on this generalization, becomes sick with whatever is to hand. Further and even more general, the engram reduces the physical resistance of the body to disease, and when an engram goes into restimu-lation (perhaps because of a domestic quarrel, an accident or some such thing) the ability of the individual to resist sickness is automatically decreased.
Children, as will be explained, have many more engrams than has been supposed. Almost all childhood illnesses are preceded by psychic disturbance and if psychic disturbance is present—keeping an engram restimulated—such illnesses can be far more violent than they should be. Measles, for instance, can be just measles or it can be measles in company with engramic restimulation, in which case it can be nearly or entirely fatal. A check of many subjects on this matter of childhood illness being predisposed by, precipitated by and perpetuated by engrams causes one to wonder just how violent the diseases themselves really are: they have never been observed in a cleared child and there is reason to investigate the possibility that childhood illnesses are in themselves extremely mild and are complicated only by psychic disturbance—which is to say, the restimulation of engrams.
In fact, one could ask this question of the entire field of pathology: What is the actual effect of disease minus the mental equation? How serious are bacteria?
The field of bacteriology has been without dynamic principles until now: the dynamic, survival, is applicable
145
L. RON HUBBARD
to all life forms, and "life forms" include germs. The purpose of the germ is to survive. Its problems are those of food, protection (offense and defense) and procreation. To accomplish these things the germ survives at its optimum efficiency. It mutates, alters with natural selection and changes dynamically from survival necessity (the missing step of the evolution theory, that last) in order to accomplish the maximum survival possible. It makes errors by killing the hosts, but to have a purpose to survive does not mean that a form necessarily survives.
In pathology, the germ, bent on its purpose, acts as a suppressor to the survival dynamic of the human species. How serious this suppressor is in the absence of engram suppression in the human has not been determined; enough data exists to indicate that a human individual with his potential in the fourth zone is not, apparently, very subject to disease: the common cold, for instance, if it is a virus or not, passes him by; chronic infections are absent. What antibodies have to do with this or what this factor is, is yet another question. But it remains that a Clear is not easily made ill. In the aberree illness closely pursues mental depression (depression of the dynamic level).
The aberration of mind and body by engrams leads, then, not only to psychosomatic ills but also to actual pathology, which has hitherto been considered more or less independent of the mental state. As has been proven by clinical research, clearing of engrams does more than remove psychosomatic illness, potential, acute or chronic. The clearing also tends to proof the individual against the receipt of pathology: to what extent, it is not yet known, for such a wide and long-term view is required to establish the actual statistics that the project will require thousands of cases and the observations of medical doctors over a long term.
The amount of aberration which a person manifests,
146
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
which is to say, the position he would occupy on a sanity scale, has little to do with psychosomatic illness. Such illnesses require only one or two engrams of a specific nature to become manifest. These engrams may not be aberrative in any other way than to predispose the individual to illness. Having a psychosomatic illness is not the same as being "crazy" or having hypochondriacal tendencies. The hypochondriac thinks he has illnesses, a special case of Class 5 above.
Derangement falls sharply into two categories: the first is the mental derangement—any irrational condition—which, in Dianetics, we call aberration in order to avoid constant cataloging of the thousands, the millions of manifestations irrationality can have. The other derangement of the individual is somatic: this applies entirely to his physical being and physical ability and health. Both these things are present in every engram: the aberration and the somatic. But the engram can manifest itself chronically as either a somatic (a noun has been made out of an adjective here and it is commonly employed in Dianetics to avoid the use of the word pain, which is not embracive and which is restim-ulative) or as an aberration or as both together.
An engram must contain physical pain. When an engram is restimulated in everyday life, that physical pain may appear or it may not. If it does not appear as pain but as aberration, then the individual is in another valence than his own (the "necessity to manifest his hostilities"). If he is sane enough to be in his own valence, the physical pain will be present. In Dianetics, we say the somatic has appeared. When any somatic appears, unless the individual is a preclear30 in therapy,
30. preclear: from pre-Clear, a person not yet Clear; generally a person being audited, who is thus on the road to Clear; a person who, through Dianetics auditing, is finding out more about himself and life.
147
L. RON HUBBARD
some of the aberration is also appearing. In short, the aberration can appear by itself or the somatic plus some of the aberration can appear. When a person dramatizes another valence than his own, the aberration is present; when the dramatization, running off the engram phonograph-record-wise in one or another valence, is suppressed by some other factor, such as the police or a stronger person or even the individual himself (this has been called repression—the term is not used here because it is loaded with other meanings), the somatic most certainly will come into view.
The individual is, then, apparently "better off" (as the cells meant him to be) to occupy the survival role in the engram (the winning valence), for he is, at least, not ill. But how many people have been killed, how many banks have been robbed and how many marital partners have been driven mad by these dramatizations? So the health of the individual would be considered by society, in its effort to protect its members, to be a secondary affair. In fact, "society" has not known about this mechanical aspect, The individual who dramatizes the survival valence in his engrams may do violent things to other people. The individual who will not permit himself such a dramatization or who is forced by society away from such dramatization will most certainly become psychosomatically ill. "Heads I win, tails you lose."31 The answer is in the alleviation or deletion of the engram. For there are many additional aspects to the problem: the man who dramatizes his engrams, society or no society, is not apt to survive; and if he
31. "Heads I win, tails you lose": descriptive of a one-sided arrangement. The phrase comes from a game of flipping a coin into the air and betting on which side will land uppermost. Heads refers to the side of a coin bearing the date and the main design (often a representation of a head); tails refers to the reverse side of a coin.
148
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
dramatizes them, he is subject to whatever slurs were leveled at the valence he is in by another valence in that same engram.
The combinations of the classes and aspects of psychosomatic illness listed and described here lead to some highly complex situations. It is a scientific fact that no psychosomatic ill exists without an aberration. And it is true that no aberration exists without a potential or actual psychosomatic ill. One of the psychosomatic illnesses one would least expect to find as a psychosomatic affair is the illness of sexual perversion.
The sexual pervert (and by this term Dianetics, to be brief, includes any and all forms of deviation in dynamic two such as homosexuality, lesbianism,32 sexual sadism,33 etc., and all down the catalog of Ellis34 and Krafft-Ebing35) is actually quite ill physically. Perversion, as an illness, has so many manifestations that it must be spread through the entire gamut36 of classes from 1 to 5 above. Overdevelopment of sexual organs, underdevelopment, seminal37 inhibition or magnification, etc., are found some in one pervert, some in another. And the sum of it is that the pervert is always a very ill person in one way or another, whether he is conscious of it or not. He is very far from culpable38 for his condition, but he is also so far from normal and so
32. lesbianism: homosexual relations between women.
33. sadism: the getting of sexual pleasure from dominating, mistreating or hurting one's partner.
34. Ellis: Henry Havelock Ellis (1859-1939), English criminolo-gist and psychologist who conducted studies in psychology and sociology of sex.
35. Krafft-Ebing: Baron Richard von Krafft-Ebing (1840-1902), German neurologist and author of works on sexual pathology-
36. gamut: the entire range or extent, as of emotions.
37. seminal: pertaining to, containing or consisting of semen.
38. culpable: deserving blame; blameworthy.
149
L. RON HUBBARD
extremely dangerous to society that the tolerance of perversion is as thoroughly bad for society as punishment for it. Lacking proper means prior to this time, society has been caught between tolerance and punishment, and the problem of perversion has, of course, not been resolved. A bit off the subject here, but it can be remarked about perversion that the best previous explanation for it was something about girls becoming envious of Papa's penis or boys becoming upset about that terrible thing, the vulva, which Mama was incautious enough to show one day. It takes a great deal more than this utter tripe39 to make a pervert. It is, rather, something on the order of kicking a baby's head in, running over him with a steamroller, cutting him in half with a rusty knife, boiling him in Lysol,40 and all the while with crazy people screaming the most horrifying and unprintable things at him. The human being is a very tough character. He is so confoundedly tough that he has whipped the whole animal kingdom and he can shake the stars. And when it comes to throwing his second dynamic out of balance, what that takes is straight out of Dante41 and Sax Rohmer42 combined. Hence the pervert, containing hundreds and hundreds of vicious engrams, has had little choice between being dead and being a pervert. But with an effective science to handle the problem, a society which would continue to endure perversion and all its sad and sordid effects doesn't deserve to survive.
39. tripe: (slang) anything worthless, offensive, etc.; nonsense.
40. Lysol: (trademark) a brand of clear, brown, oily solution used as a disinfectant and antiseptic.
41. Dante: originally Durante, Alighieri (1265-1321), Italian poet. Wrote Divina Commedia, recounting an imaginary journey by the author through hell, purgatory and paradise.
42. Sax Rohmer: pseudonym of Arthur Sarsfield Ward (1883-1959), English author of mystery thrillers, especially a series centering about fictional character Dr. Fu Manchu.
150
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
Perversion can have other aspects. In one society examined, these aberrations had multiplied so far that a principal mystic cult had sprung up which contended that all mental illness came from sex; this, of course, gave further impetus to aberrations on the second dynamic (sex), as such a cultic belief must have been originated by an individual who had severe aberrations across the second dynamic. This belief that sex was the only source of human aberration and travail43 naturally attracted as its practitioners individuals who had similar aberrative patterns. And so the cult further enforced existing aberrative factors in the society, since all their activity was leveled at making sex something ogreish44 and dreadful by labeling it the society's primary source of mental illness. The prophet of this god was Man-ichaeus, a Persian of the third century, who taught that all things about the body, especially sex, were evil; the cult of Manichaeus carried on well into the Dark Ages and then vanished, to trouble man no more.
Any dynamic can be blocked: the personal dynamic, the sex dynamic, the group dynamic or the mankind dynamic. Each one has been the target at some time of one cult or another seeking to cure all man's ills and save him. Dianetics is not interested in saving man, but it can do much to prevent him from being "saved." As an organized body of scientific knowledge, Dianetics can draw only the conclusion which it observes in the laboratory.
It can be observed that the Church is entirely correct in doing all in its power to prevent blasphemy.45 Blasphemy
43. travail: (figurative) trouble, hardship or suffering.
44. ogreish: like or having the characteristics of an ogre: (in folklore and fairy tales) a man-eating monster, usually represented as a hideous giant; hence, anything likened to such a monster in appearance or character.
45. blasphemy: abuse of or contempt for God or sacred things.
151
L. RON HUBBARD
can very often be uttered during the "unconsciousness" of a person who has been struck. This would enter sacred names and curses into engrams which, reacting within the individual, give him an unnatural terror and compulsion or repulsion toward God. It is not the religion which is at fault, it is the blaspheming of the religion. Such blasphemy makes the insane zealot46 and the murderous atheist,47 both of whom the Church would very gladly do without.
In the realm of psychosomatic illness, any combination of the language is as damaging a factor in an engram as any other factor. The moronic reasoning of the reactive mind, which considers everything in an engram equal to everything in an engram, also considers that everything similar to the engram in the exterior world (the restimulators) is sufficient cause to place an engram in effect. Hence aberration and illness can come about.
There is, however, a peculiarity in psychosomatic illnesses which is chronic: the aberree's reactive mind exercises a power of choice to the extent that only prosurvival engrams become chronic. It could be said, on a reactive level, that the aberree will not permit himself to suffer illness from his engrams unless that illness has a "survival" value. This is very important in therapy. The chronic psychosomatic illnesses which a patient displays are those which have a sympathy (pro-survival) background.
It is not possible to "spoil" a child with love and affection. Whoever postulated that it was possible was postulating out of bad data and no observation. A child needs all the love and affection it can possibly get. A
46. zealot: an excessively zealous person; fanatic.
47. atheist: a person who denies or disbelieves the existence of a supreme being or beings.
152
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
test was run in one hospital which tended to show that babies, when left without attention, ran fevers. When given attention, the fevers immediately abated. The test, while not observed personally by the author, seems to have been conducted with proper controls according to report. If this is true, it postulates a mechanism in the human being which uses illness for affection on a genetic basis. There is no reason why not; there have been enough years of engineering—almost two billion—to build anything into the blueprint. These babies, in several groups, were left in the hospital by their parents for the test; they uniformly became ill when not given affection. Here is the law of affinity at work, if these tests were accurately conducted. Their purpose was not to help Dianetics, but to show that the leaving of a baby in the hospital after his birth because he has a slight illness invariably increases that illness.
A series of severely controlled Dianetic experiments over a much longer period demonstrated that the law of affinity, as applicable to psychosomatic illness, was more powerful than fear and antagonism by a very wide margin. So great is this margin that it could be compared as the strength of a steel girder to a straw. It was found, as above, that chronic psychosomatic ills existed only when they had a sympathy engram behind them. The law of affinity might be interpreted as the law of cohesion; affinity might be defined as "love" in both its meanings. Deprivation of or absence of affection could be considered as a violation of the law of affinity. Man must be in affinity with man to survive. The suicide ordinarily commits the act on the computation that the removal of self will some way benefit other selves— this, on the reactive mind level, is a very ordinary computation, deriving exclusively from engrams. The violent industrial chieftain with his merciless mien,48
48. mien: a person's manner or bearing.
153
L. RON HUBBARD
when he suffers from a psychosomatic ill, ordinarily derives it out of a sympathy engram.
The sympathy engram pretends to be prosurvival. As one preclear said, a man is not victimized by his enemies but by his friends. An engram comes about always from a greater or lesser moment of "unconsciousness." There is no engram without "unconsciousness." It is only when the analyzer is out of circuit that the exterior world can come interior, unrationalized, and work from within. The second the analyzer identifies one of those engrams as such, that engram loses about 20 percent of its value to aberrate and usually 100 percent of its value to cause a psychosomatic illness. Pain is extremely perishable. Pleasure is recorded in bronze. (Not poetry here, science. Physical pain will delete with brief attention; a pleasant or even a media-media49 experience is so solidly fixed in the mind that no treatment known to Dianetics will shake it and a great deal of effort has been leveled at pleasure recordings just to test them for permanence. They are permanent; physical pain is perishable. Too bad, Schopenhauer,50 but you were a most mistaken man.)
Exposing a lock to the analyzer—a moment of "mental anguish"—once the engram which gave it power is gone causes that lock to blow away like chaff. The analyzer works on the "doctrine of the true datum": it has no truck51 with anything which it once
49. media-media: average.
50. Schopenhauer: Arthur Schopenhauer (1788-1860), German philosopher. He maintained that the desires and drives of men, as well as the forces of nature, are manifestations of a single will, specifically the will to live, which is the essence of the world. Schopenhauer asserted that since operation of the will means constant striving without satisfaction, life consists of suffering and that only by controlling the will through the intellect, by suppressing the desire to reproduce, can suffering be diminished.
51. truck: dealings; business.
154
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
discovers to be false. Just exposing an engram without relieving it has some therapeutic value—20 percent—and this gave rise to a belief that all one had to do was know about his ills and they would vanish. Nice if it were so.
The most aberrative engram, then, is one which is held down by the reactive mind's—that moron's— concept that it is needed in the survival of the individual. This sympathy engram is the one which comes forward and stays chronic as a psychosomatic illness. There are two reasons for this: one is usually in one's own valence when a sympathy engram is received; and one's reactive mind, knowing well the value of affinity, puts forward the psychosomatic illness to attract affinity. There is no volition here on the part of the individual's "I," analytical self. But there is every "volition" on the part of the reactive mind.
A sympathy engram would go something like this: a small boy, much victimized by his parents, is extremely ill. His grandmother attends him and, while he is delirious, soothes him and tells him she will take care of him, that she will stay right there until he is well. This puts a high "survival" value on being sick. He does not feel safe around his parents; he wants his grandmother present (she is a winning valence because she orders the parents around), and he now has an engram. Minus the engram there would be no psychosomatic illness. Sickness, "unconsciousness" and physical pain are essential to the receipt of this engram. But it is not a contrasurvival engram. It is a prosurvival engram. It can be dramatized in one's own valence.
The psychosomatic illness, in such a case as this, would be a "precious possession." "I" doesn't even know the computation. The analyzer was out when the engram went in. The analyzer cannot recall that en-gram with anything short of Dianetic therapy. And the engram will not clear away.
155
L. RON HUBBARD
Now, with this engram we have a patient with sinusitis and a predisposition to lung infections. It may be that he was luckless enough to marry a counterpart of his mother or his grandmother. The reactive mind cannot tell the difference between Grandmother or Mother and wife if they are even vaguely similar in speech, voice tone or mannerisms. The wife is not sympathetic. In goes the engram to demand that sympathy. And even if the wife thinks that sinusitis and lung infection are repulsive enough to lead to divorce, the reactive mind keeps that engram keyed in. The more hatred from the wife, the more that engram keys in. You can kill a man that way.
The above is a standard sympathy engram. When a therapist tries to get that engram away from the patient, the reactive mind balks. The "I" doesn't balk. The analyzer doesn't balk. These are hopeful that this en-gram will spring. But the reactive mind keeps it nailed down until the Dianeticist puts a crowbar under it. Then it is gone. (Enough locks may be lifted, by the way, to alleviate this condition. But the patient will dig up another engram!)
Resistance to past therapies has resulted from these sympathy engrams. Yet they lie right there on the surface, fully exposed as chronic psychosomatic illness.
Feeding a patient with a psychosomatic ill any number of drugs can result in only temporary relief. "I" doesn't want the illness. The analyzer doesn't want it. But the body has it, and if anybody succeeds in curing it short of removing that engram, the body, at the command of the reactive mind, will find something else to substitute for that ill or develop an "allergy" to the drug or annul the effect of the drug entirely.
Of course, one can always rip living tissue out of the skull with knives, ice picks or shock in wholesale quantities. This will cure a psychosomatic ill. It also,
156
PSYCHOSOMATIC ILLNESS
unhappily, cures the personality, the intellect and all too often, life itself.
In Dianetics, the application of technique to relieve the engrams causing these ills has brought the uniform relief of all patients treated, without relapse. In short and in brief, psychosomatic ills can now be cured. All of them.
157
CHAPTER Six
Emotion and the Dynamics
Emotion is a 0' quantity, which is to say that it is so involved with life forces that Dianetics, at this stage, handles it with invariable success but does not attempt to give forth more than a descriptive theory. Much research must be done on emotion; but so long as the therapy embraces it and releases it with success, further data can be dispensed with up to a point.
Emotion would have to be divided sharply into minus emotions and plus emotions. The minus emotion would be nonsurvival in character, the plus emotion would be prosurvival. The pleasant and pleasurable emotions are not of any great concern to us here. It is believed that all emotion is the same thing but in its aspects above zone 1 it can be bypassed as unnecessary to explain at this time for the purpose of this book.
In zones 1 and 0, emotion becomes very important to therapy. As has been covered earlier, zones 1 and 0 are the anger and apathy zones respectively. From death up to the border between anger and fear is zone 0. From this borderline to the beginning of boredom is anger, zone 1.
It is as if the survival dynamic, in becoming contracted into zone 1, first began to display hostility, then, on further suppression toward death, anger. On further suppression, rage began to be displayed. Then fear as the next lower level, then terror and finally, just above death, apathy.
1. 0: theta, the eighth letter in the Greek alphabet. Greek for thought or life or the spirit.
158
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
And as the dynamic is suppressed, the cells react forcefully to the menace, it could be said, by resisting the menace. The analyzer resists down to the top border of zone 1, but in ever-decreasing control. From here on down the cells, the actual organism, do the resisting in a last-ditch effort. The reactive mind is thoroughly in command from the top border of zone 1 straight tin down to death, and it is in ever-increasing command of the organism as the dynamic is suppressed.
Emotion seems to be inextricably2 connected up with the actual force of life. That there is a life force no engineer could doubt. Man and medicine usually look at the pitcher and forget that the pitcher is only there to hold milk and that the milk is the important quantity. Life force is the helium3 which fills the free balloon. Out goes the helium, down comes the balloon. When this type of energy is located and isolated as itself—if it is just an energy type—then medicine can start moving forward in strides which will make all former steps look like those of a man in a sack race.4 Medicine doesn't have any spare helium, for one thing.
How high this life force can go on the survival scale is not known. Above zone 3 is the area of question marks. A Clear goes up into a level of persistence, vigor, tenacity, rationality and happiness. Perhaps someday a Clear will attain the nebulosity the author used to hear about in India which marked the man who was all soul.
How far down it can go is definitely known. A man dies. He doesn't move or think. He dies as an organism,
2. inextricably: in a way incapable of being disentangled, undone, loosed or solved.
3. helium: one of the chemical elements, a very light, inert, colorless gas: it is used for inflating balloons, etc.
4. sack race: a race in which each contestant jumps ahead while his or her legs are confined in a sack.
159
L. RON HUBBARD
then he dies as cells. There are different periods of "life after death" for the cells, and biologists remark that the hair and nail cells do not die for months. So here is a spectrum of death, first the organism and then, colony by colony, the cells.
That is from the bottom of zone 0 downward. But what we are interested in is the area from zone 1 down to the bottom of zone 0. It could be postulated that the analytical mind has its greatest bounce against the suppressor, its highest ability to care for the organism, when it is in the third zone. As the suppressor thrusts downward against it, the analyzer, within lower zone 3, thrusts heavily back. This is necessity at work. The necessity level can rise, in this action, to a point which keys out* all engrams!
It must be realized that the analyzer considers future suppressors and is continually engaged upon computations which pose problems of the future which the analyzer resolves—this is one of the functions of the imagination. It must further be realized that the analyzer is engaged upon a multitude of computations about the present, for the analytical mind is dealing continually with an enormous number of factors which comprise the suppressor of the present and the suppressor of the future. It computes, for instance, on the alliances with friends and symbiotes and its greatest victories are achieved by taking some of the suppressor and turning it into an alliance factor.
The individual can be visualized, on the survival spectrum, as being at the tip of the survival dynamic. The suppressor thrusts down, or future suppressors threaten a thrust, and the analytical mind thrusts up with solutions. The level of the individual is determined
5. key out: cause an engram (or engrams) to drop away without being erased.
160
F
!	EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
|	by how well these suppressors are apparently met.
We speak now of the Clear, and until further mention we will continue to use the Clear. The Clear is an unaberrated person. He is rational in that he forms the best possible solutions he can on the data he has and from his viewpoint. He obtains the maximum pleasure for the organism, present and future, as well as for the subjects along the other dynamics. The Clear has no engrains which can be restimulated to throw out the correctness of computation by entering hidden and false data into it. No aberration. Hence the reason we use him here as an example.
The survival dynamic is high, more than balancing
the suppressor. Take this as a first condition. This would
place the dynamic in zone 3, tone 3.9. Now increase the
suppressor. The dynamic is pushed back to tone 3.2.
Necessity surges up. The suppressor is thrust back. The
I         dynamic is once more at tone 3.9. This action could be
i         termed an enthusiastic resurgence. The individual has
actually gotten "angry"—that is to say, he has called
upon his being to furnish power for thought and action.
Mentally, he calls upon whatever constitutes mental en-
•         ergy. Physically, if the suppression was physical, he would
call upon his adrenaline. This is proper use of the endo-
crines, to use them for regaining position in relation to the
|         suppressor. Any and all body function is under analytical
I         (but not necessarily monitored) command.
!	Now let us suppose that the suppressor surges down
against the dynamic and drives the dynamic to 3.0.
Necessity level comes up. Action is taken. The full
i         force of the being is thrown against the suppressor. Now
[        let us suppose that a new factor comes into the suppres-
;         sor and makes it much, much stronger. The individual
;         still attempts to resurge against it. But the suppressor
weighs heavier and heavier against him. He is beginning
to exhaust his supplies of mental or physical energy (and
161
L. RON HUBBARD
this suppressor can be on either a mental or physical level). Wearying, the individual drops down to a 2.5. The suppressor again increases. Resurgence is attempted once more. The last supply of available energy or data is thrown out. And another factor comes into the suppressor, increasing its weight. The individual sags down to 2.0.
At exactly this point the analyzer, having failed, finally cuts out. Here is entered the top of zone 1. Hostility sets in. The suppressor is down, pressing down against actual cellular survival. And it drops lower. The individual goes into anger, recruiting cellu-larly, but not sentiently, the last forces. Again the suppressor gets new weight. The individual goes into rage. Once more the suppressor drops. The individual goes into fear, tone 0.9. Again the suppressor lowers, recruiting new factors. The individual is thrust down to 0.6 and, here, is in terror. Once more tl .. suppressor drops with new force. The individual slides into fear paralysis, 0.2.
Suppose we parallel this in a very simple, dramatic example so that we do not have to consider a thousand subtle factors. A Clear, inexperienced in hunting, determines to shoot a grizzly.6 He has a fine rifle. The grizzly appears to be easy game. The man is at 3.9 or above. He feels good. He is going to get that grizzly, as the grizzly has been threatening the man's stock.1 High enthusiasm carries him to the lair. He waits, he finally sees the grizzly. There is a cliff above the man which he could not ordinarily climb. But to get a good shot before the grizzly vanishes, the man has to climb the cliff. Seeing he was in danger of losing the game brought
6. grizzly: short for grizzly bear: a large, ferocious, brownish, grayish or yellowish bear of western North America, having a shoulder hump and long front claws.
7. stock: cattle or other farm or range animals; livestock.
162
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
the man down to 3.2. Necessity sends him up the cliff. He fires but in firing falls back down the cliff. The grizzly is wounded. He starts toward the man. Necessity surges up. The man recovers the gun and shoots again. He is at 3.0 the moment he shoots. He misses. He fires again but the miss, with the grizzly charging, brought him down to 2.5. He shoots once more. The grizzly takes the ball and keeps on coming. The man shoots again but he has suddenly realized that his rifle is not going to stop this grizzly. His tone drops to 2.0. He begins to snarl and feverishly work his gun. His bullets go wild. He experiences rage at the gun, the grizzly, the world, and throws the gun away, ready to meet the grizzly, almost upon him, with bare hands. Suddenly the man knows fear. His tone is 1.2. It drops to 0.9 with a smell in his nostrils of the bear. He knows the bear will kill him. He turns and tries to claw up the cliff and get away but his efforts are frenzied. He is at tone 0.6, stark terror. The bear strikes him and knocks him from the cliffside. The man lies still, breathing almost halted, heartbeat slowed to nearly nothing. The bear hits him again and the man lies still. Then the bear decides he is dead and walks away. Shaken, the man eventually comes around, his tone gradually rising up to 2.0, the point where his analyzer shut off. He stirs more and gets up. His tone is back to 2.5: he is analytically afraid and cautious. He recovers his gun. He begins to leave the scene. He feels a great necessity to recoup his own self-esteem and his tone comes to 3.2. He walks away and reaches a safe area. Suddenly it occurs to him that he can borrow a friend's Mauser.8 He begins to make plans to get that bear. His enthusiasm mounts. But, completely aside from the engram received when the bear knocked him out, he acts on his experience. Three days later he kills the bear and his tone rises to 4.0 for the
8. Mauser: a brand of military or hunting rifles.
163
L. RON HUBBARD
space of contemplation and telling the tale, and then his mind occupies itself with new matters.
Life is much more complicated than the business of killing grizzlies, usually a lot less dramatic but always full of situations which cause a fluctuation of the suppressor. The gaining of all pleasurable goals—a bear killed, a woman kissed, a seat in the front row at the opera, a friend won, an apple stolen—are sweeps through various levels of tone. And the individual is generally carrying on three or three thousand computations at once and there are thirty or thirty thousand variables in his computations. Too many unknowns, too many entrances of "didn't know the gun was loaded" factors: all these can throw the analyzer from a direct alignment into the scattered dispersal of nonfunction. The analyzer can be considered to cut out when tone 2.0 is reached. From 2.5 down, the computations it makes are not very rational— too many unknowns, too many unexpected factors, too many discoveries of miscalculations.
This is living on a "Clear" basis. When our hunter was hit by the bear he received an engram. That engram, when it keyed in, would give him a fear, an apathy attitude, in the presence of certain factors: every per-ceptic present—the smell of that ground, twigs, bear breath, etc. But he killed the bear. The chances of that engram keying in are remote. Not because he killed the bear but because he was, after all, a grown man. And, if a Clear, he could have thought back and cleared the whole thing himself.
This is a complete cycle of emotion. Enthusiasm and high pleasure are at the extreme top. Fear and paralysis are at the bottom. Feigned9 death, in man, is very close to the actual thing on the Tone Scale. It is a valid mechanism. But it is complete apathy.
9. feigned: pretended, simulated; sham.
164
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
So long as the analyzer is operating, the receipt of an engram is impossible. Everything files in the standard banks. As soon as the border 2.0 is passed on the way down, "unconsciousness" can be judged to have set in and anything registered, in company with pain or painful emotion, is an engram. This is not a shift of definition. The analyzer cuts out, with surgical anesthetic, at 2.0. The anesthetic may depress the level of awareness further. Pain may depress it even more. But depressing the level of awareness is not necessarily depressing emotion. How much conceived danger or sympathy is present in the environment? This is what depresses the Tone Scale. There can be a reactive engram which contains a tone 4.0, or one that contains a 1.0 or another that contains a 0.1. This is not, then, quite two-dimensional, this emotion.
The level of depth of consciousness can be affected by painful emotion, poisons or other things which depress awareness. After that it is all engram, and the engrams have their own Tone Scale which runs from 4.0 down to 0.1.
It can be seen now that two things are at work. First is the state of physical being. It is this which tunes down the analyzer. Then there is the mental state of being. This is what tunes down the emotional Tone Scale.
But remember that in engrams there is another factor present: valence. Once its own analyzer is out, the body will assume the evaluation or emotional condition of any other analyzer present. Here we have affinity at work in earnest. "Unconscious" in the presence of other beings, an individual picks up a valence for every other being present. Some of these valences are incidental. He will pick first that valence which is most sympathetic as a desirable future friend (or some similar person). And he will pick that valence which is the
165
L. RON HUBBARD
top valence (highest survival, the boss, the winner) for his dramatization. He will also take the valence of the winning entity (winning over himself or others) for emotional tone. If the winning valence is also the sympathetic valence, he has an engram which can be utilized to its fullest extent.
Let us make this an example: a man is under nitrous oxide (the most vicious anesthetic ever invented, as it is actually not anesthetic but a hypnotic) undergoing exo-dontistry.10 As usual, everybody present around the "unconscious" patient chatters and yaps about the patient, the weather, the most popular movie star or baseball. The exodontist is a tough character, bossy to the nurse, apt to be angry about trifles; he is also very sympathetic toward the patient. The nurse is a blue-eyed blonde who is sexually aberrated. The patient—actually in agony, receiving an engram amongst engrams which may ruin his life (terrible stuff, nitrous oxide; really hands out a fancy engram as any Dianeticist can attest)—is unanalytical. Everything said to him or around him is taken literally. He takes the valence of the exodontist as both the top valence present and the sympathetic valence. But every phrase uttered is aberrative and will be interpreted by that happy little moron, the reactive mind, on the order of Simple Simon" who was told he had to be careful how he stepped in the pies, so he stepped in them carefully. These people may be talking about somebody else but every "I" or "he" or "you" uttered is engramic and will be applied to others and himself by the patient in the most literal sense. "He can't remember anything," says the exodontist. All right, when the engram keys in,
10. exodontistry: the extraction of teeth.
11. Simple Simon: a foolish character in the well-known anonymous nursery rhyme: "Simple Simon met a pieman, going to the fair; Says Simple Simon to the pieman, 'Let me taste your ware. . . .' "
166
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
this patient will have an occlusion on memory in greater or lesser degree. "He can't see or feel it": this means an occlusion on sight, pain and tactile. If the patient has his eyes watering in agony at the moment (though completely "under"), he may get actual bad vision as well as poor visual recall from this experience. Now they put him in the hands of this blonde nurse to let him sleep off the drug and recover. She is an aberree amongst aberrees. She knows patients do weird things when they are still "out" so she pumps him for information about his life. And she knows they are hypnotic (yes, she sure does) so she gives him some positive suggestions. Amusing herself. She says he'll like her. That she'll be good to him. And stay there now for the present.
So the poor patient, who has had two wisdom teeth, impacted, taken out, has a full anger-sympathy dramatization. The general tone he takes is the tone the exodon-tist showed to the others in the room. The exodontist was angry at the nurse. With his recalls all messed up, the patient a few years later meets a woman similar to this nurse. The nurse has given him compulsions toward her. The silly little moron, the reactive mind, sees in this entirely different person enough similarity to create an identity between the nurse and this new woman. So the patient divorces his wife and marries the pseudonurse.12 Only now that he has married the pseudonurse, the dental engram begins to key in in earnest. Physically he gets ill: the two molars adjacent to where the wisdom teeth came out develop large cavities and begin to rot (circulation shutdown, pain in the area but can't be felt because there's a pain recall shut-off). His memory goes to pieces. His recalls become worse. He begins to
12. pseudo-: combining form meaning "closely or deceptively similar to (a specified thing)," as in pseudonurse, pseudomother, pseudofather, etc.
167
L. RON HUBBARD
develop eye trouble and a strange conjunctivitis. Further (because the dentist leaned on his chest and stomach with a sharp elbow from time to time), he has chest and stomach pains. The nitrous oxide hurt his lungs and this pain is also in chronic restimulation. But most horrible: he believes that this pseudonurse will take care of him and he stops to some degree taking care of himself in any way; his energy dissipates; and analytically he knows it is all wrong and that he is not himself. For he is now fixed in the valence of the exodontist who is angry with this nurse and so he beats the pseudonurse because he senses that from her all evil flows. The girl he married is not and was not the nurse: she sounds something like her and is a blonde. She has her own engrams and reacts. She attempts suicide.
Then, one day, since this is one engram among many, the mental hospital gets our patient and the doctors there decide that all he needs is a good solid series of electric shocks to tear his brain up, and if that doesn't work, a nice ice pick into each eyeball after and during electric shock, the ice pick sweeping a wide arc to tear the analytical mind to pieces. His wife agrees. Our patient can't defend himself: he's insane and the insane have no rights, you know.
Only the cavalry, in this one case, arrived in the form of Dianetics and cleared the patient and the wife and they are happy today. This is an actual engram and an actual case history. It is a sympathy engram, prosur-vival on the moronic reactive mind level.
This is to show the ebb and flow of emotion within this one engram. The physical being is out and in agony. The mental being is given a variety of emotional tones on a contagion principle. The actual emotional tone of the patient, his own, is beaten apathy; hence, he can no longer "be himself."
In passing, it should be mentioned that only absolute
168
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
silence, utter silence and tomblike silence should attend an operation or injury of any kind. There is nothing which can be said or given as a perceptic in any moment of "unconsciousness" which is beneficial to a patient. Nothing! In the light of these researches and scientific findings (which can be proven in any other laboratory or group of people in very short order), speech or sound in the vicinity of an "unconscious" person should be punished criminally as, to anyone who knows these facts, such an act would be a willful effort to destroy the intellect or mental balance of an individual. If the patient is complimented, as in hypnosis or during an injury or operation, a manic is formed which will give him temporary euphoria and eventually plunge him into the depressive stage of the cycle.*
The golden rule could be altered to read: If you love your brother, keep your mouth shut when he is unconscious.
* The author is well aware that many physicians, in using narcosynthesis [drug hypnotism], have occasionally accidentally entered "unconscious" periods. They have promptly considered, then, that these areas were equivocal, that the patient was probably not unconscious. In Dianetic research, patients have been rendered "unconscious" to the satisfaction of two doctors, both skeptical (since no longer skeptical) and have been given material which the Dianeticist knew nothing about. Along with the complete data of the tests—as muttered by the doctors as they took them to make sure by blood pressure, respiration, etc., that the patient could not be more "unconscious" unless he were dead, the data were recovered in full in every case and for every condition of "unconsciousness." Two patients were for a time severely aberrated by the careless comments of the anesthetizing and examining doctors: a note added to warn those attempting this experiment in the future. This is the stuff of which insanity is made. Be careful with it when manhandling patients. —LRH
169
L. RON HUBBARD
Emotion can be seen then to exist in two planes, the personal plane and the extravalence plane. It is communicable in terms of identical thinking. Rage present when a man is "unconscious" will give him a tone 1 engram: it will contain rage. Apathy present in the vicinity of an "unconscious" person will give him a tone 0 engram. Happiness present during an engram is not very aberrative but will give a tone 4 engram. And so forth. In other words, the emotions of those present around an "unconscious" person are communicated into the person as part of his engram. Any mood can be so communicated.
In dramatizing an engram, the aberree always takes the winning valence and that valence is not, of course, himself. If only one other person is present and the other is talking in terms of apathy, then the apathy is the tone value of the engram. When an apathy engram is restimulated, the individual, unless he wants to be hurt severely, is apathetic and this tone, being the nearest to death, is the most dangerous one to the individual. The rage emotion communicated to an "unconscious" person gives him a rage engram he can dramatize. This is most harmful to the society. A merely hostile tone present around an "unconscious" person gives him a merely hostile engram (covert hostility). With two people present, each having a different mood, the "unconscious" person receives an engram with two valences other than his own. When this happens he will first dramatize the winning valence with its mood and, if forced from this, will dramatize the second valence with its mood. Driven from this in a chronic engram, he goes insane.
Nothing here should be construed to mean that a person only uses or dramatizes sympathy engrams. This is very far from the case. The sympathy engram gives him the chronic psychosomatic illness. He can dramatize any engram he has when it is restimulated.
170
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
Emotion, then, is communication and a personal condition. The cellular level evaluation of a situation depends upon any other analyzer present, even if that analyzer is thoroughly hostile to it. Lacking such evaluation, the individual takes his own tone for the moment.
There is another condition of emotion which is of extreme and useful interest to the therapist since it is the first thing with which he will have to deal in opening a case. We do not mean here to start discussing therapy but to describe a necessary part of emotion.
Great loss and other swift and severe suppressor action dams up emotion in an engram. Loss itself can be a shock to reduce analytical power. And an engram is received. If it is the loss of a sympathetic person on whom an individual has depended, it seems to the individual as if death itself stalks him. When such a suppressor effect occurs, it is as if a strong steel spring had been compressed within the engram. When it releases, it comes with a terrible rush of emotion (if this discharge is, indeed, emotion, though we hardly know what other name to call it).
Life force apparently gets dammed up at these points in life. There may be enormous quantities of that life force available but some of it becomes suppressed into a loss engram. After that the person does not seem to possess as much fluid vitality as before. This may be not emotion but life force itself. The mind, then, has below it, as in a cyst, a great quantity of sorrow or despair. The more of these charges exist in such an encysted state, the less free are the emotions of the individual. This may be on a basis of suppression to a point from which there is no swift rising. Nothing in the person's future seems to bring him up to any plane like those he occupied before.
The glory and color of childhood vanishes as one progresses into later years. But the strange part of it is
171
L. RON HUBBARD
that this glamour and beauty and sensitivity to life are not gone. They are encysted. One of the most remarkable experiences a Clear has is to find, in the process of therapy, that he is recovering appreciation of the beauty in the world.
Persons, as they live forward from childhood, suffer loss after loss, and each loss takes from them a little more of this 6 quantity which may be, indeed, life force itself. Bound up within them, that force is denied them and, indeed, reacts against them.
Only this emotional encysting can, for instance, compartment the mind of a person who is multivalent or who cannot see or hear his past. The analytical mind, worked upon by the reactive bank, compartments and divides with loss after loss until there is no free flow left. Then a man dies.
Thus we could say that emotion, or what has been called emotion, is really in two sections: first, there is the endocrine system which, handled either by the analytical mind in the upper two zones or the reactive mind in the lower two zones, brings emotional responses of fear, enthusiasm, apathy, etc.; second, there would be life force itself becoming compartmented by engrams and being sealed up, little by little, in the reactive bank.
It is possible that a therapy could be formulated which would spring out these various life force charges only and create thereby a full Clear. Unfortunately, to date, this has not been possible.
The odd part of emotion is that it is so ordinarily based on the word content of engrams. If an engram says, "I am afraid," then the aberree is afraid. If an engram says, "I am calm," even if the rest of the engram gives him chattering shakes, the aberree still has to be "calm."
The problem of emotion as endocrine balance and
172
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
life force has another complication in that the physical pain in an engram is often mistaken for a particular emotion named in the engram. For instance, the engram can say with verbal content that the individual is "sexually excited" and have, as a pain content, an ache in the legs and have, as an actual emotional content (the valence that says, "I'm sexually excited"), anger. This, to the aberree dramatizing it, is a complex affair. When he is "sexually excited"—he has an idea what that means as just language—he is also angry and has an ache in the legs. This is actually very amusing in many cases and has led to a standard set of clinical jokes, all of which begin with, "You know, I feel like everybody else."
Dianeticists, having discovered that people evaluate the emotions, beliefs, intelligence and somatics of the world in terms of their own engramic reactions, delight in discovering new concepts of "emotion." "You know how people feel when they're happy. Their ears burn." "I feel just like anybody else when I'm happy; my feet and eyes ache." "Of course I know how people feel when they're happy; just pin prickles going all over them." "I wonder how people can stand to be passionate when it makes their noses hurt so." "Of course I know how people feel when they're excited; they have to go to the toilet."
Probably every person on Earth has his own peculiar definition for every emotional state in terms of engram command. The command plus the somatics and percep-tics make what they call an "emotional state."
Actually, the problem, then, should be defined in terms of the Clear, who can function without engramic orders from the reactive mind. So defined, it breaks down in terms of the endocrine system and the varying level of life force free to resurge against the suppressor.
173
L. RON HUBBARD
Laughter, it should be added, is not, strictly speaking, an emotion but a relief from emotion. The early Italians had a very definite idea, as represented by their folk tales, that laughter was of therapeutic value. Melancholy13 was the only mental illness these tales consider and laughter was its only cure. In Dianetics, we have a great deal to do with laughter. In therapy, patients vary in their laughter reaction from the slight chuckle to hilarious mirth. Any engram which really releases may be expected to begin somewhere between tears and boredom and end with laughter; the nearer the engram's tone is to tears at the first contact, the more certainly laughter will appear as it is relieved.
There is a stage of therapy often reached by the preclear when his entire past life seems to be a subject of uncontrollable mirth. This does not mean he is Clear but it means that a large proportion of the encysted charges have been tapped.'4 A preclear has laughed for two days almost without ceasing. Hebephrenia15 is not the same thing as this laughter, for the relief of the preclear on realizing the shadowy aspect and completely knowable character of his past fears and terrors is hearty.
Laughter plays a definite role in therapy. It is quite amusing to see a preclear, who has been haunted by an engram which contained great emotional charge, suddenly relieve it, for the situation, no matter how gruesome it was, when relieved, is in all its aspects a subject of great mirth. The laughter fades away as he becomes
13. melancholy: a gloomy state of mind, especially when habitual or prolonged; depression.
14. tapped: penetrated, opened up, reached into, etc., for the purpose of using something or drawing something off.
15. hebephrenia: (psychiatry) a form of aberration characterized by childish or silly behavior.
174
EMOTION AND THE DYNAMICS
disinterested in it and he can be said to be "tone 3" about it.
Laughter is definitely the relief of painful emotion.*
* The complete Tone Scale, its use in predicting the behavior of others as well as assisting in auditing, is given in the book Science of Survival, by L. Ron Hubbard.
175
Prenatal Experience and Birth
Old women less than a hundred years ago talked wisely about "prenatal influence" and how a woman marked her child. Many such intuitive thoughts are based, actually, on observed data. It can be observed that the child born out of wedlock is often a luckless creature (in a society which frowns upon such bearings). These tenets have been held in the marketplace for a great many millennia. Just because they have been held is no reason they are true, but they make an excellent beginning for a chapter on prenatal experience and birth.
If Dianetics had worked on obscure theories, such as those of the old women or those of the mystics who believe that "childish delusions" are capable of aberrating a child, Dianetics would not be a science of mind. But it was no obscure theory which brought about the discovery of the exact role prenatal experience and birth play in aberration and psychosomatic ills.
Many schools of mental healing from the Aescula-pian to the modern hypnotist were studied after the basic philosophy of Dianetics had been postulated. Much data was accumulated, many experiments were made. The fundamentals about engrams had been formulated and "unconsciousness" had been discovered as being a period of actual recording, when the theory began to predict new phenomena not hitherto observed.
1. prenatal: existing or taking place before birth.
176
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
There has been, in recent years, a practice called "narco-synthesis."2 This was actually a branch of "hyp-noanalysis"3 and "deep analysis."4 It did not produce Clears and it did not even produce alleviation in the majority of its cases. But it was discovered to be an aberrative factor in itself. A thing which aberrates may well lead to something which removes aberrations if it is studied scientifically. Narcosynthesis was so studied. Several cases were examined on which narcosynthesis had been employed. Some of these cases had experienced relief from narcosynthesis. Others had become a great deal worse.
Working with hypnoanalysis it was discovered that the technique could be varied until it would actually remove the aberrative charge contained in locks. In treating schizophrenics with narcosynthesis it was found that the locks (periods of mental anguish not including physical pain or "unconsciousness") would sometimes spring (clear) and sometimes not.
Narcosynthesis is a complicated name for a very ancient process quite well known in Greece and India. It is drug hypnotism. And it is generally employed either by those practitioners who do not know hypnosis or on those patients who will not succumb to ordinary hypnotism. A shot of sodium pentothal is given intravenously to the patient and he is asked to count backwards. Shortly he stops counting at which the injection is also stopped. The patient is now in a state of "deep sleep." That this is not sleep seems to have missed both
2. narcosynthesis: the practice of inducing sleep with drugs and then talking to the patient to draw out buried thoughts.
3. hypnoanalysis: (psychoanalysis) the use of hypnosis or hypnotic drugs in combination with psychoanalytic techniques.
4. deep analysis: depth therapy: a form of psychotherapy that attempts to work through unconscious conflicts to resolve problems in behavior.
177
L. RON HUBBARD
narcosynthesists and hypnotists. It is actually a depressant on the awareness of an individual so that those attention units which remain behind the curtain of his reactive bank can be reached directly. These attention units are up against the standard banks. The bypass circuits (demon circuits) which lie between these banks and "I" have themselves been bypassed. In other words, a section of the analytical mind has been exposed which is not aberrated. It is not very powerful and it is not highly intelligent, but it has the advantage of being hard up against the standard banks. This is basic personality? The intent and purpose and persistence of these few attention units have the same quality and direction as the whole analytical mind would have if it were Clear. It is a very nice, cooperative group of attention units and it is very useful; for basic personality has all recalls—sonic, audio, tactile, smell, pain, etc. It can get at anything that is in the banks—which is everything perceived or thought in a lifetime, minute by minute. These qualities of basic personality have been very poorly described in hypnotism, and it is doubtful even if it was generally known that sonic was part of the recall system disclosed by deep hypnotism or the drug hypnotism called narcosynthesis.
A study of basic personality in a multivalent subject who had poor memory, no good recalls and scant imagination disclosed the information that BP (the attention units called basic personality) was more able to select out data than AP (aberrated personality, as represented by the awake subject). It was further discovered that AP could ordinarily return better than BP so far as time-distance went but that when AP arrived at the
5. basic personality: the individual himself. The basic individual is not a buried unknown or a different person, but an intensity of all that is best and most able in the person.
178
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
earliest place it was unable to manage recall. But if AP had gone back and established a vague contact with an incident, drug hypnotism or standard hypnotism used on him when he was in present time (no longer returned) would then permit BP to return. Drug hypnotism has seldom been able to force back very early into a patient's life. But by making the strength of AP go back and then using BP for the recall, some very early incidents could be reached. This trick was invented to overcome some of the difficulties which had made drug hypnosis relatively uncertain in results.
Then another factor was discovered. All those patients who had been treated by narcosynthesis had become worse every time the people doing the work had crossed over but left (because "everybody knew" an "unconscious" person didn't record) a period of "unconsciousness." When one of these "unconscious" periods was so probed—by the drug hypnosis called narcosynthesis—the patient usually became worse, not better. Doing a little more probing than had been done by the usual practitioners, Dianetic research entered some of the late-life "unconscious" periods and, with much labor, laid them bare.
Now, all drug hypnosis, whether it is called narcosynthesis or a visit from the god Aesculapius, is still hypnosis. Whatever is said to a hypnotized subject remains as a positive suggestion, and these positive suggestions are simply engrams with a somewhat lighter effect and a shorter duration. When a drug is present the hypnotism is complicated by the fact that hypnotic drugs are, after all, poisons; the body is then possessed of a permanent (at least until Dianetics was discovered) somatic to go along with the suggestion. Drug hypnotism invariably creates an engram. Whatever a practitioner says to a drugged subject becomes engramic in some degree. In the course of Dianetic research, it first was supposed, playing back the careless chatter of
179
L. RON HUBBARD
practitioners out of the minds of patients they had placed under drug hypnosis, that this carelessness in saying so many aberrative things was responsible for some of the failure: But this was found to be true in a very limited sense. Then it was discovered that when the "unconscious" periods were reached by drug hypnosis they refused to lift even when the patient recounted them scores of times. This was blamed on the drug character of the hypnosis.
Straight hypnotism was then used to reach these late "unconscious" periods and these periods still failed to lift. Therefore it was adjudged safe to continue drug use on those patients who refused hypnosis. And the AP-BP alternate trick began to be employed.
It was discovered by drug hypnosis, where it was necessary, and straight hypnosis, where that was possible, that the "schizophrenic" (the multivalent aberree) could be made to reach very early periods in every case. And it was further found that an early period of "unconsciousness" would often lift. Experimentation brought about a scientific axiom: The earlier the period of "unconsciousness" the more likely it is to lift. That is a fundamental axiom of Dianetic therapy.
Manic-depressives who had sonic recall were worked upon, most of them by straight hypnosis, and it was discovered that they also followed this rule. But it was most dramatic in the multivalent aberree: for when the engram did not lift, it impinged against his analytical mind when he was awakened and created a variation in his psychoses and brought with it psychosomatic illnesses as well.
This brought about an understanding of why the multivalent aberree, under narcosynthesis, was made worse whenever some practitioner had glided over (but not entered, of course) a late-life period of "unconsciousness." Now came the problem of applying the
ISO
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
axiom. It was postulated that the primary engram must in some way suppress later engrams. In view of other data and postulates, this was an entirely reasonable assumption. The earlier a person went in the life of a multivalent aberree the less likelihood there was of restimulating him artificially. Often an engram at around two or three years of age would lift entirely and give him a great deal of relief.
The problem of this research was very far from the same problem of those who, not knowing about the reactive mind and "unconsciousness," tried merely to find computing factors on a rational level or incidents of everyday life as aberrative factors in a patient.
When an engram is touched, it is very resistive, particularly above the age of two years. Further, the whole reactive bank was buried deeply under foggy layers of "unconsciousness," and was further safeguarded by a mechanism of the analytical mind which tended to prohibit it from touching pain or painful emotion. The reactive bank was protecting itself all the way through the research but it was obviously the answer. The problem was how to achieve its relief, if it could be relieved.
Having made several multivalent personalities intensely uncomfortable, a new necessity level was reached whereby something had to be done about the problem. But there was this shining hope, the above axiom. A bridge between insanity and sanity had to be built and there, in the axiom, one had at least a glimmer of a plan. The earlier one had experienced this fog and pain, the lighter these engrams seemed to be.
Then, one day, a multivalent patient, under drugs, went back to his birth. He suffered the pain—and it was very painful with this crude technique, for Dianetics had not yet smoothed down to a well-oiled piece of machinery —and he floundered through the "unconsciousness" of the period and he fought the doctor who had tried to
181
L. RON HUBBARD
put drops in his eyes and he generally resented the entire proceedings. AP had been sent down first, then later, under drugs, BP had contacted the incident.
This seemed a remarkable day for Dianetics. After twenty runs through birth, the patient experienced a recession of all somatics and "unconsciousness" and aberrative content. He had had asthma. It seemed that this asthma had been caused by the doctor's enthusiasm in yanking him off the table just when he was fighting for his first breath. He had had conjunctivitis. That came from the eye drops. He had had sinusitis. That had come from the nose swabs used by the pretty nurse.
Rejoicing was held, for he seemed to be a new man. A primary psychosis about being "pushed around" had vanished. The subjective reality of this incident was intense. Objective reality did not matter, but this patient had a mother near at hand and objective reality was established simply by returning her in therapy to his birth. They had not communicated about it in detail. The recording of her sequence compared word for word with his sequence, detail for detail, name for name. Possibility, even if they had communicated, of such duplication, outside the Dianetic situation, was mathematically impossible. And she had been "unconscious" during his birth and had always supposed that the affair had been quite different and the return data collapsed her awake description of it as being so much fable.
In order to make sure that this was no freak (for it is a very poor research man who will base conclusions on a series of one), two manic-depressives were returned to their births and both completed the experience. But one of these two birth engrams would not lift!
The postulated axiom was called into play again. If one could find the earliest engram, then the others would lift each in turn. That was the hope.
The manic-depressive whose birth had not lifted was
182
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
returned to a period before birth in an effort to find an earlier engram.
Structural theories, as fondly held for ages, had thoroughly collapsed already when "unconscious" fog and pain had been penetrated to discover the engram as an aberrative unit. Tests had held up the discovery that all data, awake, asleep and "unconscious," from the moment of conception on, was always recorded somewhere in the mind or body. The little matter of myelin sheathing,6 since it had already been disproven by laboratory research which included the reaching of birth, was discarded. The theory that no recordings can take place in the mind until the nerves are sheathed depends upon a theoretical postulate, has never been subjected to scientific research and depends for its existence upon authority alone—and a "science" which depends on authority alone is a breath in the wind of truth and is therefore no science at all. That babies cannot record until the myelin sheathing is formed has about as much truth, on investigation, as the fact that penis envy7 is the cause of female homosexuality. Neither theory, when applied, works. For the baby, after all, is composed of cells and it is evidenced now by much research that the cell, not an organ, records the engram.
Thus there was no inhibition about looking earlier than birth for what Dianetics had begun to call basic-basic (the first engram of the first chain of engrams). And an earlier engram was reached.
It has since been discovered that a great deal of recording is done by the child in the wornb which is not engramic. For a time it was thought that the child in the womb records on the proposition of "extended hearing,"
6. myelin sheathing: the fatty layer of tissues coating the nerves.
7. penis envy: (psychoanalysis) the repressed wish of a female to possess a penis.
183
L. RON HUBBARD
where hearing tunes up in the presence of danger and particularly during "unconsciousness." But the first research discovered prenatal engrams to be most easily reached when they contained a great deal of pain. Cells, not the individual, are evidenced to record pain. And the reactive engram bank is composed only of cells.
Recourse to nature rather than recourse to authority is the very building block of modern science. So long as Galen8 remained an authority on blood, none but "madmen" like da Vinci, Shakespeare9 and William Harvey10 even thought to experiment to find out what truly was the action of blood! So long as Aristotle" remained the authority for all, the Dark Ages reigned. Advance comes from asking free-minded questions of nature, not from quoting the works and thinking the thoughts of bygone years. Recourse to precedent is an assertion that yesterday's mentors12 were better informed than today's: an assertion which fades before the truth that knowledge is compounded of the experience of yesterdays, of which we have more, most certainly, than the best-informed mentor of yesterday itself.
In that Dianetics was based on a philosophy that used the cell as the basic building block, the fact that recording of engrams was done by cells came with less
8. Galen: (ca. 130-200 A.D.) Greek physician whose works were for centuries the standards for anatomy and physiology. Though Galen gave good descriptions of some of the human body's different parts and their functions, his observations and conclusions on the circulation of the blood were far from correct.
9. Shakespeare: William Shakespeare (1564-1616), English poet and dramatist of the Elizabethan period (1558-1603), the most widely known author in all English literature.
10. William Harvey: (1578-1657) English physician and anatomist, discoverer of the mechanics of blood circulation.
11. Aristotle: (384-322 B.C.) Greek philosopher noted for his works on logic, ethics, politics, etc.
12. mentors: wise and trusted counselors or teachers.
184
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
surprise than it otherwise might have. The engram is not a memory; it is a cellular trace of recordings impinged deeply into the very structure of the body itself.
The experience of which cells themselves were capable had already been tested. It had been found that a monocell divided not only its substance but gave its total experience, as a master disc will make duplicates, to its offspring. Now, this is a peculiarity of monocells: they survive as identities. Each is personally its forebear.13 Cell A divides to a first generation; this generation is also Cell A; the second generation, the second division, creates an entity which is still Cell A. Lacking the necessity of such laborious processes as construction and birth and growth before reproduction, the monocell simply splits. And everything it has learned could be postulated to be contained in the new generation. Cell A dies but through generations from it, the latest generation is still Cell A. Man's belief that he is to live in his progeny might possibly derive from this cellular identity of procreation. Another interesting possibility lies in the fact that even neurons exist in embryo14 in the zygote, and neurons do not themselves divide but are like organisms (and may have the virus as their basic building block).
Dianetics, as a study of function and the science of mind, does not need any postulate concerning structure, however. The only test is whether or not a fact works. If it does work and can be used, it is a scientific fact. And the prenatal engram is a scientific fact. Tested and checked for objective reality, it still stands firm. And as for subjective reality, the acceptance of the prenatal engram as a working fact alone makes possible the Clear.
13. forebear: ancestor.
14. embryo: an early or undeveloped stage of something.
185
L. RON HUBBARD
At the end of a series of 270 Clears and alleviations, a short series of five cases was taken to finally settle the argument. These five cases were not permitted to admit anything before birth. They were treated with everything Dianetics, hypnotism and other therapeutics could offer, and no Clear was obtained. This ruled out the "personality of the operator" or "suggestion" or "faith" as factors in Dianetics. These five cases had never been informed of prenatal engrams. Each swerved in toward them but was restrained without informing him that engrams existed that early. The five were alleviated as to some variety of psychosomatic ills but the ills were only alleviated, not completely cured. The aberrations remained but little changed. They were extremely disappointed since each had heard something of "the miracles Dianetics could perform." Before them, 270 cases had been worked and 270 cases had reached prenatal engrams. And 270 cases had been .cleared or alleviated as the Dianeticist chose and time permitted. All could have been cleared with an additional average of 100 or so hours for each of the persons who were alleviated. In short, on random cases—and selected cases, so that at least two of each classification of neurosis or psychosis were included in the clearing— when prenatal engrams and birth were taken into account and used in therapy, results were obtained. When these factors were not taken into account, results were no more favorable than those attained in the best successes of past schools—which is not nearly good enough for a science of mind.
Dianetics had prenatal and birth engrams wished off on it as facts existing in the nature of things. That past schools have been passing over these engrams and into the prenatal area without success does not mean that prenatals could not be found any more than it means that these past schools found much value in prenatal
186
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
experience when they considered it at all. The problem is slightly more complex: the difficulty lay in finding the reactive bank which was occluded by "unconsciousness" which had never before been penetrated wittingly as "unconsciousness." The discovery of this reactive bank led to the discovery of prenatal engrams, which are quite different from "prenatal memory."
After a few cases had been examined as to objective and subjective reality, Dianetics was forced to accept, if it wished a Clear, the fact that the cells of the fetus15 record. A few more cases and a little more experience discovered that the embryo16 cells record. And suddenly it was discovered that recording begins in the cells of the zygote—which is to say, with conception. That the body recalls conception, which is a high-level survival activity, has little to do with engrams. Most patients to date sooner or later startle themselves by finding themselves swimming up a channel or waiting to be connected with. The recording is there. And there's little use arguing with a preclear that he cannot recall being a sperm, engramic or not as the case may be. It must be remarked because any Dianeticist will encounter this.
Anyone postulating that "return to the womb" was an ambition should have examined life in the womb a little more carefully. Even a poor scientist would have at least tried to find out if anybody could recall it before he made a statement that there was a memory of it. But life in the womb does not seem to be the paradise it has been poetically, if not scientifically, represented. Actuality discloses that three men and a horse in a telephone booth would have but little less room than an unborn baby. The womb is wet, uncomfortable and unprotected.
15. fetus: in man, the offspring in the wornb from the end of the third month of pregnancy until birth.
16. embryo: a child in the womb in the first eight weeks of its development.
187
L. RON HUBBARD
Mama sneezes, baby gets knocked "unconscious." Mama runs lightly and blithely17 into a table and baby gets its head staved in. Mama has constipation and baby, in the anxious effort, gets squashed. Papa becomes passionate and baby has the sensation of being put into a running washing machine. Mama gets hysterical, baby gets an engram. Papa hits Mama, baby gets an engram. Junior bounces on Mama's lap, baby gets an engram. And so it goes.
People have scores of prenatal engrams when they are normal. They can have more than two hundred. And each one is aberrative. Each contains pain and "unconsciousness."
Engrams received as a zygote are potentially the most aberrative, being wholly reactive. Those received as an embryo are intensely aberrative. Those received as the fetus are enough to send people to institutions all by themselves.
Zygote, embryo, fetus, infant, child, adult: these are all the same person. Time has been considered the great healer. That can be filed with the things "everybody knew." On a conscious level it may be true. But on a reactive level time is nothing. The engram, whenever received, is strong in proportion to the degree it is restimulated.
The mechanism of an engram has an interesting feature. It is not "reasoned" or analyzed, nor does it have any meaning until it has been keyed in. A baby, before speech, could have an engram in restimulation, but that engram must have been keyed in by the analytical data the baby has.
The reactive mind steals meaning from the analytical mind. An engram is just so many wave recordings
17. blithely: in a manner without thought or regard; in a carefree way; heedlessly.
188
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
until it is keyed in, and those recordings, by such restimulation, become effective upon the analytical mind. It may be that the engram never has any reason or meaning in itself but only thrusts its waves forward as unreasoned things at the body and analyzer, and the body and analyzer, through mechanisms, give them meaning. In other words, the engram is not a sentient recording containing meanings. It is merely a series of impressions such as a needle might make on wax. These impressions are meaningless to the body until the en-gram keys in, at which time aberrations and psychoso-matics occur.
Thus, it can be understood that the prenatal child has no remotest idea of what is being said in terms of words. It does learn, being an organism, that certain things may mean certain dangers. But this is every bit as far as it goes with recording. The mind must become more or less fully formed before the engram can impinge into the analytical level.
The prenatal child can, of course, experience terror. When the parents or the professional abortionist start after it and thrust it full of holes, it knows fear and pain.
It has, however, this prenatal child, an advantage in its situation. Being surrounded by amniotic fluid18 and dependent for nutrition on its mother, being in a state of growth and easily re-formed physically, it can repair an enormous amount of damage and does. The recovery qualities of the human body are never higher than before birth. Damage which would maim an infant for life or would kill a grown man can be taken in stride by the prenatal child. Not that this damage does not make an engram—it certainly does, complete with all data and speech and emotion—but that this damage does not easily kill it is the point here.
18. amniotic fluid: the fluid surrounding the embryo or fetus.
189
L. RON HUBBARD
Why people try to abort children is a problem which has its answer only in aberration, for it is very difficult to abort a child. One can say that in the attempt the mother herself is in more danger of dying than the child, no matter what method is used.
A society which suppresses sex as evil and which is so aberrated that any member of it will attempt an abortion is a society which is dooming itself to ever-rising insanity. For it is a scientific fact that abortion attempts are the most important factor in aberration. The child on whom the abortion is attempted is condemned to live with murderers whom he reactively knows to be murderers through all his weak and helpless youth! He forms unreasonable attachments to grandparents, has terrified reactions to all punishments, grows ill easily and suffers long. And there is no such thing as a guaranteed way to abort a child. Use contraceptives, not a knitting needle or the douche bag,19 to hold down population. Once the child is conceived, no matter how "shameful" the circumstances, no matter the mores,20 no matter the income, that man or woman who would attempt an abortion on an unborn child is attempting a murder which will seldom succeed and is laying the foundation of a childhood of illness and heartache. Anyone attempting an abortion is committing an act against the whole society and the future; any judge or doctor recommending an abortion should be instantly deprived of position and practice, whatever his "reason."
19. douche bag: a small syringe having detachable nozzles for administering a douche: a jet or current of water, sometimes with a dissolved medicating or cleansing agent, applied to a body part, organ or cavity (such as the vagina) for medicinal or hygienic purposes.
20. mores: the customs, or customary practices, rules, etc., regarded as essential to or characteristic of a group.
190
PRENATAL EXPERIENCE AND BIRTH
If a person knows he has committed this crime against a child who has been born, he should do all possible to have that child "cleared" as soon as possible after the age of eight and in the meantime should treat that child with all the decency and courtesy possible in order to keep the engram out of restimulation. Otherwise he may send that child to an institution for the insane.
A large proportion of allegedly feebleminded children are actually attempted-abortion cases whose en-grams place them in fear paralysis or regressive palsy21 and which command them not to grow but to be where they are forever.
However many billions America spends yearly on institutions for the insane and jails for the criminals are spent primarily because of attempted abortions done by some sex-blocked mother to whom children are a curse, not a blessing of God.
Antipathy22 toward children means a blocked second dynamic. Physiological examination of anyone with such blockage will demonstrate a physical derangement of the genitalia or glands. Dianetic therapy would demonstrate attempted abortion or an equally foul prenatal existence and would clear the individual.
The case of the child who, as this is read, is not yet born but upon whom abortion has been attempted, is not hopeless. If he is treated with decency after he is born and if he is not restimulated by witnessing quarrels, he will wax23 and grow fat until he is eight and can be cleared, at which time he will probably be much startled to learn the truth. But that startlement and any antagonism included in it will vanish with the finishing
21. palsy: paralysis, especially with involuntary tremors.
22. antipathy: a strong or deep-rooted dislike.
23. wax: grow bigger or greater; increase.
191
L. RON HUBBARD
of the Clear, and his love of his parents will be greater than before.
All these things are scientific facts, tested and re-checked and tested again. And with them can be produced a Clear, on whom our racial future depends.
192
CHAPTER EIGHT
Contagion of Aberration
Disease is contagious. Germs, traveling from one individual to another, wander through an entire society, respecting none until stopped by such things as sulfa' or penicillin.2
Aberrations are contagious. Like germs they respect none and carry forward from individual to individual, from parents to child, respecting none until they are stopped by Dianetics.
The people of yesterday supposed that genetic insanity must exist, for it could be observed that the children of aberrated parents were often themselves aberrated. There is genetic insanity but it is limited to the case of actually missing parts. A very small percentage of insanity falls into such a category and its manifestation is mental dullness or failure to coordinate and beyond these has no aberrative quality whatever (such people receive engrams which complicate their cases).
The contagion of aberration is too simple in principle to be much labored here. In Dianetics, we learn that only moments of "unconsciousness," short or long and of greater or lesser depth, can contain engrams. When a person is rendered "unconscious," people in his vicinity react more or less at the dictates of their engrams: in fact, the "unconsciousness" is quite ordinarily caused by somebody's dramatization. A Clear, then, could be rendered unconscious by an aberree who is dramatizing
1. sulfa: any of a group of chemical compounds with antibacterial properties.
2. penicillin: a very powerful drug for destroying bacteria.
193
L. RON HUBBARD
and the aberree's dramatization of his engram would enter as an engram into the Clear.
The mechanics are simple. People under stress, if aberrated, dramatize engrams. Such dramatization may involve the injury of another person and render him more or less "unconscious." The unconscious person then receives as an engram the dramatization.
This is not the only way contagion of aberration gets about. People on operating tables, under anesthetic, are subjected to the more or less aberrated conversation of those present. This conversation enters into the "unconscious" person as an engram. Similarly, at the scene of accidents, the emergency nature of the experience may excite people into dramatizations, and if a person is "unconscious" because of the accident, an engram is received.
Aberrated parents are certain to infect their children with engrams. The father and mother, in dramatizing their own engrams around sick or injured children, pass them along just as certainly as if those engrams were bacteria. This does not mean that the total reactive bank of a child is composed solely of the parents' engrams, for there are many exterior influences to the home which can enter into the child when it is "unconscious." And it does not mean that the child is going to react to the same engrams the way either parent might react, for the child, after all, is an individual with an inherent personality, a power of choice and a different experience pattern. But it does mean that it is utterly inevitable that aberrated parents will in some way aberrate their children.
Misconceptions and poor data in a society's culture become engrams because not all the conduct around an "unconscious" person is dramatization. If some society believed that fish-eating brought on leprosy,3 it is quite
3. leprosy: a chronic, infectious disease caused by a bacterium that attacks the skin, flesh, nerves, etc.: it is characterized by ulcers, white scaly scabs, deformities and wasting of body parts.
194
CONTAGION OF ABERRATION
certain that this false datum would find its way into engrams and sooner or later someone would develop a leprosy-like disease after having eaten fish.
Primitive societies, being subject to much mauling by the elements, have many more occasions for injury than civilized societies. Further, such primitive societies are alive with false data. Further, their practice of medicine and mental healing is on a very aberrative level by itself. The number of engrams in a Zulu4 would be astonishing. Moved out of his restimulative area and taught English he would escape the penalty of much of his reactive data; but in his native habitat the Zulu is only outside the bars of a madhouse because there are no madhouses provided by his tribe. It is a safe estimate, and one based on better experience than is generally available to those who base conclusions on "modern man" by studying primitive races, that primitives are far more aberrated than civilized peoples. Their savage-ness, their unprogressiveness, their incidence of illness: all stem from their reactive patterns, not from their inherent personalities. Measuring one set of aberrees by another set of aberrees is not likely to lead to much data. And the contagion of aberration, being much greater in a primitive tribe, and the falsity of the superstitious data in the engrams of such a tribe both lead to a conclusion which, observed on the scene, is carried out by actuality.
Contagion of aberration is very easily studied in the process of clearing any aberree whose parents fought. Mother, for instance, might be relatively unaberrated at the beginning of the marriage. If she is beaten by her husband who is, after all, dramatizing, she will begin to
4. Zulu: a member of a large, formerly warlike, Bantu people of southeastern Africa.
195
L. RON HUBBARD
pick up his aberrations as part of her own reactive pattern. This is particularly noticeable when one is clearing a person who was conceived shortly after his parents' marriage or before it. Papa may begin with a certain dramatization which includes beating a wife. Whatever he says in such a dramatization will sooner or later begin to affect the wife and she may—unless extraordinarily well balanced—begin to dramatize these things on her own. Eventually, when the child is born, she will begin to dramatize on the child, thus putting him into a continual state of restimulation.
Birth is one of the most remarkable engrams in terms of contagion. Here the mother and child both receive the same engram which differs only in the location of pain and the depths of "unconsciousness." Whatever the doctors, nurses and other people associated with the delivery say to the mother during labor and birth and immediately afterwards before the child is taken away is recorded in the reactive bank, making an identical engram in both mother and child.
This engram is remarkably destructive in several ways. The mother's voice can restimulate the birth engram in the child and the presence of the child can restimulate the giving-birth engram in the mother. Thus they are mutually restimulative. In view of the fact that they have all the other restimulators also in common, a later-life situation can cause them each to suffer simultaneously from the engram. If birth included a slammed window, a slammed window may trigger birth dramatization in both, simultaneously, with resultant hostilities or apathies.
Should a doctor become angry or despairing, the emotional tone of birth can be severe. And if the doctor talks at all, the conversation takes on its full, reactive, literal meaning to both mother and child.
Many cases were cleared where both mother and 196
CONTAGION OF ABERRATION
child were available. One such case found the mother (as heard by the child in Dianetic clearing) moaning, "I'm so ashamed, I'm so ashamed," over and over. The child had a neurosis about shame. When the mother was cleared, it was found that her mother at birth was moaning, "I'm so ashamed, I'm so ashamed." One can presume that this has been going along, by contagion, since Cheops' built his tomb.
In the larger sphere of society, contagion of aberration is extremely dangerous and cannot but be considered as a vital factor in undermining the health of that society.
The social body behaves similarly to an organism in that there are social aberrations which exist within the society. The society grows and may fade like an organism which has people, not cells, for its parts. Where pain is leveled by the head of the society at any member in that society, a source of aberration is begun which will be contagious. The reasons against corporal punishment6 are not "humanitarian," they are practical. A society which practices punishment of any kind against any of its members is carrying on a contagion of aberration. The society has a social engram, society size, which says punishment is necessary. Punishment is meted.7 The jails and institutions fill. And then one day some portion of the society, depressed into zone 1 by a government's freedom with government engrams,
5. Cheops: king of ancient Egypt for 23 years (around 2900 B.C.). Cheops was famous as the builder of the Great Pyramid in Egypt, which is one of the Seven Wonders of the World. Egyptian pyramids were built as royal tombs: each monarch built his own pyramid.
6. corporal punishment: (law) physical punishment, as flogging, inflicted on the body of one convicted of a crime: formerly included the death penalty, sentencing to a term of years, etc.
7. meted: distributed or apportioned by measure; allotted; doled (usually followed by out).
197
L. RON HUBBARD
jumps up and wipes the government out. And a new set of aberrations is formed from the violence attending the destruction. Violent revolutions never win because they begin this cycle of aberration.
A society filled with aberrees may feel it necessary to punish. There has been no remedy other than punishment. The provision of a remedy for unsocial conduct by members of the group is of more than passing interest to a government for a continuance of its own corporal practices; adding these to the continuing aberrations of the past seriously depresses the survival potential of that government and will someday cause that government to fall. After many governments so fall, its people, too, perish from this Earth.
Contagion of aberration is never more apparent than in that social insanity called war. Wars never solve the need of wars. Fight to save the world for democracy or save it from Confucianism8 and the fight is inevitably lost by all. War has become associated in the past with competition, and it has been believed, therefore, by shifty logic, that wars were necessary. A society which advances into a war as a solution of its problems cannot but depress its own survival potential. No government was ever permitted to enter a war without costing its people some of their liberties. The end product is the apathy of a ruling priesthood, where mystery and superstition alone can band the insane remnants of a people together. This is too easily observed in past histories to need much amplification. A democracy engaging in war has always lost some of its democratic rights. As it engages in more and more wars, it eventually comes under the command of a dictator (rule by a single engram). The dictator, forcing his rule, increases
8. Confucianism: the system of morality taught by Confucius, a Chinese philosopher (5517-479? B.C.).
198
CONTAGION OF ABERRATION
the aberrations by his activity against minorities. Revolt begins to follow revolt. Priesthoods flourish. Apathy awaits. And after apathy comes death. So went Greece, so went Rome. So goes England. So goes Russia. And so goes the United States and with it goes mankind.
Rule by force is a violation of the law of affinity, for force begets force. Rule by force reduces the self-determinism of the individuals in a society and therefore the self-determinism of the society itself. Contagion of aberration sweeps along like a forest fire. Engrams beget engrams. And unless the dwindling spiral is interrupted by new lands and mongrel races which escape their aberra-tive environments, or by the arrival of n means to break the contagion of aberration by clearing individuals, a race will reach downward to the end of the cycle—zone 0.
A race is as great as its individual members are self-determined.
In the smaller sphere of the family, as in the national scenes, contagion of aberration produces an interruption of optimum survival.
Self-determinism is the only possible way a computer can be built to give rational answers. Holding down seven in an adding machine causes it to give wrong answers. Entering fixed and not-to-be-rationalized answers into any human being will cause him to compute wrong answers. Survival depends on right answers. En-grams enter from the exterior world into the hidden recesses below rational thinking and prevent rational answers being reached. This is exterior-determinism. Any interference with self-determinism cannot but lead to wrong computations.
In that a Clear is cooperative, a society of Clears would cooperate. This may be an idyllic, Utopian9
9. Utopian: of or like a Utopia, any idealized place, state or situation of perfection.
199
L. RON HUBBARD
dream and it may not be. In a family of Clears there is observable harmony and cooperation. A Clear can recognize a superior computation when he sees one. He does not have to be slugged and held down and made to obey to make him put a shoulder to the wheel.10 If he is made to obey, independent of his thinking, his self-determinism is interrupted to a point where he cannot get right answers; the society which holds him has penalized, itself, his ability to think and act rationally. The only way a Clear could so be forced would be to give him engrams or turn a neurosurgeon loose upon his brain. But a Clear does not need to be forced for, if the job is important enough to do in terms of general need, he will most certainly do it according to his intelligence and do it as well as possible. One never observes the forced individual doing a job well, just as one never observes a forced society winning against an equally prosperous free society.
A family which runs on the godhead" plan, where somebody must be obeyed without question, is never a happy family. Its prosperity may be present in some material aspects but its apparent survival as a unit is superficial.
Forced groups are invariably less efficient than free groups working for the common good. But any group which contains aberrated members is likely to become entirely aberrated as a group through contagion. The effort to restrain aberrated members of a group inevitably restrains the group as a whole and leads to further and further restraint.
Clearing one member of a family of aberrees is seldom enough to resolve the problems of that family. If
10. put a shoulder to the wheel: work energetically toward a goal; put forth effort.
11. godhead: godhood; divinity.
200
CONTAGION OF ABERRATION
the husband has been aberrated, he will have aberrated or restimulated his wife and children in one way or another, even when he used no physical violence upon them. The parents implant their mutual aberrations in the children and the children, being potentially self-determined units, revolt back to stir up the aberrations of the parents. In that so many of these aberrations, by contagion, have become mutual and held in common with the whole family, the happiness of the family is severely undermined.
The corporal punishment of children is just another facet of the problem of the forced group. If anyone cares to argue over the necessity of punishing children, let him examine the source of the misbehavior of the children.
The child who is aberrated may not have his en-grams entirely keyed in. He may have to wait until he himself is married and has children or a pregnant wife to have restimulators enough to cause him to become, suddenly, one of these things they call a "mature adult," blind to the beauty of the world and burdened by all its griefs. But the child is nevertheless aberrated and has many dramatizations. The child is in a very unlucky situation in that he has with him his two most powerful restimulators—his mother and father. These assume the power of physical punishment over him. And they are giants to him. He is a pygmy.12 And he has to depend upon them for food, clothing and shelter. One can speak very grandly about the "delusions of childhood" until he knows the engram background of most children.
The child is on the unkind receiving end of all the dramatizations of his parents. A cleared child is a most remarkable thing to observe: he is human! Affinity alone can pull him through. The spoiled child is the
12. pygmy: a very small person.
201
L. RON HUBBARD
child whose decisions have been interrupted continuously and who is robbed of his independence. Affection could no more spoil a child than the sun could be put out by a bucket of gasoline.
The beginning and end of "child psychology" is that a child is a human being, that he is entitled to his dignity and self-determinism. The child of aberrated parents is a problem because of the contagion of aberration and because he is denied any right to dramatize or counter. The wonder is not that children are a problem but that they are sane in any action, for—by contagion, punishment and denial of self-determinism— the children of today have been denied all the things required to make a rational life. And these are the future family and the future race.
This is not a dissertation on children or politics, however, but a chapter on contagion of aberration. Dia-netics covers human thought, and human thought is wide ground. When one gazes at the potentialities inherent in the mechanism of contagion, respect for the inherent stability of man cannot but arise. No "wild animal" reacting with inherent "asocial tendencies" could have built Nineveh13 or Boulder Dam.'" Carrying the contagion mechanism like some Old Man of the Sea,15 we have yet come far. Now that we know it, perhaps we shall truly reach the stars.
13. Nineveh: capital of the ancient empire of Assyria, situated on the east bank of the Tigris River, opposite modern Mosul, Iraq. Nineveh contained magnificent palaces and sculpture, which have been unearthed in archaeological excavations.
14. Boulder Dam: officially Hoover Dam, one of the highest dams in the world, on the Colorado River between the southern tip of Nevada and Arizona.
15. Old Man of the Sea: character in the story of "Sinbad the Sailor" in The Arabian Nights. A seemingly harmless old man, he climbs onto the shoulders of the obliging Sinbad and refuses to get off. He clings there for many days and nights until Sinbad escapes by getting him drunk.
202
CHAPTER NINE
Keying In the Engram
The single source of inorganic mental illness and organic psychosomatic illness is the reactive engram bank. The reactive mind impinges these engrams upon the analytical mind and the organism whenever they are restimulated after being keyed in.
There are many known incidents in a lifetime which apparently have a profound influence upon the happiness and mental condition of the individual. The individual remembers these and to them attributes his troubles. In a measure he is right: he is at least looking back at incidents which are held in place by engrams. He does not see the engrams. In fact, unless he is acquainted with Dianetics, he does not know the engrams are there. And even then he will not know their contents until he has undergone therapy.
It can be demonstrated with ease that any moment of "conscious level" unhappiness which contained great stress or emotion was not guilty of the charge of causing aberration and psychosomatic illness. These moments, of course, played a role in the matter: they were the key-ins.
The process of keying in an engram is not very complex. Engram 105, let us say, was a moment of "unconsciousness" when the prenatal child was struck, via Mother, by Father. The father, aware or not of the child, uttered the words, "Goddamn you, you filthy whore: you're no good!" This engram lay where it was impressed, in the reactive bank. Now, it could lie there for seventy years and never become keyed in. It contains a headache and a falling body and the grating of teeth
203
L. RON HUBBARD
and the intestinal sounds of the mother. And any of these sounds, postbirth, may be present in large quantities without keying in this engram.
One day, however, the father becomes exasperated at the child. The child is tired and feverish, which is to say that his analytical mind may not be at its highest level of activity. And the father has a certain set of engrams which he dramatizes and one of these engrams is the above incident. And the father reaches out and slaps the child and says, "Goddamn you: you're no good!" The child cries. That night he has a headache and is much worse physically. And he feels both an intense hatred and a fear of his father. The engram has keyed in. Now the sound of a falling body or grating teeth or any trace of anger of any kind in the father's voice will make the child nervous. His physical health will suffer. He will begin to have headaches.
If we take this child who has now become an adult and rake back over his past, we shall discover (though it may be occluded) a lock like the above key-in. And now not only the key-in; we may discover half a hundred, half a thousand, such locks just on this one subject. One would say, unless he knew Dianetics, that this child was ruined postnatally by being beaten by the father, and one might attempt to bring the patient's mind back into better condition by removing these locks.
There are literally thousands, tens of thousands, of locks in the average life. To take all of these locks away would be a task for Hercules.1 Every engram a person has, if it has been keyed in, may have its hundreds of locks.
If conditioning existed as a mechanism of pain and
1. Hercules: a mythical Greek hero of fabulous strength and courage who, after completing 12 heroic feats assigned to him (including killing several legendary monsters), became immortal.
204
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
stress, mankind would be in very bad condition. Fortunately, conditioning does not so exist. It appears to exist but the appearance is not the fact. One would think that if a child were daily thrust around and reviled2 he would eventually become conditioned into a belief that this was the way life was and that he had better turn against it.
Conditioning does not, however, exist. Pavlov3 may have been able to drive dogs mad by repeated experiments: this was simply bad observation on the part of the observer. The dogs might be trained to do this or that. But it was not conditioning. The dogs went mad because they were given engrams—if and when they did go mad. A series of such experiments, properly conducted and observed, proves this contention.
The boy who was daily told he was no good and who apparently went into a decline solely because of that, declined only because of the engram. This is a happy fact. The engram may take a while to locate—a few hours—but when it is alleviated or refiled in the standard memory banks, everything which had locked onto it also refiles.
People trying to help others with their aberrations who did not know about engrams were, of course, operating with 2.9 strikes against any success. In the first place, the locks themselves may vanish down into the reactive bank. Thus we get a patient who says, "Oh, my father wasn't so bad. He was a pretty good guy." And we discovered, and the patient discovers, when an engram is sprung, that Father was customarily to be found dramatizing. What the patient knows about his past before engrams are sprung is not worth cataloging. In another case we may find a patient saying, "Oh, I
2. reviled: criticized angrily in abusive language.
3. Pavlov: Ivan Petrovich Pavlov (1849-1936), Russian physiologist; noted for behavioral experiments on dogs.
205
L. RON HUBBARD
had a terrible childhood, a terrible childhood. I was beaten seriously." And we discover, when we get the engrams refiled, that the parents of this patient never laid a hand on him in punishment or wrath in his entire life.
An engram may coast along without being keyed in for decades. One of the most remarkable types of case is one which spent an entire youth without displaying any aberration. Then suddenly, at the age of twenty-six, we discover him to be so aberrated, so suddenly, that it appears he must have been hexed.4 Perhaps most of his engrams were concerned with the action of getting married and having children. He has never been married before. The first time he is weary or ill and realizes he has a wife on his hands, the first engram keys in. Then the dwindling spiral begins to go to work. This one shuts down the analyzer enough so that others can be keyed in. And finally we may discover him in an institution.
The young girl who has been happy and carefree to the age of thirteen and then suddenly goes into a decline has not, that moment, received an engram. She has had an engram key in, which let another key in. Fission reaction. This key-in may have required nothing more than the discovery that she was bleeding from the vagina. She has an emotional engram about this; she becomes frantic. The other engrams, as the days follow, may swing into position to impinge upon her. And so she becomes ill.
The first sexual experience may be one which keys in an engram. This is so standard that sex has gotten a rather bad name for itself here and there as being an aberrative factor all by itself. Sex is not and never has been aberrative. Physical pain and emotion which incidentally contain sex as a subject are the aberrative factors.
4. hexed: bewitched; practiced on by witchcraft.
206
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
It may be that a patient is urgent in her insistence that her father raped her when she was nine and that this is the cause of all her misery. Large numbers of insane patients claim this. And it is perfectly true. Father did rape her, but it happened she was only nine days beyond conception at the time. The pressure and upset of coitus5 is very uncomfortable to the child and normally can be expected to give the child an engram which will have as its content the sexual act and everything that was said.
Drug hypnosis is dangerous when one is trying to treat psychotics, as has been mentioned. And there are other reasons it is dangerous. Any operation under anesthetic or any drugging of a patient may bring about the keying in of engrams. Here is the analyzer shutdown, there is the reactive bank open to be stirred by any comment made by the people around the drugged subject. Hypnotism itself is a condition in which en-grams may be keyed in which have never before been restimulated: the glassy-eyed stare of the person who has been "too often hypnotized," the lack of will seen in people too often hypnotized, the dependence of the subject upon the hypnotic operator: all these things stem from the keying in of engrams. Any time the body is rendered "unconscious" without physical pain, no matter how light the degree of "unconsciousness" is, even if it is only the lightness of weariness, an engram may be keyed in. And when "unconsciousness" is complicated by new physical pain, a new engram is formed which may gather up with it an entire bundle of old engrams not hitherto keyed in. Such a late engram would be a cross engram in that it crosses chains of engrams. And if such an engram resulted in a loss of sanity, it would be called a break engram.
5. coitus: sexual intercourse.
207
L. RON HUBBARD
There are some aspects to various drug "unconsciousnesses" which have been very perplexing in the past. Psychotic women often maintain, after they are awakened from a drugged sleep (and sometimes a hypnotic sleep), that they have been raped. Men occasionally maintain that the operator has tried to perform a homosexual act upon them while they were drugged. Although it occasionally occurs that people are raped after being drugged, the largest number of such assertions are merely an aspect of the key-in mechanism. Almost any child has been put through the prenatal discomfort of coitus. Often there was violent emotion other than passion present. Such an engram may stay out of circuit for years until drugged "unconsciousness" or some such thing keys it in. The patient goes to sleep without a keyed-in engram; he wakes up with one. He tries to justify the strange sensations he has (and engrams are timeless things unless they are arranged properly on the time track6) and comes out with the "solution" that he must have been raped.
Childhood rapes are very seldom the responsible cause in sexual aberration. They are the key-in.
One looks at the conscious level locks and sees sadness, mental anguish and misfortune. Some of the experience there seems to be so terrible that it must certainly cause aberration. But it does not. Man is a tough, resilient creature. These conscious level experiences are at best only guideposts leading toward the actual seat of trouble, and that is not known in any detailed way to the individual.
The engram is never "computed." An example of this, on a lightly aberrative level, can be found in a child's punishment. If one examines a childhood where
6. time track: the time span of the individual from conception to present time on which lies the sequence of events of his life.
208
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
punishment has been corporal and frequent, he begins to understand the utter futility of the pain-drive theory. Punishment actually and literally and emphatically does no good of any kind whatsoever but accomplishes quite the reverse, since it occasions a reactive revolt against the punishment source, and is likely to cause not only a disintegration of a mind but also a continual bedevil-ment7 of the punishment source. Man reacts to fight sources of pain. When he stops fighting them he is mentally broken and of little use to anyone, much less himself.
We take a case of a boy who was beaten with a hairbrush every time he was "bad." In researching this case, the most searching inquiry fails to reveal any vivid recall of why he was punished but only that he was punished. The progress of the event would go something like this: activity more or less rational, fright at threatened punishment, punishment, sorrow over punishment, renewed activity. The mechanics of the case showed the person to have been engaged on some activity which, whether others would consider it so or not, was nevertheless survival activity to him, giving him either pleasure or actual gains or even the assertion that he could and would survive. The moment punishment is threatened, old punishments go into restimulation as minor engrams, resting usually on major engrams: this shuts down the analytical power to some extent and the recording is now being done on a reactive level; the punishment takes place, submerging analytical awareness so that the punishment records in the engram bank only; the sorrow following is still in the period of analytical shutdown; the analyzer gradually turns on; full awareness returns, and then activity on an analytical plane can be resumed. All
7. bedevilment: the act of plaguing diabolically; torment; harassment.
209
L. RON HUBBARD
corporal punishment runs this gamut and all other punishments are, at best, locks, following this same pattern with only the complete shutdown resulting from pain missing.
If the analyzer wants this data for computation, it is not available. There is a reaction in the reactive mind when the matter is approached. But there are five courses the reactive mind can take with this data! And there is no guarantee and no method between land and sky of knowing what course the reactive mind will take with the data except knowing the full engram bank— and if that is known, the person could be cleared with a few more hours' work and would need no punishment.
These five ways of handling data make corporal punishment an unstable and unreliable thing. A ratio exists which can be tested and proven in any man's experience: A man is evil in the direct ratio that de-structiveness has been leveled against him. An individual (including those individuals society is liable to forget as individuals: children) reacts against the punishment source whether that source be parents or government. Anything which sets itself forward against an individual as a punishment source will be considered in greater or lesser degree (as it is in proportion to benefits) as a target for the reactions of the individual.
The little accidental milk glass upsets of children, that noise which just accidentally occurs on the porch where the children are playing, that little accidental ruination of Papa's hat or Mama's rug: these are often cold, calculated, reactive mind actions against pain sources. The analytical mind may temporize8 about love and affection and the need of three square meals. The reactive mind runs off the lessons it has learned and devil take the meals.9
8. temporize: effect a compromise; negotiate.
9. devil take the ____: a phrase used as a curse, wish of evil or the like.
210
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
If one turned an idiot loose on an adding machine to let him audit the company books and let him prevent the auditor10 from touching equipment and data which has to be his if any answers will be right, one would get very little in the way of correct answers. And if one kept feeding the idiot and made him fat and powerful, the firm would sooner or later go to ruin. The reactive mind is the idiot, the auditor is "I" and the firm is the organism. Punishment feeds the idiot.
The helpless amazement of police about the "confirmed criminal" (and the police belief in the "criminal type" and the "criminal mind") comes about through this cycle. Police, for some reason or other, like governments, have become identified with society. Take any one of these "criminals" and clear him and the society regains a rational being of which it can use all it can get. Keep up the punishment cycle and the prisons will get more numerous and more full.
The problem of the child lashing back at his parents by "negation" and the problem of Jimmie the Cob" blowing a bank guard apart in an armed robbery stem both from the same mechanism. The child, examined on the "conscious level," is not aware of his causes but will put forth various justifications for his conduct. Jimmie the Cob, waiting for this oh-so-very-sentient society to tie him down with straps in an electric chair and give him an electric shock therapy which will cause him to cease and desist forever, examined for his causes, will pour forth justifications to explain his life and conduct. The human mind is a pretty wonderful computing machine. The reasons it can evolve for unreasonable acts
10. auditor: a person who is authorized to audit (to check or examine) accounts.
11. Jimmie the Cob: a made-up name for a criminal. Cob is British dialect for "leader; chief."
211
L. RON HUBBARD
have staggered one and all and particularly social workers. Without knowing the cause and the mechanism, the chances of drawing a correct conclusion by comparing all conducts available are as remote as winning at fan-tan12 from a Chinese. Hence, the punishments have continued as the muddled answer to a very muddled society.
There are five ways in which a human being reacts toward a source of danger. These are also the five courses he can take on any given problem. And it might be said that this is five-valued action.
The parable of the black panther* is appropriate here. Let us suppose that a particularly black-tempered black panther is sitting on the stairs and that a man named Gus is sitting in the living room. Gus wants to go to bed. But there is the black panther. The problem is to get upstairs. There are five things that Gus can do about this panther: (1) he can go attack the black panther; (2) he can run out of the house and flee the black panther; (3) he can use the back stairs and avoid the black panther; (4) he can neglect the black panther; and (5) he can succumb to the black panther.
These are the five mechanisms: attack, flee, avoid, neglect or succumb.
All actions can be seen to fall within these courses. And all actions are visible in life. In the case of a punishment source, the reactive mind can succumb,
* In Dianetics considerable slang has been developed by patients and Dianeticists and they call a neglect of the problem the "black panther mechanism." One supposes this stems from the ridiculousness of biting black panthers.
-LRH
12. fan-tan: a Chinese gambling game in which a pile of coins, counters or objects is placed under a bowl and bets are made on what the remainder will be after they have been counted off in fours.
212
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
neglect, avoid, flee or attack it. The action is dictated by a complexity of engrams and depends upon which one comes into restimulation. This maelstrom13 of reaction generally resolves itself, however, in one of the five courses.
If a child is punished and thereafter obeys, he can be considered to have succumbed. And the value of a child who will succumb to punishment is so slight that the Spartans14 would long since have drowned him, for it means he has sunk into an apathy unless it so happens that he himself has computed the idea, bypassing all reaction, that the thing for which he was punished was not bright (he can't be assisted in this computation if punishment is entered into the reactive mind by the source trying to assist him). He can flee the punishment source, which at least is not apathy but merely cowardice by popular judgment. He can neglect the matter entirely and ignore the punishment source—and would have been called a stoic by the ancients, but might be called merely dull-witted by his friends. He can avoid the punishment source, which might give him the doubtful compliment of being sly or cunning or pandering.15 Or he can attack the punishment source either by direct action or by upsetting or fouling the person or the possessions of the source—in which instance he would be called, on direct action, a valiant fool, taking parental size into account, or in a less direct fashion he could be called "covertly hostile" or could be said to be "negating." As long as a human being will attack as a response to a valid threat, he can be said to be in fair
13. maelstrom: an agitated or tumultuous state of affairs.
14. Spartans: the citizens of Sparta, a city in ancient Greece, who would permit a child to live only if he showed potential of becoming an asset to the state.
15. pandering: ministering to others' passions or prejudices for selfish ends.
213
L. RON HUBBARD
mental condition—"normal"—and a child is said to be "just acting like any normal child."
Enter punishment into the computation and it no longer computes. It is entirely different in the case of "experience." Life has plenty of painful experience waiting for any human being without other human beings complicating the score. A person who is still unblocked in his dynamics or who has been unblocked by Dianetics can absorb the most amazing amount of hammering in the business of living. Here, even when the reactive mind receives engrams as a result of some of this experience, the analytical mind can continue to cope with the situation without becoming aberrated in any way. Man is a tough, resilient, competent character. But when the law of affinity begins to be broken and such a breaking of affinity gets into the reactive bank, human beings, as antagonistic sources of nonsurvival, become a punishment source. If no contrasurvival en-grams involving human beings are in the earlier (before five years) content of the engram bank, prosurvival engrams are taken as a matter of course and are not severely aberrative. In other words, it is the breaking of affinity with his fellows on an engramic level which most solidly blocks the dynamics. Man's affinity with man is far more a scientific fact than it is a poetic and idyllic idea.
The cycle, then, of life which will be "normal" (current average state) or psychotic is an easy thing to draw. It begins with a large number of engrams before birth, it gathers more in the dependent and rather helpless condition postbirth. Punishment of various kinds, entering now as locks, key in the engrams. New engrams which will involve the earlier ones enter. New locks accumulate. Illness and aberrated action set in most certainly by the age of forty or fifty. And death ensues sometime afterwards.
214
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
Short of the optimum solution of clearing the en-grams, there are several things which can be done about aberration and psychosomatic ills. That these methods are uncertain and of only limited value does not mean that they will not occasionally meet with some astonishingly beneficial responses.
Such methods can be classified under the headings of environmental change, education and physical treatment. Taking factors out of the environment of an aberree or taking the aberree out of the environment in which he is unhappy or ineffective can bring about some astonishingly swift recoveries: this is valid therapy. It removes the restimulators from the individual or takes the individual away from the restimulators. It is ordinarily quite hit-or-miss (and more miss than hit) and it will not remove all the restimulators by nine-tenths, since the individual himself carries the bulk of these around with him or is compelled to contact them. One is reminded of a case which had severe asthma. He had received it in a very severe birth engram; his frantic parents carried him to every mountain asthma resort suggested and spent tens of thousands of dollars in these jauntings. '6 When this patient was cleared and the engram refiled, it was discovered that the restimulator for his asthma was clean, cold air! The only certainty in the environment approach is that a sickly child will recover when removed from restimulative parents and taken where he is loved and feels safe—for his sickness is the inevitable result of restimulation of prenatal engrams by one or the other or both his parents. Somewhere along the line there is probably a husband or a wife who has descended chronically into the first two zones after marriage, after having married pseudo-mother or pseudofather or pseudoabortionist.
16. jauntings: trips; excursions.
215
L. RON HUBBARD
In the educational field, new data or enthusiasms may very well key out engrams by overbalancing the reactive mind in the light of a new analytical surge. If a man can simply be convinced he has been fighting shadows or if he can be persuaded to hang his fears on some indicated cause, whether that cause is true or not, he can be benefited. Sometimes he can be "educated" into a strong faith in some deity or cult which will cause him to feel so invulnerable that he rises above his engrams. Raising his survival potential in any way will raise his general tone to a point where it is no longer on a par with the reactive bank. Giving him an education in engineering or music, where he can receive a higher level of respect, will often defend him from his restimu-lators. A rise to a position of esteem is actually a change of environment, but it is also educational since he is now taught he is valuable. If a man can be made busy at a hobby or work by personal or exterior education that it is good for him, another mechanism comes into being: the analytical mind becomes so engrossed that it takes to itself more and more energy for its activity and begins to align with a new purpose.
Physical treatment resulting in improved physical condition will bring about hope or change a man's reactions by shifting him on his time track. It may key out engrams.
These methods are valid therapy: they are also, in reverse, the things which cause aberrations to manifest themselves. There are wrong ways to act and wrong things to do and wrong ways to treat men which, in the light of what we know now, are criminal.
Thrusting a man into an environment which re-stimulates him and making him stay there is a slice of murder. Making him keep an associate who is restimu-lative is bad; making a man or a woman stay with a marriage partner who is restimulative is unworkable
216
KEYING IN THE ENGRAM
mores unless Dianetic therapy is used; making a child stay in a home where he is restimulated is most certainly inhibitive, not only of his happiness but of his mental and physical development—a child should have many more rights about such things, more places to go. On the physical therapy level, anything as violent as surgery or exodontistry in the psychosomatic plane is utter barbarism in the light of Dianetics. "Toothache" is normally psychosomatic. Organic illnesses enough to fill several catalogs are psychosomatic. No recourse to surgery of any kind should be had until it is certain that the ailment is not psychosomatic or that the illness will not diminish by itself if the potency of the reactive mind is reduced. Mental-physical therapy is too ridiculous, with the source of aberration now a science, to be seriously mentioned. For no thinking doctor or psychiatrist possessed of this information would touch another electrode for electric shock therapy or even glance at a scalpel or ice pick to perform an operation on the pre-frontal lobes of the brain unless that doctor or psychiatrist is himself so thoroughly aberrated that the act springs, not from any desire to heal, but from the most utter and craven17 sadism to which engrams can bring a man.*
* Many persons investigating the treatment of the mentally ill by psychiatrists and others in charge of mental institutions are prompted—when they discover just what the prefrontal lo-botomy, the transorbital leukotomy and electric shock actually do to patients—to revile the psychiatrist as unworthy of trust and accuse him of using it to conduct vivisection experiments on human beings. That any possible hope of recovery via Dianetics may be gone for these unfortunate patients in the majority of cases should not be blamed upon the psychiatrist and neurosurgeon. These people have only followed their teachings in various universities and have practiced such
17. craven: cowardly.
217
L. RON HUBBARD
actions merely because they believed the problem of the mind could not be solved by anyone. A witch-burning attitude toward these people is very far from the one adopted by Dianetics. Pointing to the fact that they have murdered minds which would otherwise have recovered, labeling them "mind snatchers," and making a horror story out of their actions is far from rational conduct. On the whole, these people have been entirely sincere in their efforts to help the insane. By contagion of aberration such people have been subjected to enormous stresses in this work, having had their own engrams in continual re stimulation. They can be cleared and their experience is valuable. Legislation against them such as that recently mentioned by a senator who was familiar with Dianetics, horror stories about them in newspapers and a general public antipathy, as well as the medical doctors' traditional distrust of them, cannot but bring about a disorderly condition. Dianetics is a newly discovered science and is nonparti-san.K -LRH
18. nonpartisan: not an adherent or supporter of a person, group, party or cause; objective.
218
CHAPTER
Preventive Dianetics
There are many branches in Dianetics. It is actually a family of sciences covered by a single set of axioms. There is, for instance, Educational Dianetics, which contains the body of organized knowledge necessary to train minds to their optimum efficiency and to an optimum of skill and knowledge in the various branches of the works of man. And there is Political Dianetics, which embraces the field of group activity and organization to establish the optimum conditions and processes of leadership and intergroup relations. And again there is Medical Dianetics. And there is Social Dianetics. There are many such subdivisions which are sciences within themselves guided by their own axioms.
We are dealing in this volume, actually, with basic Dianetics and Dianetic therapy as applied to the individual. This is the most immediately important and the most valuable to the individual.
But no book on Dianetic therapy would be complete without a mention of a branch of Dianetics which, some say, is even more important to the race than the therapy. This is Preventive Dianetics.
If one knows the cause of something, he can usually prevent the cause from going into effect. The discovery and proof of Ronald Ross1 that the malaria germ was carried by the mosquito makes it possible to prevent the disease from committing the ravages it once enjoyed at the expense of mankind. Similarly, when one knows the
1. Ronald Ross: (1857-1932) British physician.
219
L. RON HUBBARD
cause of aberration and psychosomatic illness, he can do a great deal toward preventing them. '
While Preventive Dianetics is a large subject, infiltrating the fields of industry and agriculture and other specialized activities of man, its basic principle is the scientific fact that engrams can be held to minimal content or prevented entirely with large gains in favor of mental health and physical well-being as well as social adjustment.
The engram is actually a very simple thing: it is a moment when the analytical mind is shut down by physical pain, drugs or other means, and the reactive bank is open to the receipt of a recording. When that recording has verbal content, it becomes most severely aberrative. When it contains antagonism on an emotional level, it becomes very destructive. When it is intensely prosurvival in content, it is most certainly capable of thoroughly deranging a life.
The engram, amongst other things, determines fate. The engram says that a man has to fail to survive, and so he contrives numerous ways to fail. The engram commands that he can only experience pleasure amongst the members of another race and so he goes amongst them and abandons his own. It commands that he must kill to live and so he kills. And far more subtly, the engram weaves its way from incident to incident to cause the catastrophe which it dictates.
A recent case was plotted out to have actually gone to enormous lengths to break his arm, for with a broken arm he received the sympathy without which the en-gram said he could not live. The plot covered three years and half a hundred apparently innocent incidents which, when netted together, told the story.
The accident-prone person is a case where the reactive mind commands accidents. He is a serious menace in any society for his accidents are reactively intentional
220
PREVENTIVE DIANETICS
and they include the destruction of other people who are innocent.
Drivers with several accidents on their records are generally accident-prone. They have engrams which command them to have accidents. When you have run a case, just one, you will see how thoroughly and maliciously disposed this moronic thing, the reactive mind, can be about such things. Cleared drivers could have accidents only through two sources: (a) mechanical failure and, more important, (b) because of accident-prone people. The terrible and awesome death toll taken by our automotive transport is almost all attributable to reactive mind driving rather than learned response driving. The apathy of this society is measured by the fact that it does not act severely to prevent all automotive accidents; just one broken windshield is one too many. Now that an answer is to hand, action can take place.
The aberree, in thousands of ways, complicates the lives of others. Preventive Dianetics makes it possible to sort out the aberree who is accident-prone and bar him from activities which will menace others. This is one general aspect of Preventive Dianetics. That the aberrees so isolated can be cleared is another type of problem.
The other general aspect of Preventive Dianetics, and the more important, is the prevention of engrams and modification of content both on the social and the individual scale. On the social scale one would delete from the society the causes of aberration in that society as if he were deleting engrams from the individual. In the same way, one can prevent the social causes from occurring in the first place.
In the individual, the prevention of engrams is a very easy matter. Once the source of aberration and illness is known, one can prevent the source from entering a life. If the source has been known to enter, one can prevent
221
L. RON HUBBARD
the next step, the key-in. Of course, the final answer in all this is therapy to a clearing, but there is one aspect of the source which is not so answered.
The child cannot be safely cleared until he is at least five years of age and current practice is to place this figure at about eight years. Improved address to the problem may reduce this figure, but it cannot be reduced below the age of speech unless someone in the future invents a catalyst2 which simply clears out the reactive mind without further treatment (not as wild as it may sound). But just now, and probably for a long time to come, the child will remain a problem to Dianetics.
Childhood illness is chiefly derived from engrams. It is most likely to be severe before the age of speech and the number of deaths within the first year of life, while medicine may reduce them, is yet a serious thing.
Preventive Dianetics addresses this problem in two phases: first, the prevention of engrams; and second, the prevention of the key-in.
Taking the key-in first, there are two things which can be done to prevent it. The child can be given a calm and harmonious atmosphere which is not restimulative or, if the child appears to be restimulated despite kindly treatment, he can be removed to another environment which will be minus the two most certain sources—his father and mother—and which will contain a source of affection. The test of whether or not a child is restimulated, prespeech or postspeech, is very simple. Is he susceptible to illness? Does he eat well? Is he nervous? There can be actual physical things wrong with the child, of course, but these are quickly established by a doctor and they lie in the category of physical derangement.
2. catalyst: a person or thing acting as the stimulus in bringing about or hastening a result.
222
PREVENTIVE DIANETICS
Quarrels within the hearing of a child, loud noises, frantic conduct, drooling sympathy when he is sick or hurt: these things are some of the key-in catalog. These make a child ill physically and aberrated mentally by keying in his engrams. And nobody can say how many he has!
The primary source of prevention lies in the field, oddly enough, of the regard in which another person is held—his mother.
It is not "biological love" which makes Mother play such an enormous role in the life of a human being. It is the simple mechanical truth that Mother is a common denominator to all the child's prenatals. The prenatal engram is far more serious than the postnatal. Any such engram a person has contains his mother or his mother and another person, but always his mother. Therefore her voice, the things she says, the things she does, have an enormous and vast effect upon the unborn child.
It is not true that emotion gets into a child through the umbilical cord, as people always suppose the moment they hear of prenatals. Emotion comes on another (more electrical than physical) type of wave—what type is a problem for structure. Therefore, anyone who is emotional around a pregnant woman is communicating that emotion straight into the child. And Mother's emotion is, in the same manner, so conducted to his reactive mind.
Whether or not the unborn child is "unanalytical" has no bearing on his susceptibility to engrams. The prenatal engram is just another engram. Only when the child is actually struck or hurt by high blood pressure or orgasms or other sources of injury does he become "unconscious." When he becomes "unconscious" he receives all the percepts and words in the area of the mother as engrams. Analytical power has nothing to do with engrams. If the child is "unanalytical," this does not
223
L. RON HUBBARD
predispose him to engrams. If the child is "unconscious" or hurt, it does. The presence or absence of "analytical power" has nothing to do with whether or not engrams are received.
Morning sickness,3 coughing, all monologuing (Mother talking to herself), street noises, household noises, etc., are all communicated to the "unconscious" child when he is injured. And the child is very easily injured. He is not protected by formed bones and he has no mobility. He is there: when something strikes him or presses him, his cells and organs are injured. A simple experiment to demonstrate how mobility influences this is to lie down in bed and place one's head on a pillow. Then have somebody lean a hand on one's forehead. As there is no mobility, the pressure of the hand is far stronger than it would be if a hand were laid on the forehead when one was standing. The tissue and the water around the child form very slight buffers. In an injury, amniotic fluid, as an incompressible medium, presses him, for it cannot compress itself. The child's situation is far from armored. Mother's act of tying her shoes, in the later stages of pregnancy, even may be severe on the child. Mother's strain when lifting heavy objects is particularly injurious. And Mother's collision with objects like a table edge might well crush a baby's head. The repair facilities of the unborn child, as mentioned elsewhere, are far above anything ever before discovered. The child may have its head crushed but the blueprint is still there and the building materials and repair can be made. So it is not a case of the child being "all right" just because it can live through almost anything. It is a case of whether or not these injuries are
3. morning sickness: nausea occurring in the early part of the day, especially as a characteristic symptom in the first months of pregnancy.
224
PREVENTIVE DIANETICS
going to have high aberrative value as engrams.
Attempted abortion is very common. And remarkably lacking in success. The mother, every time she injures the child in such a fiendish fashion, is actually penalizing herself. Morning sickness is entirely en-gramic, so far as can be discovered, since Clears have not so far experienced it during their own pregnancies. And the act of vomiting because of pregnancy is via contagion of aberration. Actual illness generally results only when Mother has been interfering with the child either by douches or knitting needles or some such thing. Such interference causes the mother to become ill and, from an actual physical standpoint, is much harder on the mother than on the child. Morning sickness evidently gets into a society because of these interferences such as attempted abortion and, of course, injury.
The cells know when pregnancy occurs. The reactive mind is acquainted with the fact before the analyzer by process of organic sensation, since the endocrine system is altered. Hence, the mother's discovery of pregnancy has little to do with whether or not she was sick before the discovery.
This entire field has been a subject of considerable research in Dianetics. Much more research must be done. These conclusions are tentative. But the conclusion that the engram is received and that it is as violent as its content, rather than its actual pain, is a scientific fact and not in any way a theory. It is as real a discovery as gravity.
Preventing these engrams is the first consideration. Preventing them from having any content is the second. Women who lead peasant lives, doing heavy labor, are subject to all manner of accident. Perhaps such accidents cannot be prevented because of the purpose these women serve in the society. But when it is known that
225
                 L. RON HUBBARD

any injury to the mother can create an engram in the
unborn  child, it should be the concern of  all those
present during such an injury, including the mother, to
maintain a complete and utter silence. Any remark is
abcrmtive, in an engram. Even such a statement as "You
can remember  this when in Dianetic therapy," made
toward an  unborn child, installs an engram so that
every word in this statement means a physical pain just
where  he received it at the time, and in the future
"Dianetic therapy" will be restimulative to him.
   The doctor, punching around to find out if Mother is
pregnant, may  say, "Well, it's hard to tell this early."
The  patient in Dianetic therapy years later will return
into the vicinity of this incident only to draw a blank
until the Dianeticist suddenly guesses the content from
how  the patient describes his reactions. If the doctor is
very tough and says, "You had better take good care of
yourself, Mrs. Jones. If you don't, you'll be mighty
sick!" the child, "unconscious" from the examination
no matter how mild it is, will get a mild hypochondria
when  the engram keys in and be very concerned over
his health.
   If the husband uses language during coitus, every
word  of it is going to be engramic. If the mother is
beaten by him, that beating and everything he says and
that she says will become part of the engram.
   If she does not want the child and he does, the child
will later react toward him as an ally4 and perhaps have
a nervous breakdown when the father dies. If she wants

4. ally: in Dianetics it basically means someone who protects a
person who  is in a weak  state and becomes  a very strong
influence over the person. The weaker person, such as a child,
even partakes the characteristics of the ally so that one may find
that a person who has, for instance, a bad leg, has it because a
protector or ally in his youth had a bad leg. The word is from
French and Latin and means to bind together.
                           226
                PREVENTIVE DIANETICS

the child and he doesn't, the ally computation5 is reversed.
This is true when  abortion is threatened or attempted,
providing the threat is contained in an engram.
   Should  the mother  be injured and the  father be
highly solicitous,6 the engram has this for content and
the child has a sympathy engram. The way to survive,
then, is to be pathetic when injured, and even see to it
that one is injured.
   A woman   who is pregnant should be given every
consideration by a society which has any feeling for its
future generations. If she falls, she should be helped—
but silently. She must not be expected to carry heavy
things. And she should not have coitus forced upon her.
For every coital experience is an engram  in the child
during pregnancy.
   An  astonishing number of pregnancies must take
place which are never realized. The violence of coitus,
the use of douches and jellies (used because the woman
is still contracepting and does not know she is already
pregnant), straining bowel movements, falls and acci-
dents must account for a large number of miscarriages
which come  about sometime around the first period
after conception. For the zygote and embryo forms of
the child have a rather frail grip on existence and are
very severely injured by things the mother would con-
sider nothing. Once  past the first missed period, the
chances of miscarriage rapidly grow less and only when
the child is  a genetic monstrosity  or when   abortion
5. ally computation: little more than a mere idiot calculation
that anyone  who  is a friend can be  kept a friend only by
approximating the conditions wherein the friendship was real-
ized. It is a computation on the basis that one can only be safe in
the vicinity of certain people and that one can only be in the
vicinity of certain people by being sick or crazy or poor  and
generally disabled.
6. solicitous: anxious and concerned about a person's welfare or
comfort.

                           227
                 L. RON HUBBARD

attempts are made can a miscarriage be expected to
take place The monstrosities are so small a percentage
that they are negligible as a possibility.
   The amniotic sac7 can be pierced many times and
repeatedly and  emptied  of all water  after the first
missed period and the child can still survive. Twenty or
thirty abortion attempts are not uncommon in the aber-
ree and  in every attempt the child could have been
pierced through the body or brain.
   The  child before birth does not depend upon the
standard senses for its perceptions. Engrams are not
memories  but cellular level recordings. Therefore, the
child needs no eardrums to record an engram. Cases are
on hand where whatever hearing mechanism the unborn
child had must have been temporarily destroyed by an
abortion attempt. And the engram was still recorded.
The  cells rebuilt the apparatus which was to be the
source of sound in the standard banks and stored their
own data in the reactive bank.
   Release of such engrams  means  a  restoration of
rationality to the individual far above the current norm
and  a stability and well-being greater than man ever
thought man possessed. These engrams have been con-
firmed by taking the data from a child, from the mother
and the father, and all data checked. So we are dealing
here with  scientific facts which, no matter how  star-
tling, are nevertheless true.
   The  mother, then, should be extremely gentle on
herself during pregnancy and those around her should
be entirely informed  of the necessity for silence after
any jar or injury. And in view of the fact that it is not
possible to tell when a woman has become pregnant and
in view also of the high potentiality of aberration in the
zygote and embryo engrams, it is obvious that society
7. amniotk  sac: the membrane  sac enclosing the developing
fetus and amniotic fluid.
                           228
                PREVENTIVE DIANETICS

must better its ways toward women if the future health
of the child is to be preserved.
   The woman has, to some degree, become considered
less valuable in this society than in other societies and
times. She is expected to be in competition with men.
Such a thing is nonsense. A woman has as high a plane
of activity as man. He cannot compete with her any
more than she can compete  with him in the fields of
structure and  vigorous activity. Much  of the  social
maelstrom  now in existence has as its hub the failure to
recognize the important role of the woman as a woman
and the separation of the fields of women and men.
   The changes which  will come about in the next
twenty years need no urging here. But with the recent
discoveries in  photosynthesis8 which  should  secure
enough  food to feed man better and at less cost, the
importance  of birth control dwindles. The morality
standards have already changed, no matter what moral-
ists do to try to block the change. And woman, there-
fore, can be freed of many of her undesirable chains.
   In the custody of man is the current world and its
activity and structure. In the charge of woman is the
care of the person of the human being and his children.
Almost sole custodian of tomorrow's generation, she is
entitled to much more respect than her chattel9 period
of the past gave her.
   It is not, then, any wild Utopian thought that woman
can be placed above the level hitherto occupied. And so
she must be  placed if the childhood of tomorrow's
generation is to reach any high standard, if homes are to
be peaceful and unharassed and if society is to advance.

8. photosynthesis: the process by which green plants use sun-
light to convert carbon dioxide (taken from the air) and water into
complex substances.
9. chattel: slave or any movable possession (as opposed to a
house or land).
                           229
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   Preventive Dianetics, in the sphere of the home,
must place emphasis on the woman in order to safe-
guard the child.
   As  any first step, a mother should be cleared, for
any mother who attempts an abortion is blocked across
the second dynamic and any block menaces her health
as well as her happiness. An antipathy for children has
been found to accompany sexual aberration.
   Preventive Dianetics, then, on the level of the indi-
vidual, asks for cleared parents and  then precaution
against the aberrating of the child, and further precau-
tion against the keying in of any aberration the child
might have received.
   To  do  this is very easy. Maintain  silence in the
presence of injury. Do what has to be  done for the
injured or ill and do it in silence. Maintain silence in
the presence  of birth to save both  the sanity of the
mother and the child and safeguard the home to which
they will go. And the maintaining of silence does not
mean  a volley10 of "Sh's," for those make stammerers.
   In a wider field, the maintenance of silence around
any "unconscious" or injured person is second in im-
portance only to preventing the "unconsciousness" in
the first place.
   Say nothing and make no sound around an "uncon-
scious" or injured person. To speak, no matter what is
said, is to threaten  his sanity. Say nothing  while  a
person is being operated upon. Say nothing when there
is a street accident. Don't talk!
   Say nothing around  a sick child or an injured child.
Smile, appear calm, but say nothing. Actions do not
speak louder than words but actions are all that can be
done  around the sick and injured, unless one has an
 10. volley: (figurative) a noisy, rapid outpouring or burst of many
things at once.
                            230
                PREVENTIVE DIANETICS

active desire to drive them into neurosis or insanity or,
at best, to give them a future illness.
   And above all, say nothing around a woman who has
been  struck or jarred in any way.  Help  her. If she
speaks, don't answer. Just help her. You have no idea of
whether she is pregnant or not.
   And  it is a remarkable fact, a scientific fact, that the
healthiest children come from the happiest mothers.
Birth, for one thing, in a cleared mother, is a very mild
affair. Only birth engrams in the mother made it hard.
A cleared mother needs no anesthetic. And that is well
because the anesthetic makes  a dazed child and  the
engram, when it reacts, makes him appear a dull child.
A happy woman  has very little trouble. And even a few
engrams, which  arrive despite all precautions, are noth-
ing if the general tone of the mother is happy.
   Woman, you have a right and a reason to demand
good treatment.
                            231
I
 Book Three
Therapy
                    CHAPTER ONE
   The Mind's Protection
   The mind  is a self-protecting mechanism. Short of
the use of drugs as in narcosynthesis, shock, hypnotism
or surgery, no mistake can  be made  by  an auditor1
which cannot  be remedied either by himself or by
another auditor. Those things which are stressed, then,
in this book, are ways to accomplish therapy as swiftly
as possible with minimal errors; for errors take time.
Auditors are going to make errors, that is inevitable. If
they make the same error repeatedly, they had better get
someone to guide them through therapy.
   Thf-t- are probably thousands of ways to get into
trouble .ith mental healing, but all these ways can be
classed in these groups: (1) use of shock or surgery on
the brain; (2) use of strong drugs; (3) use of hypnosis as
such; and (4) trying to crossbreed Dianetics with older
forms of therapy.
   The  mind  will not permit  itself to be seriously
overloaded so long as it can retain partial awareness of
itself; it can only be overloaded when its awareness is
reduced to a point where it cannot evaluate anything: it
can then be thoroughly upset. Dianetic reverie2 leaves a

1. auditor: a person trained and qualified in applying Dianetics
processes and  procedures to  individuals for their betterment;
called an auditor because auditor means "one who listens."
2. reverie: the state of reverie is actually just a name. It is a label
introduced to make the patient feel that his state has altered and
that he has gone into a state where his memory is very good or
where he can do something he couldn't ordinarily do before. The
actuality is that he is able to do it all the time anyway. It is not a
strange state. The person is wide awake, but merely by asking
him to close his eyes he is technically in reverie.
                           235
                 L. RON HUBBARD

patient fully aware of everything which is taking place
and with full recall of everything which has happened.
Types of therapy which do not do this are possible and
useful but they must be approached with the full knowl-
edge that they are not foolproof. Dianetics, then, uses
the reverie for the majority of its work, and, using the
reverie, an auditor cannot possibly get himself into any
trouble from which he cannot extricate himself and the
patient. He is working with an almost foolproof mecha-
nism as long as the mind retains some awareness: a
radio or a  clock or an  electric motor are far more
susceptible to injury in the hands of a workman than the
human  mind. The mind  was built to be as tough as
possible. It will be found that it is difficult to get it into
situations which make it uncomfortable and impossible,
with the reverie, to embroil3 it enough to cause neurosis
or insanity. In the US infantry manual there is a line
about decision: "Any plan, no matter how poorly con-
ceived, if boldly executed, is better than inaction."
   In Dianetics, any case,4 no matter how serious, no
matter how  unskilled the auditor, is better opened than
left closed. It is better to start therapy  if it is to be
interrupted after two hours of work than not to start
therapy at all. It is better to contact an engram than to
leave an engram uncontacted even if the result is physi-
cal discomfort for the patient—for that engram will not
thereafter possess as much power and the discomfort
will gradually abate.
   This  is scientific fact. The mechanism  Dianetics
uses is an ability of the brain which man as a whole did
not know  he had. It is a process of thought which

3. embroil: throw into confusion; complicate.
4. case: a general term for a person being treated or helped. Case
also refers to a person's condition, which is monitored by the
content of his reactive mind.  A  person's case is the way he
responds to the world around him by reason of his aberrations.
                           236
                THE MIND'S PROTECTION

everyone possesses inherently and which was evidently
meant  to be used in the overall process of thinking but
which, by some strange oversight, man has never before
discovered. Once a person has learned that he possesses
just this one new faculty, he is better able to think than
he  was before, and  he can  learn this faculty in ten
minutes. Further, when one approaches an engram with
this faculty (which, when  intensified, is the reverie),
some of that engram's sublevel connections are broken
and the aberrative factors no longer have as much force
either in the physical or mental spheres. Further, the
knowledge  that there is a solution to mental ills is a
stabilizing factor.
   Approaching  an engram with the reverie is very far
from the same as restimulating the engram exteriorly as
is done in life. The engram is a powerful and vicious
character only so long as it is untapped. In place and
active, it can be restimulated to cause innumerable
mental and physical ills. But approaching it with reverie
is approaching it on a new circuit, one that disarms it.
The  power of the engram  is partly the fear of the
unknown—knowing    brings stability by itself.
   Do not think that you will not make patients uncom-
fortable. That is not true. The auditor's work, when it
taps engrams which  cannot be lifted, may cause the
patient to have headaches, various aches and pains and
even  mild physical  illness, even when the  work  is
carefully done.  But life has been  doing  this to the
patient on a much  grander  scale for years and, no
matter how badly the case is mauled around, no matter
how  many  aberrations spring into view to plague the
patient for a day or two, none are as serious as those
which  can be occasioned by the environment acting
upon the untapped engram.
   The  auditor can do everything backwards, upside
down  and  utterly wrong and the patient will still be
                           237
                 L. RON HUBBARD

better, provided only that he does not try to use drugs
before he has worked a few cases, that he does not use
hypnotism as hypnotism and he does not try to cross
Dianetics with some older therapy. He can use drugs in
Dianetics if he knows  his Dianetics and  if he has
medical concurrence. He can use all the techniques of
hypnotism so long as he is thoroughly experienced with
Dianetics. And once he has used Dianetics, he will not
fall back to mystic efforts to heal minds. In short, the
point which is offered here is that so long as the auditor
takes a relatively simple case at first to see how the
mechanisms  of the mind work and uses only the rev-
erie, he cannot get into trouble. There will be those,
certainly, who believe they are so vastly experienced in
tom-tom  beating or gourd rattling that they won't give
Dianetics a chance to work as Dianetics but will sail in
and begin to plague the patient about "penis envy" or
make  him repent his sins; but the patient who starts to
get this will be smart to simply change positions from
the couch to the auditor's chair and clear up some of
the aberrations of the auditor before work proceeds.
   Anybody who  has read this book once through and
procured  a patient with sonic recall for a trial effort
will know more about the mind, in those actions, than
he has ever known before, and he will be more skilled
and able to treat the mind than anyone attempting to do
so, regardless of reputation, a very short while ago.
This does not mean that men who have had experience
with mental patients will not, knowing Dianetics (know-
ing Dianetics) have an edge on those who do not realize
some  of the foibles5 of which man in an aberrated state
is capable. And on the other hand it does not mean that
some  engineer or lawyer or cook with a few Dianetic
5. foibles: minor weaknesses or failings of character; slight flaws
or defects.
                           238
               THE MIND'S PROTECTION

cases under his belt will not be more skilled than all
other practitioners of whatever background or kind. In
this case, the sky is no limit.
   One could not say, offhand, that an able hypnotist or
an able psychologist, ready and willing to jettison6 and
unlearn yesterday's mistakes, is not better prepared to
practice Dianetics. In the field of psychosomatic medi-
cine, the medical doctor, with a vast fund of experience
in healing, might very  well be far and above  other
auditors in Dianetic work. But it is not necessarily the
case, for in research it has been proven that men and
women  with most  unlikely professional backgrounds
have suddenly become auditors superior in skill to those
in fields you might suspect were more  closely allied.
Engineers particularly are excellent material and make
excellent auditors. Again, Dianetics  is not being re-
leased to a profession, for no profession could encom-
pass it. It is insufficiently complicated to warrant years
of study in some university. It belongs to man and it is
doubtful if anyone could manage to gain a corner7 on it
for it does not fall within any legislation of any kind in
any  place and  if Dianetics were  legislated into a li-
censed profession, then it is to be feared that listening
to stories and jokes and personal experience would also
have to be legislated into a profession. Such laws would
put all men of goodwill who lend a sympathetic ear to a
friend's troubles inside the barbed wire. Dianetics is
not psychiatry. It is not psychoanalysis. It is not psy-
chology. It is not personal relations. It is not hypnotism.
It is a science of mind and  needs about as much
licensing and regulation as the application of the science
6. jettison: throw off (something) as an obstacle or burden;
discard.
7. corner: a monopoly acquired on a stock or a commodity so as
to be able to raise the price.
                           239
                 L. RON HUBBARD

of physics. Those things which  are legislated against
are a matter of law because they may in some way
injure individuals or society. Legislation exists about
psychoanalysis in some three states in the Union, legis-
lation against or about psychiatry exists everywhere. If
an  auditor wishes to constitute8 himself a psychiatrist
with the power of vivisecting9 human brains, if he wants
to constitute himself a doctor and administer drugs and
medicines, if he wants to practice hypnotism and pour
suggestions into a patient, then he must square it with
psychiatry, medicine and the local laws about hypno-
tism, for he has entered other fields than Dianetics. In
Dianetics, hypnotism is not used, no brains are operated
upon and no drugs are given unless the local medico is
part of the staff. Dianetics is not in any way covered by
legislation anywhere, for no law can prevent one man
sitting down and telling another man his troubles, and if
anyone wants a monopoly on Dianetics, be assured that
he  wants it for reasons which have  to do not with
Dianetics but with profit. There are not enough psy-
chiatrists in the country to begin to staff the mental
institutions. Surely this generation, particularly with all
the iatrogenic* work which has been done, will con-
tinue to need those institutions and will need psychia-
trists: their field is the treatment of the  insane by
definition and that has nothing to do with thee and me.
In psychology,  Dianetics drops into line without dis-
turbing anything concerned  with staffs or research or

* Iatrogenic means illness generated by doctors. An operation
during  which  the doctor's knife slipped and  accidentally
harmed  the patient might cause an iatrogenic illness or injury
since the fault would have been with the surgeons. —LRH

8. constitute: establish or set up; make  (a person  or  thing)
something.
9. vivisecting: cutting into or dissecting.
                            240
               THE MIND'S PROTECTION

teaching posts, for psychology is simply the study of the
psyche and now that there exists a science of the psyche
it can go ahead  with a will. Thus, Dianetics is the
enemy  of none, and Dianetics falls utterly outside all
existing legislation, none of which anticipated or made
any provision for a science of mind.
                            241
                   CHAPTER Two
      Release or Clear
   The  object of Dianetic therapy is to bring about a
Release or a Clear.
   A Release (noun) is an individual from whom major
stress and anxiety have been removed by Dianetic therapy.
   A  Clear (noun) is an individual who, as a result of
Dianetic therapy, has neither active nor potential psycho-
somatic illness or aberration.
   To clear (verb) is to release all the physical pain and
painful emotion from the life of an individual or, as in
Political Dianetics, a society. The  result of this will
bring about persistence in the four dynamics, optimum
analytical ability for the individual and, with that, all
recall. The experience of his entire life is available to
the Clear and he has all his inherent mental ability and
imagination  free to use it. His physical vitality and
health are markedly improved and  all psychosomatic
illnesses have vanished and  will not return. He has
greater resistance to actual disease. And he is adaptable
to and  able to change his environment. He  is not
"adjusted"; he is dynamic. His ethical and moral stand-
ards are high, his ability to seek and experience pleas-
ure is great. His personality is heightened and  he is
creative and constructive. It is not yet known how much
longevity is added to a life in the process of clearing,
but in view of the automatic rebalancing of the endo-
crine system, the lowered incidence of accident and the
improvement  of general physical tone, it is most cer-
tainly raised.
   A  Release is an individual from whom have been
released the current or chronic mental  and  physical
                            242
                 RELEASE OR CLEAR

difficulties and painful emotion. The value of a Re-
lease, when compared  to a  Clear, may  not at first
thought be considered great, but when one understands
that a Release is usually in excess of the contemporary
norm  in mental stability, it can be seen that the condi-
tion is not without great value.
   As  a standard of comparison, a Clear is to the
contemporary norm as the contemporary norm is to
a contemporary institutional case. The margin is wide
and it would be difficult to exaggerate it. A Clear, for
instance, has complete recall of everything which has
ever happened to him or anything he has ever studied.
He does mental computations, such as those of chess,1
for example, which a normal would do in half an hour,
in ten or fifteen seconds. He does not think "vocally"
but spontaneously. There are no demon circuits in his
mind except those which it might amuse him  to set
up—and  break down  again—to care for various ap-
proaches to living. He is entirely self-determined. And
his creative imagination is high. He can do a swift study
of anything  within his intellectual capacity, which is
inherent, and the study would be the equivalent to him
of a year or two of training when he was "normal." His
vigor, persistence and tenacity to life are very much
higher than anyone has thought possible.
   The objection that it is dangerous to create too many
Clears in a society is a thoughtless one. The Clear is
rational. The acts which damage   a society are irra-
tional. That a handful of Clears could probably handle
any number of "normals" is within reason, but that the
1. chess: a game of skill played on a checkered board by two
players, each possessing an initial force of 16 pieces, including a
piece called a "king." There are individual rules of movement for
each different kind of piece. Players make alternate moves, each
seeking to attack the other's king in such a manner that no escape
or defense is possible, thus ending the game.
                           243
                 L. RON HUBBARD

Clear would handle them to their detriment is unreason-
able. The more  Clears a society possessed, the more
chance that society would have to prosper. That a Clear
is unambitious is not proven out by scientific observa-
tion, for the curve of dwindling ambition follows the
curve of reducing rationality; and those who have been
cleared have proven the matter by re-activating all their
skills toward goals they had once desired but had begun
to consider unattainable when "norms."* That a Clear
is in some degree separated from the "norm" is attrib-
utable to the gulf between their respective mental abil-
ities, for he has achieved  solutions and conclusions
before the "norm" has begun to form an idea of what to
conclude. This does not make a Clear intolerable to the
"norm,"  for the Clear has  none of that superiority
attitude which is actually a product of engrams. This is
a quick glance at the state of being Clear, but the state
cannot be  described; it has to be experienced to be
appreciated.
   A Release is a somewhat variable quantity. Anyone
well advanced on the road to Clear is a Release. There
is no comparison between a Clear and anything man has
before believed obtainable, and there is no comparison
between clearing and any therapy hitherto practiced. In
the case of the Release only is there a basis of com-
parison between  Dianetics and past therapies such as
"psychoanalysis" and  any other. A Release  can be ef-
fected in a few weeks. The resulting condition will be at
least equivalent to that following two years of "psycho-
analysis" with the difference that the Release has a guar-
antee of permanent results and no guarantee of success
has ever been made by "psychoanalysis." A Release does
* Norm  is a term in psychology denoting the normal individual,
which  is to say, an average person. The IQ and behavior of a
"norm"  would be an averaging out of the current population. There
is nothing desirable about being a "norm," for he is badly aberra-
ted. -LRH
                           244
                 RELEASE OR CLEAR

not relapse into any pattern which has been relieved.
   These  are the two goals of the Dianetic  auditor:
Clear and Release. It is not known at this writing how
long  is the average  time  to raise the institutionally
insane into the neurotic level: it has been done in two
hours, it has been done in ten and in some cases it has
required two hundred.*
   The Dianetic auditor should determine beforehand
in any case whether he wishes to attempt a Release or a
Clear. He can  achieve either with anyone not organi-
cally insane (missing or seared portions of the brain
bringing about  insanity, mainly genetic or iatrogenic
and relatively rare except in institutions). But he should
make an estimate of the amount of time he can invest in
any one  person and regulate his intention accordingly
and  announce  it to his patient. The two goals are
slightly different. In a Release, one does not attempt
entrance into phases of the case which will or may bring
about a necessity of long work and gives his attention to
the location and release of emotional charge. In clear-
ing, the auditor gives his attention to the location of the
basic-basic engram, the discharge of emotion and the
entire engram bank.
   There is a third goal which could be considered a
subhead of a Release. This is an assist: it is done after
injury, or illness following the  injury, or illness just
sustained, in order to promote more rapid recovery; to
assist the  body  in its rehabilitation after  injury or
*  The Dianetic auditor  who  practices with the institutionally
insane exclusively should provide himself with the text now in
preparation on that subject. The techniques are similar to those
described here but incline more toward heroic measures. This
present volume is addressed to treatment of the normal person or
the neurotic patient not  sufficiently violent to he institutional-
ized. However, with intelligence and imagination, these same
techniques can he applied with success to any mental state or
physical illness. Institutional Dianetics is primarily the reduction
of an insanity to a neurosis. — LRH
                            245
                        L. RON HUBBARD
        illness. This is specialized therapy which will probably
       be practiced commonly enough but is of primary ben-
j |     efit to the medical doctor who, with it, can save lives
        and speed  healing by releasing the engram  of that
        particular illness or injury, thus removing the various
        engram conceptions which the furtherance of the injury
        restimulates. Any  Dianetic auditor can  practice this.
        The assist has about the same level of usefulness as a
        faith-healing miracle which would work every time.
          Estimations of the amount of time the case will
         require are difficult to attain with any accuracy greater
        than 50 percent and it should be understood by the
        patient that the time in therapy is variable. It depends in
        a measure upon the skill of the auditor, the number of
        unsuspected engrams never hitherto reactivated, and the
        amount of restimulation to which the patient is subject
        during therapy. Therefore, the auditor should not be
        optimistic in estimating time but should make his pa-
        tient understand that greater or lesser time may  be
       consumed  in the therapy.
           Any  person who  is intelligent and possessed of
        average persistency and who is willing to read this book
        thoroughly should be able to become a Dianetic auditor.
        When  he has cleared two or three cases he will have
        learned far more and  understood far more  than is
        contained in  this book, for there is nothing  which
        develops an understanding of a machine like handling it
        in action. This is the instruction book, the machine in
        question is ready to hand  wherever there are men.
        Contrary to superstition about the mind, it is almost
        impossible to permanently injure the mechanism. It can
        be done  with an electric shock or a scalpel or an ice
        pick, but it is almost impossible to do it with Dianetic
        therapy.
                                    246
                    CHAPTER THREE
     The Auditor's Role
   The  purpose of therapy and  its sole target is the
removal of the content of the reactive engram bank. In
a Release, the majority of emotional stress is deleted
from  this bank. In a Clear, the entire content is re-
moved.*
   The application of a science is an art. That is true of
any science. The  efficacy of its application depends
upon  the understanding, skill and ability of whoever
applies it. The chemist has a science of chemistry and
yet the profession of being a chemist is an art. The
engineer may have behind him  the precision of all the
physical sciences and yet the practice of engineering is
an art.
   Certain rules of procedure can be laid down after
the basic axioms of a science are understood. Beyond
those rules of procedure is the understanding, skill and
ability necessary to application.
   Dianetics is extremely simple. This does not mean
that cases cannot be extremely complicated. To cover
one case  for each kind of case in this book  would
necessitate two billion cases and that would only en-
compass the current population. For each man is a great
deal different from every other man. His inherent per-
sonality is different. His composite of experience is
different. And his dynamics are of different strengths.

* The content of the engram bank  is actually shifted rather
than removed, for it refiles under the heading of experience
in the standard banks. The  material, however, appears to
vanish in therapy because  the therapy is addressed to the
engram bank, not the standard banks. —LRH
                            247
                 L. RON HUBBARD

The  only constant is the mechanism  of the reactive
engram bank and that alone does not vary. The content
of that bank is different from man to man  both in
quantity and intensity but the mechanism of operation
of the bank and  therefore the basic mechanisms of
Dianetics are constant from man to man, and were in
every age and  will be in every future age until man
evolves into another organism.
   The target is the engram. It is also the target of the
patient's analytical mind and the patient's dynamics as
he tries to live his life: It is the target of the auditor's
analytical mind and the auditor's dynamics. So brack-
eted1 and salvoed,2 it gives up its store of engrams.
   This should be extremely  plain to any auditor: the
amount  he relaxes from the position of auditor and
forgets the target, he garners3 trouble which will con-
sume his time. The moment he makes  the error of
thinking that the person, the analytical mind or  the
dynamics  of the patient are resisting, trying to stop
therapy or giving up, the auditor has made the funda-
mental and primary  error in the practice of Dianetics.
Almost anything that goes wrong can be traced back to
this error. It cannot be too emphatically stated that the
analytical mind and the dynamics of the patient never,
never, never resist the auditor. The auditor is not there
to be resisted. He has no concern with resistance from
anything except the patient's (and sometimes his own)
engrams.
   The  auditor is not there as the patient's driver or
adviser. He is not there to be intimidated by the patient's

 1. bracketed: of a target, having had its range determined by
placing shots both  short of the target and  beyond  it. Used
figuratively.
2. salvoed: fired at with a number of guns or artillery pieces at
one time.
3. garners: acquires; gathers or collects.
                           248
                 THE AUDITOR'S ROLE

engrams or be frightened by their aspects. He is there to
audit and only to audit. If he feels that he is called upon
to be lordly to the patient, then the auditor had better
change chair for couch because he has a case of authori-
tarianism coming into view. The word auditor is used,
not operator or therapist, because it is a cooperative
effort between the auditor and the patient, and the law
of affinity is at work.
   The patient cannot see his own aberrations. That is
one of the reasons why the auditor is there. The patient
needs to be bolstered to face the unknowns of his life.
That is another reason the auditor is there. The patient
would  not dare address the world which  has gotten
inside him and  turn his back upon the world that is
outside him  unless he has a  sentry. That is another
reason the auditor is there.
   The  auditor's job is to safeguard the person of the
patient during therapy, to compute the reasons why the
patient's mind cannot reach into the engram bank, to
strengthen the patient's nerve and to get those engrams.
   There  is a three-way case of affinity at work this
moment.  I am in affinity with the auditor: I am telling
him  all that has been discovered and is in practice in
Dianetics and I want him to succeed. The auditor is in
affinity with the patient: he wants the patient to attack
engrams.  The  patient is in affinity with the auditor
because, with minimal work, that patient is going to get
better and—with  persistence lent him by  the auditor,
plus his own—will become a Release or a Clear. There
are even more   affinities at work, a vast network of
them. This is a cooperative endeavor.
   The engram  bank is the target, not the patient. If the
patient swears and moans and weeps and pleads, those
are engrams talking. After a while the engrams that
make him swear and moan and weep and plead will be
discharged and refiled. The patient, in whatever state,
                           249
                 L. RON HUBBARD

knows  full well that the action taken is necessary. If the
auditor is so short of rationality that he mistakes this
swearing or moaning   as something directed at him
personally, that auditor had better change places with
the patient and undergo therapy.
   The only thing which resists is the engram! When it
is being restimulated it impinges against the patient's
analyzer, tends to reduce analytical power, and  the
patient exhibits a modified dramatization. Any auditor
with two  brain cells to click together will never be in
any slightest danger of his person at the hands of the
prerelease or preclear*  If the auditor wants to use
hypnotism  and  try to run late physically painful en-
grams, such as operations, when early ones are avail-
able, he may  find himself targeted. But then he has
done  something very wrong. If the auditor suddenly
gets supermoral and  lectures the patient, he may get
involved, but again he has done something very wrong.
If the auditor snarls and snaps at the patient, he may get
targeted, but once more a fundamental error has been
made.
   The target is the engram bank. It is the auditor's job
to attack the preclear's engram  bank.  It is the pre-
clear's job to attack that bank. To attack the preclear is
to permit his engram bank to attack the preclear.
   We  know  that there are five methods of handling
an engram. Four of them are wrong. To succumb to an
engram  is apathy, to neglect one is carelessness, but to
avoid or flee from one is cowardice. Attack, and only
attack, resolves the problem. It is the duty of the auditor
to make  very  sure that the preclear keeps attacking

* The terms prerelease and preclear are used to designate an
individual entered into and undergoing Dianetic therapy. The
term preclear is used most commonly. The word patient is less
descriptive because  it implies illness, but it is used inter-
changeably. —LRH
                            250
                THE AUDITOR'S ROLE

engrams, not the auditor or the exterior world. If the
auditor attacks the preclear, that's bad gunnery and
very poor logic.
   The  engram  bank is best attacked primarily by
discharging its emotional charge anywhere it can be
contacted. After that it is best attacked by finding out
what the preclear, in reverie, thinks would happen to
him if he got well, got better, found out, etc. And then
it is most and always most important, in any way
possible, to contact the primary moment of pain or
unconsciousness  in  the patient's life. This is basic-
basic. Once  an auditor has basic-basic, the case will
swiftly resolve. If the preclear's reactive mind is sup-
pressing basic-basic, then the auditor should discharge
more reactive emotion, discover the computation now in
force, and try again. He will eventually get basic-basic.
That's important. And that is all that is important in a
preclear.
   In the prerelease (patient working toward Release
only), the task is to discharge emotion and as many
early engrams as will present themselves easily. The
reduction of locks may be included in prerelease; but
only when  they  lead to basic-basic should locks be
touched in a preclear.
   There  are three levels of healing. The first is getting
the job done  efficiently. Below that is making  the
patient comfortable. Below that is sympathy. In short, if
you can do nothing for a man with a broken back, you
can make him comfortable. If you can't even make him
comfortable, you can sympathize with him.
   The  second and  third echelons above are entirely
unwarranted in Dianetics. The job can be done  effi-
ciently. Making the patient comfortable is a waste of
time. Giving him sympathy may snarl up the entire case,
for his worst engrams will be sympathy engrams and
sympathy may restimulate them out of place. The auditor
                            251
                 L. RON HUBBARD

who  indulges in "hand-patting," no matter how much it
seems to be indicated, is wasting time and slowing down
the case. Undue roughness  is not indicated. A friendly,
cheerful, optimistic attitude will take care of everything.
A preclear sometimes needs a grin. But he has already
had more "hand-patting" than the analyzer has been able
to compute. His  chronic psychosomatic illness contains
sympathy in its engram.
   The next thing the auditor should know and live is
the Auditor's Code.*4 This may sound like something
from "When Knighthood Was in Flower" or the "Thir-
teen Rituals for Heavenly   Bliss and Nirvana,"  but
unless it is employed by the auditor on his patients, the
auditor will have some heavy slogging. This code is not
for the comfort of the preclear; it is exclusively for the
protection of the auditor.
   The Auditor's Code should never be violated. Prac-
tice in Dianetics has demonstrated that violation of the
Auditor's Code alone can interrupt cases.
   The auditor should be courteous in his treatment of
all preclears.
   The auditor should be kind, not giving way to any
indulgence of cruelty toward preclears, nor surrender-
ing to any desire to punish.
   The  auditor should be  quiet during therapy, not
given to talk beyond the absolute essentials of Dianetics
during an actual session.

* It is interesting that the Auditor's Code outlines, save for its
last clause, the survival conduct pattern of man. The Clear
operates more or less automatically on this code. Dianetics is
a parallel to thought, since it follows the natural laws of
thought. What works in Dianetics works as well in life. — LRH

4. Auditor's Code: a collection of rules (do's and don'ts) that an
auditor follows while auditing someone, which assures that the
preclear will get the greatest possible gain out of the auditing he
is having.
                           252
                THE AUDITOR'S ROLE

   The auditor should be trustworthy, keeping his word
when given, keeping his appointments in schedules and
his commitments to work, and never giving forth any
commitment  of any kind which he  has any slightest
reason to believe he cannot keep.
   The auditor should be courageous, never giving ground
or violating the fundamentals of therapy because a pre-
clear thinks he should.
   The auditor should be patient in his working, never
becoming restless or annoyed by the preclear, no matter
what the preclear is doing or saying.
   The auditor should be thorough, never permitting his
plan of work to be swayed or a charge to be avoided.
   The  auditor should be persistent, never giving up
until he has achieved results.
   The auditor should be uncommunicative, never giv-
ing the patient any information whatsoever about his
case, including evaluations of data or further estimates
of time in therapy.
   Various conditions ensue when any of the above are
violated. All violations slow therapy  and  cause the
auditor more work. All violations come back  to the
detriment of the auditor.
   For instance, in the last, it is not part of the audi-
tor's work to inform the preclear of anything. As soon
as he starts doing so, the preclear promptly hooks the
auditor into the circuit as the source of information and
so avoids engrams.
   The auditor will see in progress the most violent and
disturbing human emotions. He may be moved to sym-
pathy, but if he is, he has overlooked something and
hindered therapy: Whenever an emotion shows, it is an
emotion which will shortly be history. Whatever gyra-
tions5 the preclear may go through, however much he

5. gyrations: actions of turning round, wheeling or whirling.
                           253
                 L. RON HUBBARD

may  move  or wrestle around, the auditor must keep
firmly in mind that every moan or gyration is one step
closer to the goal. For why   be frightened or waste
sympathy about something which, when it has been
recounted a few times, will leave a preclear happier?
   If the auditor becomes  frightened and pulls that
error of all errors when a  preclear begins to shake,
"Come  up to present time!" he can be sure that the
preclear will have a couple of bad days and that the next
time the auditor wants to enter that engram it will be
blocked.
   If an auditor assumes the state of mind that he can
sit and whistle while Rome burns before him and be
prepared to grin about it, then he will do an optimum
job. The things at which he gazes, no matter how they
look, no matter how they sound, are solid gains. It's the
quiet, orderly patient who is making few gains. This
does not mean  that the auditor is trying for nothing but
violence, but it does mean that when he gets it he can
be cheerful and content that one more engram has lost
its charge.
   The  task of auditing is rather much a shepherd's
task, herding the little sheep, the engrams, into the pen
for slaughter. The  preclear isn't under the auditor's
orders but the preclear, if the case runs well, will do
whatever the auditor wants with these engrams because
the analytical mind and the dynamics of the preclear
want that job done. The mind knows how  the mind
operates.
                           254
                    CHAPTER FOUR
         Diagnosis
   One  of the most important contributions of Dia-
netics is the resolution of the problem of diagnosis in
the field of aberration. Hitherto there have been almost
unlimited  classifications; further, there has been no
optimum  standard.* As one researches in the field of
psychiatric texts, he finds wide disagreement in classi-
fication and continual complaint that classification is
very complex  and lacking in usefulness. Without an
optimum  goal of conduct or mental state and without
knowledge  of the cause of aberration, catalogs of de-
scriptions alone were possible and  these were so in-
volved and contradictory that it was nearly impossible
to sharply assign to a psychotic or neurotic any classifi-
cation which would  lead to an understanding of his
case.** The main  disability in this classification system
was  that the classification did not lead to a cure, for
there was no  standard treatment and there was  no
optimum  state to indicate when treatment was at end;
and  as there was no  cure for aberration or psycho-
somatic illness, there could be no classification which
*  "Psychology has . . . no mental standards to set up. . , .
The psychologist does not occupy himself with the establish-
ment of norms." The Psychology of Abnormal People, by
John J. B. Morgan, Longmans, Green & Co., New York, 1928.
-LRH
**  "The work of the psychiatrist was taken up mainly with
describing and  classifying symptoms. This procedure has
been strongly criticized by some students on the ground that it
leads nowhere and encourages a false pretense of understand-
ing where there is none. Giving a name to something does not
increase our understanding of it." Ibid., Intro. —LRH
                           255
                     L. RON HUBBARD

would  indicate the direction which was to be taken or
what could uniformly be expected of a case.
   This  is no criticism of past efforts surely, but it is a
source of relief to know that the classification of aber-
ration is unnecessary along such complicated lines as
have been  used  and that the cataloging of psycho-
somatic ills, while necessary to the physician, is unim-
portant to the auditor. In the evolution of the science of
Dianetics  there were  several stages  of classification
until it finally became clear that the label on a patho-
logical condition should only be whatever the auditor
had to overcome to achieve cure. This system, as now
evolved through practice, makes it possible for the auditor
to "diagnose" without any more knowledge than is con-
tained in this chapter and his own future experience.
   The number of aberrations possible is the number of
combinations of words possible in a language as con-
tained in engrams. In other words, if a psychotic thinks
he is God, he has an engram which says he is God. If he
is worried about poison in his hash, he has an engram
which tells him he may get poison in his hash. If he is
certain he may be "fired" from his job any moment,
even though he is competent and well liked, he has an
engram  which tells him he is about to be "fired." If he
thinks he is ugly, he has an engram about being ugly. If
he is afraid of snakes or cats, he has engrams which tell
him  to fear snakes and cats. If he is sure he has to buy
everything he sees, despite his income, he has an en-
gram  which tells him to buy everything he sees. And in
view of the fact that anyone not released or cleared has
upwards of two or three hundred engrams and as these
engrams contain a most remarkable assortment of lan-
guage  and as he may  choose one  of five ways of
handling any one of these engrams, the problem of
aberration is of no importance to the auditor except
where it slows therapy.
                           256
                      DIAGNOSIS

   Most aberrated people talk in a large measure out of
their engrams. Whatever the chronic patter' of the indi-
vidual may  be,  his rage patter, his apathy patter, his
general attitude toward life, this patter is contained in
engrams wherever it departs even in the slightest degree
from complete rationality. The man who "cannot be
sure," who "does not know" and who is skeptical of
everything, is talking out of engrams. The man who is
certain "it cannot be true," that "it isn't possible," that
"authority must be  contacted," is talking out of en-
grams. The woman   who is so certain she needs a
divorce or that her husband is going to murder her some
night is talking out of either her own or his engrams.
The man who comes in and says he has a bad pain in his
stomach that feels "just like a #12 gauge2 copper wire
going straight through me," has quite possibly had a
#12  gauge copper wire through him in an attempted
abortion or talk of such a thing while he was in pain.
The man  who  says it "has to be cut out" is talking
straight out of an engram, either from some operation
of his own  or his mother's or from  an attempted
abortion. The man who  "has to get rid of it" is again
possibly talking out of an attempted-abortion engram.
The man who  "can't get rid of it" may be talking from
the same source but from another valence. People, in
short, especially when talking about Dianetics and en-
grams, give forth with engram  talk in steady streams.
They have no awareness, ordinarily, that the things they
are saying are minor dramatizations of their engrams
and  suppose that they have  concluded these things
themselves or think these things: the supposition and
explanation is  only justified thought—the  analyzer

1. patter: the special vocabulary of a particular activity.
2. gauge: thickness or diameter, as of sheet metal or wire. A #12
gauge copper wire is approximately three thirty-secondths of an
inch thick.
                           257
                 L. RON HUBBARD

performing its duty in guaranteeing that the organism is
right no matter how foolishly it is acting.
   The auditor can be assured, particularly when he is
talking about Dianetics, that he is going to  hear in
return a lot of engram  content; for discussion of the
reactive mind generally takes place in language which it
itself holds.
   Recall that the reactive mind can think only on this
equation—A = A = A, where the three A's may be re-
spectively a horse, a swear word and the verb to spit.
Spitting is the same as horses is the same as God. The
reactive mind is a very zealous Simple Simon, carefully
stepping in each pie. Thus, when a man is told he has to
delete the content of the reactive bank, he may say that
if he did, he is sure he would lose all his ambition. Be
assured—and  how easily this proves up on therapy and
how red-eared some preclears become—that he has an
engram which may run something like this:
   (Blow or bump, prenatal)
Father: Damn  it, Agnes, you've got to get rid of that
   goddamned  baby. If you don't, we'll starve to death.
    I can't afford it.
Mother:  Oh, no, no, no. I can't get rid of it, I can't, I
   can't, I can't! Honest, I will take care of it. I'll work
   and slave and support it. Please don't make me get
   rid of it. If I did I'd just die. I'd lose my mind! I
   wouldn't have anything to hope for. I'd lose all my
   interest in life. I'd lose my ambition. Please let me
   keep  it!
   What a common  one that engram is: and how sin-
cere and "rational" and earnest an aberree can be in
supporting his conclusion that he has just "thought up"
the "computation"  that if he "gets rid of it," he'll lose
his mind and ambition, maybe even die!
   As  this work is written, most of the engrams that
will be found in adults come from the first quarter of
                           258
                      DIAGNOSIS

the twentieth century. This was the period of "Aha, Jack
Dalton,3 at last I have you in my possession!" It was the
period of Blood and Sand4 and Theda Bara.5 It was the
period of bootleg6 whiskey and woman   suffrage.7 It
covered the days of "flaming youth" and "The Yanks
are coming,"8 and bits of such color will be demanding
action in the engram  banks.  Dianetic auditors have
picked up whole passages of the great play Drunkard9
out of prenatal engrams,  not as a  piece of funny
"corn"10 but as Mama's sincere and passionate effort to
reform Papa. Superdrama, mellerdrammer." And not
only that but also tragedy. The hangover of the Gay
Nineties,12 when the "business girl" had just begun to
be "free" and Carry  Nation13 was saving the world at

3. Jack Dalton: member  of an outlaw gang in the nineteenth-
century American West; also a character in early westerns.
4. Blood and  Sand: title of a silent movie featuring Rudolph
Valentine.
5. Theda Bara: stage name of Theodosia Goodman (1890-
1955), US actress who played parts of evil women in forty films
between 1915 and 1919.
6. bootleg: made, sold or transported unlawfully. The term arose
from the practice of hiding a liquor bottle in the leg of one's boot.
7. suffrage: the right to vote, especially in a political election.
8. "The Yanks  are coining": line from the refrain of the song
"Over There" by George  M. Cohan  (1878-1942), American
actor, songwriter, playwright and producer. The song is about the
American troops sent to Europe to fight in World War I.
9. Drunkard: a play written by William H. Smith and "A Gentle-
man" in the late 1800s, a moral domestic drama of American life.
10. corn: (informal) old-fashioned, trite or mawkishly (weakly
emotional) sentimental material, as a joke, a story or music.
11. mellerdrammer: humorous spelling of melodrama, any sen-
sational writing, speech or action with exaggerated appeal to the
emotions.
12. Gay Nineties: the 1890s, a period of sudden affluence in the
US brought on by the industrial revolution.
13. Carry Nation: (1846-1911) American temperance agitator,
famous for her use of a hatchet to break up saloons.
                           259
                 L. RON HUBBARD

the expense of bartenders, will be common  fare in
engrams  found in today's adults. Yesterday's cliches
and absurdities become, tragically enough, today's en-
gramic commands. One very, very morose young man,
for instance, was found to have as the central motif14 of
his reactive mind Hamlet's15 historic vacillations16 about
whether "to be or not to be, that is the question." Mama
(who was what these colloquially minded auditors call a
"loop"17) had gotten it by contagion from  an actor-
father whose failure to be a Barrymore18 had driven him
to drink and wife beating; and our young man would sit
for hours in a morose apathy wondering about life. To
classify his psychosis required nothing more than "apa-
thetic young fellow."
   Most of engram content is merely cliches and common-
places and emotional crash dives by Mama or Papa. But
the auditor will have his moments. And when he suddenly
learns about them, the preclear will have his laughs.
   In other words, aberration can be any combination
of words contained in an engram. Thus, to classify by
aberration is not only utterly impossible but completely
unnecessary. After an auditor has run one case, he will
be far more able to appreciate this.
 14. motif: dominant idea or feature.
15. Hamlet:  hero of the play Hamlet, a tragedy (first printed
 1603) by William Shakespeare. Hamlet is a young prince who
avenges the murder of his father.
16. vacillation: a wavering in mind or opinion.
 17. "loop": literally, a length of film or magnetic tape whose
ends have been joined to form an endless strip, so that continuous
repetition of the recording is made possible (e.g., in rehearsing
the  synchronization required for dubbing  a foreign-language
soundtrack). Used  figuratively.
 18. Barrymore: referring to the Barrymore family, American
actors of English-Irish descent, one of the most famous families
in the history of the American stage: Maurice Barrymore (1847-
 1905) and his three children-Lionel (1878-1954), Ethel (1879-
 1959) and John (1892-1942).
                            260
                      DIAGNOSIS

   As  for psychosomatic  ills, as classified in an earlier
chapter, these depend also upon accidental or intentional
word combinations and all the variety of injury and unbal-
anced fluid and growth possible. It is very well to call an
obscure pain "tendinitis," but more probably and more
accurately it is a fall or injury before birth. Asthma comes
fairly constantly from birth, as do  conjunctivitis and
sinusitis, but when these can occur  in birth, there is
generally prenatal background. Thus it can be said that
wherever a man or woman aches is of minor importance
to the auditor beyond using the patient's chronic illness to
locate the chain of sympathy engrams, and all the auditor
needs to know of that illness is that some area of the body
hurts the patient. That, for the auditor, is enough  for
psychosomatic diagnosis.
   It happens that the extent of  aberration and the
extent of psychosomatic illness are not the regulating
factors which establish how long a case may take. A
patient may be a screaming lunatic and yet require only
a hundred hours to clear. Another may be  a "well-
balanced" and  moderately successful person and yet
take five hundred hours to clear. Therefore, in the light of
the fact that the extent of aberration and illness has only a
minor influence on  what the auditor is interested in—
therapy—classification by these is so much wasted time.
   Oh, there are such things as a man being too sick
from heart trouble to be worked very hard, and such
things as a patient worrying so continuously as a mani-
festation of his usual life that the auditor finds his work
difficult, but these are  rarities and  again have  little
bearing on the classification of a case.
   The rule in diagnosis is that whatever the individual
offers the auditor as a detrimental reaction to therapy is
engramic and will prove so in the process. Whatever
impedes the auditor in his work is identical to whatever
is impeding the patient in his thinking and living. Think
of it this way: the auditor is an analytical mind (his
                            261
                 L. RON HUBBARD

own) confronted with a reactive mind (the preclear's).
Therapy is a process of thinking. Whatever troubles the
patient will also trouble the auditor; whatever troubles
the auditor has  also troubled the patient's analytical
mind. The patient is not a whole analytical mind. The
auditor will find himself occasionally  with a patient
who  does nothing but swear at him and yet when the
appointment time arrives, there that patient is, anxious
to continue therapy; or the auditor may find a patient
who  tells him how useless the entire procedure is and
how she hates to be worked upon and yet if he were to
tell her, "All right, we'll stop work," she would go into
a prompt  decline. The analytical mind of the patient
wants to do the same thing the auditor is trying to do:
fight down into the reactive bank. Therefore, the audi-
tor, when  he encounters opposition, adverse theory
about Dianetics, personal criticism, etc., is not listen-
ing to analytical data but reactive engrams and  he
should calmly proceed, secure in that knowledge; for
the patient's dynamics, all that can be brought to bear,
will help him so long  as the auditor is an ally against
the preclear 's reactive mind,  rather than a critic or
attacker of the preclear 's analytical mind.
   This is an example:
   (In reverie—prenatal basic area)
Preclear: (Believing he means Dianetics) I don't know.
   I don't know. I just can't remember. It won't work. I
   know it won't work.
Auditor:  (Repeater technique,19 described later) Go
   over that. Say, "It won't work."
19. repeater technique: the repetition of a word or phrase in
order to produce movement  on  the time track into areas of
disturbed thought containing that word or phrase. After the audi-
tor has placed the patient in reverie, if he discovers the patient, for
instance, insists he "can't go anyplace," the auditor makes him
repeat the phrase. Repetition of such a phrase, over and over,
sucks the patient back down the track and into contact with an
engram  which contains it.
                           262
                      DIAGNOSIS

Preclear: "It won't work. It won't work. It won't work.
   . . ." etc., etc. Ouch, my stomach hurts! "It won't
   work. It won't work. It won't work. . . ." (Laughter
   of relief) That's my mother. Talking to herself.
Auditor:  All right, let's pick up the entire engram.
   Begin at the beginning.
Preclear: (Quoting  recall with somatics [pains]) "I
   don't know how to do it. I just can't remember what
   Becky told me. I just can't remember it. Oh, I am so
   discouraged. It won't work this way. It just won't
   work. I wish I knew what Becky told me but I can't
   remember. Oh, I wish . . ." Hey, what's she got in
   here? Why, goddamn her, that's beginning to burn!
   It's a douche. Say! Let me out of here. Bring me up
   to present time! That really burns!
Auditor: Go back to the beginning and go over it again.
   Pick up whatever additional data you can contact.
Preclear: Repeats engram, finding all the old phrases
   and some new  ones, plus some sounds. Recounts
   four more times, "reexperiencing" everything. Be-
   gins to yawn, almost falls asleep (unconsciousness
   coming  off), revives and repeats engram  twice
   more. Then  begins to chuckle over it. Somatic is
   gone. Suddenly engram is "gone"  (refiled and he
   cannot discover it again). He is much pleased.
Auditor: Go  to the next earliest moment of pain or
   discomfort.
Preclear: Uh.  Mmmmm.     I can't get in there. Say, I
   can't get in there! I mean it. I wonder where . . .
Auditor: Go over the line, "Can't get in there."
Preclear: "Can't get in there. Can't . . ." My legs feel
   funny. There's a sharp pain. Say, what the hell is she
   doing? Why, damn her. Boy, I'd like to get my hands
   on her just once. Just once!
Auditor: Begin at the beginning and recount it.
                           263
                 L. RON HUBBARD

Preclear: (Recounts engram  several times, yawns off
   "unconsciousness," chuckles when  he can't find the
   engram  anymore. Feels better.) Oh, well, I guess she
   had her troubles.
Auditor: (Carefully refraining from agreeing that Mama
   had her troubles, since that would make him an ally of
   Mama) Go to the next moment of pain or discomfort.
Preclear: (Uncomfortable) I can't. I'm not moving on
   the time track. I'm stuck. Oh, all right. "I'm stuck,
   I'm  stuck." No. "It's stuck. It's stuck that time." No.
   "I stuck it that time." Why damn her! That's my
   coronary trouble! That's it! That's the sharp pain I get!
Auditor: Begin at the beginning of the engram and
   recount, etc.
   Each time, it can be seen in this example, that the
patient in reverie encountered analytically the engram
in near proximity, the engram command impinged itself
upon  the patient himself, who  gave it forth as an
analytical opinion to the auditor. A preclear in reverie
is close up against the source material of his aberra-
tions. An  aberree wide-awake may  be  giving forth
highly complex  opinions which he  will battle to the
death to defend as his own  but which are, in reality,
only his aberrations impinging  against his analytical
mind. Patients will go right on declaring that they know
the auditor is dangerous, that he shouldn't ever have
started them  in therapy, etc., and still keep working
well and efficiently. That's one of the reasons why the
Auditor's Code  is so important: the patient is just as
eager to relieve himself of his engrams as could be
wished, but the engrams give the appearance of being a
long way from anxious to be relieved.
   It will also be seen in the above example that the
auditor is not making any  positive suggestion. If the
phrase is not engramic, the patient will very rapidly tell
him so in no uncertain terms and although it still may
be, the auditor has no great influence over the preclear
                           264
                      DIAGNOSIS

in reverie beyond helping him to attack engrams. If the
preclear contradicted any of the above, it means that the
engram containing the words suggested is not ready to
be relieved and another paraphrase is in order.
   Diagnosis, then, is something which takes care of
itself on the aberration and psychosomatic plane. The
auditor could have guessed—and kept it to himself—
that a series of attempted abortions were coming up in
the above example before he entered the area. He might
have guessed that the indecisiveness of the patient was
from his mother. The auditor, however, does not com-
municate his guesses. This would  be suggestion and
might be  seized upon  by the patient. It is up to the
preclear to find out. The auditor, for instance, could not
have known  where on  the time track the preclear's
"coronary  pain"  was nor  the nature of  the injury.
Chasing up and down looking for a specific pain would
be just so much   wasted time. All such things will
surrender in the course of therapy. The only interest in
them is whether or not the aberrations and illnesses go,
to return no more. At the end of therapy they will be
gone. At the beginning they are only complication.
   Diagnosis of aberration and psychosomatic illness,
then, is not an essential part of Dianetic diagnosis.
   What  we are interested in is the mechanical opera-
tion of the mind. That is the sphere of diagnosis. What
are the working mechanics of the analytical mind?
   1.   Perception: Sight, hearing, tactile and pain, etc.
   2.   Recall: Visio-color, tone-sonic,* tactile, etc.
   3.   Imagination: Visio-color, tone-sonic, tactile, etc.
   These are the mechanical processes. Diagnosis deals
primarily with  these factors and with these factors can

* Visio means sight recall in Dianetics. Sonic means sound
recall. Somatic means pain recall. A patient who can see,
hear and feel pain stores them. "I," remembering, recalls
them as visio, sonic and somatic. — LRH
                            265
                          L. RON HUBBARD
I
§         establish the length of time a  case should take, how
I         difficult the case will be, etc. And we need only a few of
I'         these.
|            This further simplifies into a code:
|            1. Perception (over or under optimum):
I                    a. Sight
|y                b. Sound
|            2.  Recall (under):
|:                  a. Sonic
t                      b. Visio
.'&,
 f           3.  Imagination (over):
                    a. Sonic
                      b. Visio
            In other words, when we examine a patient before
          we make  him a preclear (by starting him into therapy), we
           are interested in three things only: too much or too little
          perception, too little recall, too much imagination.
            In perception, we mean how well or how poorly he
          can hear, see and feel.
             In recall, we want to know if he can recall by sonic
          (hearing), visio (seeing) and somatic (feeling).
            In imagination, we want to know  if he "recalls"
          sonics, visios or somatics too much.
             Let us make this extremely clear: it is very simple, it is
          not complex, and it requires no great examination. But it
          is important and establishes the length of time in therapy.
             There is nothing wrong with an active imagination
         so long as the person knows he is imagining. The kind
          of imagination  we are  interested in is that used for
          unknowing "dub-in"20 and in that kind only. An active

           20. dub-in: the manifestation of putting, unknowingly, percep-
            tions which do not in actual fact exist, in the environment. (It is a
            phrase taken from the motion picture industry, meaning to record
            dialogue and various sounds and then integrate them into the film
            after it has been shot. This is done for scenes where the original
            recording is faulty, for scenes where it is simply more convenient
            to add dialogue and  other sound later, and for films playing
           abroad which require new dialogue in the native language of the
            host country.)
                                      266
                      DIAGNOSIS

imagination which the patient knows to be imagination
is an extremely valuable asset to him. An imagination
which  substitutes itself for recall is very  trying  in
therapy.
   "Hysterical"21 blindness and deafness or extended
sight or hearing  are  useful in diagnosis.  The  first,
"hysterical" blindness, means  the patient is afraid to
see; "hysterical" deafness means he  is afraid to hear.
These will require considerable therapy. Likewise, ex-
tended sight and extended hearing, while not as bad as
blindness and deafness, are an index of how frightened
the patient really is and is often a straight index of the
prenatal content in terms of violence.
   If the patient is afraid to see with his eyes or hear
with his ears in present time, be assured there is much
in his background to make him afraid, for these actual
perceptions do not "turn off" easily.
   If the patient jumps at sounds and is startled by
sights or is very disturbed by these things, his percep-
tions can be said to be extended, which  means  the
reactive bank has a great deal in it labeled "death."
   The  recalls in which we are interested in diagnosis
are those which are less than optimum only. When they
are "overoptimum,"   they are  actually imagination
"dubbed  in" for recall. Recall (under) and imagination
(over) are actually, then, one group, but for simplicity and
clarity we keep them apart.
   If the patient cannot "hear" sounds or voices in past
incidents he does not have sonic. If he does not "see"
scenes of past experiences in motion-color pictures, he
does not have visio.
21. hysterical: (psychiatry)  of or characteristic of  hysteria, a
psychiatric condition variously characterized by emotional excit-
ability, excessive anxiety, sensory and motor disturbances, or the
unconscious simulation of organic disorders, such as blindness,
deafness, etc.
                           267
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   If the patient hears voices which have not existed or
sees scenes which have not existed and yet supposes
that these voices really spoke and these scenes were
real, we have "overimagination." In Dianetics, imagi-
nary  sound recall would  be hypersonic, sight recall,
hypervisio (hyper = over).
   Let us take specific examples of each one of these
three classes and demonstrate how they become funda-
mental in therapy and how  their presence or absence
can make  a case difficult.
   A  patient with a mild case of "hysterical" deafness
is one who has difficulty in hearing. The deafness can
be organic but, if organic, it will not vary from time to
time. This patient has something he is afraid to hear. He
plays the radio very loudly, makes people repeat contin-
ually and misses pieces of the conversation. Do not go
to an  institution to find this degree of  "hysterical"
deafness. Men  and women   are "hysterically" deaf
without any conscious knowledge of it. Their "hearing
just isn't so good." In Dianetics, this is being called
hypohearing (hypo = under).
   The patient who is always losing something when it
lies in fair view before him, who   misses signposts,
theater bills and  people who   are in  plain sight, is
"hysterically" blind to some degree. He  is afraid he
will see something. In Dianetics, this is being called,
since the word hysterical is a very inadequate and overly
dramatic one, hyposight.
   Then  there is the case of overperception. This is not
necessarily imagination, but it can go to the length of
seeing and  hearing things which are not there at all,
which happens to be a common insanity. We are inter-
ested in a less dramatic grade in standard operation.
   A  girl, for instance, who sees something or thinks
she sees something but knows she doesn't and is very
startled, who jumps  in fright when  anyone silently
                            268
                      DIAGNOSIS

comes  into a room,  and can  be so startled rather
habitually, is suffering from  extended sight. She  is
afraid she will encounter something. But  instead of
being blind to it, she is too alive to it. This is hyper-
sight.
   A person who is much alarmed by noises, by sounds
in general, by certain voices, who gets a headache or
gets angry when the people around are "noisy" or the
door slams or the dishes rattle, is a victim of extended
hearing. She hears sounds far louder than they actually
are. This is hyperhearing.
   The  actual quality of the seeing and hearing does
not need to be good. The actual organs of sight and
sound  can be in poor  condition. The only fact of
importance is the "nervousness" about reception.
   This disposes of the two perceptions in which we are
interested in Dianetics. As the auditor talks to people
around  him  and  gets their reactions to sights and
sounds, he will find wide variety in quality of response.
   Recall is the most directly important to therapy, for
it is not a symptom, it is an actual tool of work. There
are many  ways to use recall. The Clear has vivid and
accurate recall for every one of the senses. Few aber-
rees have. The auditor is not interested in other senses
than sight and sound because the others will be cared
for in the usual course of therapy. But if he has a patient
who  has no sonic, watch out. And if he has a patient
with neither sonic nor visio, beware! This is the multi-
valent personality, the schizophrenic, the paranoid of
psychiatry with symptoms not acute enough to be so
classified in normal  life. This does not  mean-
emphatically does not mean—that people without sight
and  sound recall are insane, but it does mean  an
above-average case and it means a case which will take
some time. It does not mean the case is "incurable," for
nothing can be further from the truth: but such cases
                            269
                 L. RON HUBBARD

which are not present or bypass engrams which are
present and so on in a tangled hash.)
   The optimurii preclear would be one who had aver-
age response to noises and sights, who had  accurate
sonic and visio and who could imagine and know that
he was  imagining, in color-visio and tone-sonic. This
person, understand clearly, may have aberrations which
make  him climb every chimney in town, drink every
drop in every bar every night (or try it anyway), beat his
wife, drown his children and suppose himself to be a
jub-jub bird.26 In the psychosomatic line he may have
arthritis, gallbladder trouble, dermatitis, migraine head-
aches and flat feet. Or he may have that much  more
horrible aberration—pride  in being average  and  "ad-
justed." He  is still a relatively easy case to clear.
   In  the case which  has  sonic and  visio shut-off
without "dub-in," we are dealing with engrams which
have shut down some of the primary working mecha-
nisms  of the mind.  The  auditor will have to slog
through hours and hours and hours of trying to contact
engrams  when the patient cannot hear them or see
them. A case which merely has a shut-down sonic recall
still means that the auditor is going to do a lot more
work  than on an average case. This case is very, very
far from  impossible to resolve. That is not the idea
here, to frighten off any attempt on such a case. But this
case will only be resolved after a great deal of persis-
tent effort. Such a  person may  be  apparently very
successful. He may be enormously intelligent. He may
have few or no psychosomatic ills. Yet he will prove to
have a crammed engram bank, any part of which may
come  into restimulation at any time and swamp him.
Usually, however, this type of case is quite worried and

26. jub-jub bird: imaginary creature from the poem "Jabber-
wocky"  by Lewis Carroll.
                            272
                      DIAGNOSIS

anxious about many things, and such worry and anxiety
may put a little more time on the worksheet.
   In the case of the "dub-in" who doesn't know it,
where  circuits are giving him back altered recall, we
have a case which may very likely prove to be very long
and  require artful treatment. For there is a "lie fac-
tory" somewhere in that engram bank. This case may
be the  soul of truthfulness in his everyday life. But
when  he starts tackling his engrams, they have content
which makes him  give out material which is not there.
   Sharply  and clearly, then, without further reserva-
tion or condition, this is Dianetic diagnosis: The aberra-
tion is the engram content; the psychosomatic illness is
the former injury. The perceptions of sight and sound,
underoptimum  recall, overoptimum imagination regu-
late the length of the case.
   If the auditor wants  to be fancy, he  can list the
general Tone Scale position of the individual mentally
and physically. The woman who is dull and apathetic is,
of course, around tone 0.5 in the zone 0 part of the
dynamic  scale earlier in the book. If the man is angry
or hostile, the auditor can mark him down as a 1.5 or
somewhere  generally in the zone 1 range of the survival
scale. These markings  would  apply to the probable
average tone of the aggregate engrams in the reactive
mind. This is interesting because it means that a zone 0
person  is far more  likely to be ill and is a  slightly
harder case than a zone 1 person. And, as therapy raises
tone to zone 4, the 1.5 is closer to the goal.
   It is difficult to estimate time in therapy. As men-
tioned before, it has several variables such as auditor
skill, restimulative elements in the patient's environ-
ment and sheer volume of engrams.
   The  auditor is advised, in his first case, to seek out
some member  of the family or a friend who is as close
as possible to the optimum preclear, which is to say, a
                           273
                 L. RON HUBBARD

person with visio and sonic recall and average percep-
tions. In clearing this one  case he will learn  at first
hand much  of what can be expected in the engram
banks of any mind, and  he will see clearly how en-
grams behave. If the auditor himself falls into one of the
harder brackets and if he means to work with somebody
in one of these brackets, that poses no great difficulty;
either case can be released in a hundredth the time of
any former mental healing technique and they can be
cleared, if any skill at all is used, in five hundred hours
of work  per case. But  if two cases are particularly
difficult, before they work on each other, each would be
wise to find and clear a nearly optimum preclear. That
way  each will be a  competent operator when  the
rougher cases are approached.
   Thus, diagnosis. The other perceptions, recalls and
imaginations are interesting but not vital in measuring
case time. IQ,  unless it falls down into the feeble-
minded  level, is no great factor. And even then the IQ
of any patient goes up like a skyrocket with clearing
and rises all the while during the work.
   There  are organic insanities. latrogenic psychoses
(caused by  doctors) are equivocal27 in Dianetics, for a
part of the machinery may have been wrecked. Never-
theless, with many  organic psychoses a case can  be
improved by Dianetics, even if an optimum cannot be
reached. And  so all an auditor can do is try. Insanities
caused by missing parts of the nervous system have not
been  extensively investigated by auditors at this time:
the reviving of corpses is not the end of Dianetics; the
bringing about an optimum mind  in *he normal or
merely  neurotic person has had the main emphasis.
Dianetics can be otherwise used, is being and will be.
But with so many potentially valuable people who can

27. equivocal: questionable; suspicious.
                            274
                       DIAGNOSIS

be made   highly valuable to themselves and society,
emphasis has been placed on inorganic aberrations and
organic psychosomatic illnesses. Cases which have been
subjected to prefrontal lobotomy (which saws a section
out of the analytical mind), the topectomy (which re-
moves pieces of brain somewhat as an apple corer cores
apples), the transorbital leukotomy (which, while the
patient is being electrically shocked, thrusts an ordi-
nary dime-store28 ice pick into each eye and reaches up
to rip the analyzer apart), and electric shock "therapy"
(which sears the brain with 110 volts), as well as insulin
shock29 and other treatments, are considered by Dia-
netics to be  equivocal. There  are ordinary  organic
insanities such as paresis,30 but most of these, even so,
can be benefited by Dianetics.
28. dime-store: of or purchased at a dime store or five-and-ten-
cent  store—a  store that  sells a wide  variety of  inexpensive
merchandise,  originally with many articles priced at five or ten
cents.
29. insulin shock: a state of coma resulting from reduced blood
sugar when insulin (a substance which helps the body use sugar
and other carbohydrates) is present in excessive amounts. Insulin
shock is used by psychiatrists as one form of shock therapy in
"treating" mental illness.
30. paresis: a brain disease of syphilitic origin, characterized by
mental deterioration, speech disturbances and progressive mus-
cular weakness. See also syphilis in the glossary.
                            275
                      CHAPTER FIVE
  Returning, the File Clerk1
    and the Time Track
   There is a method of "thinking" which man did not
know he had.
   If you would like an illustration of this, ask a small
child if she would like to go sleigh-riding in memory.
She will try to remember the last time she rode her
sleigh. She will frown and pucker her brows perhaps.
Now  tell her to go back  to the last time she was
sleigh-riding. Coaxed, she will suddenly come  forth
with a complete experience and, unless she is badly
aberrated, will be able  to tell you about the  snow
getting down her collar and so forth. She is right back
there sleigh-riding, swimming or whatever you choose.
   Man, when  and if he thought about this at all, must
have mistaken it for imagination. But it is not imagina-
tion. Anyone, unless he is very severely aberrated in-
deed, can be "sent back," wide-awake, to an experience
of the past. In initial tests one should use experiences not
long gone and experiences which are pleasant.
   This is not memory in the way one "remembers
something." It is returning. Remembering is a far more
complicated process than returning. Just why people go
around seeking to remember some specific or complex
datum when  they can return is something of a mystery
when  one considers lost articles, things read, conversa-
tions had and so forth. Remembering, of course, has a

1. file clerk: Dianetic auditor's slang for the mechanism of the
mind  which acts as a data monitor. Auditors can get instant or
"flash"  answers direct from  the file clerk to aid in contacting
incidents. Technically the name of the file clerk might be "bank
monitor unit" but that phrase is too unwieldy.
                           276
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

very definite role and is an automatic process which
provides "I"  with conclusions and  data in a never-
ending stream. But when  one wishes a very precise,
specific bit of information or when one seeks a past
pleasure to contemplate it, returning is more to the point.
   The hypnotist, with much mumbo jumbo2 and hand
passes, et al.,3 has something which he calls "regres-
sion." This is a very complicated business which re-
quires being hypnotized. True enough, regression has
research value since, by hypnosis, it bypasses occlu-
sions which are not otherwise easy to get around. And
regression served Dianetics well when the author was
checking his data on memory  banks. But it evidently
had occurred to none that regression is an artificial use
of a natural process.
   Undoubtedly some people use returning for some of
their mental work, and these people probably think that
"everybody else" does likewise, which is far from true.
But even  those people who  return naturally seldom
understand that this is a distinct process, much different
from remembering.
   People  also  relive without being  hypnotized  or
drugged; this is a rarer thing. If a person sits in contem-
plation of some past glory for a while he will begin to
relive instead of simply return.
   In Dianetics, we have had much to do with "spec-
trums." The spectrum of gradations is a much better
mechanism  for philosophy than Aristotle's pendulum
which swung from one extreme to the other. We have
the spectrum of the dynamics. We call them four dy-
namics, through which the command Survive! is ex-
pressed, and the four are actually a great number of
2. mumbo   jumbo:  senseless or pretentious language, usually
designed to obscure an issue, confuse a listener or the like.
3. et al.: and others.
                           277
                 L. RON HUBBARD

gradations from the cells of "I," through "I," through
family and  children, through club and city and state,
through nation and race and hemisphere and finally all
mankind. That is a spectrum: gradations of something
which are really the same thing but which have wider
and wider scope or range.
   In much the same way as the spectrum of Survive!
we have a spectrum of memory at work. First there is
memory  in its most precise, present-time sense. Then
there is memory  of the past. Then  there is more
memory  of the past. And so we move into a part of the
spectrum which  has been overlooked: part of the "I"
returns into the past, then a greater part of "I" returns
into the past (at which point we have return) and finally,
at the extreme, all of "I" is back in the past. First there
is remembering. This is the furthest from exact data
(except in a Clear). Then there is returning, in which
part of the  "I" is actually in the past  and records
appear to be perceptions he  is actually experiencing.
Then there is reliving, where a man is so thoroughly in
the past for the moment that, while he was recalling an
infant experience, if startled he would react just as he
would have when a baby.
   There  is a lot of aberrated notion in this present
society about the evils of living in the past. These stem
partially from an unwillingness of aberrated people to
face and understand yesterday.
   One of the prime sources of "bad memory"  is
Mother. Often  enough, Mother  has been sufficiently
panic-stricken at the thought of Junior's recalling just
what she did to Junior that a mankind-wide aberration
seems to have sprung up. The standard attempted abortion
case nearly always has an infanthood and childhood full
of Mama  assuring him that he cannot remember any-
thing when he was  a baby. She doesn't want him to
recall how handy she was, if unsuccessful, in her efforts
                           278
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

with various instruments. Possibly prenatal memory
itself would be just ordinary memory and in full recall
to the whole race if this guilty conscience in Mother had
not been rolling along lo! these millennia. In the nor-
mal course of work, the auditor will have his hands full
of Mama  screaming objections about her grown son's
or daughter's entering into therapy because of what they
might find out: Mama has been known, by auditors, to
go into a complete nervous collapse at the thought of
her child's recalling prenatal incidents. Not all of this,
by the way, is based on attempted abortion. Mama often
has had a couple of more men than Papa that Papa never
knew about; and Mama  would very often rather con-
demn  her child to illness or insanity or merely unhappi-
ness than let a child pursue the course of the preclear
even though Mother avowedly has no recollection what-
ever of anything bad ever happening to the child. Under
therapy herself, she usually volunteers the truth. Here is
the source of why good memory  is discouraged in a
society and infant and prenatal memory overlooked, to
say nothing of the ability to return and relive.
   The index system of the standard bank is a wonder-
ful thing to behold. Everything is there, filed by subject,
filed by time and filed by conclusions. All perceptions are
present.
   With the time-file system we have what is called in
Dianetics a time track. Going back along this track with
part of "I" is returning. It is definitely present for both
conscious and "unconscious" data. The time track is of
vast and interesting concern to the auditor.
   The mind is a well-built computer and it has various
services. Auditors, backing off from Latin and com-
plexity, call the source of one of these services the file
clerk.* This is not a very dignified name  and  it is
* Technically, the name of  the file clerk might be "bank
monitor units" but the phrase is too unwieldy. —LRH
                            279
                 L. RON HUBBARD

certainly anthropomorphic. There is no small man or
woman  in there with a green eyeshade. But the action
which  takes place is a close approximation to what
would  happen if such an  entity did dwell within the
mind.
   The file clerk is the bank monitor. "He" monitors
for both the reactive engram bank  and the standard
banks. When he is asked for a datum by the auditor or
"I," he will hand out a datum to the auditor via "I." He
is a trifle moronic when he handles the reactive engram
bank, a contagion from the reactive mind, and he will
at times hand out puns and crazy dreams when he
should be delivering serious data.
   The  file clerk, if the auditor asks the preclear for the
last time he saw a movie, will hand out the movie, the
date it was seen, the age and  physical being of the
person,  all perceptics, the plot  of the  movie,  the
weather—in  short, he hands out everything that was
present and connected with the movie.
   In ordinary living the file clerk feeds memory to "I"
at a rapid rate. A good memory  gets its data in split
seconds. If the file clerk has to shove the memory
around various reactive occlusions, it may take minutes
or days for the data to arrive.
   If we had a big computing machine of the most
modern design, it would have a "memory bank" of
punched cards or some such thing and it would have to
have a selector and feeder device to thrust out the data
the machine wants. The brain has one of these—it could
not operate without it. This is the bank monitor—the
file clerk.
   Keep in mind these two parts of the mind: the time
track and the/j'/e clerk and keep in memory this mecha-
nism  of returning. These are the three things we use,
with the reactive and standard banks, in the Dianetic
reverie.
                           280
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

   The  file clerk is a very obliging fellow. If he has
been  having trouble getting to the  "I" around  the
reactive occlusions and circuits in general, he is particu-
larly obliging. He cooperates with the auditor.
   The monitor system could be considered on the basis
of attention units, where a man could be supposed to
have a thousand. Thus  a thousand  possible attention
units would be available to a dear's "I." In the aber-
ree, probably  fifty are  available to "I,"  five or six
hundred  absorbed in the reactive engrams, and the
remainder variously used besides composing this mecha-
nism we  call the bank monitor, the file clerk.
   It seems as  if the file clerk in an aberree would
rather work with the auditor than with the aberree. That
may  appear  an astonishing fact, but it is a scientific
fact. The file clerk works best, then, when he is select-
ing data out of a  preclear's banks to present to the
auditor. This is an aspect of the law of affinity. "I's"
file clerk and the auditor are a team, and they work very
often in close harmony without enough consent from
the preclear's analyzer to notice.
   The return is most easily effected, in the aberree, by
the auditor's addressing the file clerk, not the patient.
This can actually be done with the patient wide-awake.
The  auditor asks him for information, tells him to go
back to it. "I" is suddenly in possession of the whole
file. Something inside the mind, then, works in close
harmony  with the  auditor and works better for the
auditor than it does for the person in whose mind it is.
That is the file clerk.
   The  object of the auditor is to take what the file
clerk hands forth and to keep the file clerk from getting
swamped  by reactive data. Once the data has been given
out by the file clerk, it is the business of the auditor to
see that the preclear goes over it enough times to take
the charge out of it. The mechanism of doing this is
                            281
                 L. RON HUBBARD

extremely simple. In order to help matters and keep the
preclear from being distracted, the auditor goes through
a routine with every session which disposes the patient
to let the file clerk work.
   The patient sits in a comfortable chair with arms, or
lies on a couch in a quiet room where perceptic distrac-
tions are minimal. The auditor tells him to look at the
ceiling. The auditor says: "When I count from one to
seven your eyes will close." The auditor then counts
from  one to seven and  keeps counting quietly and
pleasantly until the patient closes his eyes. A tremble of
the lashes will be noticed in optimum reverie.
   This is the entire routine. Consider it more a signal
that proceedings are to begin and a means  of con-
centrating the patient on his own  concerns and  the
auditor than anything else. This is not hypnotism. It is
vastly different. In the first place, the patient knows
everything which is going on around him. He is not
"asleep," and can bring himself out of it any time he
likes. He is free to move about, but, because it distracts
the patient, the auditor does not usually permit him to
smoke.
   The  auditor makes very sure that the patient is not
hypnotized by telling him, before he begins to count,
"You will know everything which goes on. You will be
able to remember everything that happens. You can
exercise your own control. If you do not like what is
happening, you can instantly pull out of it. Now, one,
two, three, four," etc.
   To make doubly sure, for we want no hypnotism, even
by  accident, the auditor installs a canceller. This is an
extremely important step and should not be omitted even
when  you may  be entirely certain that he is in no way
influenced by your words. The auditor may inadvertently
use restimulative language which will key in an engram:
he may, when he is especially new in Dianetics, use such
                           282
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

a thing as a holder4 or a denyer,5 telling the preclear to
"stay there," when he is returned on the track or telling
him, worst of all things, to "forget it," one of a class of
phrases of the forgetter mechanism which is most severe
in its aberrative effect, denying the data  entirely to the
analyzer. To prevent such things from  happening, the
canceller is vital. It is a contract with  the patient that
whatever the auditor says will not become literally inter-
preted by the patient or used by him  in any  way. It is
installed immediately  after the  condition of reverie is
established. A canceller is worded more or less as follows:
"In the future, when I utter the word cancelled, everything
which I have said to you while you are in a therapy session
will be cancelled and will have no force with you. Any
suggestion I have made to you will be without force when
I say the word cancelled. Do you understand?"
   The  word cancelled is then said to the patient im-
mediately before he is permitted to open his eyes at the
end  of the session. It is not further amplified. The
single word is used.
   The  canceller is vital. It prevents accidental positive
suggestion. The patient may be suggestible or even in a
permanent, light hypnotic trance (many people go through
life in such a trance). An engram is actually a hypnotic
suggestion. It could be said that the purpose of therapy
is to awaken a person in every period of his life when he
has been forced into "unconsciousness." Dianetics wakes
people up. It is not hypnotism, which puts people to

4. holder: any engram command  which makes  an individual
remain in an engram knowingly or unknowingly. These include
such things as "Stay here," "Sit right there and think about it,"
"Come  back and sit down," "I can't go," "I mustn't leave," etc.
5. denyer: a species of command    which, literally translated,
means  that the engram doesn't exist. "I'm not here," "This is
getting nowhere," "I must not talk about it," "I can't remem-
ber," etc. A command which makes  the preclear feel there is no
incident present.
                           283
                 L. RON HUBBARD

sleep. Dianetic therapy wakes them up. Hypnotism puts
them to sleep. Can you  ask for a wider difference in
polarity?6 Dianetic therapy removes engrams. Hypno-
tism installs engrams. Further, Dianetics is a science,
an organized body of knowledge—hypnotism is a tool
and an  art and is such a wild variable that man has
suspected it as a dangerous  thing for centuries and
centuries, use it though he did.*
   The  auditor will inevitably get cases into his hands
which will drop into a hypnotic sleep for all he can do
to prevent it. Such cases have engrams which make
them do this, just as others have engrams which make
them  stay awake. The auditor then mentions neither
"sleep" nor "wake." He takes his cases wherever they
drop into their own inversion7 level and works them
from there. Patients will plead to be drugged or put into
a trance. Let them plead! The reverie has a Clear at its
end—drugs  and  hypnotism have dependency  on the
auditor and many   other undesirable aspects. A case
takes longer in amnesia trance than in reverie. The
gains in reverie are certain. The patient gets more and
more well. When amnesia trance or hypnotism are used
instead of reverie, no matter how easily the data seems
to come up, the usual run of cases so treated experience
little relief until the case is nearly completed, when the
patient so long uncomfortable gets suddenly well. Hyp-
notism carries with it transference,8 enormous operator
* An  additional difference is that a patient can be returned
with no counting whatever. —LRH
6. polarity: (figurative) the possession of two opposite or con-
trasted principles or tendencies.
7. inversion: acute awareness of self.
8. transference: (psychoanalysis) the process in and by which a
person's feelings, thoughts and wishes shift from one person to
another, especially this process in psychoanalysis with the ana-
lyst made the object of the shift.
                           284
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

responsibility and other impedimenta9 with which Dia-
netics, in long practice, has done without. Hypnotism
was used for research, then abandoned.
   Hence,  install the canceller every time. Never ne-
glect to install it in every session. The patient may be
trancing, which is something we don't want, but some-
thing which we cannot always avoid, and which we
cannot always  detect. Just install the canceller at the
beginning  of the session, then  after you bring  the
patient to present time, use the canceller word.
   This is a rehearsal, then, of the entire routine:
Auditor: Look at the ceiling. When I count from one to
   seven your eyes will close. You will remain aware of
   everything which goes on. You will be able to remem-
   ber everything that happens here. You can pull yourself
   out of anything which you get into if you don't like it.
   All right (slowly, soothingly): One, two, three, four,
   five, six, seven.* One,  two,  three, four, five, six,
   seven. One, two, three (patient's eyes close and eyelids
   flicker), four, five, six, seven. (Auditor pauses; installs
   canceller.) All  right, let us go  back  to your  fifth
   birthday . . . (work continues until the auditor has
   worked the patient enough for the period) . . . Come to
   present time. Are you in present time? (Yes.) (Use
   canceller word.) When I count from five to one and
   snap  my fingers you will feel alert. Five, four, three,
   two, one. (Snap!)
   As it can be seen in this example, when work for the
day is concluded, the preclear, who may have  been
returned into his past for two hours, must be brought
back to present time and startled with a finger snap to
* If the patient objects to numbers, use letters of the alphabet.
He  may have  been counted down  in some past surgical
operation so that numbers make him nervous. —LRH

9. impedimenta: things which impede or encumber progress;
baggage.
                           285
                 L. RON HUBBARD

restore his awareness of his age and condition. Some-
times he is unable easily to come back to present, for
which there is quick remedy which we will cover later,
so the auditor must  always  assure himself that the
patient feels he actually is in present time.
   This is the reverie. This is all one needs to know
about its actual mechanics. Experience will show him a
great deal. But these are the basic processes:
     1. Assure patient he will know   everything that
       happens.
    2.  Count until he closes his eyes.
     3. Install canceller.
    4.  Return him to a period in the past.
     5. Work  with file clerk to get data.
    6. Reduce all engrams contacted so that no charge
       remains.
    7. Bring patient to present time.
    8. Be sure he is in present time.
    9. Give him canceller word.
   10. Restore full awareness of his surroundings.
   The  patient's time track, in the lowest level of
attention units, is always in excellent condition. It can
be depended upon to reach any date and hour of his life
and all the data in it. In the higher levels of awareness,
this time track may appear to be in very foul condition.
The reactive mind engram circuits stand between these
lower levels—right up against the banks—and the higher
levels which contain "I." The lower levels contain only
a shadow of the force of "I" and appear to be another
"I"  in a case of multivalent personality.
   You  can draw this on a piece of scratch paper and it
would  be helpful if you would  do so. Draw  a  tall
rectangle (the standard banks) to the left of the page.
Draw  half a dozen circles up against the right side of
this rectangle for a representation of the file clerk—the
bank monitor units. Now draw, about the center of the
                           286
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

sheet, a large rectangle. Black it in. This is the area of
the reactive engram circuits. It is not the reactive bank.
It is the circuit pattern from the reactive engram bank,
which borrows from  the analyzer to make demons,
vocal thinking, etc. Now, to the right of the page, draw
a white rectangle. This is the portion of the analyzer
which is "consciousness" and "I."
   The  whole  task of therapy  is to get that black
rectangle, the reactive engram bank circuits, deleted so
that from the standard bank to the left of the sheet to
the analyzer portion  to the right of the sheet is all
analyzer. It can't be done with a knife as some people
have supposed, evaluating the situation from their own
engrams, for that black area you have drawn  is all
analyzer rendered useless by engrams, and when thera-
py is done,  it will all be available for thinking. This
increases IQ to an enormous extent.
   Now  suppose  that the bottom of your picture is
conception and  the top is present time. The vertical
route up and down, then, is the time track. In this graph
it can be supposed that present time just keeps adding
up higher and higher, further and further from concep-
tion in the form of new construction (an analogy). For
"I" to get data from the standard banks to the left, "I"
would  have to work through this black rectangle, the
reactive mind circuits. To a large extent "I" manages to
get data from around this black area. But to a much
larger extent it doesn't.
   Now  suppose that we draw a vertical line at the right
of the picture. This line is "awareness." Consider that it
can be moved,  still vertical, to the left. As the line passes
toward the left, we get deeper and deeper "trance." As
the line moves into the reactive mind area, it becomes
hypnotic trance. Now, as it moves even further left and
into the circles we are calling "file clerk," it becomes the
amnesia trance of hypnotism. Thus, anywhere we place
                           287
                 L. RON HUBBARD

this line we establish a "depth of trance." We want  to
work  over to the right of the reactive bank, nearest the
awake level, so that we can keep "I" in contact with his
surroundings and keep  unwanted data  from coming
through which will make the patient chronically uncom-
fortable. If the patient instantly slides from the right all
the way to the left so that the attention units, the circles, of
the file clerk itself are present, and does so the instant you
count from one to seven, he is a hypnotic subject. He may
not be aware, when he wakens, of what has taken place,
for "I" was out of contact. Work him there, for he will
have full sonic, etc., but be very, very careful to work
very early in his prenatal area. He might not be able to
recall what has taken place, and a late engram (which, if
tapped, will not reduce) may have its full force opened up
on  "I" when  the patient regains possession of himself.
Further, you might  give him  a positive suggestion by
accident. Work by preference with trance depth well to the
right of the reactive bank.
   The  characteristics of the units we label "file clerk"
are similar in desires to those of the basic individual
when  he  is cleared. Thus, in any patient, the basic
personality can be reached, for here is a sample of it.
But the auditor should be content to know it is there; as
the clearing goes forward, he will see more and more of
it. The individual is himself, his personality does not
alter, it simply becomes what he wanted it to be all the
time at his optimum moments.
   The  units up against the standard banks can  be
considered  the file clerk. But the file clerk has more
than just the standard bank which he can tap. He also
has the entire engram bank from which  he can pull
forth data.
   The  time track may  have  several aspects to the
preclear. There is actually no track there except time
and  time is invisible, but the awareness, the "I," can
                            288
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

return along it. The track is always there, stretched out.
But aberrated ideas of it continually occur and recur in
the same patient. It may get all bunched up. It may be
very long. It may  be that he cannot get on it at all
(here's the schizophrenic—he is off his time track). But
it is there. It is the filing system by time and "I" can be
returned back along time by the simple request that he
do so. If he does not, he is stuck in the present or an
engram, which is easy to resolve. And so forth.
   Now  let us consider the engram bank. It was drawn
as a black rectangle in the above sketch. Let us alter
that a trifle and draw all this again, with the rectangles
represented as triangles with all their points downwards
and together but all else as before—the standard banks,
the analyzer (consciousness) and "I." This is a working
model now, an analogy, of what the auditor is trying to
contact. It is as if the engram bank itself existed in that
black triangle. Actually it doesn't, only its circuits, but
all we need to visualize is that it does. Therefore, there
is a thin point at the bottom. "I" and the file clerk can
get together here. This is the bottom of the time track.
This is immediately  after conception. A  little higher
up, let's say two and one-half months after conception,
it is a little harder for "I" and the file clerk to achieve
contact. There is more reactive circuit between them.
At seven months  after conception, it is more difficult.
And  at twenty years of age, it has approached impos-
sibility in most cases without Dianetic technique.
   Hence, the auditor will find it expedient to work in
the prenatal area and as early in that as possible. If he
can clear the time from conception to birth, including
birth, his task is nine-tenths complete. To  clear the
entire reactive bank is his goal.
   The reactive bank is like a pyramid which is fairly
well armored everywhere but just under the point, and
which becomes unarmored when the point is contacted.
                           289
                 L. RON HUBBARD

This is taking the reactive bank in an exposed sector.
The  effort is to get into the basic area, contact early
engrams, erase the basic-basic engram by recountings
and then progress upwards, erasing engrams. These
engrams  apparently vanish. Actually, it takes a hard
search to discover them once they are really gone. They
exist as memory in the standard bank, but that memory
is so unimportant, having been integrated now as experi-
ence, that it cannot aberrate. Nothing in the standard
bank  can aberrate. Only the contents of the reactive
bank can aberrate—moments of "unconsciousness" and
what was recorded within them—and  locks. The audi-
tor, in his work, considers an engram erased when it
vanishes, when the preclear can no longer contact any
part of it, but only after the preclear has thoroughly
reexperienced it, complete with somatics.*
   This inverted pyramid, in its upper reaches, is ef-
fect. In the lower reaches, it is the primary cause of
aberration. The cement that holds this inverted pyramid
together is physical pain and painful emotion. All the
physical pain ever recorded by the organism and all the
painful emotion are parts of this inverted pyramid.
   The  auditor first discharges the painful emotion
from  later life as it was displayed in "conscious mo-
ments." He runs these periods as true engrams until the
preclear is no longer affected by them. Then he tries to
contact basic-basic, that first engram. He reduces all
engrams  he contacts en route to that primary goal. In
* You can  contact the file clerk by drugs or hypnotism and
gather and  reduce engrams.  But this is an oversimplified
solution. What we are doing in Dianetic therapy is more than
this—we  are trying to get "I" in contact with the file clerk,
not just work the file clerk alone. Hypnoanalysis and narco-
synthesis failed because they knew nothing of  the engram
bank and because they tried, without knowing what it was, to
work only the file clerk. The desire of the patient to be worked
in amnesia trance or any drugged state is an effort to spare
 "I" and throw the burden on the file clerk. —LRH
                            290
    RETURNING, THE FILE CLERK AND THE TIME TRACK

every  session he tries to reach basic-basic until he is
certain he has it.
   Basic-basic is the bottom point. Once it has been
gained, an erasure is begun during which engram after
engram  is "reexperienced" with all somatics until it is
gone. Before basic-basic had been reached, the auditor
may have had to run engrams twenty times before they
reduced. Later he may have found they reduced in five
runs. Then he contacts and erases basic-basic. If the pa-
tient has sonic by this time—or if he has had  it all
along—the  engrams start erasing with one or two re-
countings.
   The file clerk is smart. The auditor who does not
credit the ability of these attention units will involve the
case beyond  necessity and  will lengthen it. The file
clerk may hand things out by phrases, by somatics, by
time. Whatever he hands out ordinarily will reduce on
recountings. By working with, not trying to command
the file clerk, the auditor  will find the case  steadily
improving until it is released or fully cleared. The only
time the auditor disregards this is when he uses the
repeater system, which will be described.
   We  have "I" in a reverie; we return him to a period
in his life along  his time track;  the file clerk gives
incidents forth which the preclear reexperiences; the
auditor makes the preclear recount the engram until it is
relieved or has "vanished"* (all engrams will even-
tually "vanish"  after basic-basic is erased); anything
new  the file clerk offers, even during the recounting, is
addressed by the auditor to make the preclear reexperi-
ence it. That is the total sum of activity in Dianetics.
There are, as accessories, the repeater technique and a

* The words vanished or erased, when applied to an engram
which has been  treated, mean that the engram has disap-
peared from the engram bank. It cannot be found afterwards
except by search of the standard memory. — LRH
                           291
                 L. RON HUBBARD
few shortcuts. This is therapy. Amplification is needed,
of course, and will be found in the ensuing pages to
give the auditor all the data he needs. But this is the
entire outline of Dianetic therapy.
                           292
                      CHAPTER  Six
   The Laws of Returning
   The engram  has the aspect of—and is not—a live
entity which protects itself in various ways. Any and all
phrases in it can be considered commands. These com-
mands  react on the analytical mind in such a way as to
cause the analytical mind to behave erratically.
   Dianetic therapy is parallel to the methods of thought
and thinking itself. Anything which reacts against Dia-
netics and the auditor can uniformly and without excep-
tion be found to react in just that way on the patient's
analytical mind. Conversely, the patient's problems of
thinking in his usual activities are the auditor's prob-
lems in therapy.
   The bulk of these "commands" the engrams contain
are not computable in any way, since they are contradic-
tory or demand unreasonable acts. It is the impossibility
of computing them and reconciling them to thought and
existence which makes the patient aberrated.
   Let us take an engram which comes from one of
Mother's bowel movements.  She is straining, which
causes compression, which brings about "unconscious-
ness" in the unborn child. Then, if she habitually talks
to herself (a monologuist), as an enormous number of
aberrated women do, she may say, "Oh, this is hell. I
am all jammed  up inside. I feel so stuffy I can't think.
This is too terrible to be borne."
   This may be in the basic area. The dream mecha-
nism of the mind (which thinks in puns mostly, symbol-
ogists to the contrary) may bring forth a dream about
hellfire as the engram is approached. The preclear may
                           293
                 L. RON HUBBARD

be sure that he is going to descend into fire if he goes
on his time track toward this engram. Further, he may
think his time track is all jammed up. This will mean,
perhaps, that the incidents are all in one place on it. So
much  for "This is hell," and "all jammed up inside."
Now  let us take a look at what happens with "I'm so
stuffy I can't think." The preclear sniffles because he
thinks this means a cold in his nose. And as for "This is
too terrible to be borne," he is filled with an emotion of
terror at the thought of touching the engram, for this
command   says it is too painful to bear. Additionally,
engrams  being literal in their action, he may think that
he was too terrible to be born.
   The emotional reaction to hell, from some other place
on the track—as contained in some other engram—may
say that "going to hell" is loud sobbing. Hence, he does
not "want"  to recount this engram. Further, he is
terrified of it because it is "too terrible to be borne."
That Mother was only discussing with her ambivalent
self the necessity of laxatives is! never entered into the
computation. For the reactive mind does not reason, it
thinks in identities, seeking to command the analytical
mind.
   There is only as much data as is in the engram and
the analytical reaction to this unthinking thing is utterly
literal.
   Let us look at another. This is a coitus experience. It
has, as its somatic, varying pressure. It is not painful —
and by the way, no matter how painful these engrams
may  be in present time when restimulated, no matter
how  forceful, when they are actually contacted, their
reexperienced pain is very mild, no matter what it was
when  received. So this is a shaking up of the unborn
child, that is all. But it says, "Oh, darling, I'm afraid
you'll come in me. I'll just die if you come in me. Oh,
please, don't come in me!"
                           294
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

   What does the analytical mind do with this? Does it
think about coitus? Does it worry about pregnancy? No,
emphatically not. The engram that would make one
think about coitus would say, "Think about coitus!"
and the engram that contained a worry about pregnancy
would say, "I am worried about pregnancy." The pain
is not severe in this coitus experience but it specifically
states that the engram is not to be entered: "Do not
come in me!" He  would die if he did, wouldn't he? It
says so right there. And the patient finds himself wan-
dering around  the track until the auditor uses repeater
technique (as will be covered).
   How about another type of engram? Let us suppose
that our poor patient has been unlucky enough to get a
Junior tagged on him. Let us suppose his name is Ralph
and his father's name is Ralph. (Be careful of these
Junior cases, they are unusually complex sometimes.)
Mother (see the Kinsey1 report, if you've any doubts) is
having a quiet affair on the side with Jim. This coitus
somatic is no more painful than being gently sat upon,
but the patient has a terrible time with it. Mother: "Oh,
honey, you are so wonderful. I wish Ralph were more
like you but he isn't. He just doesn't seem to be able to
excite a girl at all." Lover: "Oh, Ralph isn't so bad. I
like him." Mother: "You don't know his pride. If Ralph
found out about this, it would kill him. He would just
die, I know." Lover:  "Don't worry, Ralph'11 never
hear."
   This little gem of an engram is more common than
1. Kinsey: Alfred Charles Kinsey (1894-1956), American scien-
tist who investigated the sexual behavior of men and women. In
1947  and 1948, he  published books on  his findings—Sexual
Behavior in the Human Male and Sexual Behavior in the Human
Female—popularly  known  as the Kinsey Reports, which shattered
existing conceptions of the nature and extent of American sexual
practices.
                           295
                 L. RON HUBBARD

one would suppose before he begins to get an embryo-
eye view of Mother. This won't compute in the analyzer
as data. Therefore it is a worry. (A worry is contradic-
tory engram commands which cannot be computed.)
Ralph, Junior, finds that he is very shy sexually. That is
the aberrative pattern. Approaching it in therapy, we
find we have a sympathy computation with the lover.
After all, he said Ralph wasn't so bad, that he liked
Ralph.  Well, the only  Ralph  is, of course, to the
reactive mind, Junior. This  keeps our  patient from
approaching this engram because he thinks he will lose
a friend if he touches it. Further, on the aberrative side,
Junior has always worried about people's pride. As we
contact this in therapy, he shies violently from it. After
all, if he found out about it it would "kill him dead
right where he lies." And there is another thing here, a
sonic shut-off. It says right there that Ralph will never
hear. This  is survival stuff. That is what  the cells
believe. Therefore Ralph never hears  in recall. There
will be more sonic shut-offs. Mother is promiscuous2
and that generally means blockage on the second dy-
namic. Blockage on the second dynamic often means
she  dislikes children. In  short, this would   be  an
attempted-abortion case which stabbed Junior full of
enough holes to supply a cheese factory for some time.
Junior, now a man, may have extended hearing because
he  is frightened in general of  "life." But his sonic
recall is zero. This engram, then, would have to be
sorted out through the demon circuits as "impressions"
which come to the mind. The auditor, taking what the
patient says about this, may very soon guess its content
and explode it by repeater technique.
   Now  take the case of the mother who, a soul of
propriety (if a little on the whiny side), discovers she is

2. promiscuous: having sexual relations with many people.
                           296
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

pregnant and goes to the doctor. Mother: "I think I'm
pregnant. I'm afraid I am." Doctor punches her around
for a while, knocking the unborn child, who  is our
preclear thirty years later, into an "unconscious" state.
Doctor: "I don't think so." Mother: "I'm really afraid I
am. I'm sure I'm caught. I just know it." Doctor (more
punching): "Well,  it's hard to tell this early."
   It says right there that this man patient of ours is
pregnant. If we look, we'll see he has a paunch. That's
good  survival, that is. And in therapy we find he is
afraid he exists: "I am afraid I am." And suddenly he
isn't moving on the time track. Why? He's caught. That
doesn't mean he's pregnant, that means he is caught.
Further, he won't be able to recount it. Why? Because
it is "hard to tell this early." Consequently, he doesn't
speak about it. We free him on the track with repeater
technique.
   Oh, this language of ours which says everything it
doesn't mean! Put into the hands of the moronic reac-
tive mind, what havoc it wreaks!3 Literal interpretation
of everything!  Part of the  aberrative pattern of the
person who had the above engram was great cautious-
ness about advancing any opinion. After all, it was hard
to tell, this early.
   Now let us take an engram from a girl patient whose
father was badly aberrated. He strikes Mother because
he is afraid Mother is pregnant and Father is blocked on
dynamics one, two, three and four. Father: "Get out!
Get out! I know you haven't been true to me! You were
no virgin when I married you. I should have killed you
long ago! Now you're pregnant. Get out!"
   The  girl, some five weeks  after conception, is
knocked "unconscious" by the blow to Mother's abdo-
men.  She has a severe engram  here because it has

3. wreaks: inflicts; causes.
                           297
                 L. RON HUBBARD

painful emotional value which she will never be able to
dramatize  satisfactorily. The aberrative pattern here
demonstrates itself in hysterics whenever a man might
accuse her of not being true. She was a virgin when she
was married  twenty-one years after this engram was
received, but she was sure she was not. She has had a
"childhood  delusion" that her father was likely to kill
her. And she is always afraid of being pregnant because
it says now she is pregnant, which means always, since
time is a march of "nows." In therapy, we try to get
near this engram. We  return the patient to basic area
and suddenly find her talking about something which
happened when she was five years of age. We return her
again and now she is talking about something which
happened when  she was ten years of age. The auditor,
observing any such reaction as this, knows he is han-
dling a bouncer.4 It says, "Get out!" and the patient
gets out. The auditor recognizes what is wrong, uses
repeater technique and reduces or erases the engram.
   Always  and invariably, the analytical mind reacts to
these engrams as though commanded. It performs on
the track as these engrams state. And it computes about
the case or about life as these engrams dictate. Healthy
things to have around, engrams! Real, good survival!
Survival good enough to lay any man in his grave.
   The  auditor is not much worried  by the phrases
which assist therapy. An engram received from Father
beating Mother which  says: "Take that! Take it, I tell
you. You've got to take it!" means that our patient has
possibly had  tendencies as a  kleptomaniac.5 (Such
things are the whole source of the impulses of a thief,

4. bouncer: an engramic command (such as "Can't stay here" or
"Get out!") which sends the preclear up the track toward present
time.
5. kleptomaniac:  a person  suffering from an  uncontrollable
tendency to steal things, with no desire to use or profit by them.
                           298
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

the test being that when  an  auditor erases all such
engrams  in a patient, the patient no longer steals.) The
auditor will find it eagerly recounted because its content
offers it to the analytical mind.
   The whole species of engrams which say, "Come
back here! Now  stay here!" as fathers are so fond of
saying, accounts for a snap back to an engram when
therapy is entered. The patient goes straight back to it
the moment it is exposed. When recounted the com-
mand  is no longer effective. But while that engram
existed, unentered, it was  fully capable of  sending
people to an institution to lie in a fetal position. Anyone
left in institutions who has not been given shocks or
prefrontal lobotomy and who suffers from this type of
insanity can be released from such an  engram  and
restored to present time simply  by  use of repeater
technique. It sometimes takes only half an hour.
   Traveling on the track, then, and wandering through
the computations the analyzer is compelled by these
engrams to attempt is something like playing a child's
game which has a number of squares, along which one
is supposed to move a "man." A game could actually
be composed on the basis of this time track and engram
commands.  It would be similar to Parcheesi.6 Move so
many  squares, land on one which says, "Get out!"
which means  one would go  back to present time or
toward it. Move so many squares and then lose a move
because this square on which we now land says, "Stay
here!" and the "man"  would stay until the auditor let
him  out by technique (but because  this is struck by
therapy, it would have no power to hold long). Then
move  so many squares to one which  said, "Go to
sleep," at which the "man" would have to go to sleep.
6. Parcheesi: a trademark for a board game in which the moves
of pieces on a board are determined by the throwing of dice.
                           299
                 L. RON HUBBARD

Move  so many  squares until one was hit which said,
"Nobody  must find out," and so there would be no
square. Move so many  until one was reached which
said, "I'm afraid," at which the "man"   would be
afraid. Move again to a square which said, "I must go
away," so the "man" would go away. Move once more
to a square which says, "I'm not here," and the square
would be missing. And so forth and so forth.
   The classes of commands which particularly trouble
the auditor are only a few. Because the mind actually
does some part of its thinking, especially when remem-
bering, by  return, even when  the individual is not
returning, all these commands also impede the thought
processes of the mind. In therapy they are particularly
irksome and are the constant target of attention of the
auditor.
   First is the patient-ejector species of command.
These  are colloquially called bouncers. They include
such things as "Get out!" "Don't ever come back,"
"I've got to stay away," etc., etc., including any combi-
nation of words which literally mean ejection.
   Second is the patient-holder species of command.
These  include such things as "Stay here," "Sit right
there and think about it," "Come back and sit down,"
"I can't go," "I mustn't leave," etc.
   Third is the engram-denyer species of command
which,  literally translated, means that the engram
doesn't exist: "I'm  not here," "This  is getting no-
where," "I must not talk about it," "I can't remem-
ber," etc.
   Fourth is the engram-grouper species of command
which, literally translated, means that all incidents are
in one place on the time track: "I'm jammed  up,"
"Everything happens at once," "Everything comes in
on me  at once," "I'll get even with you," etc.
                          300
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

   Fifth is the patient-misdirector which sends the pre-
clear in the wrong direction, makes him go earlier when
he should be going later, go later when he should go
earlier, etc. "You can't go back at this point," "You're
turned around," etc.
   The bouncer sends the preclear soaring back toward
present time. The holder keeps him right where he is.
The denyer  makes  him feel that there is no incident
present. The fourth, the grouper, foreshortens his time
track so that there is no time track. The misdirector
reverses the necessary direction of travel.
   Contacting any engram causes the preclear to react
"analytically." Just as in the case of an engram being
restimulated, the commands are impinged upon  his
analyzer, and although the analyzer may firmly believe
it has just computed the reaction all of its own accord, it
is actually speaking straight out of the content of an
engram or engrams.
   This is the method of repeater technique.
   As he goes back along the track contacting engrams,
the preclear runs  into areas  of "unconsciousness"
which are occluded by "unconsciousness" or emotion.
In most early engrams the preclear can be expected to
yawn and  yawn. It is not the command "to sleep"
which is responsible for this: the "unconsciousness" is
releasing (boiling off, the auditors call it). A preclear
may, for a space of two hours, fumble around, drop off
into "unconsciousness," appear doped, start to go to
sleep, without any such command being present.
   Part of the engram bundle of data is the analyzer
shut-off. When he is returned and an engram is con-
tacted, the preclear then experiences an analyzer attenu-
ation, which means he is much less able to think in the
area. Boiling off "unconsciousness" is a process very
necessary to therapy, for this "unconsciousness" could
be restimulated in the everyday life of the individual
                           301
                 L. RON HUBBARD

and, when  restimulated, make his wits shut off just a
little or a very great deal, slowing down his thought
processes.
   The aspect of "unconsciousness," then, reduces the
preclear's awareness whenever it is contacted. He has
dreams, he mumbles  foolish things, he flounders. His
analyzer is penetrating the veil which kept him from the
engram.  But it is also highly susceptible, when in this
state, to an engram command.
   When  urged by the auditor to go through the engram
and recount it (although the auditor knows it may take
minutes for this "unconsciousness" to boil off enough
to let the patient through), the preclear may complain
that "I  can't go  back  at this point." The  auditor
promptly takes note of this. It is an engram command
coming through. He does not apprise the patient of this
knowledge; the patient usually doesn't know what he's
saying. If the patient then continues to have trouble, the
auditor tells him, "Say, 'I can't go back at this point.' "
The patient then repeats this, the auditor making him go
over it and over it. Suddenly the somatic turns on and
the engram is contacted.
   In interviewing a patient, the auditor notes carefully,
without appearing to do so, what  phrases the patient
chooses and  repeats about his ills or about Dianetics.
After he has placed the patient in reverie, if he discovers
the patient, for instance, insists he "can't go anyplace,"
the auditor makes him repeat the phrase.
   Repetition of such a phrase, over and over, sucks the
patient back down the track and into contact with an
engram  which  contains it. It may happen  that this
engram  will not release—having too many before it—
but it will not release only in case it has that same
phrase in an earlier engram. So the repeater technique
is continued with the auditor making  the patient go
earlier and earlier for it. If all goes on schedule the
                            302
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

patient will very often let out a chuckle or a laugh of
relief. The phrase has been sprung. The engram has not
been  erased, but that much  of it will not thereafter
influence therapy.
   Anything the patient does about engrams and any
words  he uses  to describe the action are contained,
usually, in those engrams. Repeater technique takes the
charge off the phrases so that the engrams can  be
approached.
   This technique, of  course, can very occasionally
land the patient in trouble, but the kind of trouble into
which one can get in Dianetics is not very severe. The
engram, restimulated in everyday life, can be and is
violent. Murders, rapes and arsons, attempted abor-
tions, backwardness in school—any aberrated aspect of
life—stem from these engrams. But the act of approach-
ing them in Dianetic therapy goes on another channel, a
channel closer to the source of the engram. Ordinarily,
acting on an unsuspecting individual, the engram has
enormous motor and speech power, ties up great num-
bers of circuits in the mind which should be used for
rationality, and generally effects havoc: its contacts are
"soldered in" and cannot be thrown out by the ana-
lyzer. In therapy, the patient is headed  toward the
engram: that act alone begins to disconnect some of its
"permanent  leads."7 A patient can be gotten into an
engram which, unless approached on the therapy route,
might have  made  him curl up  like a fetus and get
shipped off to the nearest institution. On the therapy
route, which is a return down the time track, the most
powerful holder has its force limited: a patient can get
into a holder which in normal life might be a psychosis:
his only manifestation, perhaps, is that when he is told
7. leads: electrical conductors (usually wires) conveying current
from a source to a place of use.
                           303
                 L. RON HUBBARD

to "Come up to present time," he simply opens his eyes
without actually traversing the interval up the track to
present time. He does not suspect he is in a holder until
the auditor, watchful for such a manifestation, feeds
him repeater technique.
Auditor: Are you in present time?
Preclear: Sure.
Auditor: How do you feel?
Freciear: Oh, I've got a slight headache.
Auditor: Close your eyes. Now say, "Stay here."
Preclear: All right. "Stay here. Stay here. Stay here."
   (Several times)
Auditor: Are you moving?
Preclear: No.
Auditor: Say, "I'm caught. I'm caught."
Preclear: "I'm caught." (Several times)
Auditor: Are you moving on the track?
Preclear: Nope.
Auditor: Say, "I'm trapped."
Preclear: "I'm trapped. I ———" Ouch, my head!
Auditor: Keep going over it.
Preclear: "I'm  trapped. I'm trapped. I'm trapped."
   Ouch! That's worse! (His somatic is getting stronger
   as he approaches the engram holding him  on the
   other side of the "unconsciousness" veil.)
Auditor: Keep going over it.
Preclear: "I'm trapped—oh,  God,  I'm trapped. I'll
   never get out of this place. I'll never get out. I'm
   trapped!"
Auditor: Contact it closely. Make sure there is nothing
   more  in it. (A  trick to keep the preclear  from
   replaying what he himself has just said and keep
   running the engram.)
Preclear: My head hurts! Let me come up to present
   time!
Auditor: Go through it again. (If the preclear comes up
                           304
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

   with this much charge, he'll be unhappy and the
   incident may be hard to enter next time.)
Preclear: "Oh,  God,  I'm trapped. I'm afraid I'm
   trapped." (New word showed up.) "I'll never get out
   of this place as long as I live. I'm trapped. I'll never
   get out. I'm trapped." (aside) She's crying. "Oh,
   why did I ever have to marry such a man!"
Auditor: How's your head?
Preclear:  Hurts less. Say, that's a dirty trick. She's
   pounding herself on the stomach.  That's mean!
   Why, confound her!
Auditor: Reexperience it again. Let's make sure there
   isn't more in it. (Same mechanism  to keep the
   preclear from replaying what he said before rather
   than what he now  gets from the engram. If he
   replays rather than reexperiences, the engram won't
    lift.)
Preclear: (Does so, getting some new words and sev-
   eral sounds including the thud of the blows on her
   abdomen  and an auto horn [bulb type] in the street
   outside.) Don't tell me I have to run this thing again.
Auditor: Recount it, please.
Preclear: Well, so this dame tries to bust my head in
   and get rid of me. And so I jumped out and beat hell
   out of her.
Auditor: Please reexperience the engram.
Preclear: (Starts to do so, suddenly finds out that, like
   a piece of string with a loop in it, this engram has
   straightened out and contains more data where the
   loops were.) "I've got to think of something to tell
   Harry. He'll jump all over me." (This was the source
   of his joking—"jumped out," etc.)
Auditor: Please go over it again. There may be more
    in it.
Preclear: (Does so, old parts of it reduce, two new
   sounds appear,  her footsteps and running water.
                           305
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   Then he is happy and laughs at it. This engram is
   released because it may not have entirely vanished.
   Such an engram  is in this shape only when it is
   contacted prior to basic-basic.)
   This is both repeater technique and  an engram
talked into recession. This engram may appear again
with a very faint additional charge after basic-basic is
contacted, but it has lost all power to aberrate or give
out a psychosomatic headache or other illness. Yet this
engram, not contacted by therapy, was quite enough to
make  this patient, when a boy, scream with terror every
time he found he could not get out of some closed space
(claustrophobia).
   The repeater technique is the one particular phase of
Dianetics which  requires cleverness from the auditor.
Given  persistency and patience, any auditor can suc-
ceed in the other phases of the science with minimal
intelligence. In the repeater technique he must learn
how to think—for therapy purposes—like an engram.
And  he will have to observe how the subject is conduct-
ing himself along the time track. And he will have to
observe the type of reaction the subject has and draw
from this the conclusion as to what sort of command is
troubling the subject when the subject himself either
does not cooperate or does not know.
   This is not to say that the repeater technique is hard:
it is not. But the ability of the auditor to use it is the
principal reason why  a case takes longer  with one
auditor than another. It is a definite ability. It is playing
the game mentioned  earlier with cleverness. Where is
the preclear stuck and with what command? Why has
the preclear suddenly stopped cooperating? Where is
the emotional charge which  is holding up the case?
With the repeater technique the auditor can resolve all
these problems and a clever auditor resolves them much
faster than an unclever one.
                           306
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

   How  does one think like an engram? Ronald Ross,
discovering that insects carried germs, considered  it
necessary to think like a mosquito. Here is a similar
menace, the engram.  One has to learn to think, for
therapy purposes, like an engram.
   The auditor could not and does not have to be able to
look into a patient's eyes and guess why  the patient
won't eat anything but cauliflower on Wednesdays. That
is an aberration and the auditor does not have to guess
at either aberrations or psychosomatic illness sources:
they all come out in time and he will learn much about
them as he goes. But the auditor must be able to keep
his patient straightened out on the track, moving earlier
into the basic area, moving upwards from there for a
reduction. The current answer  to this is the repeater
technique. Understand that a whole new art of practice,
or many  arts of practice, could be evolved  for Dia-
netics: one would be unhappy with his fellow man if
such evolution and betterment did not take place. Just
now, the best that has come forward—and the criterion
of best is that it works uniformly in all cases—is the
repeater technique. The auditor must be able to use it if
he expects anything like results from a case at this time.
When  the auditor—or some auditor—has run a few
cases and knows the nature of this beast, the engram, he
may—and  better had—come  forward with improved
techniques of his own. The real drawback which re-
peater technique has is that it requires the auditor to be
clever.
   Being clever does not mean  talking a lot. In Dia-
netics, when one is auditing, that is being very unclever.
Indeed, auditors, when they begin to work  cases, al-
most invariably so love the sound of their own voices
and the feel of their skill that the poor preclear hardly
gets a chance to get a word in reactivewise—and it is
the preclear who is to be cleared, who has the only
                           307
                 L. RON HUBBARD

accurate information, who can make  the only evalu-
ations.
   Being clever in the sense of the repeater technique is
being able to pick out, from the subject's conversation
or action, just what the engrams contain which will
prevent his reaching them, progressing through them
and so forth. The repeater technique is addressed only
to action, not to aberration.
   Here  is a case, for instance, which was so "sealed
in" that thirty hours of almost continual repeater tech-
nique were  necessary to break the walls between the
analytical mind and the engrams. It is important to
know  that an engram would not be an engram if the
preclear could contact it easily. Any engram which can
be easily contacted and has no  emotional charge is
about as aberrative as a glass of soda water.
   A  young girl, with sonic recall, but with extended
hearing and such a complete imbalance of the endo-
crine system that she had become an old woman at
twenty-two, was worked  for seventy-five hours before
she contacted anything in the basic area. This is almost
incredible but it happened.  In a  patient with sonic
shut-off and off his time track, seventy-five hours of
work would just about get the wheels greased. But this
girl, having sonic recall, should have been well on the
road to being Clear and  she had yet to touch basic-
basic.
   By  repeater technique and repeater alone the case
was  finally resolved. It contained practically no holders
or bouncers. It simply appeared that the whole prenatal
area was a blank.
   Now,  it happens that an engram,  being not a
memory  with reason in it, is just a set of waves or some
other type of recording which impinges  itself on the
analytical mind and the somatic mind and  runs the
voice and muscles  and other parts of the body. The
                           308
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

analytical mind, to justify what it finds going forward,
and cut down by the engram in dramatization, may be
interjecting data to make this action seem reasonable
—to  justify it. But this does not make an engram
sentient. When an engram is first approached in therapy
it appears to be absent entirely. It may be that three
sessions will be required to "develop" this engram. As
many  are worked,  this does not mean  three blank
sessions, but it means that the "I," in returning, must
pass over an engram a few times for the engram to
"develop." This is important to know. Just as you ask
the mind for a datum one week and don't find it (in an
aberree) and ask it again the next week and find it, so
with engrams. A  cardinal principle in therapy is that if
you  keep asking  for it, you  will eventually get the
engram. Returning over and over the prenatal area will,
of itself alone, eventually develop the engrams in it so
that the analytical mind can attack them and reduce
them. This is slow freight. The repeater technique—
although the engram is still in need of development by
several sessions—speeds the process immensely.
   In the case of this young girl it probably would have
taken another fifty or sixty hours of work to contact the
engrams  unless a technique like repeater had been
used. Repeater technique resolved it when the auditor
noted that she kept saying, "I'm sure there's a good
reason why I feel bad up in my childhood. After all, my
brother raped me when I was five. I'm sure it's up in my
childhood, much later. My mother was terribly jealous
of me. I'm sure it's later."
   This young lady, as might be imagined, had studied
some school of mental healing in college which thought
sex or eating vitamins caused aberrations of the mind
and she had often held forth on the fact that, while she
was not averse to what she called "analysis," she did
think it dull to expect a fetus to hear anything. She
                           309
                 L. RON HUBBARD

would go into the area before birth and declare she was
quite comfortable. But birth was not in sight. That is
important. The basic engram or engrams in the basic
area—around  the embryo period—cannot vanish and
will not vanish short of therapy, and when birth cannot
even be contacted by so much  as one somatic, it is
certain that something lies before it. If birth were the
first engram, everybody could be cleared in five hours.
Birth can even be in sight and there may still remain
half a hundred severe prenatal experiences. In her case,
nothing was  in  sight. Her educational pattern had
slowed the case: she was always trying to sit in present
time and "remember" with a memory so full of occlu-
sions that she couldn't have recalled her mother's right
name. (She had acquired this from being in the hands of
mental practitioners for ten years who had asked her to
do nothing but "remember.") As has been said, she was
quite comfortable before birth, sensed the amniotic
fluid and was certain that life in the womb was a joyous
life for all. The incongruity that she could experience
the sensations of this amniotic fluid and floating com-
fort and warmth and a continued belief that there was
no prenatal memory  escaped her utterly. The auditor
made  no slightest effort to convince her. Knowing his
business, he merely kept sending her back and  forth,
trying this mechanism or that.
   She  finally wanted to know  if there had to be
prenatal experience and was told that what was there
was there, that if there was no prenatal memory then
she wouldn't recall any but that if there was, she might.
This is a good, equivocal attitude for an auditor. Dia-
netics, after all, as one auditor put it, "just shows the
yard goods" and makes  no sales effort at all.
   The  auditor had been using repeater technique on
varieties of phrases. She was moving on  the track so
there must be a denyer present. And he had utterly run
                             310
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

out of ideas when he realized, suddenly, that she was
very handy with that phrase, "much later."
Auditor: Say "much later" and return into the prenatal
   area.
Girl: "Much  later. Much later," etc. (very bored and
   uncooperative).
Auditor: Continue please. (Never say "Go ahead," for
   that means to do just that. Say "Continue" when you
   want them to keep on progressing along an engram
   or repeating, and "Return over it" when rerunning
   an engram already run once.)
Girl: "Much later. Much ..." I have a somatic in my
   face! It feels like I am being pushed. (This was good
   news, for the auditor knew she had a midprenatal
   pain shut-off which prevented later somatics from
   appearing.)
Auditor: Contact it more closely and continue to re-
   peat.
Girl: "Much   later. Much later." It's getting stronger.
   (Naturally. On repeater technique, the somatic gets
   stronger until the phrase appears, exactly right. On a
   nonsonic case it impinges itself indirectly on "I"; in
   a sonic, the sound comes through as sound.)
Auditor: Continue.
Girl: "Much  ..." I hear a voice! There. That's it.
   Why,  that's my father's voice!
Auditor: Listen to the words and repeat them, please.
Girl: He's talking to my mother. Say, this face pressure
   is uncomfortable. It keeps going up and down on
   me.  It hurts!
Auditor: Repeat his words, please.
Girl: He's saying, "Oh honey, I won't come in you
   now. It's better to wait until much later to have one."
   And  there's my mother's voice. Say, this pressure is
   hurting me. No, it's eased up considerably. Funny,
   the minute I contacted his voice, it got less.
                            311
                 L. RON HUBBARD

Auditor: What  is your mother saying, please, if you
   hear her?
Girl: She's saying, "I don't want  you in there at all
   then!" She's mad! Say, the somatic stopped. (Coitus
   had ended  at this point.)
Auditor: Please return to the start of this and recount.
Girl: (Regains the beginning, somatic returns.) I wonder
   what they're doing? (then a pause) I hear a squishing
   sound! (then a pause and embarrassment) Oh!
Auditor: Recount the engram, please.
Girl: There's a sort of faint rhythm at first and then it
   gets faster. I can hear breathing. Now it's beginning
   to bear down harder but a lot less than it did the first
   time. Then it eases up and I hear my father's voice:
   "Oh, honey I won't come in you now. It's better to
   wait until much later to have one. I'm not too sure I
   like children that well. Besides, my job . . ." And
   my  mother must  shove at him" because there's a
   sharper somatic here. "I don't want you in there at
   all then. You cold fish!"
Auditor: Return to the beginning and recount it again,
   please.
Girl: (Recounts it several times, somatic finally van-
   ishes. She feels quite cheerful about it but doesn't
   think to mention that she doubted prenatals existed.)
   This is repeater technique at work. This particular
case had had about two hundred phrases thrown at her
for repeater technique without finding one of them that
would fit. In the first place, there were only a few lower
engrams which the file clerk was willing to give out and
the auditor was guessing at the whole gamut of denyers.
A later incident might have contained—and did, but no
somatic appeared—numbers of the phrases he used. But
the file clerk was willing to settle for this one for it was
early and could be erased.
   The file clerk rarely hands out something in a badly
                             312
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

occluded case which cannot be reduced  to recession.
And an auditor never leaves an engram so offered until
he has made  every effort with many  recountings to
reduce it. The file clerk, in this case, by the by, would
have let down  the auditor by putting forth such an
engram as birth, which would not have lifted and which
would have  caused a lot of lost work and given the
patient a headache for a few days. The auditor would
have let the file clerk down if he had not reduced the
engram  offered by making  the girl go over it several
times until the somatic was gone and the voice faded
out.
   The reason this engram stayed hidden was because
its content said so. Actually it was a  coitus. As an
engram  it seemed to say that the incidents would be
found later on in life. Further, as an engram, it said that
it was not to be entered.
   Repeater technique will sometimes embroil a patient
in trouble of a minor sorfby getting him "sucked into"
incidents which will not lift. This is not common but
the file clerk occasionally hands  out a late incident,
rather than an early one. However, this is not an error
on the part of the file clerk. Remember, he has these
engrams filed by subject, somatic and time, and the
auditor can use any one of these. When the file clerk
responds and hands out a somatic on a repeater phrase
the auditor has gleaned from the preclear's chatter or
has guessed himself and yet that somatic will not lift or
no voice appears  with it (in a sonic case, or merely
won't lift with a nonsonic), the file clerk had to unstack
a pile of material. Therefore, the auditor, realizing this,
finding that a voice does not appear or that the somatic
will not lift, has the preclear repeat the same phrase
and tells him to go earlier and earlier. Another somatic
may  turn up in a different place in the body. The file
clerk has gotten an even earlier one loose, now that a
                             313
                 L. RON HUBBARD

small amount of trouble has been taken from what he
could first get. Now this earlier one is addressed simi-
larly. It may get mediumly strong as a somatic, the
preclear repeating the phrase all the while, and still no
voice may appear. The auditor then sends the preclear
earlier. The file clerk again has managed to get out an
even earlier one, now that something has been taken
from  the second. This  time again, an even  earlier
somatic turns on, probably down around the basic area
in a case which has not previously contacted this area,
and this time a voice can be heard. The engram re-
duces.  The  file clerk, in short, was  willing to risk
trouble in order to get several somatics unstacked and
let the auditor get a basic incident.
   There  are variations on this sort of thing. As the
filing system is by subject, somatic and time, the audi-
tor can use other things than phrases. He can send a
preclear to the "highest intensity of a somatic," and
often results may be  obtained, though this is not as
reliable as by subject nor as foolproof. The preclear,
incidentally, does not mind going to any "highest inten-
sity" of somatic because somatics are about a thou-
sandth part as strong as the original agony, though they
are quite strong enough. In present time with the pre-
clear not  in therapy, the  intensity of one  of these
somatics can be a drastic affair, as witness the migraine
headache. Taking  the migraine, a preclear can be re-
turned to the very moment of its reception when one
would  think its intensity would be the highest and yet
find a mild, dull ache such as one would  get with a
hangover. This is part of the principle that any entrance
of a case is better than a case not entered at all. For, by
return with  standard reverie technique, the source is
approached,  and if the source is contacted at all, the
power of the engram to aberrate has become reduced in
                             314
              THE LAWS OF RETURNING

strength no matter how   many  mistakes the auditor
makes.
   Returning to "maximum  intensity" of a somatic,
then, is nothing very painful. Actual maximum intensity
is when the preclear is awake before the contact with
the incident is made. But in returning to "maximum
intensity" the incident may  often be contacted  and
reduced. If "maximum intensity" however, contains in
its engram the phrases, "I can't stand it!" "It's killing
me,"  or "I'm  terrified," then expect our preclear to
respond to it in some such way. If he does not respond,
then he has an emotional  shut-off, which is another
problem which  will be taken up later.
   Similarly, the auditor can  handle  his preclear in
time. There exists a very accurate clock in the mind.
The  file clerk is very well acquainted with this clock
and wherever possible will comply. The auditor who
wants the patient to go "six minutes before this phrase
is uttered" will generally find that his preclear is now
six minutes before it, even though the incident is prena-
tal. The auditor can bring his preclear forward, then,
minute by minute as he desires. He can take a preclear
straight through an incident by announcing, "It is one
minute later. It is two minutes later. Three minutes have
gone by," and so forth. The auditor does not have to
wait for those minutes to elapse; he just announces
them. He  can make  a preclear go through time at
five-minute intervals or hour intervals or day intervals,
and unless there is engramic material which holds him
or otherwise affects the operation, the auditor can move
the preclear on the time track at will. It would be very
nice if the auditor could send the preclear to conception
and then tell him it is one hour later, two hours later and
so forth, to pick up the first engram. However, there are
more factors involved than time, and the plan, though
pretty, is not feasible. The time shift is generally used
                             315
                 L. RON HUBBARD

when  the auditor is trying to get the preclear ahead of
an incident to make sure that he really has a beginning.
By returning the preclear by five- or ten-minute inter-
vals, the auditor may sometimes  discover that he is
running backwards into a very long and complicated
incident and that the headache he has been seeking to
alleviate on the preclear was received, actually, hours
before the period in which he  thought it had initially
been received. In such a case there is a second engram
appended to an earlier engram and the auditor cannot
lift the second one until he has the first one.
   Actually, time shift is of limited use. The auditor
who  tries to go chasing backwards through time will
find that he  will have  on  his hands   an artificially
restimulated case and that the work is much impeded.
Repeater technique works best and is most easily han-
dled by the file clerk. The auditor uses a time shift to
get the preclear as close to basic area (early prenatal) as
possible and  then generally, if the file clerk doesn't
simply go to work handing out engrams which can be
washed,  one after the other, the auditor uses repeater
technique. Time shift and "running down a somatic"
have some limited use. Some experimentation will show
about how much use they have.
   The laws of returning are these:
   1.   A returned patient reacts more, theoretically, to
       those commands which are earlier than he is on
       the time track and less to those commands
       which  are later than his point in time.
   2.  A preclear reacts to those engramic commands
        which are: (a) in chronic restimulation, or (b) to
       which he is nearest on the time track. Thus, if
        an engram says, "I'm afraid," he is. If it says,
        "I'd rather die than face this," he would. If the
       command   to which he  is near says, "I'm
        sleepy," he will be. If it says, "Forget it," he
                             316
           THE LAWS OF RETURNING

    will. Commands  in chronic restimulation give a
    false color to the personality: "I can never be
    sure of anything," "I don't know,"  "I can't
    hear anything"  are all possibly in chronic re-
    stimulation. If the file clerk won't give them up,
    then keep working  the case anyway  around
    these. They will give up after a while.
3.  The action of the preclear on the time track and
    the condition of the track are regulated exclu-
    sively by engramic commands   classifiable as
    bouncers, holders, denyers and groupers  and
    misdirectors. (These conditions, it is repeated,
    are quite variable, as variable as language: "I
    don't know whether I am coming or going," for
    instance, in an engram makes it very confusing.
    "I can't go back at this point" makes the pre-
    clear keep progressing later and later.)
4.  The engramic command   manifests itself either
    in the awake speech  of the preclear before a
    session of therapy or is inadvertently announced
    as a supposedly "analytical" thought when he
    nears the vicinity of the command.
5.  The  engram   is not  a sentient, rationalized
    memory, but a collection of unanalyzed percep-
    tions, and it will develop into contact simply by
    the process of returning through it, to it, over it
    or asking for it.
6.  The  file clerk will give the auditor whatever can
    be extracted from the engram bank. The auditor
    must aid the file clerk by reducing in charge or
     severity everything the file clerk offers. This is
    done by making  the patient recount it. (Other-
    wise the file clerk gets so much material piled
    around  that, with this in restimulation, he can
    no  longer get at the files. The auditor who
    bucks  the file clerk is not rare. The file clerk
                         317
                          L. RON HUBBARD

            who  will buck an auditor, except by withholding
             data which will not reduce, has yet to be found.)
         The techniques  available to the auditor are as fol-
     lows:
         1.  Returning, in which the preclear is sent as early
             as possible on his track before therapy itself is
           engaged upon.
         2.  Repeater technique, by which  the file clerk is
              asked for data on certain subjects, particularly
             those affecting the return and travel on the time
             track, and which aid the ability of the preclear
            to contact engrams.
        3.   Time shift, by which a preclear can be moved
             short or long distances on the track by specific
           announcement of the amount of time forward
            the preclear is to go or time backwards,  or
             return or progression through intervals of time.
              (It is also useful to find out if the preclear is
            moving  or which direction he is moving on the
             time track in order to discover the action some
I           engram may be having upon him.)
f       4.  Somatic location, by which the moment of re-
|            ception of the somatic is located, in an effort to
I            discover whether it is received in this engram or
{            to find an engram containing it.
                                   318
                    CHAPTER SEVEN
 Emotion and the Life Force
   One  of the largest roles in therapy is played by
emotion. In the second book we covered this subject
and  divided it tentatively as a theory only into three
divisions: (a) the emotions contained in the command of
engrams whereby physical pain became confused with
emotions; (b) the emotions contained as endocrine reac-
tions subject to the analytical mind of the Clear and the
analytical mind and reactive mind of the aberree; and
(c) the emotions contained in engrams which bound up
free units of life force.
   Further work and research on emotion will undoubt-
edly bring about an even closer understanding of it. But
we have a workable knowledge of emotion now. We can
use what we know and produce results with it. When we
know  more, we shall be able to produce much better
results but just now we can produce the Release and the
Clear. If we treat emotion as bound-up life force and if
we  follow these general precepts to release it, we shall
obtain a very large gain in any preclear; indeed, we shall
produce our largest single gains by so releasing emotion.
   In an  engineering science like Dianetics, we can
work on a push-button basis. We know that throwing a
switch will stop a motor, that closing it again will start
it and that no matter how many times we open or close
that switch our motor will stop or start. We are using
here  a force which   is still as mysterious to  us as
electricity was to James Clerk Maxwell. Much  earlier
Benjamin  Franklin had observed that electricity existed
and had  done some  interesting things with it: but he
had not used it much and he  could not control it. A
                            319
                 L. RON HUBBARD

philosopher like Bergson' selected out a thing he called
elan vital, a life force. Man is alive, there must be a
force or flow of something which keeps him alive; when
man  is dead there is no force or flow. This is life force
in the Benjamin Franklin stage. As he considered elec-
tricity, so did Bergson consider life force. Now we are
up, in Dianetics, to the James Clerk Maxwell stage, or
very nearly. We  know  that certain equations can be
made  about life force and we can use those equations.
And  we  can theorize that "life force" and what has
been  called a certain kind of "emotion"  are  either
similar or the same thing. We may have the wrong
theory, but so might James Clerk Maxwell. Indeed,
Maxwell's theories may still be wrong: at least we have
electric lights. In Dianetics, we are pretty certain that
the majority of tenets are parallels of natural law: these
are the big computations. We are not certain that we have
emotion properly bracketed, but then we shall not be sure
until we have actually taken a dead man and pumped him
up with life force again. Short of this extreme, we are on
solid ground with emotion as life force.
   We  can, for instance, take a girl, examine some-
thing of her background  with, let us say, an electro-
encephalograph* (an instrument for measuring nervous
* The  electroencephalograph, hypnoscopes, intelligence charts,
tests for various dynamics and so forth are all mechanical aids
to Dianetics. They are primarily used in research. They can be
used in practice where  available and the skill of the auditor
permits, but they have not been generally in such practical use
and at this time and with this therapy are not needed. Some
chemist, one of these days, is going to invent a perfect "trance
gas," I hope, which will speed the clearing of a schizophrenic;
and  some engineer, I trust, will make something to measure
nerve impulses cheap  enough to be used  in general practice.
Right now, we  can get along without them, no matter how
desirable they may be to the future. — LRH
 1. Bergson: Henri Bergson (1859-1941), French philosopher.
Awarded  Nobel Prize for literature (1927).
                           320
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

impulses and reactions) and then proceed on the basis
of the information so obtained to do one of two things.
The first is inhuman and would not be done, of course,
but she could be made sick or insane merely by using
this data, so obtained. (If the data is obtained in ther-
apy, it is obtained by actual contact with engrams and
an engram  contacted in reverie has lost its power to
aberrate: Dianetic therapy thus makes such an eventual-
ity utterly impossible.) The second and far more impor-
tant fact to us is that she can be made to recover, with
this same data, all the force, interest, persistence and
tenacity to life and all the physical and mental well-
being possible. If it could not be made to work both
ways, we would  not have the answer, at least in work-
able form. (Some fiction writer, by the way, if tempted
to horrorize on the first fact, must please recall that the
data was obtained  with apparatus which would  have
staggered Doctor Frankenstein for intricacy and skill in
use  and that Dianetic  therapy contacts  the data at
source; the apparatus is necessary to keep from touch-
ing the source, for the instant the source is touched by
therapy its power vanishes like yesterday's headlines.
So let's have no Gaslight2 plays about Dianetics, please;
they'd be technically inaccurate.)
   This is not as simple as electricity in that the switch
cannot be turned off and on. So far as Dianetics is con-
cerned, it can only be turned on. We  have a rheostat,3
then, which will not drop back but which, when pressed
forward, releases more and more dynamic force into the
individual and gives him more and more control over its use.
   Man  is intended to be a self-determined organism.
That is to say that as long as he can make evaluations of
2. Gaslight: a play by Patrick Hamilton (later called Angel Street)
in which a man tries to drive his wife insane.
3. rheostat: an electrical instrument used to control current by
varying resistance.
                            321
                 L. RON HUBBARD

his data without artificial compulsions or repressions
(held-down sevens in an adding machine) he can oper-
ate to maximum efficiency. When man becomes exteri-
orly determined, which is to say compelled to do or
repressed from doing without his own rational consent,
he becomes  a push-button animal. This push-button
factor is so sharply defined that an auditor, in therapy,
who discovers a key phrase in an engram (and does not
release it) can use that phrase for a little while to make
a patient cough or  laugh or stop coughing  or stop
laughing at the auditor's will. In the case of the auditor,
because  he got  the data at  source—contacted  the
engram itself, which robbed it of some power—the push
button will not last very long, certainly less than two or
three hundred pushes. The  whole pain-drive effort at
handling human beings, and most of the data accumu-
lated in the past by various schools, has been, unwit-
tingly, this push-button material. If the engram is not
touched at source it is good for endless use, its power
never diminishing. Touched  at source, however, the
original recording has been reached and so it loses its
power. The "handling of human  beings" and what
people have been calling, roughly, "psychology" have
been actually push-button handling of a person's aber-
rational phrases and sounds. Children discover them in
their parents and use them with a vengeance. The clerk
discovers that his boss can't stand a full wastebasket
and so always has one full. The bosun4 on a ship finds
out one of his sailors cringes every time he hears the
phrase, "fancy pants" and so uses the words to intimi-
date the man.  This is push-button warfare amongst
aberrees. Wives may find that certain words make the
husband wince or make him angry or make him refrain
4. bosun:  a ship's petty officer in charge of rigging, boats, an-
chors, etc.
                           322
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

from doing  something and so they use these "push
buttons." And husbands find their wives' push buttons
and keep them  from buying  clothes or using the car.
This defensive and offensive dueling amongst aberrees
is occasioned by  push buttons reacting against push
buttons. Whole populaces are handled by their push-
button responses. Advertising learns about push buttons
and uses them in such things as "body odor" or consti-
pation. And in the entertainment field and the songwrit-
ing field push buttons are pushed in whole racks and
batteries to produce aberrated responses. Pornography
appeals to people who have pornographic push buttons.
Corn-and-games5 government appeals to people who
have "care for me" push buttons and others. It might be
said that there is no necessity to appeal to reason when
there are so many push buttons around.
   These same  push buttons, because they are sevens
held down by pain and emotion (false data forced into
the computer by engrams—and  every society has its
own special patterns of engrams), also happen to drive
people insane, make them ill and generally raise havoc.
The only push button the Clear has is whatever his own
computer, evaluating on his experience which itself has
been evaluated by the computer, tells him is survival
conduct along his four dynamics. And so, being no
marionette  in the  hands  of careless  or designing5
people, he remains well and sane.
   It is not true, however, that a Clear is not emotional,
that his reason is cold, and that he is a self-conscious
puppet to his own computations. His computer works so
rapidly and on so many   levels with so many of his
5. corn-and-games: reference to the practice in ancient Rome of
feeding people and providing official public amusement (circuses
in the arena) in an attempt to prevent unrest.
6. designing: crafty, conniving.
                           323
                 L. RON HUBBARD

computations going on simultaneously but out of the
sight of "I" (though "I" can examine any one of them
he chooses) that his inversion or acute awareness of self
is minimal. Inversion is the condition of the aberree
whose poor computer is wrestling with heavy impon-
derables7 and held-down sevens in his engrams such as
"I must  do it. I just have to do it. But no, I'd better
change my mind."
   The computational difference between the Clear and
the aberree is very wide. But there is a much grander
difference: life force. The dynamics have, evidently, so
much  potential force. This  force manifests itself as
tenacity to  life, persistence in  endeavor,  vigor  of
thought and act and ability to experience pleasure. The
dynamics in a man's  cells may be no stronger than
those in a cat's cells. But the dynamics in the whole
man  are easily greater than those in any other animal.
Assign this as one will, the man is basically more alive
in that he has a more volatile8 response. By more alive is
meant that his sentient, emotional urge to live is greater
than those found in other life forms. If this were not
true, he would not now command the other kingdoms.
Regardless of what a shark or  a beaver does when
threatened with  final extinction, the shark  and  the
beaver get short shrift when they  encounter the dy-
namics of man: the shark gets worn as leather or eaten
as vitamins and the beaver decks9 a lady's back.
   The  fundamental aspect of this is seen in a single
reaction. Animals   are content  to survive  in their
environments and seek to adjust themselves to those
environments. That very dangerous animal—or god—

7. imponderables: things that cannot be conclusively determined
or explained.
8. volatile: moving suddenly and often from one idea, interest,
feeling, etc., to another; changeable.
9. decks: decorates; dresses up.
                           324
             EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

man  has a slightly different idea. Ancient schools were
fond of telling the poor demented aberree that he must
face reality. This was optimum conduct: facing reality.
Only  it isn't man's optimum conduct. Just as these
schools made the fundamental error of supposing that
the aberree was unwilling to face his environment when
he was actually, because of engrams, unable to face it,
they supposed that the mere facing of reality would lead
to sanity. Perhaps it does, but it does not lead to a
victory of man over the elements and other forms. Man
has something more: some people call it creative imagi-
nation, some  call it this or some  call it that; but
whatever  it is called, it adds up to the interesting fact
that man is not content merely to "face reality" as most
other life forms are. Man makes reality face him. Propa-
ganda  about  "the  necessity of  facing reality," like
propaganda  to the effect that a man could be driven
mad  by a "childhood delusion" (whatever that is), does
not face the reality that where the beaver down his ages
of evolution built mud dams and keeps on building mud
dams, man graduates in half a century from a stone and
wood dam  to make a mill-wheel pond to structures like
Grand Coulee Dam,10 and changes the whole and entire
aspect of a respectable portion of nature's real estate
from a desert to productive soil, from a flow of water to
lightning bolts. It may not be as poetic as Rousseau
desired, it may not be as pretty as some "nature lover"
would desire, but it's a new reality. Two thousand years
ago the Chinese built a wall which would have been
visible from the moon had anybody been up there to
look; three thousand years ago he had  North Africa
green  and  fertile; ten thousand years ago  he was
engaged  upon  some  other project; but always he
has been  shaping things up pretty well to suit man.

10. Grand Coulee Dam:  a large, concrete dam located on the
Columbia River in central Washington.
                            325
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   There's an  extra quality at work or  perhaps just
more of it, so much more of it that it looks like a new
thing entirely.
   Now,  all this is not any great digression from ther-
apy; it is stated here as an aspect of life force. Where
the individual finds himself "possessed of less and less
life force," he is losing some of the free units some-
where. And  the free units of this life force, in a society
or an individual, are the extra surge that is needed to
tame North Africa, divide an atom or reach the stars.
   The mechanical  theory here—and recall it is but
theory and Dianetics can stand without it—is that there
are so many  units of force per individual. These units
may be held in common by a group and may build to
higher and higher numbers as "enthusiasm" increases;
but for our purposes, we can consider that man, as an
individual or a society—both are organisms—has  a
ready number to hand for use in any given hour or day.
He may  manufacture these life units as required and he
may  simply have  a given supply: that is beside the
point. What is to the point is that he can be considered,
at any hour or day, as just so much alive. Consider this
as his dynamic potential as we can see on our descriptic
earlier.
   What happens, then, to this dynamic potential in the
aberree? He has  a large quantity of engrams in his
bank. We know  that these engrams can sleep for his
entire life without being "keyed in," and we know that
any or all of them can be keyed in and thereafter wait
for restimulators in the environment to set them into
action. We know  that his necessity level can suddenly
rise and surmount all these keyed-in engrams, and we
know  that a high survival activity can bring him such a
chance of pleasure that the engrams can stay unrestim-
ulated, though keyed in. And  we can  suppose that
these engrams, from one period of life to another, can
                          326
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

actually key out again and stay out because of some vast
change of environment or survival chances.
   The usual case, however, is that a few engrams stay
keyed in continually and are-restimulated rather chroni-
cally by the environment of the individual, and that if
he changes environment the old may key out but even-
tually new ones will key in.
   Most  aberrees are in a state of chronic restimulation
which, on the average, starts the spiral dwindling down
rather rapidly.
   As  this pertains to life force, the mechanical action
of an engram, on being keyed in, is to capture so many
of these units of life force. Sudden and sweeping re-
stimulation of the engram permits it to capture a great
many  more units of life force. In the average case, every
restimulation captures a greater residue of life force and
holds it. When enthusiasm or impetus aligns the pur-
pose of the individual toward a true survival goal (as
opposed to a pseudogoal in the engrams) he recaptures
some  of these units. But the spiral is dwindling: he
cannot capture back, except in very unusual circum-
stances, as many as he has lost into the engram bank.
   Thus it can be said, for purposes of this theory of
life force action, that more and more life force units out
of an individual's supply are captured and held in the
engram  bank. Here they are perverted in use to coun-
terfeit themselves as dynamic (as in the manic and the
high euphoria case) and force action upon the somatic
and analytical mind. In this engram bank, the life force
units are not available as free feeling or for free action
but are used against the individual from within.
   An  observation here tends to demonstrate this action:
The more  restimulated an aberree is, the less free feeling
he may possess. If caught in a manic (highly complimen-
tary prosurvival  engram),  his life force is channel-
ing straight through the engram  and his behavior, no
                           327
                 L. RON HUBBARD

matter how  enthusiastic or euphoric, is actually very
aberrated. If he  has this much   life force to be  so
channeled, then he can be shown to have even more life
force, sentiently directed, when Clear. (This has been
done.)
   We  have demonstrated  the parasitic quality of the
"demon   circuits" which use pieces of the analytical
mind  and its processes. This parasitic quality is com-
mon  to engrams in other ways. If a man has, arbitrarily,
1,000  units of life force, he has an ability to channel
them,  when  Clear, into highly zestful existence: in a
manic  state, with a prosurvival engram in full restimu-
lation, the life force is directed through an aberrated
command   and gives him,  let us say, 500 units of
pseudodynamic thrust.
   In other words, the power is out of the same battery:
such an engram has, at best, less power than the whole
organism, cleared, would have. (This aspect of the manic
or superpersonality neurotic has misled some of the old
schools of mental healing into the thoroughly aberrated
and  poorly observed  belief that insanities alone were
responsible for man's ability to survive, a concept which
can be disproven in the laboratory simply by clearing one
of these manics or any other aberree.)
   The engram  uses the same current but perverts it,
just as it uses the same analytical mind but usurps" it.
Not only does the engram have no life of its own, but it
is wasteful, as are so many parasites, of the life force of
the host. It is thoroughly inefficient. If a comparable
device were  fitted into an electronic circuit, it would
merely  lead off and make   "unalterable" some of
the functions of the equipment which should be left
variable and would, in addition, consume, simply by

11. usurps: appropriates wrongly  to itself (a right, prerogative,
etc.).
                           328
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

lengthened leads and bad condensers12 and tubes, power
supply vital to the machine.
   In the human mind, the engram assumes its most
forceful "assist" aspect in the manic, channeling and
commanding  the organism into some activity of wild
violence and monomanic13 concentration. The "super-
salesman," the violently buoyant14 "glad-hander,"15 the
fanatical and apparently unkillable religious zealot are
classifiable as manics. The abundance of "power" in
these people, even when it is as grim as Torquemada's16
or as destructive as Genghis Khan's,17 is an object of
admiration in many quarters. The manic, as will be
later covered, is a "prosurvival," "assist" command in
an engram  which  yet fixes the individual on some
certain course. But an engram  is capable only of as
much  "power"  as is present in the host, just as it is
capable of tying up only as much analyzer as is present.
   Let us take a forceful manic who is displaying and
functioning on 500 arbitrary units of life force. Let us
12. condenser:  a device  storing a charge of  electricity. Also
called a capacitor.
13. monomanic: one who  suffers from an obsession with one
idea or interest.
14. buoyant: lighthearted, cheerful.
15. glad-hander: one who is demonstrative in his personal con-
tacts; one who acts more friendly or more optimistic than neces-
sary; one, as a politician, who pretends friendliness.
16. Torquemada: Tomas  de  Torquemada (1420-1498), first
Grand  Inquisitor of Spain. The Spanish Inquisition, established
under Ferdinand and Isabella in 1478, was centralized by Torque-
mada  after his appointment in 1483 as Grand Inquisitor. He
gained the reputation, partly deserved, partly exaggerated, of
great cruelty in his conduct of the Spanish Inquisition, which
reportedly was responsible for the burning of some two thousand
persons between 1481 and 1504.
17. Genghis Khan: (1162-1227) Mongol conqueror of much of
Asia and eastern Europe. He and his armies were totally ruthless
in their actions and were said to have killed over a million people
in one city alone.
                          329
                 L. RON HUBBARD

assume  that the entire being is possessed of 1,000
arbitrary units of life force. Suppose we have here an
Alexander.18 The dynamics of the average person are
unassisted by manics in most cases but are dispersed as
a stream of electrons might be  dispersed by a block
before  them.  Here  are  scattered activity, scattered
thoughts, uncomputable problems, lack of alignment.
In such a person, with 1,000 units present, 950 of those
units could be so captured in the engram banks and yet
so thoroughly counteractive that the person displays a
functioning capacity of only 50  units. In the case of
Alexander, it could be assumed, the manic must have
been an  alignment in a general direction of his own
basic purposes. His basic purpose is a strong regulator:
the manic happens  to align with it: a person of great
ability and personal prowess becomes possessed of 500
units via a manic engram, believes he is a god and goes
out and conquers the known world. He was educated to
believe he was a god, his manic engram said he was a
god and  had a holder in it. Alexander conquered the
world  and died  at thirty-three. He could hold in his
manic only so long as it could be obeyed: when it could
no longer be obeyed, it changed his valence, became no
more a manic and drove him, with pain, into dispersed
activities. The engram,  received from  his mother,
Olympias, can almost be read even at this late date. It
must have said he would be a joyous god who would
conquer all the world and must keep on conquering,
that he must always strive to rise higher and higher. It
was  probably a ritual chant of some sort from his
mother, who was a high priestess of Lesbos'9 and who
must have received some  injury just before the ritual.
18. Alexander: Alexander III, known as Alexander the Great:
(356-323  B.C.) king of Macedonia (ancient kingdom located in
what is now Greece and Yugoslavia).
19. Lesbos: Greek island in the Aegean Sea. The word lesbian
derives from the ancient Greek name of this island, from the
eroticism and homosexuality attributed to Sappho (ancient Greek
poetess) and her followers.

                           330
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

She hated her  husband, Philip.20 A son who  would
conquer all was the answer. Alexander may well have
had  fifty or a hundred such  "assist" engrams, the
violent praying of a woman aberrated enough to mur-
der. Thus, he could be assumed to have conquered until
he could no longer stretch a line of supply for conquer-
ing, at which time he, of course, would no longer be
able to obey the engram and its force of pain would turn
on him. The engrams  dictated attack to conquer, and
they enforced the command with pain: once conquering
could no longer be  accomplished, the pain attacked
Alexander. He  realized one day he was dying: within
the week he was dead, and at the height of his power.
Such, on a very  large scale, is a manic phrase in an
engram at work.
   Now  let us suppose that Alexander, with only educa-
tion to turn him against his father, with only prayers to
ask him to conquer the world, not engrams, had been
cleared. Answer: given a sufficient and rational reason,
he would most certainly have been able to conquer the
world and at eighty might well have been alive to enjoy
it. How can we assume this?
   The manic with 500 units of directed purpose has been
cleared. He  now  has 1,000  units of sentiently directed
purpose. He is exactly twice as forceful as he was when he
was in a forceful manic and his basic purpose may be
similar but now can be realized and will not turn on him
the moment he has reached a goal or failed.
   This is clinical, the theory behind life force. It was
formulated in an effort to explain observed phenomena.
The theory may  be wrong,  the observed data is not.
But the theory must be somewhere close to right be-
cause with it could be predicted considerable phenom-
ena which had not been known to exist before: in other
20. Philip: Philip II: (382-336 B.C.) king of Macedonia, father
of Alexander the Great.
                           331
                  L. RON HUBBARD

words,  it is a profitable theory. It followed after Dia-
netics was well formulated, for a strange fact, vital to
the therapist, turned up: the preclear advanced in ther-
apy In exact ratio to the amount of emotional charge
released from his reactive bank.
   The  purpose  and persistency of the aberree was
hindered in ratio to the amount of emotional charge
within his engram bank. His recovery of survival poten-
tial increased in ratio to the amount of energy freed
from the engram  bank. His health increased in ratio to
the amount of energy freed from the engram bank.
   The  engrams which contained the greatest discharge
were  those which centered around  loss of imagined
survival factors.
   Hence, this theory of life force was formulated. Any
manic, cleared, seemed to demonstrate far more actual
power and energy than before he was cleared. And any
"normal,"   cleared, increased in accessible life force
units to compare with any manic cleared.
   Undoubtedly  further work and observation will re-
fine this theory. At the present moment, however, it
serves. It is one of those "scientific theories" thrown in
to explain an operation or a long series of observations.
In this case, it happens to be squarely aligned with the
basic tenets of Dianetics, for it predicts data which can
then be found  and does not throw out former data
predicted by the basic mathematics and philosophy of
Dianetics.
   Here  we are speaking, actually, not of this slippery
term,  emotion, but, we  believe, life force. This life
force is considerably enhanced by success and pleasure
in general and is, according to this theory, augmented,
in terms of arbitrary units, by pleasure. In other words,
pleasure  is a  thing  which  recharges  the  batteries
or permits them to be recharged; and in a Clear, far
                           332
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

from leading to softness, leads to renewed activity since
indolence21 is engramic.
   Pleasure is a vitally important factor: creative and
constructive endeavor, the overcoming of not unknow-
able obstacles toward some goal, the contemplation of
past goals reached: all combine to recharge life force.
The person, for instance, who has been an enormous
success and then loses that success and so becomes ill is
following no rational cycle but an engramic command
cycle. In a way, he has disobeyed an engramic com-
mand  and having disobeyed, suffers pain. The "child
wonder"  who early "burns out" is actually, via therapy,
about as burned out as a banked22 furnace. Any "child
wonder" is a forced affair: think of the dreams Mama
must have  poured through his engrams. She's hurt:
"Oh,  I'll never forgive myself! If I have ruined my
child, I will never forgive myself. My child, that's to be
the world's greatest violinist!" or "Oh, you brute! You
have struck me! You  have injured our child. I'll show
you.  I'll make him  the  greatest child pianist in all
Brooklyn! He's to be a beautiful child, a wonder child!
And you've struck him, you brute. Oh, I am going to sit
right here until you go away!" (Actual engrams.) The
last computes that the way to get even with Papa is to be
the greatest pianist in all Brooklyn. The child is a great
success—musical  ear, practice and great "purpose."
He  gets this engram  restimulated constantly by his
mother. But then, one day he loses a contest, he knows
suddenly he is no longer a child, that he has failed. His
purpose wavers. He gets headaches (Papa's blow) and is
at last "neurotic" and "burned out." Cleared, he went
21. indolence: the quality or state of disliking or avoiding work;
idleness; laziness.
22. banked: (of a fire) covered with ashes or fuel to make it burn
long and slowly.
                           333
                 L. RON HUBBARD

back to being a pianist, not as an "adjusted" person but
one  of the best-paid concert pianists in Hollywood.
Music aligned with basic purpose.
   Again, in another manic example, a patient who had
been some time in therapy—not the first to do this by
far—raved that he had been "turned on" by Dianetics.
He  was walking  about a foot off the Earth, chest
punched out and so forth. His glasses suddenly would
not fit him; his eyes were too good. He was a beaming,
powerful case of euphoria. Artificial restimulation had
touched a manic engram, had brought it into key for the
first time in his life. He felt wonderful. The auditor
knew that he was due for a complete comedown within
thirty-six hours to three days (the usual time) because
an artificial restimulation, by therapy, had tapped the
engram. It happened that his grandmother had told her
daughter that she must  not abort the child because
someday it might become a "fine upstanding man or
beautiful woman." He  was upstanding all right: it al-
most strained his back muscles. Another glance at the
engram in therapy and the manic phase was gone.
   This manic, then, as in the case of the boy wonder,
can be assumed to have gathered up available life force
and suddenly  channeled it along basic purpose lines,
making  a high level of concentration of life force. In the
case of the pianist, his cleared force was well above the
manic  force. In the other case, currently in process, a
level has been reached which is approaching the former
level and will surpass it by far.
   In the same way, an enthusiasm for a project will
channel life force along some purpose line and neces-
sity will suddenly rob back from  engrams enough
power  to carry an individual far, although he has no
active manics whatever.
   Now  we come to the heart of this matter: the prosur-
vival engram. It is pseudosurvival like all engramic
                           334
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

"assists," a mirage which dissolves and leaves burning
sands.
   Formerly, we  spoke mainly of  contrasurvival en-
grams. These lie across the dynamics of the individual
and his basic purpose.*
   The contrasurvival engram is to the dynamics like a
logjam which dams a necessary river. The dynamic is
blocked in some degree. Any blockage to any one of the
four dynamics (or any section of that spectrum) causes
a dispersal of the flow. It does not make less dynamic,
particularly, but it does misdirect it in the same order
that the river, blocked in its natural flow, might become
five streams going  in various directions or flood a
fertile pasture it should merely have watered.
   The  prosurvival engram alleges to assist (but does
not actually assist) the dynamic on its way. It pretends it
is the dynamic. In the analogy of the river, the prosur-
vival engram would be a canal which took the river's
force and sent it off in some unintended direction. The
prosurvival engram is not a manic; it can and does
contain at times manic phrases.
   A  contrasurvival engram  says, "He's  worthless,
damn  him, let's kill him."
   The prosurvival engram says, "I am saving him." If
* It happens that there is an additional specialization of the
dynamics in everyone, a sort of built-in personal dynamic. It
is a clinical fact that the basic purpose is apparently known to
the individual before he  is two years of  age: talent and
inherent personality and  basic purpose go  together as a
package. They seem to be part of the genetic pattern. Anyone,
by Dianetic reliving, can be sent to the age of two years and
consulted about his purpose in life, and he will come forth
with a very specific desire as to what he wishes to accomplish
in life (and two-year-old activity as reviewed confirmed it). It
will be discovered that his later life has followed this general
pattern wherever he succeeded. Of fifteen persons examined,
the basic purpose was found formed at two years of age, and
when  cleared these persons used and pursued the basic pur-
pose. —LRH
                           335
                 L. RON HUBBARD

it added, "He is a darling and a very wonder with the
ladies," it would then be a prosurvival with a manic.
   In terms of the descriptic which defines the survival
dynamic  and the suppressor earlier in this book, the
contrasurvival engram would be part of the suppressor
(an aberrated part) and the prosurvival engram would
be part of the dynamic thrust (an aberrated part).
   Neither one of these things is actually a sentient and
computable portion of survival dynamic or suppressor.
   The engram  (delirium from illness, perhaps) which
says, "I will stay with you, darling, so long as you are
sick" is an apparent but wholly shadow-stuff part of the
survival dynamic. But the reactive mind has no sense of
time when restimulated, and this engram, keyed in and
constantly restimulated by some concept in it such as an
odor or a person's voice who may or may not be the
original person, demands that the person who has it be
ill just as he was  ill when it was  said. This way,
according to our moron,  the reactive mind, lies sur-
vival: "I had someone taking care of me when I was ill.
I need someone to take care of me. I must be ill." Here
is the basic pattern of all sympathy engrams. Here is the
basic pattern of the engram  which  will contain the
chronic psychosomatic illness in any patient. The vari-
ety is, of  course, very  large but  all insist that the
individual who has them be ill in order to survive.
   The suppressor-type engram, always contrasurvival,
can be cut into restimulation in exactly the same way as
the prosurvival engram. An engram is an engram and
all the mechanics  are the same. The  fact that the
analytical mind cannot time the engram can make any
engram seem omnipresent.23 Time can "heal" the expe-
riences of the analytical mind, perhaps, but not the
reactive mind, which has no time; a fact which makes

23. omnipresent: present everywhere at the same time.
                           336
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

time not the great healer but the great charlatan.24 There
may  be no actuality at all in this suppressor data. It is
false data. Such engrams let an individual, for instance,
see a butterfly and then tell him it is dangerous: he then
comes to detest spring because that is the time he sees
butterflies. This engram may say, "You're all against
me. You're against everything I do," which was actually
Mama  making a stand against her husband and mother-
in-law. It contains a concept, a recording of the sound
of a sewing machine as well. The individual possessing
this engram hears a sewing machine (if this engram has
at some time been keyed in) at a moment when he is
weary and dull and, looking toward the machine (he
never identifies the actual sound: these engrams protect
themselves), sees his wife. She is the associative restim-
ulator, something his analytical mind,  told to scent
danger, picks up as the cause. So he searches around
and finds something he  is angry about (something
almost "rational") and begins to tell her she is against
him. Or it can be an engram of such low emotional tone
that it is an apathy, and so he sits down and weeps and
moans that she is against him. If, during "unconscious-
ness" at birth, the doctor said he'd have to spank him,
the individual possessing this engram howls and gets
headaches when  he is spanked and, when  grown,
spanks his children as the strongest suppressor he can
think of.
   There is a difference, then, between the pro- and
contra-engrams, particularly the real sympathy pro-
engram and the contra-engram. And it is a difference,
even if we have been long on the road in this chapter,
which  is of vital interest to the auditor.
   All the  real reluctance he  will see  in preclears
24. charlatan: an assuming empty pretender to knowledge or
skill; a pretentious impostor.

                           337
                 L. RON HUBBARD

during therapy will come from these sympathy prosur-
vival engrams. These add up  into some very weird
computations. They  tell the patient that he had better
not "get rid of it" and so the patient struggles to retain
his engrams. Such an engram  is very common. A
typical case is Mama pushing off Papa, who insists he
cannot afford a child. The struggle injures the child and
in the "unconsciousness"  he receives, of course, an
engram: Mama is refusing to get rid of it, Mama is on
baby's side, therefore baby had  better do exactly as
Mama   says and "not get rid of it." This aligns with
purpose, the deepest purpose, to survive. If he gets rid
of his engrams,  he will die because getting rid of it
means death, for Mama said she would die if she got rid
of it. Further, on up through life, Mama may have the
nasty habit  of telling him  when  he  is ill that she
will "take care of  her baby and  protect him  from
his father," and this makes  a  new  force in the old
computation.
   Thus we come to the ally computation. This will be
the chief and number one struggle of the auditor, the
thing which  will most elusively resist him, the thing
which lies down close to the core of a person.
   The ally computation is severe enough that an audi-
tor once  said that a man  is not  victimized by his
enemies, he is murdered by his friends. Engramically
speaking, that is quite true.
   The  only aberration and psychosomatic ill the pa-
tient will continually hold to is a prosurvival engram
which is part of an ally computation. That could be
written fifty times here without being stressed enough.
It is most important, it is the first thing which the
auditor is going to buck when he enters a case, the first
thing he must  discharge if he wishes therapy  to go
swiftly. He may have to touch and reduce many contra-
survival engrams, for they come swiftly enough when
                           338
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

called, before he can even get an idea of what the ally
computation is. But when he gets an ally computation
he had better run it out and discharge all its emotion or
the case will hang fire.
   The  ally computation is the reactive mind  level
moronism that survival depends on Grandma or Aunt
Sue or some serving maid thirty years dead. The attend-
ants of the individual when he was ill, the people who
begged his pregnant mother to stop trying to abort him,
or fed him or otherwise tried to keep him from being
hurt: these are the allies.
   The reactive mind operates wholly on two-valued
logic. Things are life or they are death, they are right or
they are wrong, just as the engram wording states. And
the personnel of engrams are friends or enemies. The
friends, the allies, mean life! The enemies mean death!
There is no middle ground. Any restimulator or associ-
ated restimulator for the prosurvival engram means life:
and any  restimulator or associated restimulator for a
contrasurvival engram means death!
   The auditor, of course, may be a really restimulative
person (one who  is a pseudofather, a pseudolover of
Mother before birth, etc.) but he is always an associa-
tive restimulator, the person who may take away these
terribly, horribly vital things, the prosurvival engrams.
The contrasurvival engrams outbalance this factor and,
of course, the analytical mind of the preclear is always
all for the auditor and the therapy.
   The trouble comes when the analytical mind is shut
down  by restimulation and the auditor is seeking the
ally computation. Then  the preclear's reactive mind
dodges and avoids.
   The ally computation, however, is simple to trace.
And  it is very vital to trace it, for this computation may
contain the bulk of all the emotional discharge of the
case. Freeing the complete ally computation wholly
                           339
                 L. RON HUBBARD

before basic-basic is reached is wholly impossible. But
as much  life force as possible must be restored to the
preclear to make the case work well.
   For the ally computation, above all things, encysts
the life force of the individual. Here is caught and held
the free feeling,  the very  heartbeat  of life itself. A
preclear is only placed in apathy by ally computations.
The body can be almost dead in the presence of antag-
onism  and still rally and fight. But it cannot fight its
friends. The law of affinity has been aberrated into an
entrance into the reactive engram bank. And that law,
even when twisted with the murky shadows of unreason
in the reactive mind, still works. It is a good law. It is
too good when  the auditor is trying to find and reduce
engrams  which are making  the preclear ache with
arthritis or bleed internally with stomach ulcers. Why
can't he "get rid of" his arthritis? Mama said, when
she gracefully fell over a pig, "Oh, I can't get up!
Oh, my poor, poor baby. Oh, my baby! I wonder if I
hurt my poor, poor baby. Oh, I hope my baby is still
alive! Please, God, let him live. Please, God, let me
keep my  baby. Please!" Only the god to which she
prayed was the reactive mind, which makes one of its
idiot computations on the basis of everything is equal
to everything.  A  holder, a prayer  for life, a thor-
oughly bruised baby's spine, Mama's sympathy, a pig
grunt, a prayer to God: all these things are equal to
the reactive mind  and so we  have  a fine case of
arthritis, particularly since our patient sought "sur-
vival"  by marrying   a girl with  a voice just like
Mama's sounded when he was in the womb. Ask him to
get rid of his arthritis? The reactive mind says "NO!"
Arthritis is a baby is a pig grunt is a prayer to God is
wife's sympathy is being poor is Mama's voice and all
these things are desirable. He's kept himself poor and
he's kept  his arthritis and he married  a  wife who
                            340
             EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

would  make  a harlot25 blush and this is prosurvival:
wonderful stuff, survival, when the reactive mind com-
putes it! And in the case of the ulcers, here was baby
poked full of holes (Mama is having a terrible time
trying to abort him so she can pretend a miscarriage,
and she uses assorted household instruments thrust into
the cervix26 to do it) and some of the holes are through
and through this baby's abdomen and stomach: he will
live because he is surrounded by protein and has a food
supply  and  because  the sac  is like one of  these
puncture-proof inner tubes that seals up every  hole.
(Nature has been smart about attempted abortion for a
long, long time.) It so happens that Mama in this case
was not a monologuist, although most of Mama's activ-
ity on this line is a dramatization and has conversation
with it; but it also so happens that Grandma lives next
door and she comes over unexpectedly, shortly after the
latest effort to make baby meet oblivion. Grandma may
have been an attempted abortionist in her day but now
she is old and highly moral and besides, this baby is not
giving her any morning  sickness; she therefore finds
much to censure27 when she sees a bloody orangewood
stick in the bathroom. Baby  is still "unconscious."
Grandma berates Mama: "Any daughter of mine who
would do such a horrible thing should be punished by
the vengeance of God" (the principle of, "don't do as I
do, do as I say," for who gave Mama this dramatization
in the first place?) "and driven through the streets. Your
baby has a perfect right to live: if you don't think you
can take care of him, / certainly will. Now you go right
on through with your pregnancy, Eloisia, and when that

25. harlot: a prostitute.
26. cervix: a neck-shaped, anatomical structure, as the narrow
outer end of the uterus.
27. censure: criticize severely.
                           341
                 L. RON HUBBARD

baby is born, if you don't want him, you bring him to
me! The idea of trying to hurt that poor thing!" And so,
when   our bleeding  ulcer case gets  born, there  is
Grandma  and there is security and safety. Grandma is
here the ally (and she can become an ally in a thousand
different ways, any of them based on the principle that
she talks sympathetically to baby when he is out like a
flounder,28 and fights Mama in his favor when he is
"unconscious"), and when he grows to boyhood he can
be found placing a large dependency on Grandma,
much  to the parental wonder (for they never did any-
thing to little Roger, not they). And Roger will, when
Grandma  is dead, develop bleeding ulcers to get her back.
   Whoever  is a friend is to be clasped to the bosom
with bonds of steel, says this great genius, the reactive
mind, even though it kills the organism.
   The ally computation is a little more than the mere
idiot calculation that anyone who is a friend can be kept
a friend only by approximating the conditions wherein
the friendship was realized. It is a computation on the
basis that one can only be safe in the vicinity of certain
people  and that one can  only be  in the vicinity of
certain people by  being sick or crazy  or poor  and
generally disabled.
   Show  an auditor a child who was easily frightened
by punishment, who was not at ease around home and
who had allies who seemed more important to him than
the parents (grandparents,  aunts, boarders,29 doctors,
nurses, etc.) and who was sickly, and the auditor can
usually spring into view an attempted abortion back-
ground because, more often than not, it is there. Show
an auditor a child who showed enormous attachment for

28. out like a flounder: in a faint; unconscious. (Flounder is a
slang term for the corpse of a drowned man.)
29. boarders: people who  regularly get meals, or room and
meals, at another's home for pay.
                           342
             EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

one parent and  detestation for the other and the auditor
can bring out a background wherein one person wanted to
get rid of or hurt the child and the other parent did not.
   The ally computation, then, is important. And it is
also very secret. Trying to get the real allies in a case is
often a great struggle. It may be that a patient had eight
or ten of these allies in some cases and tried desperately
to hold to them, and when he could not, searched and
found mates and friends who were approximations of
his allies. A wife, around whom A is continually ill but
whom  he  will not leave under any circumstances, is
usually a pseudoally, which is to say she approximates
some mannerism  of the actual ally, has a similar voice
or even a similar first name. B, who will not leave a job
and yet who  is working far below his ability level in
life, may be  there because his boss is a pseudoally;
further, he may be working at this job because an ally
had a similar station in life and he is being the ally.
   Anything which  can so far corrupt a person's life is
naturally going to be difficult to some degree in thera-
py, for when he is asked to get rid of his ally computa-
tion, it is as likely that he will give any clue to it as it is
that he would have spit in his ally's face.
   These prosurvival engrams containing the ally com-
putation can be described as those which contain per-
sonnel who defended the patient's existence in moments
when  the patient conceived that his existence was under
attack. This need not be an actual, rational defense: it
may  only be that the content of the engram seems to
indicate it; but it can safely be assumed that the worst
ally computations are those when the life of the patient
was  defended against attackers by the ally. Most ally
computations have their genesis30 in the prenatal area.

30. genesis: the way in which something comes to be; beginning;
origin.
                           343
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   The ally computation is sought as the first action in
any case and new ally computations are sought through-
out a case.                                 ^
   These sympathy prosurvival engrams, which make
up the ally computations, vary only in intensity from
the standard prosurvival engram. A standard prosur-
vival engram is bad only because someone  has ex-
pressed friendship for the  patient or another person
when  he was "unconscious":  it is difficult to discover
and  clear even  when  it actually has  been  entirely
misread—which   is to say that the prosurvival content
was intended for another person than the patient but is
only  misconstrued  by  the patient. If the  patient is
"unconscious" and somebody  says, "He is a good
guy,"  actually meaning  another person  entirely, the
egocentric" reactive mind takes the phrase to have been
meant for oneself. In the sympathy prosurvival engram
(the ally computation is composed only of these) there
is an actual defense of the person from danger by some
ally: this can vary from  a dramatic scene  wherein
somebody  has been bent on killing the patient and the
ally has arrived, like the cavalry, in the nick of time, to
the incident wherein the patient was simply saved (or
assumed  he was being saved) from destruction such as
drowning, being run over, etc. And the sympathy pro-
survival engram is only as good as its content in words,
for it does not rationalize the action. Engrams have
been  discovered where the patient was actually being
murdered  but  the content was  such  that he  was
convinced  he was  being saved: such a  case would
include what auditors call a "mutual A A"—a  father
and mother together attempting an abortion, A A mean-
ing "attempted abortion" —wherein Mama was in utter
31. egocentric:  viewing everything in relation to oneself; self-
centered.
                           344
             EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

agreement and  disposed herself for the operation but
became  frightened and began to scream about "her
precious baby" in an effort to save herself from being
injured: patients with this sort of sympathy prosurvival
engram can get pretty confused about Mother.
   The insidious32 aspects of the sympathy prosurvival
engrams  are  several: (1) they are aligned with the
fundamental dynamic  of survival in the most literal
sense and are therefore aligned with the purpose of the
individual; (2) they are like cysts round which centra-
survival engrams serve as the outer shell; (3) they most
sharply affect the health  of the individual and  are
always the basic factor beneath the psychosomatic ill-
ness which  the individual displays; (4) they cause the
reactive mind  (but not the analytical mind) to resist
therapy; and (5) they are the largest drain upon the life
force units.
   In (3) above, the prosurvival sympathy engram does
more than just carry forward the injury which becomes
the psychosomatic illness. Any engram is a bundle of
data which includes not only all perceptics and speech
present but also metering  for emotion and  state of
physical being. The  last, the state of physical being,
would be serious enough. This metering says that struc-
ture was so and such at the moment this sympathy
prosurvival engram was  received. In the case of an
embryo engram, then, the reactive mind, in forcing the
engram  back into action, may also force the structural
pattern back upon the body: this occasionally results in
retarded development, embryo-like skin, embryo-type
back curvature, and so forth. The glands themselves,
being physical organs, are also sometimes  so sup-
pressed in the reactive mind's effort to approximate all
32. insidious: spreading or developing or acting inconspicuously
but with harmful effect.

                           345
                    L. RON HUBBARD

conditions. The underdeveloped gonads,33 the sublevel
thyroid, the wasted limb: all these things often come
from sympathy prosurvival engrams. This is so observ-
ably the case that when an individual is being cleared,
growth process begins to bring the body up to genetic
blueprint even before the case is completed: the change
which takes place in the physical being of the patient is
sometimes so remarkable and so marked that it is far
more startling than the mere disappearance of a catalog
of psychosomatic ills such as coronary, ulcers, arthritis,
allergies, and so on.
   It would be supposed that anything powerful enough
to twist the physical blueprint and keep the body from
developing or make it keep on growing where it should
have stopped would resist any therapy. This is true only
in a most limited sense. Once one is aware of what
suppresses a case, one can go about vanquishing the
suppressors, because a prosurvival engram, unlike a
contrasurvival engram, has an Achilles' heel.34
   The most workable answer now known to Dianetics
lies in the principle of life force units and a technique
for throwing them  back into circulation. The prosur-
vival engram collects and holds such units, according to
this theory, and collapses when its power to hold units
is broken.
   Entering a  case, then, where one  has a  chronic
psychosomatic illness (and what case doesn't have, even
though it is as slight as an occasional fit of sneezing or
33. gonads: bodily organs that produce gametes (mature sperm
or eggs capable of participating in fertilization).
34. Achilles' heel:  a portion, spot, area  or the  like, that is
especially or solely vulnerable. In Greek mythology, Achilles was
an illustrious Greek warrior. He had been  dipped in the river
Styx (one of the mythological rivers of hell) by his mother, which
rendered him invulnerable except in the heel by which she held
him. He was fatally wounded by an arrow in that heel.
                           346
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

hiccups), the auditor first scouts it, going through a
returning routine to find out how early he can get for
material, how  the  state of the sonic recall is, how
occluded is the youth of the person and so forth. When
he has made this survey, he begins to make his compu-
tation on the case: first, was the child happy with both
Father and Mother, and  if not, where was the child
happiest? (There will be  where  the allies live.) Was
either parent an unreasonably powerful factor in shap-
ing the thinking powers of the child? Here again may be
an  ally, even if a poor  one.  Did the  patient have
grandparents or other relatives; how did he feel toward
them? All this data will be more or less occluded and
warped by demon circuits and is about as reliable as the
data this patient will inevitably try to get from "loopy"
parents or relatives, who not only do not know what
happened to him but might be most anxious not to have
anything discovered.
   What  really did happen? Don't let patients ask rela-
tives or parents anything if you can help it, for these are
restimulators in the extreme and never have any data
you can use; the patient is just trying to use them as
bypass  circuits to avoid the pain  of recalling things
himself. When  the case is finished he will no longer
want to hound35 these people, and if you want a check
for research reasons, get one of the relatives and put
him through therapy.
   The auditor now has some slight idea of who the
allies may be. And here comes the Achilles' heel of the
ally computation:
   Any ally computation may have included the loss of
the ally. And the loss of the ally may  be the trigger

35. hound: hunt or chase with or as with hounds; chase or follow
continually; nag.
                           347
                 L. RON HUBBARD

which will start chain fission.36 For what we are going
to try to do is blow off or discharge as many life force
units as possible from the reactive engram bank and
weaken  it. Every charge we get from the bank will
reinforce the ability of the patient to carry on in exist-
ence and  will aid his analytical mind to get into the
engram  bank. Hence, discharging these frozen units is
a vital and important part of therapy and the condition
of the case will improve in direct ratio to the number of
these units so discharged.
   Consider  these life units as free  life energy: an
engram  capturing them can set itself up, for all intent,
as a life force. It is then an entity and only then. The
demon  circuits, the valence walls37 (which compartment
the analyzer, so to speak, and bring  about multiva-
lence), the force and power of the engram itself are all
dependent, according  to theory and  as observed in
practice, upon usurped life units.
   To free these units is the primary task of therapy; to
relieve pain from the engrams is the secondary task; to
make  the patient comfortable during therapy does not
even rank, though there is no need he should be uncom-
fortable. The dual character of therapy, then, is actually
two  sections of the same thing: relieving engrams.
There is this dual nature in engrams, however, that they
have painful emotion (where that means usurped life
force) and physical pain (where that means  pain of
injury, illness, etc.).

36. chain  fission: (fission means  a  splitting apart, dividing)
larger atoms such as atoms of uranium  can fission (split) into
smaller atoms such as atoms of iodine and bromine. This process
can be  designed so that each fission will cause another fission,
thereby setting off a chain reaction. The atomic bomb is an
example  of a chain fission. Used figuratively.
37. valence wall: a sort of protective mechanism by which the
charge of the case is compartmented to permit the individual to
work at least some of the time.
                           348
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

   To  get as early as possible as fast as possible and
find basic-basic is the direction and intent of therapy in
its first stages: to accomplish this (when it cannot be
done  immediately  merely by  returning and  finding
basic-basic which can and always should be tried) one
relieves the case and robs the engram bank by releasing
life units (painful emotion captured them) from the ally
computations.
   In brief, the entire intent and act of therapy is to find
the earliest engram and erase it and then proceed to
erase all other engrams as engrams so they can no
longer be discovered (they refile in the standard bank
but it takes a genius to find them there and a search of
hours and hours: hence, to the auditor they can be said
to have "erased," for they are no longer engrams and
are now experience). The first, last and only job of the
auditor is to find the earliest engrams available and
erase them. That  cannot be  said too often or too
strongly.
   The various ways to accomplish this are the tech-
niques and  arts of therapy. Anything  which  brings
about this erasure of engrams in place and their refiling
as experience is useful and legitimate whatever it in-
cludes. An engineer intends to remove  a mountain
which  is in the way of a river: his intent and all his effort
is directed toward moving that mountain. The ways and
means employed by him to move that mountain—by steam
shovel, hydraulic rams38 or dynamite—are the art and
techniques applied to do the job.
   There are three degrees of knowledge in our task:
(1) in Dianetics, we know the goal: we know the results
which come  about when that goal is attained; (2) we
38. hydraulic rams: devices by which the energy of descending
water is utilized to raise a part of the water to a height greater
than that of the source.
                           349
                 L. RON HUBBARD

know  the character of the obstructions between us and
the goal, but of the exact character of the obstruction
we can never learn too much; (3) the art and technique
of removing the obstruction between us and the goal are
legitimate only by  the test of whether or  not they
remove the obstruction.
   The method of attack on the problem can always be
improved by learning more about the character of the
factors in the problem, and by learning new arts and
techniques which can be applied to the problem, and by
studying to improve our skill in practicing existing arts
and  techniques. The currently existing art and tech-
nique is not to be considered optimum merely because it
does the job. The time and ease of work  could be
shortened by new techniques or advancing skills for old
techniques.
   All this is interjected so that Dianetics, unlike Aris-
totelian logic39 and natural history, will be recognized
as an advancing, changing  science. It is interjected at
this place because no auditor should just sit back with
this routine and never try to improve the routine.
   Very  well. This is the routine. It works but it can
never be made to work too quickly or too well.
     1. Place the patient in reverie and scout into the
       prenatal area to see if engrams are available for
        lifting without further work. If they are there
       and can be found, take the charge out of them
       and erase them if possible. Do not try to erase
       anything  as remote from  basic-basic as birth
        unless the file clerk insists on presenting birth.

39. Aristotelian logic: Aristotle's method of logic, characterized
by the syllogism, an argument or form of reasoning in which two
statements or premises are made  and a logical conclusion is
drawn from them. Example: All mammals are warmblooded
(major premise); whales are mammals (minor premise); there-
fore, whales are warmblooded (conclusion).
                           350
        EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

   In other words, get the subject into the prenatal
   area and look for the earliest engrams. Do not
   ask  for  specific  instances,  particularly for
   something like birth; just take whatever is pre-
   sented. If you can't get back early, take step 2.
2. Scout the patient's life while he is in reverie (do
   this in any event sooner or later if the case slows
   down but only if it slows down to a point where
   early engrams  are either not reducing or are
   without any  emotion). Establish in this scout
   whoever may have been depended upon by the
   patient, and be suspicious always that he has not
   told you the really important allies, but do not
   tell him you are suspicious.
3. Find out when the patient lost any ally through
   death or departure. Approach this moment and
   one way  or another, by getting earlier material
   and  this incident or getting just this incident,
   discharge the sorrow  of loss out of the inci-
   dents. Treat any  incident in  which  the ally
   departs or the patient is separated from the ally
   as an engram and erase it accordingly or run it
   until it has no "charge" of sorrow on it. If the
   "charge" holds, suspect an early moment of
   sorrow about this ally and find that and treat it
   as an engram.
4. First, last and always, the job is to get basic-
   basic and  then ever afterwards the currently
   existing earliest moment of pain or sorrow, and
   to erase every incident as it is advanced by the
   file clerk or found by repeater technique.
5. Any incident that hangs fire always has a simi-
   lar incident earlier, and the patient should be
   taken earlier for the prior incident when  an
   engram  will  not  "reduce"  on  recounting.
                       351
                 L. RON HUBBARD

    6. At any time the engrams start to become emo-
       tionless in tone, even though they reduce, sus-
       pect another ally computation and, early or late
        in the patient's life, get it and reduce it at least
       until the emotional discharge is gone. Do not
       get everything in a case restimulated by chang-
       ing from an unreduced incident to something
       which  looks more  fruitful, but reduce every-
       thing in view before you go looking for a new
       sorrow charge.
    7. It is better to reduce an emotionless early en-
       gram than it is to upset the case by hounding
       him for an ally computation when a cunning
        search fails to reveal one in sight. Erasing early
       emotionless engrams  will eventually bring a
       new ally computation into sight if you occasion-
        ally look for it.
    8. Consider that any holdup on a case, any unwill-
       ingness to cooperate, stems from ally computa-
        tion.
    9. Treat all demon circuits as things held in place
       by life force units absorbed into the bank and
       address the problem of demon  circuits by re-
       leasing charges of sorrow.
   10. Consider that loss by death or departure of an
       ally is identical with a death of some part of the
       patient and  that the reduction of a death  or
       departure  of an ally will restore that much life
       back to the patient. And remember that great
       sorrow charges are not always death or depar-
       ture but merely may  be a sudden  reversal of
        stand by the ally.
   Always keep in mind  that that person who most
nearly identifies himself with the person of the patient,
such as a sympathetic mother or father or grandparent
or relative or friend, is considered by the reactive mind
                          352
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

to be a part of the person himself and that anything
happening to this sympathetic character can be consid-
ered to have happened  to the patient. In such a case,
where an  ally has been found to have died of cancer,
you may  occasionally find the patient to have a sore or
scaly place where he supposed the ally's cancer to have
been.
   The  reactive mind  thinks in identities only. The
sympathetic prosurvival engram  identifies the patient
with another individual. The death or loss (by departure
or denial) of the other individual is therefore a reactive
mind  conviction that the patient has suffered some
portion of death.
   Emotional charges may be contained in any engram:
the emotion communicates, in the same tone level, from
the personnel around the "unconscious" person into his
reactive mind. Anger goes into an engram as anger,
apathy as apathy, shame as shame. Whatever people
have felt emotionally around an "unconscious" person
should be found in the engram which resulted from the
incident. When the emotional tone of personnel in an
engram  is obviously angry or apathetic from the word
content and yet the patient, recounting, does not feel it,
there is something somewhere which has a valence wall
between the patient and the emotional tone, and that
valence wall is nearly always broken  down  by the
discovery of an engram with a sorrow charge sometime
earlier or later in a patient's life.
   The  only legitimate reason for entering later por-
tions of a person's life before the prenatal area has been
well exhausted is to search for sorrow discharges occa-
sioned by the death, loss or denial by an ally. And by
"denial," we  mean  that the ally turned into an active
enemy  (real or imaginary) of the patient. The counter-
part of the ally, the pseudoally, is a person whom the
reactive mind  has confused  with the  real ally. The
                           353
                 L. RON HUBBARD

death, loss or denial by a pseudoally  can contain a
sorrow charge.
   According to theory, the only thing which can lock
up life units is this emotion of loss. If some method
existed of doing nothing  but freeing all life units, the
physical pain could be neglected.
   A Release is brought about, one way or another, by
freeing as many life units as possible from periods of
loss with minimal address to actual engrams.
   The  loss of an ally or pseudoally need contain no
other physical pain or "unconsciousness" than the loss
itself occasions. This is serious enough. It makes an
engram.
   Any  person who is suddenly discovered to be oc-
cluded in a patient's life can, with some reliability, be
considered  an ally or pseudoally. If, either while re-
membering  or returning, large sections of a patient's
association with another person are missing, that per-
son can  be called an occluded  person. It is a better
guarantee of ally status if the occlusion surrounds the
death of the person or a departure from or a denial by
that person. It is possible for occlusion to take place,
also, for punishment  reasons; which  is to say, the
occluded person may also be an archenemy. In such a
case, however, any memory  present will concern the
death or defeat or illness of the occluded person. Occlu-
sion of a person's funeral in the memory of a patient
would   theoretically label that  person  an  ally  or
pseudoally. Recollection of the funeral of a person but
occlusion of pleasant association might tend to mean
that the person was an enemy. Such rules are tentative.
But it is certain that any occlusion means that a person
had a vast and unrevealed significance in a patient's life
which should be explained.
   It may be remarked at this point that the recovery of
the patient will depend in large measure on the life units
                           354
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

freed from  his reactive bank. This is a discharge of
sorrow and may  be quite violent. The usual practice is
to "forget" such things and the "sooner forgotten, the
sooner healed." Unfortunately this does not work:  it
would be a happy thing if it did. Anything forgotten is a
festering sore when  it has despair connected with it.
The  auditor will find that every time he locates that
archdenyer, "forget  it," he will get the  engram  it
suppressed; when he can't locate the engram and yet
has found a somatic, a "forget it" or "don't think about
it" or "can't remember it" or "don't remember it" or
some other denyer will be sitting there in the context of
the engram. Forgetting is such unhealthy business that
when a thing has been "put out of mind," it has been
put straight into the reactive engram bank and in there
it can absorb life units. This "loopy" computation, that
forgetting things makes them bearable, is incredible in
view  of the fact that the hypnotist, for instance, gets
results with a positive suggestion when he puts one of
these denyers on the end of it. That has been known
now for a great many eons: it was one of the first things
the author was taught when he studied Asiatic practices.
From India it long ago filtered to Greece and Rome and
it has come to us via Anton Mesmer;40 it is a fundamen-
tal principle in several mystic arts; its mechanics were
known  even to the Sioux41 medicine man. Yet people at
large, hitherto unguided about it, and perhaps because
they lacked any real remedy, believed that the thing to
do with sorrow  was to "forget it." Even Hippocrates42
40. Anton Mesmer:  (1734-1815) Austrian physician who devel-
oped the practice of mesmerism—hypnotism.
41. Sioux: of or having to do with a member  of a tribe of
American  Indians living on the plains of northern United States
and southern Canada.
42. Hippocrates: (4607-370? B.C.) Greek physician, known as
"the father of medicine."

                           355
                 L. RON HUBBARD

remarks that the whole of an operation is not finished
until the patient has recounted the incident to all of his
friends in turn, and while this is inadequate therapy, it
has been,  like the confessional, a part  of popular
knowledge for lo, these many ages; yet people persist in
suppressing sorrow.
   The  auditor will many   times in his  activity be
begged by a patient "not to talk to me about so-and-
so's death." If he is foolish enough to heed this tearful
plea when  the patient is in reverie, then the auditor is
actively blocking a release. That is the first incident he
should get!
   Perhaps it would  be bad, without  Dianetic tech-
nique, to approach such things; but with our art it is
easy not only to enter the actual moment of the incident
but to then recount it until the tears and wailings are but
echoes  in the casebook.  Treating that loss like an
engram,  recounting it until it is no longer painful
emotionally, is to give back to the patient vitality he has
not had since the incident took place. And if the inci-
dent does not ease on a dozen recountings, slide back
down its sorrow track, just as you would with any other
engram, and find earlier and earlier moments. A patient
starting to discharge sorrow at the age of fifty may find
himself, two hours later, down in the basic area recount-
ing the primary moment of sorrow, at the moment when
the lost ally first became an ally. If the auditor can get
the whole chain on  any one  ally, exhausting sorrow
from  it from later to earlier, taking all the sorrow he
can get from  every incident and  stripping the entire
series of engrams of their charge, he may, in a few
hours' work, rid the case of enough emotional charge to
then begin an orderly erasure.
   Please observe this difference: the Achilles' heel of
the ally computation can be considered late on the chain
of incidents which concern that ally, which is to say that
                          356
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

we have a funnel here, upright in time, which can be
entered late and followed early: the Achilles' heel of the
contrasurvival engram chain is in the earliest incidents,
exactly the reverse of the emotionally painful engrams.
   To regain, out of the engram bank, life units so that
enough  free emotion is available to release or clear a
case, start with late ally or pseudoally losses and work
back earlier.
   To release the physical pain of the individual from
the engram bank, start early (as close to conception as
you can get) and work through to late.
   Physical pain in the contrasurvival chain can sup-
press painful emotion in the prosurvival chain.
   Painful emotion in the prosurvival chain can sup-
press physical pain in the contrasurvival engrams.
   If you were to draw a picture of the prenatal area of
the reactive engram bank, it would appear somewhat as
follows: a long line drawn  horizontally, representing
time, would have dark blots on it representing engrams;
one end  of the line would represent conception, the
other end birth. Above this line would lie a dark area,
like a heavy mist, extending from one end of the line to
the other and dropping down almost to it. Above this
dark mist would lie another horizontal line, the appar-
ent time track along which the patient returns. The first
long line is the actual time track; the mist is painful
emotion; the uppermost dark line is what the patient
mistakes and uses for his time track.
   The  painful emotion  is, of course, occasionally
tapped in the prenatal area itself, and the opportunity of
dispersing it by  so  discovering prenatal emotional
charges should  never be  overlooked by  the auditor:
indeed, once much  of the later-life painful emotion is
discharged, a great deal of painful emotion can  be
found amongst the early engrams. The better part of
this mist, and the first part the auditor often contacts, is
                           357
                 L. RON HUBBARD

in late life: although it originates, as charge, in late life,
it can be said to lie on this prenatal area.
   Moments  of loss, the loss by death or departure of
any  of the  patient's allies, and the loss of  an ally
because he turns against the patient, trap these emotional
charges and intervene them between  the patient and
actuality. Although the moment of loss was postbirth,
in infanthood, childhood, adolescence, adulthood, it
was retroactive in suppressing early engrams.
   This aspect of painful emotion is a key-in of the
early incidents by the moment of loss. In other words, a
moment  of great loss suppresses the individual on the
Tone Scale to a point where he approximates the level
of early engrams and these, keyed in, hold the units of
charge thereafter.
   Life  units so seized are  held and  are the  life of
engrams.  As in electricity, a positive charge glances
away from  a positive charge: like charges repel each
other. The analyzer, operating, it can be said for anal-
ogy, on the same kind of charge as that contained in the
engram, glances away from the engram, which remains
thereby unknown and intact.
   As  the individual returns into the area of the early
engrams—which   are held keyed in by virtue of the
seized charges from late incidents—he can quite com-
fortably pass by enormous quantities of aberrative ma-
terial without even suspecting it is present. However,
when the late moments of painful emotion are released,
the auditor can go immediately into the early area and
find engrams of physical pain which he had not hitherto
been able to uncover.
   Actually the late moments and the early moments
are both engrams: The news or observation of loss shuts
down  the analyzer, and everything which then enters it
is engramic and is filed in the reactive mind. Because
of sight and a memory of activity which is connected to
                           358
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

the present, all of which serves to keep an individual
oriented, a person can often recall the moment of loss,
whereas  he cannot  recall prenatal material, for he
lacked in that area any connection with orienting factors
which  would impinge  themselves on  the analyzer.
While  the prenatal infant definitely, especially in the
late stages, has an analyzer, experience and memory
are not coordinated and the existence of engrams is not
then suspected by the analytical mind. This is not true
of the  later periods of  life, particularly those after
speech has been learned and is being used. The fact of
the matter  is that this later-life ability to recall sur-
rounding circumstances without feeling any extremity
of pain also serves  to hide here the existence of an
actual engram: a person feels that he knows all about
such a moment  of loss analytically: actually he has no
contact with the engram itself, which contains a mo-
ment of "unconsciousness" of a lesser depth than that,
for instance, of the anesthetic variety. Childhood losses
of allies, however, can be so entirely occluded that the
allies themselves are not remembered.
   The  auditor will find very late engrams easy  to
contact. And he will also discover something else. The
patient may not be, as he is returning to such a moment
of loss, occupying his own body. This "phenomenon"
has been known for several thousand years and even the
latest mention of it merely said that it was "interesting"
without making  any further effort to find out why a
person, returned  to an area  in hypnotic regression,
sometimes could be found within himself (which is to
say, seeing things as though  he were  himself) and
sometimes saw things there and himself included as part
of the scenery (as though he had  a detached view).
Because  we have discovered that a natural function of
the mind is to return in an awake state to past incidents
does not alter the fact that we encounter aspects hitherto
                           359
                 L. RON HUBBARD

known  as mysterious "phenomena" of drug dreams
and hypnotism. We  are not by any means practicing
hypnotism. So, this means that hypnotism and Dia-
netics use similar abilities of the mind—it  does  not
mean  that such abilities belong in the field of hypno-
tism. And one of the various aspects of the return is that
it occasionally—or, in some  patients, continually—
encounters areas  where  the patient is "outside" his
body. These exteriorized views of self have two expla-
nations. One of them is valence, whereby the patient has
taken unto himself the identity of another person and
sees the scene through  that other person's eyes; the
other is exteriorization, in which painful emotion is
present in such quantity that the patient cannot occupy
himself. That painful emotion may stem from past or
future incidents to the moment when   the patient is
witnessing a scene to which he has been  Dianetically
returned. On several recountings of the scene, the pa-
tient will come nearer and nearer to an occupation of
his body until at last he sees the scene from within his
body. At  times no emotional  discharge (tears, etc.)
takes place until the patient has gone over the incident
several times and until he is within his own body. It is as
though, returned, he had to scout the ground to find out
if it was safe to occupy himself. If, after a few recount-
ings, no discharge such as tears takes place, then the
emotion  is suspended elsewhere, earlier or later but
usually much later. Exteriorization because of emotion
is the same as exteriorization because of physical pain
to all intents and purposes of the auditor. When he
encounters a case which, all the way up and down the
track, is continually exterior, he should address his skill
to the release of moments of painful emotion.
   All patients seem to have the idea that time heals
and that some incident of ten or twenty years ago no
longer has any  effect upon them. Time  is a great
                           360
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

charlatan, not a great healer, as has been remarked.
Time, by the processes of growth and decay, alters, and
environment  introduces new faces and activities and
thus alters the restimulators: a moment of painful emo-
tion in the past has, like any other engram, its own
restimulators and is, in addition, holding keyed in all
the early engrams which relate to it so that their restim-
ulators also work: every restimulator has a set of restim-
ulators which  are  associated to it by  the analytical
mind, which  cannot see the real restimulator. All this
makes a complex pattern, but complex in therapy only
if one does not know the source of aberration. If the
auditor returns the patient to any moment of painful
emotion in the past and runs it as an engram, he will
discover that all its original charge is present and will
discharge.
   He  will usually find the patient shying away from
any thought of going into the actual engram: the pre-
clear may attempt to detail all manner of bric-a-brac,
his own  thoughts, the reasons why it no  longer is
painful to him, and so forth. These thoughts and data
before the fact or after it are about as much  use in
running an engram  as a dissertation about "childhood
illusions" was to the problem of removing aberrations
from the human mind. The  auditor who will listen to
these "reasons" and "I remembers" in lieu of running
the engram  itself will not get his patient well and will
waste valuable hours of therapy. An auditor who will do
this belongs to the hand-patting school of thought which
believes sympathy has value. He does not belong in an
auditor's chair. It is wasted time, wasted valuable time,
to listen to anything the patient thought or said or did or
believed when  the patient should be  going into the
engram and running it as an engram. Certainly there is
a necessity to find out, from the patient's talk, where
                            361
                 L. RON HUBBARD

that engram is, but once it is located, all else is dross.43
   Take a  moment  when  a child is notified of his
parents' deaths. The auditor learns that the parents died
when  the child was two years of age. He can then
deduce, without further trouble or questions, that some-
body must  have told his patient about the death of the
parents, that there was a precise moment when  the
patient, then an infant, learned about that death. Re-
counting the matter in present time—without  being
returned—the  patient is using all the intervening years
as buffers against the painful emotion. The  auditor
returns the patient, without further preamble than the
usual routine of putting the patient into reverie, to the
moment  when  the patient learned of the death of the
parents. The patient may do a little fumbling to orient
himself in the past, but shortly he will have a contact
with the instant somebody informed him. Be assured, if
that child loved his parents at all, that an engram exists
here. The engram starts at the first moment the child is
informed, when the analyzer can be expected to have
shut down. The end of the engram is a moment, an
hour, a day or even a week  later when the analyzer
again turned on. Between the first moment of analytical
attenuation and a regain  of analytical power is the
engram.  The first minutes of it are the most severe.
Running  an hour of it (an hour of incident, not of
therapy) should be more than ample. Most auditors run
only the first few minutes several times to get a test of
whether or not there is going to be  any emotional
discharge. Run such a period of loss which must con-
tain painful emotion exactly as you would run a period
of physical pain and "unconsciousness" with another
source. For the period of painful emotion is an "uncon-
scious" period  just as certainly as if the patient had

43. dross: inferior, trivial or worthless matter.
                           362
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

been struck with a club. If the emotion in this period
can be  contacted with four or five recountings (each
time starting at the beginning, making sure the patient
is returned and  in contact with all perceptics of the
incident, and running it for what it is, an engram), then
the engram should be recounted until the emotion in it
is gone,  until the patient is bored  with  it or even
cheerful about it. If, after four or five recountings the
patient is still well exteriorized, still has not contacted
any emotion, then the charge is suspended elsewhere,
either earlier or later, and tries should be made in terms
of other losses, no matter how many years from the
unyielding  incident, to get a discharge. After  a dis-
charge is blown  off elsewhere, the incident first ad-
dressed, as in the case of the two-year-old who lost his
parents, may discharge. It is certain that sooner or later
such an  incident will discharge and it is also certain
that the case will not make much progress in getting
any bulk  of physically painful engrams until such a
severe incident is well discharged.
   Discharges  are contacted, often, in very  unlikely
places. Somewhere they contact the surface enough so
that a touch by the returned patient will permit the units
to free, permit engrams to key out and come into view
on the time track in their proper places.
   The  engram bank  becomes  severely distorted by
painful emotion and the areas of painful emotion be-
come severely distorted by physical pain elsewhere. The
filing system of the reactive mind is bad. The file clerk
is able to recover and  deliver to the auditor only so
many  painful emotion engrams or physical pain en-
grams  at a time. They  may be  disordered in their
positions on the track, which is to say, the auditor may
contact an early physically painful engram (always his
most important job), then contact one in midprenatal,
then one postbirth, and thereafter no other engrams of
                            363
                 L. RON HUBBARD

the physical pain variety seem to be present (engrams of
the physical variety which contain knockouts by acci-
dents, illnesses, surgery or injury). This does not mean
that the case is stalemated or that the patient is cleared.
It more likely means that there are incidents of the other
engram  variety (painful emotion, stemming from loss
by death, departure or reversal of allies) which can now
be contacted. The auditor then looks for and exhausts
the emotional discharge from the loss engrams, usually
later in life. These, with the units freed back in circula-
tion, allow earlier physical pain engrams to appear and
the auditor reduces each one of these he can contact. As
soon as he  can no longer find physically painful en-
grams, he goes back to a search for painful emotion
engrams  and  so forth alternately as necessary. The
mind, being a self-protecting mechanism, will sooner
or later block the patient from physical pain engrams if
painful emotion engrams are ready; and it will block
him from painful emotion engrams as soon as physical
pain engrams are ready.
   Start late to get painful emotion and work back
early. Start early to get physical pain engrams and work
toward late. And whenever any engram  is contacted,
run it until it is no longer troublesome in any way to the
patient or is entirely gone (refiled, but gone for all the
auditor and patient will be able to tell at the moment). If
an incident, after many recountings, shows no signs of
lightening (somatic decreasing or emotion either not
expressed  or not decreasing), only then  should the
auditor seek another incident. In a painful emotion
engram  the charge  is often later. In a physical pain
engram  the  suspension is invariably caused by the
existence of the same phrase in an earlier physical pain
engram  which can be contacted, and in such case the
auditor should go back over the phrases which brought
                           364
            EMOTION AND THE LIFE FORCE

him to the somatic until he finds a contact and a lift of
the engram.
   It should be extremely clear by this time that ration-
alization44 about action or conduct or conditions does
not advance therapy and is of no use beyond occasional
aid in locating engrams. It should be equally clear that
no amount of explanation or hand-patting or evaluation
by the auditor is going to advance the erasure of the
engrams  themselves. It should be plain that what a
person thought at the time of  the incident was not
aberrative. It should be clear that painful emotion puts
the compartments and demon circuits into the mind and
that the physical engrams hold the aberration and physi-
cal pain in the body.
   This entire operation is mechanical. It has nothing
to do with justified thought or shame or reasons. It has
only to do with exhausting the engram bank. When the
bulk of painful emotion is gone, the person is released;
when  the engram bank  is exhausted of content, the
person is cleared.
   The mind  is like a fine piece of equipment: as itself
and as a mechanism it is almost impossible to destroy
except by removing some of its parts: engrams do not
remove parts of the mind, they add unnecessary things
to it. Envision a beautiful, streamlined machine, oper-
ating perfectly—that would be the mind  without the
additions of pain and painful emotion. Now envision
this beautiful machine in the hands of a crew of mo-
ronic mechanics: they start to work around it and do not
know that what they do affects the machine at all. Now
they see that something is wrong with the machine and
are all unwitting that they have placed various assorted
monkey  wrenches, hatpins, old cigar butts and yester-
day's garbage into it and around it. Their first thought
44. rationalization: justified thought—the excuses one makes to
explain his irrational behavior.
                            365
                 L. RON HUBBARD

is to put something new on or in the machine to correct
its operation and they add  arbitrary gadgets to it in
order to patch up the machine's operation. Some of
these gadgets appear to help the machine (sympathy
engrams) and  can be  used, in the presence of the
remaining bric-a-brac, by the machine itself to help its
stability. The morons interrupt the fuel supply (painful
emotional engrams) or, like the Japanese captain who
beat the car with a switch when it would not go, try to
goad the machine (punishment drive) and so add more
trouble. At last this machine appears to be a hopeless
wreck, being almost hidden beneath everything added
to it and thrust into it, and the moron mechanics shake
their heads and say, "Let's put something else on it or it
will stop!" They do and the machine appears to stop
(goes insane).
   In Dianetics, a workmanlike job of clearing away
the debris in and around the machine is performed. It is
not done by adding any more debris. The moron me-
chanics (the content of the reactive mind) seem dis-
mayed  at this action, but the machine itself, suddenly
aware that something is being done for it which will
actually bring it into good running  operation again,
begins to help. The more debris which is cleared, the
better it runs and the less force the moron mechanics
have. The course of improvement should be, and is,
rapid. We can stop when the machine is running at least
as well as the "normal" machine (a Release) or we can
stop when we have all the debris out of the machine (a
Clear). When  we  have effected a Clear, we behold
something which has never been beheld before because
it never before existed in a debris-free state: a perfect
machine, streamlined, powerful, shining, able to adjust
and  care for all its own operations without  further
therapeutic assistance of any kind.
                           366
                     CHAPTER EIGHT
  Some Types of Engrams
   Two examples of each kind of engram are given so
that the auditor can clearly understand their differences:

           Contrasurvival Engram
   This is any kind of engram  which lies across the
dynamics and  has no alignment with purpose: fight
between  Mother and  Father shortly after conception.
Father strikes Mother in stomach. She screams (first
percepts are pain, pressure, sound of blow and scream)
and he says, "Goddamn you, I hate you! You are no
good. I'm  going to kill you!" Mother says, "Please
don't hit me again. Please don't. I'm hurt. I'm hurt.
I'm frantic with pain!" Father says, "Lie there and rot,
damn you! Goodbye!"
   In this engram we have a severe aberrative situation:
first, because it is early; second, because its content
says the person who  has it is hurt and frantic; third,
because it has a holder and is therefore apt to become
chronic ("Lie there"); fourth, because it can produce
disease ("and  rot"); fifth, because  it has religious
connotation about God and being damned; sixth, be-
cause it gives the individual a feeling other people are
no good  ("you"  applies to other people, ordinarily);
seventh, because it has an emotional tone, by content,
of hostility ("I hate you"); and  eighth, because the
individual, postbirth, has to live with these restimula-
tive persons, his father and mother. It has other addi-
tional effects, giving, like all engrams, two additional
and  unnecessary valences to  the individual, one of
                           367
                 L. RON HUBBARD

which, the mother's, is a coward valence and the other,
the father's, a bully valence. The individual may drama-
tize this in several ways: if he does not dramatize it, he
feels the pain (as he would then be in his own valence)
whenever it is restimuiated; if he dramatizes the mother,
he will feel the pain she received, which is a blow in the
stomach (whereas his own was on his head and heart);
if he dramatizes the father, he will be in trouble with
society, to say nothing of his own wife and children.
There is no winning with any engram of any kind, but
so long as a person has engrams, some  kinds, the
sympathy engram  particularly, serve to hold away an-
tagonistic engrams.
   The second  contrasurvival example is a morning
sickness engram where the mother is vomiting so vio-
lently that the compression on the child is severe and
renders it "unconscious." The mother is vomiting and
gasping and saying to herself between spasms, "Oh,
why  was I ever born! I knew I shouldn't have let him
come in me. I knew it, I knew it. It was wrong but he
had to do it anyway. Ugh, how nasty. Sex is nasty. It's
horrible. I hate sex. I hate men. I hate them. Oh, ugh, it
won't come up, it won't come up. I am so sick at my
stomach and it won't come up."
   In this engram we have something a woman might
dramatize if she were pregnant but which a man could
never dramatize as pregnancy but only by being sick at
his stomach. Much morning sickness seems to be an
aberration stemming from engrams: somewhere back in
time some mother may have vomited from food poison-
ing and started the whole thing—perhaps in the days
when man  was still in trees. Now note that the mother is
throwing up, that the content of her stomach is being
regurgitated: the engram, however, says that it won't
come up: when this is dramatized with the individual in
his own valence, he experiences pressure on him and
                           368
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

"unconsciousness"  and thus such a dramatization is
impossible; when this is dramatized it must be drama-
tized as the mother, but the action is not dramatized so
much as the command and we get a condition where the
individual with such an  engram, when  he  is sick,
cannot vomit. The command of the engram is more
important than  the action people take in it. On a
reactive level there is no rationality. If this were on a
conscious level, where it would not be aberrative, of
course, the action could be mimicked and then would
contain actual vomiting, the action on the conscious
level being more important than the word content.
   In therapy, when we encounter this engram, we may
have  difficulty entering  it because  it says  that "I
shouldn't have let him come in me," which is a denyer.
We  also find, with the "It won't come up," a holder.
The engram  will most certainly lift the moment these
words and the somatic lift, and these words could not
interrupt the engram. If the engram does not lift, it is
because there is a previous engram with much the same
content (the aberree  has a  pattern of dramatization
which he repeats over and over and over, giving people
around him many  incidents which are more or less alike
except in their point in time). This could be restimu-
lated in the environment (but not in therapy) to a point
where it would cause madness, for "it" may also refer
to the child, who, identifying himself with the word
"it," then cannot rise to present time. In therapy the
engram  is somewhat drained of power just by being
touched with the returned analytical mind; further, the
auditor discovers the patient is not moving on the track
and a scout of the situation soon discovers the holder,
for the patient will sooner or later say he "can't come
up" even if the auditor has not guessed it.
   In the aberrative sphere, this engram would prob-
ably put a heavy block across the second dynamic and
                           369
                 L. RON HUBBARD

we would find the person in whose reactive mind it was
being frigid,' prudish and sharp  with children (all of
which  go together in various combinations). Further,
we would find an apprehension that "he" was going to
have to do something when he found out it was wrong.
In the psychosomatic sphere it might cause headaches
during or because of coitus or a tendency to nausea
whenever coitus was performed. Any of the phrases of
this engram, like any other phrases in any other en-
gram, would tend to give him both the somatic and the
aberration, providing, of course, the individual was in a
state of low analytical power as found in weariness or
slight illness. Thus, this one is waiting until somebody
says during a future "unconsciousness" period, prefer-
ably in a voice like the mother's would sound through
the walls of the abdomen and womb, "Ugh, how
nasty!" or some other phrase to key it in. "Nastier," by
the way, would not key it in. "Ugly," despite a similar
syllable to "Ugh," would not key it in. The sound of
vomiting itself probably would key it in.

            Prosurvival Engram
   This could be any engram which, by content only,
not by  any  real aid to the individual containing it,
pretended to assist survival. Let us take a coitus en-
gram: Mother  and Father are engaged in intercourse
which, by pressure, is painful to the unborn child and
which  renders him "unconscious" (common   occur-
rence, like morning  sickness, usually present in any
engram  bank). Mother is saying, "Oh, I can't live
without it. It's wonderful. It's wonderful. Oh, how
nice. Oh, do it again!" and Father is saying, "Come!
 1. frigid: habitually failing to become sexually aroused, or ab-
normally repelled by sexual activity: said of a woman.
                           370
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

Come!  Oh,  you're so good. You're so  wonderful!
Ahhhh!"  Mother's orgasm puts the finishing touch on
the "unconsciousness" in the child. Mother says, "It's
beautiful." Father, finished now, says, "Get up," mean-
ing she should take a douche (they do not know she is
pregnant) and then begins to snore.
   Obviously, this is a valuable incident because one
"cannot live without it." Furthermore, "it's beautiful,"
also, "it's wonderful." But it is also extremely painful.
It cannot be followed because it has first something
which beckons part of the mind back, "Come!" and
then, later, tells it to "Get up." Things that are "beau-
tiful" and "wonderful" can  cause our patient, not in
therapy, to have an orgasm when she looks at beautiful
and  wonderful things, providing they have  been so
labeled.
   Dramatization  of this can be  in either the father
valence or the mother valence: to dramatize it in the
personal valence would mean physical pain. Thus, the
individual holding this will be found, varied only by his
other coitus engrams, to be, as Father, disgusted after
the act and telling his partner to "Get up." The emotion
is contained in how the words "Get up" were spoken:
this is a telegraphed emotion out of voice tones, not
word content: engrams always contain both.
   In therapy, we find the reactive mind very chary2 of
letting this one come to view because, after all, one
"cannot  live without it." There are whole classes of
these favorable evaluation phrases in engrams,  and
wherever he comes upon one, the auditor will find the
preclear's reactive mind holding out on him. "I don't
want to lose you," "Hold on to this," "I can't let go of
this, I'd fall," and so forth. But  this is, after all, just
another engram and "pleasant" or not is aberrative.

2. chary: cautious, wary.
                            371
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   Masochistic3 and sadistic impulses often stem from
coital engrams which contain those specific things, so
the auditor is not to infer that merely because this coitus
is painful to the child, it will make the child a masochist
or a sadist. If masochism or sadism is present in the
patient, it is caused by engrams which contain rapes,
beating for sexual  gratification, enjoyment of pain,
etc., and engrams which homonymically seem to state
that sex and pain are alike, such as a "normal" coitus
which  says, "It hurts so good! Hurt me  again, Bill.
Hurt me again! Oh, shove it in me, way up! Make it hurt
so I can come." Dramatized by a boy, this might very
well bring about sodomy because the engram is not an
observed  action but a series of commands,   literally
taken.
   Thus, our  prosurvival coitus engram, as the first
example of one here, is relatively innocent in a person's
aberrative pattern. But by an accident of words, it could
be very different in its aberrative effect.
   The second prosurvival example concerns another
prenatal engram. (One auditor commented, while he
was  being cleared, that he "had thought of my  life
BD—before   Dianetics—as a graph of years, in which
the time from conception to birth occupied one-fiftieth
of the linear distance between conception and present
time, but now think of the prenatal period as occupying
two-thirds of the distance between the beginning and
now." The  prenatal area, cleared, at last went back to
being one-fiftieth.)
   The mother, subject to high blood pressure, continu-
ally brought about  a condition of great pain in the
unborn  infant, particularly when  she was  agitated.
3. masochistic: of, concerning or pertaining to the getting of
sexual pleasure from being dominated, mistreated or hurt physi-
cally or otherwise by one's partner.
                          372
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

(This is a prime source of migraine headache.) What-
ever it was which agitated her into high blood pressure
at the moment  this engram was  received was un-
known—and   much of the "plot" of prenatal life may
remain unknown  for the explanatory data may come
before the pain and the engram, and a complete record-
ing only happens after the instant of pain when some
degree  of  "unconsciousness" comes   about. The
mother, at the beginning of the engram, when pressure
began to build up and stiffen out the unborn child, was
weeping. She was by herself. "Oh, how am I ever going
to get out of it? Everything looks so drab and colorless
to me. Oh, why  did I ever start it; 1 can't possibly go
through with it. But I have to, I have to. I would be sick
if I didn't. Oh, Lord, everything comes in on me at
once. I am utterly trapped. But there, I will go through
with it, I'll feel better. I'll be brave and do it. I've got
to be brave. I am brave. I am the bravest person in the
world. I have to be and I am." The pressure receded.
   Exactly what this was about will remain a mystery to
the auditor who reduced it, the patient who had it, the
author and the reader: such is often the case with an
engram. They  are conceived in misunderstanding and
they aren't to be understood, save mechanically, and
only deleted from the engram bank.
   This is a particularly dangerous engram to have for
it contains a manic in the words "bravest person in the
world." "I," of course, is ordinarily used by the unborn
child to be himself when the engram is at last able to
affect an analyzer in which there is speech. Before that
moment,  of course, there is just a recording without
word  meaning, although  even before the words are
given meaning, the engram  can be aberrative. This is
further dangerous because it says, "I'm trapped," and
because it says, "Everything comes in on me at once."
"Trapped"  is our enemy, the holder. But "Everything
                            373
                 L. RON HUBBARD

comes  in on me at once" is a grouper. Further, the
remainder of the content, as an engram, will not com-
pute in the analyzer. It says one "must go through with
it," but that one "cannot go through with it," that one
"would  get sick if I didn't go through with it" but that
"it is impossible." Everything being equal to every-
thing, as our moronic enemy, the reactive mind, com-
putes, this engram both repels and attracts therapy: it
brings about a condition of indecision in the analytical
mind  which is insufferable.
   The individual holding this engram might find him
self—as it acted as aberration—first in the manic por-
tion of being the bravest person in the world and then,
regressed a trifle by a slight change of restimulators
such as his migraine headache getting bad, find himself
utterly undecided about any course of action and with
the telegraphed emotion,  contained in the tears, of
being very depressed. But this is prosurvival because it
apparently dictates a way  out of  a situation. As an
additional factor, it brings, with its phrase about "every-
thing being drab and colorless," colorblindness, at least
in recall, so that the recalled images of the past are
"seen"  in the mind as having no color. It can bring
about, if added to by enough subsequent dramatiza-
tions, actual perceptic colorblindness. The whole en-
gram  is very likely, when combined with other factors,
to place the individual in an institution with all of his
somatic turned on (migraine) and, because of the group-
er, all other pain he felt in his life turned on as well. This
grouper bunches the track of the engram bank all into one
place and then puts the individual squarely in that place.
   In therapy, when this was contacted, a case which
had  been classified as "insane" came  into a release
state of "normal." The  patient had been institutional-
ized, was in the fetal position and had regressed physi-
cally. That she kept screaming these exact words and
                           374
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

weeping had been placed on her record as the manifes-
tation of a childhood delusion. The case was opened by
repeater technique, using the words she kept screaming,
after she had had her attention fixed upon the auditor by
loud, monotonous noise. There were some former inci-
dents containing these words which had to be reached
before the incident in dramatization would ease. How-
ever, engrams like this are commonly contacted in more
or less "normal" people and are relieved as routine. A
very high degree of restimulation had been experienced
by this patient and several severe "loss" engrams had
occurred which had kept earlier content keyed in.
   It might also be remarked in re4 all these "trapped,"
"caught," "can't get out of it" cases (which is to say,
where there are several holders and also a high quantity
of painful emotion) that certain fetal aspects are visible
even when the case is "normal." A shiny skin, a spinal
curvature, only partial development of the gonads: all
are common  and one or many  such signs may be
present.

            Sympathy Engram
   The first example is an illness suffered by a patient
when he was a small boy. At two years and a half, he
was taken ill with pneumonia. He had a considerable
background of attempted abortion and the usual engram
cargo received from  aberrated parents. He  was ex-
tremely worried about the quarrels and upsets of his
own home; numbers of his engrams had been keyed in
and amongst them was his pneumonia. His grandmother
came and took him to her home because, whenever he
was ill, his mother would go away and leave him. The
incident was extremely occluded and was only reached
after several late-life painful emotion engrams had been

4. in re: in regard to.
                           375
                 L. RON HUBBARD

discharged and after almost a hundred prenatal physical
pain engrams had  been released. The grandmother,
when  he was crying in delirium, mistook his activity as
demonstrating that he was "conscious," which he was
not, and she  sought to reason with him.  She said,
"Those people don't really mean to be so bad to you,
honey. I know they have good hearts really. You just do
what they say and believe what they tell you and you'll
be all right. Now promise you'll do that, won't you,
honey." The  child, in the last depths of reaction, re-
sponded and promised her he would believe them and
do what they said. "I love you very much," the grand-
mother continued, "and I will take care of you. Now,
don't worry, honey. Forget it now. Just get a little rest."
   The phrases contained in this engram, because they
were on a trance level and because they could be held in
place by his fever and pain, produced a very profound
effect on the child. He had to believe whatever was
said. This means  literal belief and cost him, for one
thing, much of his sense of humor. Because he wanted
to be all right, he had to believe what his parents said;
the things they had  said, prenatally, contained every
kind of a bad datum possible about who was the boss
and how  much fun it was to beat the mother and so
forth. All this, then, was made into "true data" which,
because his sympathy engram said so, he had to believe.
No  more horrible curse could ever be laid on anyone
than those in sympathy engrams which say, "Believe
what  is said,"  "Believe what  is read,"  "Believe
people," because that engram  means literally that the
poor old analyzer will now never be able to evaluate its
own  data unless, by utter rebellion, the individual ne-
gates against the whole world, which can occasionally
be done. Let this individual, however, as this one did,
marry a woman   who has characteristics similar to his
grandmother's (a pseudograndmother) and he becomes
                           376
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

prey  to (a) the pain and  illness, chronic, which he
experienced in his grandmother sympathy engrams
(necessary to get and keep her sympathy); and (b) all his
prenatals, since the pseudograndmother throws him into
his own valence: This makes him quarrel, which makes
his wife fight back, and suddenly this woman is not
pseudograndmother but pseudomother. Exit sanity.
   In therapy, when we  encounter this sympathy en-
gram  at last, it is discovered to have been buried in two
ways: (a) it was aligned with purpose; and (b) it had a
forge tier mechanism on it.
   Because  of (a), the self-protection of the mind per-
mitted it to give up the engram only when  enough
tension was taken off the case to permit the mind to get
along without this engram.
   In (b) we have a device which is common in en-
grams. Whenever we  try to run an engram which has
somatics enough even to make the preclear roll around
on the couch but which contains no word content, we
suspect  a forgetter mechanism. There  are evidently
people in this world who think that the panacea5 for all
mental  discomfort is to forget. "Put it out of my
mind," "If I remembered it I would go mad," "Junior,
you never remember a thing I tell you," "Nobody can
remember anything," "Can't remember," and just plain
"I don't know," as well as the master of the family of
phrases, "Forget  it!": all bar information from the
analyzer. A  whole  case, freshly opened, may  keep
answering  everything with one of these denyers (there
are many   other kinds of denyers, if you recall). Re-
peater technique  will eventually begin to release the
phrase from various engrams and  begin to show up
incidents. To have a grandmother who says, "Forget it"
continually every time a child gets hurt is to be cursed

5. panacea: a remedy for all kinds of diseases or troubles.
                           377
                           L. RON HUBBARD

            beyond  Macbeth.6 A  forgetter, used by an ally, all by
            itself and with practically no pain or emotion present
           will submerge  data which, in recall, would not be
            aberrative but which, so buried—by a forgetter—makes
             things said just before it aberrative and literal.
              Hence,  this engram remained utterly out of sight
           until the case was almost finished and as soon as it was
            contacted, the already deintensified reactive bank col-
            lapsed and the patient was cleared.
             The second example of the sympathy engram con-
            cerns a childhood experience of a patient who, at the
           beginning of therapy, was a remarkably confused indi-
           vidual. Here is an example of a sympathy engram
           which is not uncommon. (It will not be primary in any
            ally computation but, because it is often repeated in the
           same  case, becomes aberrative.) This incident occurred
           when  the child had been badly hurt in an accident. He
            had received a fractured skull and concussion and was
           for many days in a coma. He had never learned that
           such an incident happened to him although examination
            afterwards disclosed evidence of the fracture and dis-
           closed also that while he had known there was a ridge
           in his skull he had  never wondered  about it for an
            instant. His father and mother were, at the time, on the
            verge of divorce and, in the presence of the only partly
            conscious child, quarreled several times in these few
            days, evidently upset by his accident and recriminative7
            as to whose fault it was. The first part of the series of
           engrams within this one large engram are unimportant
           as an example save that they brought about a condition
            where the mother put herself forward as a defender of
            the child who was not under attack by the father. The

it'
|i            6. Macbeth:  title character of a play by Shakespeare, tortured by
              his guilt for murders he committed rising to power in Scotland.
              7. recriminative: accusing in return.
                                        378
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

mother's  conversation aberratively indicated that the
father was attacking the child, and the words in an engram
rather than the action are important as aberrative factors.
Finally the father left the house and home. The mother sat
down by the boy's trundle bed8 and, weeping, told him she
would keep him from dying, that she would "work and
slave and wear her fingers to the bone" to keep him
alive and "I am the only reason you are alive. I have
defended you against that beast and monster. If it were
not for me, you would have died long ago and I am
going to care for you and protect you. So don't pay any
attention to anything people tell you. I am  a good
mother. I have always been a good mother. Don't listen
to them. Please, baby, stay here and get well, please!"
   This remarkable piece of nonsense came, of course,
straight out of her reactive mind. She did not feel guilty
about the way she was taking care of the baby, though
she had  done  her  cyclic worst for  this child since
conception. (There is no such thing as guilt nor a guilt
complex that is not straight out of an engram that says,
"I am guilty" or some such similar phrase.)
   Here  is ambivalence at work. By  ambivalent is
meant  power on  two sides. It had better be called
multivalence, for it is demonstrable that people have
many  valences, twenty or thirty not being unusual for a
"normal."  This mother, with her wild pleas and her
mawkish9 sentimentality, shifted around in valences like
a whirling dervish.10 She was capable of being viciously
8. trundle bed: a low bed moving on small wheels. It can be
pushed under a regular bed when not in use.
9. mawkish: sentimental in a tearful way, so as to be sickening.
10. dervish: a member of any various Moslem orders of ascetics
(ones who  lead a life of austere self-discipline, especially as an
act of religious devotion or penance), some of which employ
whirling dances and the chanting of religious formulas to pro-
duce a collective ecstasy.
                           379
                 L. RON HUBBARD

cruel, torturing her child with, as the Navy calls them,
"capricious" and unusual punishments": yet one  of
these valences  which, unfortunately  for the patient,
only turned on when  he was  ill, was one of savage
protection for the child and assurances to him that she
loved him and would never leave him to starve, etc. She
formed,  in this child, because of her own  reactive
pattern and her inabilities, close to a thousand engrams
before he was ten. This particular specimen given was
fairly standard.
   The aberrative aspect of this engram was a "convic-
tion" that if one's mother were not around and if one
were not on good terms with her, one would starve, die
or suffer generally. Also, it meant, because of the time
it was given, having a bad headache if one wanted to
live. The whole series of these engrams made a highly
complex pattern of psychosomatic ills including sinusi-
tis, a chronic rash, allergies and numerous other actual
physical ills, despite the fact that the patient had always
tried to be as forthright in his physical being as possible
and was not in any way a hypochondriac.
   In  therapy, the entire chain of fights in this area,
much  of the prenatal area and  most late-life painful
emotion engrams  were relieved before this sympathy
engram  displayed itself.
   As a note on the subject of sympathy engrams, these
are in no wise exclusively found in childhood: they exist
prenatally and postnatally—and sometimes  late in life.
Any persons who  defend the child against further abor-
tion attempts become part of the sympathy engram
chains and,  of course, they are allies whose loss is
something to be dreaded. Late sympathy engrams have
been discovered at fifty years of age. One, discovered at
11. capricious: characterized by or subject to whim; impulsive
and unpredictable.
                           380
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

thirty, consisted of a nymphomaniac nurse who, during
the period when  the patient was still under ether and
still in pain, talked to him obscenely, played with  his
genitals and still managed, by the content of her re-
marks, to plant a sympathy engram which produced a
very serious psychic condition in the patient. (It is in no
wise true that many cases of sexual play exist while the
patient is under anesthetic or drugged, but because this
is a standard psychotic reaction of delusion is no reason
to rule that the incident cannot occasionally happen.)
   The sympathy  engram only has to sound like a
sympathy engram to become one: there is no evaluation
of actual intent by the reactive mind.

          Painful Emotion Engram
   Three  of these are given to illustrate a type of each.
They  can happen  at any period, including prenatally,
but are most easily tapped in more recent life, when
they will then lead back to early incidents of physical
pain, sympathy engrams and the like. The first example
is a case of loss by death of an ally. A girl, at the age of
eighteen, was given a painful emotion engram by being
told by her parents that her aunt was dead. The aunt was
a prime  ally. The patient, treated at the age of thirty-
one, recalled the death of her aunt but attributed her
sorrow to other things such as a restimulation of what
she called her own  "death instinct" (which was, in
reality, engramic chatter by Mother about wanting to
die and get it all over with). Actually, the aunt had been
a large factor in dissuading the mother from "getting
rid of" the child and had made the mother promise that
she would  not. The aunt had  also tended the child,
postnatally, through illnesses and was, in fact, the only
refuge for the girl when a termagant12 mother and a

12. termagant: boisterous, quarrelsome, scolding; shrewish.
                           381
                 L. RON HUBBARD

religiously bigoted father would converge on  her, for
neither had wanted her and there had been a number of
efforts to terminate the pregnancy preterm.13
   Her father communicated  the information to the girl
with a sonorous14 voice and appropriately long face. "I
want you  to be very respectful at the funeral, Agatha."
("What  funeral?") "Your aunt just passed to the great
beyond." ("She's dead?") "Yes, death must come to us all
and we must  all be prepared someday to meet the fate
which waits for us at the end of the road. For it is a long
path, life, and God and flaming hell wait at its other end
and someday  we all must die. Be sure you are very re-
spectful at the funeral." She had begun to pale at the word
"funeral," she was to all purposes "unconscious" when
she heard the first mention of "death" and she remained
"unconscious," if moving about, for two whole days.
   The case had been very slow until this engram was
discovered and run. An enormous discharge of grief took
place, which had  never before manifested  itself. It was
reduced to boredom in eight recountings, at which the first
moment  of the aunt's intervention in the abortion attempts
was automatically contacted and released. Thereafter the
case made   progress in  the prenatal area, prohibition
against "getting rid of it" having been removed; and,
according to theory, free units being available, the charge
had come  off the prenatal area. There were five other
allies in this case, the girl, with parents who had been so
wicked  to her, having attached herself to anyone who
would  show her interest and refuge. As lower physical
pain came into view, more allies showed up and more
painful emotion engrams  were discharged, permitting
new physically painful engrams to display themselves.

13. preterm: before the end of the period a pregnancy normally
lasts.
14. sonorous: resonant, giving a deep, powerful sound.
                          382
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

   The next example is an engram from a patient who
had all his life been reared and cared for by "moneyed
parents." He had a very severe prenatal area which yet
would  not lift to view. It was discovered at length that
his nurses had been his only source of love and affec-
tion and that his mother, being a woman who liked to
unsettle the household  as  often as possible, would
discharge a nurse every time she found the child had
grown fond of her, even though the mother herself made
it plain that she considered  the child "nasty."  The
engram: the boy sees his nurse coming out of the house
with her suitcase in her hand: he stops playing in the
yard and runs to her to "scare her": she is quite angry
from the scene she has just had—an Irish girl—and yet
she smooths her face and kneels down beside him. "I
am  leaving, Buddy. I can't stay here anymore. No, I
can't be your nurse now. But there, there, you'll have
another one. Don't cry. It's not good for little boys to
cry. Goodbye, Buddy. I love you." And she goes off out
of sight.
   He  was stunned from  the first instant she said she
was leaving. The prohibition against crying was from
an ally: whatever an ally says must be good and must be
believed because allies are survival and one must sur-
vive: allies therefore must be believed. He had not cried
except on rare occasions of enormous sorrow in all the
years thereafter. Eight of these departures were touched
without result but with this one they all loosened and
discharged, one after the other.
   Any departure of or from an ally contains an emo-
tional charge  which,  if it will not display  itself, is
elsewhere suppressed.
   The third example of the painful emotion engram is
the third type: loss of an ally by reversal. A wife loved
her husband very dearly. They had gotten along well
together until his parents came into the vicinity and
                           383
                 L. RON HUBBARD

began to malign his wife. He was furious with them for
it and quarreled with them. His wife was a pseudoally,
and unfortunately that ally had told the child to believe
his parents. (This is fairly chronic with allies—if they
would give the child correct data when he is emotion-
ally disturbed or  ill, there would be  less trouble. A
remark such as, "Well, you'll grow up someday and be
able to care for yourself," is much better than a hatful
of Emersonian15  platitudes.16) This brought about a
tragic reversal. The reactive mind, restimulated at the
sight of his wife (the husband was  emotionally dis-
turbed, very restimulated already by his parents) threw
in the data that one must believe one's parents. This
made  his wife no good, as per their aberrative chatter.
He went into his father's valence to escape this impon-
derable situation and that valence beat women.  He
struck his wife repeatedly, dramatizing one of his fa-
ther's engrams: "I hate you. You are no good. 1 should
have listened to them sooner. You're no good."
   The  wife was in therapy. This charge suppressed
itself, not out of shame for her husband's actions but for
the mechanical reason  that the early area had to be
relieved before this one would  discharge (smart  file
clerk). Her case had slowed down to a point where the
board looked entirely clear although somatics (which
she attributed to natural causes) and aberrations (which
she  said were  reasonable reactions) still manifested
themselves. Suddenly  this incident appeared when

15. Emersonian: of Ralph Waldo Emerson: (1803-1882) Ameri-
can essayist, poet and lecturer. Emerson was part of the transcen-
dentalist movement, which advised people to look for God-given
power  within themselves.  His best-known  essay  is "Self-
Reliance." Many  in the nineteenth century took inspiration from
Emerson,  especially through his brief and pointed sayings and
urgings, such as "Hitch your wagon to a star."
16. platitudes: flat, dull or trite remarks, especially those ut-
tered as if they were fresh or profound.
                           384
              SOME TYPES OF ENGRAMS

repeater technique was used on the auditor's random
guess, "I hate you," for it was known that she said this
now  and then to her husband. Three recountings dis-
charged  this painful emotion despite its violence (it
made her weep until she almost choked). Immediately
twelve prenatals, all fights between her mother and
father (an  ally, of  which  her  husband  was   the
pseudoally) wherein the mother beat her abdomen and
cursed the child, appeared and were erased and the case
progressed to Clear.
   Loss of dogs, dolls, money, position, even the threat
of a loss: anything may bring about a painful emotion
engram  so long as it is loss. It may be loss by death,
loss by departure, loss by reversal. Anything connected
with the life of the patient and associated by him with
his own survival seems to be capable of locking up life
units when lost. A condition of such painful emotion is
that it has early physically painful engrams upon which
to append. The  physically painful engram is still the
villain but it has an accomplice in the painful emotion
engram.
                           385
                     CHAPTER NINE
 Mechanisms and Aspects of
    Therapy—Part One
            The Case Entrance
   Every case presents a new problem of entrance. No
two human  beings are exactly alike and no two cases
will follow the exact pattern. However, this presents no
problem  to Dianetics since the mechanics are always
the same.
   There  are three case classifications: the sonic recall,
the nonsonic recall and the imaginary  recall (what
auditors call a "dub-in" recall).
   In the sonic recall case, the entrance is very easy.
But in all cases the basic procedure is the same. Put the
patient in reverie (and don't worry too much   if he
doesn't go into a very deep reverie because reverie only
serves to fix his attention on himself and the auditor
and you can at least accomplish that). Install a cancel-
ler. Return him  to childhood  to pick up  a pleasant
incident and then find a minor pain incident such as a
slap in the face. Run him through this a few times just
to let him get the idea. If he doesn't respond well, put
him into yesterday and let him ride to work and ask him
about sounds and sights, then send him to childhood
again.
   The  object of finding a minor incident such as a
slapped  face is to find out if the patient has a pain
shut-off. A pain  shut-off is not particularly difficult in
Dianetics. You can get back before the command which
installed the anesthesia, but it is interesting to know
about it because you want to look for it early in the
case. See then if the patient has an emotional shut-off.
                           386
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

This again is not particularly embarrassing but again is
data you want to find eventually.
   Test now to find out if the patient is within himself or if
he is outside himself, watching himself. If he is exterior-
ized, you are working a case which  has considerable
walled-up emotion in it which must be discharged.
   Now  make  a try to get basic-basic. You might surprise
yourself and get it. And you might work fifty hours for
it, releasing the case the while. Get whatever the file
clerk will give you in the prenatal area and what you
get, reduce.
   Whether  basic-basic is contacted or not, locate as
many  prenatals as will present themselves without much
coaxing and reduce each one.
   If you  find no prenatals, bring  the patient up to
present time but remind him to keep his eyes closed.
Now  ask him  a few  questions about his family, his
grandparents, his wife or, if the preclear is a woman,
her husband. Ask about any former husbands or wives.
Ask  about children. And ask particularly about death.
You are looking for a painful emotion engram, an instant
of loss which will discharge.
   Finding out about one, even if it is just the death of a
favorite dog, return the preclear to it and run it from the
first moment he hears the news of it and for the ensuing
few minutes of it. Then start it again. Reduce the moment
as an engram. You want an emotional discharge. Run it
several times. If you don't get a discharge, find some
other moment  of loss, some failure, something, any-
thing which  will discharge: but do it all quietly as if
with sympathy. Lacking  any success, start in repeater
technique, never for a moment giving any intelligence
that you are anything but  calmly concerned  for his
welfare (even if some of his gyrations worry you). Try
such phrases as "Poor little ___  ," using his or her
childhood name.
                           387
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   When  the preclear has repeated this several times
(the auditor at the same time stating that the somatic
strip1 will return to any incident containing the phrase
to assist the "suck down"), he may find himself in a
high-tension incident which will discharge. If nothing
discharges yet, keep calm  (all this work will pay divi-
dends  in the next session or the next or next), keep
searching, keep observing. There is emotional charge
here somewhere which will discharge. Try other combi-
nations of words such as those which would be said to a
sick and worried child, make the preclear repeat them.
   If you have had no success as yet, make another test,
without saying it is a test, to see if the preclear is actually
leaving present time. Don't let him "try to remember" —
you want  him  to return and that is another process,
although it is just as natural to the brain. If he is stuck
in present time, start him on repeater technique again,
suggesting bouncers: "Get out and never come back!"
"You can't ever return!" etc., which would account for
his being still in present time. If he is not returning
after some of this, start in with holder phrases: "I'm
stuck!" "Don't move!" and so forth.
   Stay calm, never appear anxious. If you get neither a
discharge nor an engram with repeater technique in this
first session and if you get no motion on the track, read
this manual again and  try your patient not later than
three days after this first session. At that time some of
the data you have asked for may be available.
   Ordinarily, however, you will receive either a prenatal
1. somatic strip: a physical indicator mechanism which has to
do with time. The auditor orders the somatic strip. The somatic
strip can be sent back to the beginning of an engram and will go
there. The somatic strip will advance through an engram in terms
of minutes counted off by the auditor, so that the auditor can say
that the somatic strip will go to the beginning of the engram, then
to the point five minutes after the engram began, and so form.
                           388
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

or a discharge and if you get a discharge, then ask the
somatic strip to go back for the prenatal it was sitting
on. Reduce  everything you can find. If birth turns up
and seems to be in full recall, try to reduce that but do
so in the knowledge that it probably will not lift very
far and in the knowledge that you had better run it over
and over and over to deintensify it all you can.
   Sometimes  the preclear will go into a deeper reverie
than you wish. But do not try to wake him into a higher
level. Work him where he is. But if he seems to be in
something approaching hypnotic trance, be very careful
of your language. Never tell him, for instance, to go
back  there and stay there until he finds something.
That's a holder. Don't use holders and bouncers and
groupers, et al., on anyone  in Dianetics. "Will you
please return to the prenatal area?" "Let's see if the
somatic strip can locate an early moment of pain or
discomfort." "Please pick up the somatic at the begin-
ning and roll the engram." "What do you hear, please?"
"Continue" (when you want him to keep on going from
the point of the engram where he is to the later end of the
engram). "Recount that again, please."
   There's nothing  to be nervous about. If you  get
nervous, then he'll get nervous.
   Sometimes  you run into a pain shut-off. This has a
tendency  to put the pain into the muscles  and  the
muscles will jump and quiver and the patient may sense
this and still feel nothing more. Once in a great while a
patient will have such a thorough pain shut-off that he
bounces about, all unconscious of the action, and al-
most falls from couch to floor. If you run into this, do
not be alarmed: the pain is locked in somehow. Get
early enough and you'll locate a somatic he can feel, or
go late and find an emotional charge.
   Don't  be  misled if he tells you, with  regard to
emotion, that he has worked it all out in psychoanalysis
                           389
                 L. RON HUBBARD

or some such thing. He may have walled in the death of
his wife or sweetheart or child, but the whole engram is
still there, crammed with captured units, ready to be
run exactly as an engram.
   If you run into a heavy emotional charge, simply let
the patient weep, keep him at the business of running
the engram  in a soft, sympathetic voice, have it re-
counted until there is no charge left in any of it and then
run him early into the prenatal area or early childhood
to get a physical pain engram that must have been below
that emotional charge and held it in place.
   The extravagance of emotional discharge is nothing
to be alarmed about. Bringing the patient out of it and
to present time suddenly would cause him unhappiness
about it. Running the painful emotion engram  will
discharge, in a few recountings, sorrow which society
has believed could never be countered or relieved except
by repression. Get the moment he first heard the news
or observed the thing which made him feel so bad. Run
it far enough from its beginning to make sure that you
have the initial shock—a few minutes of engram time
will do—and then get him to recount it again. He may
observe himself to be far outside himself when you
start. The moment may not discharge until you have run
it several times. Remember, he is returned to the inci-
dent, he is not running it as a memory, a thing which
would do no good whatever.
   Do not let him replay anything, ever. Replay is a bad
habit some preclears have of playing over what they
remember  they said the last time instead of progressing
through the engram  freshly on each recounting and
contacting what is contained in the engram itself. Tell
the preclear there may be some more in it, ask him what
color the bed in the room he is returned to is, keep his
attention, by any quiet mechanism, upon  the scene.
And  do not let him replay ever, not on any engram at
                           390
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

any time: he could  replay forever without therapeutic
value, each time saying what he remembered he said the
last time. There is a difference between this and the
repeated reexperiencing of the engram to gather addi-
tional data and to get rid of the charge.
   Discharge  emotion, reduce  incidents of physical
pain as early prenatally as possible. If you can't get into
the prenatal area at first, it has many bouncers in it and
repeater technique will take you there.
   If the patient keeps saying such a thing as "I can't
remember," be patient—always follow the code. Have
him  start running that phrase as repeater technique. If
he gets a somatic but contacts nothing else, send him
earlier. If he gets another and still can't contact on "I
can't remember," send him earlier, his whole engram
bank must be strewn with them—poor fellow. Some-
body really didn't want him to know what had hap-
pened  to him.  Eventually you will get back  to an
engram which will release a phrase. When he has gone
over the phrase a few more  times, he will smile or
chuckle or perhaps merely feel relieved. Now you can
either run the engram in which you found the earliest
phrase, which is best, or you can come back toward
present time, lifting the phrase as it later appeared. Or
you can start on something else, which may block the
case.
   The goal, and the whole goal, is to place the stand-
ard bank in entire conscious reach of the individual by
deleting (a) early and subsequently  all physical pain
engrams;  (b) all demon circuits (which are merely
contained in engrams and come up more or less auto-
matically); and (c) all painful emotion engrams.
   The  process of work is to get as early as you can,
preferably prenatal and very  early in that, and try to
find and reduce an engram, complete with all somatics
(pain) and perceptics (words and other sensations). If
                             391
                 L. RON HUBBARD

you fail in this, you go late, any time from birth forward
to present time, and find a moment of loss or threatened
loss from which you can get an emotional charge. Then
you go back early, early, early and find the engram on
which  it rested. You try always, until you are certain
you have it, to get basic-basic, the earliest engram. You
reduce as many early engrams as you can find, using
the file clerk and repeater system, and when you seem
to run out of material, you go later into life and try to
find another emotional charge.
   The physically painful engrams cover up later emo-
tional charges. Emotional charges cover up physically
painful engrams. Back and forth, back and forth. Run
as much  as you can get early: when it seems to be
running out or getting too unemotional, get some later
material.
   This is the way you work a case. No matter what
kind of  a case it is, no matter what  the state of its
recall, no matter if the case is normal, psychotic or
neurotic or what, this is the way.
   These are the tools:
     1. Reverie, or fixed attention if you cannot  get
        reverie;
     2. Return;
    3. Repeater technique;
    4. A  knowledge  of bouncers, holders, groupers,
        misdirectors, denyers;
    5. A knowledge of the painful emotion engram;
    6. The  reduction or the erasure;
    7. The flash answer;2
     8. The valence shift.3
2. flash answer: the first thing which comes into a person's head
when  a question is asked of him.
3. valence shift: getting the preclear moving around from one
valence to the other.
                           392
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

   This is all you need to do:
    1. Keep  the patient mobile, able to move on the
        track.
    2. Reduce or erase everything you get your hands on.
    3. Deduce from  the remarks of the patient, in or
       out of therapy, what  must be  his bouncers,
       holders, groupers, misdirectors, denyers.
    4. Keep it solidly in mind that the number one goal
       is basic-basic, the earliest moment of pain and
       "unconsciousness."
    5. Keep in mind that the patient may have "com-
       putations" which make  his illness or his aberra-
       ted state "valuable" to him and discover whence
       those "computations" come by flash answer to
       your questions.
    6. Keep  the case progressing, gaining, work only for
       progress and  gain, not for sudden, soaring re-
       sults. Worry only when  the case remains static
       and worry then in terms of finding the engram
        which is balking everything. Its content will be a
       close approximation to the way the patient says he
       feels about it and will contain the same or similar
       words.
    7. Get the patient back to present time each time
       you work  and feed him the canceller. Test him
       with  an age flash, get his first reply to how old
        he is, find the holder at that age if he is not at
       present time.
    8. Keep your temper no matter what the patient says.
    9. Never try to tell him what his data means: he
      knows and he alone knows what it means.
   10. Keep  your nerve and run Dianetics; like Farra-
      gut4 said, "Damn the torpedoes! Go ahead."

4. Farragut: David Glasgow Farragut (1801-1870), US admiral
who  won the battles of New Orleans and Mobile Bay for the
Union in the US Civil War.
                          393
              L. RON HUBBARD

11. Wife, son, whatever you may  be to the preclear,
    you  are the auditor when you are auditing. He
    cannot compute his own engrams to find them—if
    he could they would not be engrams. You can
    compute them. Do what you think a good auditor
    would  do, never what the patient says, save only
    when  he accidentally concurs in his opinion that a
    good  auditor would do that. Be the auditor, not
     the recording device. You and the file clerk in his
    mind are running the case: what his engrams and
    his analytical mind believe should have no force
    in any of your  computations. You and his file
    clerk know. He, as "I," doesn't know.
12. Be  surprised at nothing. Audit.
These are the things you must not do:
 1. Dilute Dianetics with some practice or belief of
    yesteryear: you  will only slow  or sidetrack a
    case. Analyzing  data received on any other basis
    than getting more engrams leads to delay and
    confusion for the preclear. It is a temptation to
    use this material for other reasons than getting
    engrams  if one has been trained in another field
    than Dianetics. Yielding to that temptation be-
    fore one knows how Dianetics works is a very
    unfair test of Dianetics, completely aside from
    the way it snarls a case. The temptation is great
    because with Dianetics you get such a wealth of
     data.
 2. Do   not bully the patient. If the case is not
    progressing,  then the fault lies with the auditor.
    Do  not surrender to an old practice of getting
    mad  at a patient just because he doesn't get
    well. You may be sure the engram you have just
    reduced out of his reactive engram bank is the
    reason he won't take baths, but if he still refuses
     to bathe, be certain there is an earlier reason.
                        394
 MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

 3. Don't assume grandly that you have a "differ-
    ent" case just because it doesn't resolve swiftly.
    They are all "different", cases.
 4. Don't run for help to somebody who does not
    know  Dianetics if your nerve fails you. The rea-
    son the case did not progress or became involved
    is right there—your nerve failed you. Only Dia-
    netics can work a problem in Dianetics.
 5. Do not listen to a patient's complaints as com-
    plaints; use them as data to get engrams.
 6. Do not suppose that just because you cannot
    reach prenatal engrams in a case that they are
    not there. There are scores and scores of them
   in every case. Remember that an engram isn't a
   memory,  it has to be developed to become
    within recall. There is no human being walking
    on Earth today who does not have a plenitude of
    prenatals.
 7. Do not allow the patient to use his mother or his
   memory  of what he had been told as a bypass of
    prenatals. Every time you find a patient talking
    in past tense instead of present tense he is not
    returned to an incident. Unless he is returned,
    the engram will not lift.
 8. Do not suppose that because a patient does not
    feel bad today about a sorrow of yesterday that
    a despair charge is not located back on his track
    when he  received the impact of that despair.
    Time may encyst, it does not heal.
 9. Do not think in terms of "guilt complexes" or
    "shame" unless you think of them as engram
    content, for there they will be found. Never
    suggest to a patient that he may be at fault in an
   engram.
10. Any departure from optimum behavior or con-
    duct or rationality on the part of the patient is
                       395
                 L. RON HUBBARD

      engramic: don't make "allowances for human
       nature" any more than you, as a mathematician,
       would make allowances for an adding machine
       which brought up wrong answers. Sexual fears,
       repressions, defenses are not "natural" as they
       have been regarded in the past.
   11. Don't  worry  about  the patient's aberrations.
       Work to contact and reduce and erase engrams.
       You  will find, in any patient, enough aberra-
        tions to fill a dictionary.
   12. Don't fret if your patient does not become a
       Clear in an evening or a month. Just keep work-
       ing. You'll have him above normal so quickly
       you won't realize when you passed it. Above
       that you are shooting for a very high goal.

           "Stuck in Present Time"
   Cases, when they are entered, are found in various
positions and situations on the time track; sometimes
they are off the time track entirely, and sometimes the
time track is all snarled up in a ball. Now and then
the time track is found to be in good condition and the
engrams  available, but this is not ordinary.
   No case can be said to be more difficult than another
except in the matter of recalls, "dub-ins" and shut-offs.
But the case which seems to be "stuck in present time"
and on whom   no repeater phrase works is very often
quite puzzling  to an  auditor. The preclear  will not
return to engrams. Ordinarily there may be pain and
emotional shut-offs and the painful emotion cannot be
quickly discharged. Sometimes somatics will turn on
but no content can be gained. Sometimes there is no
somatic but content. The situations are quite various.
   There are several things an auditor can do. The first
of them is to use his wits. The next is to indoctrinate the
                           396
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

patient into returning. This indoctrination is quite sim-
ple. The auditor takes the patient back a few hours and
has the patient tell what he sees. The sonic and visio
may be occluded but the patient may have some idea of
what is taking place. The auditor then takes him back a
few days, then a few months and finally several years,
each time getting the patient to describe his "surround-
ings" as best he can. The patient now has the idea of
returning. He can  travel at least along portions of his
life which are not occluded by engrams.
   When  the patient is returned to some early moment
in his life, begin to use repeater technique on him,
aiming toward obvious things such as feeling shut-offs
(going over the word "feel") or forgetter mechanisms
(such as "forget"). An engram may then be contacted
and reduced.
   If repeater technique still does not work and  still
does not get data, diagnose by his behavior in therapy
and  his statements what must be  troubling him or
occluding his recalls and  again use these guesses as
repeater. For instance, he may have no recollection of
some member of his family. Have him repeat the famil-
iar name. Or have him repeat his own childhood nick-
name  until an incident is contacted.
   Should  this still fail, then find some light locks,
incidents which contain minimal pain, and run those.
Such  things as falls from a tricycle, getting sent from
the table, getting spanked or scolded, being kept after
school and  so forth will serve. After he has reduced
several locks, again try to find an engram.
   The running of locks will not bring about any great
recovery, and there are thousands and thousands of
locks in any case, most of which will vanish without
assistance from the auditor once the severe engrams are
located. But locks may  be  used to  indoctrinate the
patient into returning and therapy in general and may
                           397
                 L. RON HUBBARD

even bring about an  improved condition in him by
demonstrating to him that he can face his past.
   The foremost things to do in any case at the begin-
ning are to (1) attempt to locate and erase basic-basic,
and (2) discharge painful emotion. The sooner emotion
can be released, the better, and there is always emotion
on a case, just as there is always a plenty of prenatal
incidents.
   But when a case is stuck in present time either when
it is opened or during progress, it is highly charged
with occluded emotion and it is obeying a restimulated
engram to the effect that it must go all the way to now
and stay there. The wording of this engram will gener-
ally be expressed by the patient himself in complaining
of his trouble. Repeater technique is used with this clue.
That failing, indoctrinate the patient by taking him back
to what he can contact and when indoctrination is done,
as above, start using repeater technique again.
   There  is one motto which applies to all therapy, "If
you keep asking for it, you'll get it." Any and all engrams
surrender on the basis of returning the patient to the area
time and again, session after session. The engram bank
may be balky but enough asking will bring forth any data
in it sooner or later. Just keep asking, keep the routine of
therapy running. Even a "stuck in present time" case will
eventually begin to return on the sole principle of repeater
technique.
   There  are certain things that the auditor may  be
doing which are wrong. He may be trying to work the
case on data taken from parents or relatives, which is
usually fruitless in view of the fact that it undermines
the preclear's faith in his own  data (all the data will
check with the relatives; just don't worry about check-
ing it until the case is finished). Or he may be trying to
work  the case in the presence of other people. Or he
may  be violating the Auditor's Code. A  list of these
                           398
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

deterrents to progress is to be found elsewhere in this
volume.

                   Basic-Basic
   The  first goal of the auditor is basic-basic and after
that always the earliest moment of pain or discomfort
which he can reach. He may have to go late for emo-
tional charges and these themselves may be physically
painful. Emotion may bar the patient from basic-basic.
But always that first turn-off of the analyzer is impor-
tant and when  it is gained, subsequent engrams are
much  more easily reduced.
   Basic-basic is the vital target for two reasons: (1) It
contains an analyzer shut-off which  itself is restimu-
lated every time a new engram is received. The common
denominator of all engrams is analyzer shut-off. Turn it
on the first time it was shut off and a vast improvement
takes place in the case, for thereafter analyzer shut-off
is not as deep. (2) An "erasure" (which is to say, an
apparent removal of the engram from the files of the
engram  bank  and refiling in the standard bank as
memory)  of  basic-basic widens the track beyond it
markedly and brings many new engrams into view.
   Basic-basic  is occasionally found  weeks   before
Mother's  first missed period, which  would  place it
much  earlier than any examination for pregnancy or an
attempted abortion. Sometimes in a nonsonic case sonic
is discoverable in basic-basic but far from always.
   Considerable  material may   be "erased"  before
basic-basic appears.
   Sometimes  basic-basic gets "erased" without either
the auditor or the preclear knowing that it has been
reached, basic-basic being merely another engram  in
the basic area. Sometimes much painful emotion must
be discharged  in the later life areas before basic-basic
discloses itself.
                           399
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   Always, however, basic-basic is the target, and until
he has a good idea that he has reached it, the auditor,
once every session, makes an effort to get it. Thereafter
he tries to get the earliest moment of pain or discomfort
he can  reach every session. If he can reach nothing
early, he seeks to discharge a late emotional engram.
When   it is completely discharged, "reduced"  or
"erased" as an engram, then he goes down into the
earliest material the file clerk will give him.
   Whatever comes up, the auditor seeks to take all the
charge out of it, whether that charge is pain or emotion,
before he proceeds on his way to new material. This is
done  merely by  returning the patient back over the
incident many times until it no longer affects him either
painfully or emotionally, or until it seems to vanish.

        The Reduction and the Erasure
   These two  terms are highly colloquial. Serious ef-
fort has been made to deter their use and substitute for
them something sonorous and wonderfully Latin, but no
progress has been  made  to date. Auditors insist on
using colloquial terms such as AA for attempted abor-
tion, louse up for engrams which  seriously aberrate,
aberree for a person not released or cleared, zombie for
an electric shock or neurosurgical case and so forth. It
is feared that a tendency exists in them to be disrespect-
ful to the hallowed5 and sacred tomes of yesteryear, to
the dignity of past authorities which labeled much and
did little. However this may be, reduction and erasure
are in such common use that to change them is hardly
necessary.
   To reduce means to take all the charge or pain out of
an incident. This means to have the preclear recount the
incident from beginning to end (while returned to it in

5. hallowed: regarded as holy; honored as sacred.
                           400
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

reverie) over and over again, picking up all the somatics
and perceptions present just as though the incident were
happening at that moment. To reduce means, techni-
cally, to render free of  aberrative material as far as
possible to make the case progress.
   To erase an engram means to recount it until it has
vanished entirely. There is a distinct difference between
a reduction and an "erasure." The difference depends
more upon what the engram is going to do than upon
what the auditor wants it to do. If the engram is early, if
it has no material earlier which will suspend  it, that
engram  will "erase." The patient, trying to find it again
for a second or sixth recounting, will suddenly find out
he has no faintest idea what was in it. He may ask the
auditor who, of course, will give him no information
whatever. (The auditor who prompts is slowing down
therapy by making himself the patient's memory.) Go-
ing through it and trying to find it may cause the patient
some amusement when he cannot. Or it may make him
puzzled, for here was something which had, on  first
contact, a painful somatic and a highly aberrative con-
tent which now no longer seems to exist. That is an
"erasure." Technically the engram is not erased. If the
auditor cares to spend some time, solely for purposes of
research, he will find that engram in the standard banks
now, labeled "formerly aberrative: rather amusing: in-
formation which  may be  useful analytically." Such a
search is not germane to therapy. If the incident had a
somatic, was recounted a few times and then, when its
last new material was found, vanished, it is erased so
far as the engram bank is concerned. It will no longer
be "soldered" into the motor circuits, will no longer be
dramatized, it no longer blocks a dynamic and is no
longer an engram but a memory.
   The  "reduction" has some interesting aspects. Let
us take a childhood incident (age of four, let us say)
                          401
                 L. RON HUBBARD

which had to do with a scalding. This is contacted while
much data remains in the basic area. It has many things
below it which will hold it in place. Nevertheless, it has
emotional charge and therapy is slowed by that charge.
The  file clerk hands out the scalding. Now it will not
erase, but it will reduce. Here is a job which will take
more time than an erasure. And there may be several
aspects to that job.
   The somatic is contacted, the incident is begun as
close to the beginning as the auditor can get, and is then
recounted. This scalding, let us say, has apathy as its
emotional tone (tone 0.5). The preclear slogs through it
apathetically, well exteriorized, watching himself  be
scalded. Then  suddenly, perhaps, an emotional dis-
charge may come  off, but not necessarily. The preclear
returns to the beginning and recounts (reexperiences)
the whole thing once more. Then again and again. Soon
he begins to get angry at the people involved in the
incident for being so careless or so heartless. He has
come up to anger (tone 1.5). The auditor, although the
patient would like to tell how vicious his parents are or
how  he thinks laws ought to be passed about scalding
children, patiently puts the preclear through the inci-
dent again. Now  the preclear ceases to be angry and
finds that he is bored with the material. He has risen up
to boredom  on the Tone  Scale (tone 2.5). He may
protest to the auditor that this is a waste of time. The
auditor puts him back through the incident again. New
data may show up. The somatic may or may not be still
present at this period but the emotional tone is still low.
The auditor puts the preclear through the incident again
and  the preclear may, but not always, begin  to be
sarcastic6 or facetious.7 The incident is again recounted.

6. sarcastic: sneering; bitterly cutting; taunting.
7. facetious: joking or trying to  be jocular, especially at an
inappropriate time.
                          402
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

Suddenly the preclear may be amused about it (but not
always) and the incident, when it obviously has reached
a high tone, may be left. It will probably sag in a few
days, but that is a matter of no great importance for it
will be erased wholly on the return from basic-basic. In
any case it will never be as aberrative as it was before
the reduction.
   A  reduction will sometimes result in the whole
engram's  apparently disappearing. But it is obvious
when  this will occur. Without much lifting in the Tone
Scale, the incident, by repetition, simply goes out of
sight. This is reducing to recession. In a few days that
incident will be back in force again, almost as strong as
ever. There is material before it and emotional charge
after it which make it unwieldy.
   Several things can happen, then, to an engram in the
process of work. It can reduce, which  is to say, dis-
charge emotionally and somatically and be of no great
aberrative power thereafter. It can reduce to recession,
which is to say it merely goes out of sight after several
recountings. It can erase, which is to say, vanish and
cease to be thereafter, so far as the engram bank is
concerned.
   A little experience will tell an auditor what engrams
are going to do after he has contacted them. Erasure
takes place, ordinarily, only after basic-basic has been
reached or, for that matter, when the basic area is being
worked. The  reduction occurs with an emotional dis-
charge. The reduction to recession happens when there
is too much in the engram bank suppressing the inci-
dent.
   Every now  and then even the best auditor will get
hold of an engram and decide to grind it out now that it
has been contacted. It is a sorry job. Perhaps it is better
to grind it out than to merely restimulate it and let the
patient be irritated by it for a couple of days. Perhaps
                           403
                 L. RON HUBBARD

not. But in any case, that engram which reduces only to
recession was better not contacted in the first place.
   New   auditors are forever charging at birth as an
obvious target. Everybody has a birth: in most patients
it can  be located  rather easily. But  it is a painful
incident and until the basic area has been thoroughly
worked  and  until late-life painful emotion has been
discharged and until the file clerk is ready to hand up
birth, the incident is better left in place. It will usually
reduce to recession and afterwards keep popping up to
plague the auditor. The patient gets obscure headaches,
gets sniffles, feels uncomfortable afterwards  unless
birth is taken on the return (from the basic area). The
auditor is wasting time, of course, by trying to remove
these headaches  and sniffles, because birth, with the
whole prenatal life before it, will not properly reduce or
erase but only recede. It is too often the case that birth,
if prematurely contacted, will give the patient a head-
ache and a cold. These discomforts are minor and of no
great importance, but the work the auditor may have
invested in working an incident which will only reduce
to recession is lost work. True, the file clerk occasion-
ally hands out birth: if he does, there is an emotional
charge on it which will discharge and the incident will
reduce properly. The auditor by all means should take
it. True, a case sometimes stalls down and the auditor
runs birth anyway just to see if he can speed things up.
But merely going back to birth to put one's hands on an
engram  because he knows it is there will bring about
discomfort and lost time. Go prenatal as far as you can
and see what the file clerk will hand forth. Try repeater
technique in the basic  area. You may   get incidents
which  will erase. If there is nothing there, find out
about a painful emotion engram in late life, the death of
a friend, the loss of  an ally, a failure of a business,
something. Blow a charge from it and reduce it as an
                          404
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

engram  and then go back prenatally as early as possible
and see what has turned up. If the file clerk thinks you
need birth he'll give it out. But do not ask for birth just
to have an engram to work, because it may prove to be a
thoroughly uncomfortable and fruitless endeavor. Birth
will come up when it will come up and the file clerk
knows his business.
   Charging into any late period of "unconsciousness"
such  as surgical anesthetic, where  physical pain is
present in large quantities, can bring about this need-
less restimulation. You can, of course, fare better with
such things in reverie than in hypnosis or narcosynthesis
where  such a restimulation might bring about severe
results. In reverie the effect is light.

         Handling the Somatic Strip
   There are two little men on each side of the brain, a
set for each lobe, hanging by their heels. The outer one
is the "motor  strip,"8 the inner one, the "sensory
strip."* If you wish to know more about the structure
of these pairs, Dianetic research will have the answer in
a few more years. Currently there is something known
about them, a description. To an engineer who knows
Dianetics the current description which will be found in
the library is not entirely reasonable. These are, pos-
sibly, switchboards of some sort. Readings can be taken
in the vicinity of them—just aft of the temples—if you
have a  very sensitive galvanometer,9 a galvanometer
* The sensory strip could be considered the "mental" side of
the switchboard, the motor strip the physical side. —LRH

8. motor strip: the mind's control system through the motor
controls. There are two panels on each side of the skull, one on
top of the other, and they control opposite sides of the body. One
of the panels on each side is where the thoughts register, and the
other panel is where the muscle control is set up.
9. galvanometer: an instrument for detecting and measuring
small electric currents.
                           405
                     L. RON HUBBARD

more  sensitive than any on the public market today.
Those readings show emanations of a field of some
sort. When  we  have  established the precise type of
energy flowing here, we can probably measure it with
better precision. When we  know  exactly where the
thinking is done in the body we will know more about
these strips. All Dianetic research has  established to
date is that, beneath  a welter10 of labels, nothing  is
actually known which is worth recounting about these
structures beyond the fact that they have something to
do with coordination of various parts of the body. We
do, however, refer to them for lack of something better,
in the course of therapy. Now that we know something
about function, further research certainly cannot help
but yield precision answers about structure.
   The auditor can turn somatics on and off in a patient
like an engineer handles switches. More aptly, he can
turn them on and off in the body like a conductor runs a
streetcar along a track. Here we have the game referred
to previously when we talked about the time track.
   In a patient who  is working well, the "somatic
strip" can be commanded to go to any part of the time
track. Day by day, hour by hour, in normal  life the
somatic strip ranges up and down this track as engrams
are restimulated. The auditor, working a patient, may
find his own somatic strip obeying his own commands
and some of his own somatics turning on and off, a fact
which  is at worst mildly uncomfortable. The whole
body, the cells, whatever it is that is moving we do not
really know. But we can handle it, and we can assume
that it at least passes through the switchboard of the
little men who hang by their heels.
   "The  somatic strip will now go to birth," says the
auditor.

 10. welter: a jumble or muddle.
                           406
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

   The  patient in reverie begins to feel the pressure of
contractions thrusting him down the birth canal.
   "The somatic strip will now go to the last time you
injured yourself," says the auditor.
   The  preclear feels a mild reproduction of the pain
of, perhaps, a bumped knee. If he has sonic and visio
recall, he will see where he is and suddenly realize that
it was in the office: he will hear the clerks and typewrit-
ers and the car noises outside.
   "The  somatic strip will now go into the prenatal
area," says the auditor.
   And  the patient finds himself in the area, probably
floating along, not uncomfortable.
   "The somatic strip will now go to the first moment
of pain or discomfort which can now be reached," says
the auditor.
   The patient drifts around a moment and suddenly
feels a pain in his chest. He begins to cough and feels
depression all over him. Mama   is coughing (often
source of chronic coughs). "Roll the cough," says the
auditor. The patient finds himself at the beginning of
the engram  and begins to run it. "Cough, cough,
cough," says the patient. He then yawns. " 'It hurts and
I can't stop,'" he quotes his mother. "Go to the beginning
and roll it again," says the auditor. "Cough, cough,
cough," begins the patient, but he is not coughing as
badly now. He yawns more deeply. " 'Ouch. It hurts, it
hurts, and I can't seem to stop,'" quotes the preclear,
listening directly if he has sonic, getting impressions of
what's said if he does not have. He has picked up words
now  that were suppressed in it by "unconsciousness."
"Unconsciousness" is beginning to come off with the
yawns.  "Roll it again," says the auditor. "'I can't
stop,'" says the preclear, quoting all that he finds this
time. The somatic is gone. He yawns again. The engram
is erased.
                           407
                                L. RON  HUBBARD

             "The somatic strip will now go to the next moment
            of pain or discomfort," says the auditor.
              The somatic does not turn on. The patient goes into
           a strange sleep. He mutters about a dream. Suddenly
            the somatic gets stronger. The patient begins to shiver.
           "What  occurs?" says the auditor. "I hear water run-
            ning," says the preclear. "Somatic strip will go to the
            beginning of the incident," says the auditor. "Roll it."
           "I keep on hearing water," says the preclear. (He must
           be stuck, the somatics did not move. This is a holder.)
            "Somatic strip will go to whatever it is that is holding,"
            says the auditor. " Til hold it in there a while and see if
           it does some good,'" quotes the preclear. "Pick up the
           beginning  of the incident now and  roll it," says the
            auditor. "I feel myself being jostled," says the preclear.
          "Ouch, something bumped me." "Pick up the begin-
            ning and roll it," says the auditor. " Tm sure I must be
            pregnant,' " quotes the preclear. " Til hold it in there
           a while and see if it does some good.' " "Is there
            anything earlier?" says the auditor. The preclear's strip
lj|        goes to the earlier moment where he feels pressure as
W          she tries to get something into the cervix. Then he rolls
           the engram and it erases.
              This is handling of the somatic strip. It can be sent
           anywhere.  It will pick up the somatic first, usually, and
           then pick up the content. Using repeater technique, the
           somatic strip is "sucked down" to the incident and the
           somatics turn on. Then the incident is run. If it does not
            lift, find an earlier incident simply by telling the so-
            matic  strip to go to the earlier incident.
              If the somatic strip does not move, which is to say, if
           somatics (physical sensations) do not turn on and off,
           then the patient is stuck somewhere on the track. He can
           be stuck in present time, which would mean he has a
           bouncer  thrusting him all the way up the track. Use
           repeater technique or merely try to send the somatic
                                       408
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

strip back. If it won't go, get various bouncer phrases
like "Can't go back," "Run a mile," etc., and with them
suck the somatic strip down to the incident and run it.
   The somatic strip may move  through an incident
with full sensation and yet, returning over the same
ground  several times, will not bring out data. Time
after time this can be done without result in some
engrams: the somatics remain almost the same, undu-
lating through the incident each time but with no other
content. Then the auditor is "bucking"  a denyer, a
phrase such as  "This is a secret," "Don't let him
know,"  "Forget it," etc. In such a case he sends the
somatic strip to the phrase which denies the data: "Go
to the moment  a phrase is uttered denying this data,"
says the auditor. After a moment, " 'If he found out
about this, it would kill him,' " quotes the preclear,
either from sonic or from impressions. Then the auditor
sends the somatic strip back to the start of the incident
and it goes on through it, this time with other perceptic
content. The somatics, unless the incident is very late
prenatal with basic area full of material, undulate (fluc-
tuate according to the action of the engram) and dimin-
ish  to either reduction  or  erasure on   consecutive
recountings.
   The  auditor tells the somatic strip to go earlier, some-
times it goes later. This is a misdirector. "Can't tell
which way I am going," "Going backwards," "Do just
the opposite": these are the type of phrases of the misdi-
rector. The auditor recognizes that he has  one in the
preclear—guesses  it or discovers it from the preclear's
wording of the complaint about the action—and by re-
peater or direct command of the strip, picks up the phrase
and the engram, reduces or erases it and continues.
   If the somatic strip does not respond according to
command,   then a bouncer, a holder, a misdirector or a
grouper has been restimulated and should be discharged.
                          409
                 L. RON HUBBARD

The somatic strip will be where the command is which
forbids it to function as desired.
   There are good and bad conductors of this somatic
strip. The good conductor works  closely with the file
clerk, using such broad orders as "The somatic strip
will pick up the earliest moment of pain or discomfort
which can be reached," or "The somatic strip will go to
the highest intensity of the somatic you now  have"
(when  a somatic is bothering the patient). The bad
conductor picks out specific incidents which he thinks
might be aberrative, bullies the somatic strip into them
and somehow  beats them down. There are moments
when  it is necessary to be quite persuasive with the
strip and moments  when  it is necessary to pick out
incidents of physical pain, but the auditor is the best
judge of what should take place. As long as the strip
will work smoothly, finding new incidents and running
over them, he should not tamper with it beyond making
sure that he reduces everything the strip contacts.
   A  very fine way to thoroughly wreck a case is to put
the somatic strip into an incident, decide something else
is more important and  go rushing off to it, get that
half-lifted and go off to something else. By the time three
or four incidents have been so touched but not reduced,
the strip stalls down, the track starts to bunch up and
the auditor has a snarl which may take him many hours
of therapy or a week or two of rebalancing (letting the
case settle) to bring it back to a workable state.
   The patient will sometimes want a somatic turned
off. It has been bothering him. That means that the strip
is somehow hung up in some incident which therapy or
the patient's environment has restimulated. Ordinarily
it is not worth  the time  and trouble to  locate the
incident. It will settle out of its own accord in a day or
two and it may be an incident which cannot be reduced
because of the earlier engrams.
                              410
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART ONE

   The somatic strip is handled in a late incident just as
it is sent to an earlier one. Despair charges are con-
tacted in the same way.
   If you want a test to see if the strip is moving, or to
test recall, send it back a few hours and find out what
you get. While the prenatal area is easier to reach than
yesterday in many cases, some idea will be gained of
how the patient is working.

               Present Time
   The beginning is conception. Your patients some-
times have a feeling that they are sperms or ovums at
the beginning of the track: in Dianetics, this is called
the sperm dream. It is not of any great value so far as
we know  at this time. But it is very interesting. It does
not have to be suggested to the preclear. All one has to
do is send him to the beginning of the track and hear
what he has to say. Sometimes he has an early engram
mixed up with conception.
   At the late end of the track is, of course, now. This
is present time. It happens now and then that patients
are not getting back to present time because they have
struck holders en route. Repeater technique with holders
will generally free the strip and get it to present time.
   A patient may get a trifle groggy with all the things
which have been happening to him in the course of a
therapy session. And he may have reduced resistance to
engrams as he comes back up the track and may thus
trip a holder. The auditor should be very sure the patient is
up in present time. Occasionally the patient will be so
thoroughly stuck and the hour so  advanced that the
effort to bring him all the way up is not feasible at the
time. A period of sleep will generally accomplish it.
   There  is a test whereby the auditor can tell if the
preclear is up to present time. He snaps a question at
the preclear, "How old are you?" The preclear gives
                            411
                     L. RON HUBBARD

him  a "flash answer." If it is the preclear's right age,
the preclear is in present time. If it is an earlier age,
there is a holder there, and the patient is not in present
time. There are other methods of determining this but it
is not very important, by and large, if the patient does
fail to make it.
   Snapping questions at people, asking how old they
are, elicits some surprising answers. Being stuck on the
track is so common in "normal" people that a day or
two or a week or two of failure to reach present time in
a preclear is far from alarming.
   Anyone who  has a chronic psychosomatic illness is
definitely stuck somewhere on the time track. Snap
questions about it get "three," or "ten years," or some
such answer quite ordinarily even when asked of people
who  suppose they are in good health. Reverie reveals to
them where  they are on the track. Sometimes, in the
first session, a preclear shuts his eyes in reverie to find
himself in a dentist's chair at the age of three. He has
been  there for the last thirty years or so because the
dentist and his mother both  told him to "stay there"
while he was shocky with pain and gas—so he did, and
the chronic  tooth trouble he  had  all his life is that
somatic.
   This doesn't happen very often, but you can find
someone  you know,  it is certain, who would flash
answer  "ten years" and, being put in reverie, would
find himself, as soon as the engram came to view, lying
flat on his back in a ballpark or some such situation,
with somebody telling him not to move until the ambu-
lance came: that's his arthritis!
   Try it on somebody.

             The Flash Answer
   A  device in common   use in therapy is the flash
answer. This is done in two ways. The first mentioned
                             412
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

here is the least used. "When I count to five," says the
auditor, "a phrase will flash into your mind to describe
where  you are on  the track. One, two, three, four,
five!" "Late  prenatal," says the preclear, or "yester-
day," or whatever occurs to him.
   The flash answer is the first thing which comes into
a person's head when  a question is asked him. It will
come  from the engram  bank, usually, and will be
useful. It may be "demon talk" but it is generally right.
The  auditor merely asks a question, such as what is
holding the patient, what denies him knowledge, etc.,
prefacing the question with the remark, "I want a flash
answer to this."
   "I  want a flash answer  to this," says the auditor.
"What  would happen if you became sane?" "Die,"
says the patient. "What would happen if you die?" says
the auditor. "I'd get well," says the patient. And with
this data they then make  an estimate of the current
computation on allies or some such thing. In this case,
the ally said to the preclear when he was ill, "I'd die,
just die if you didn't get well. If you're sick much
longer I'll go insane." And a former engram said the
preclear had to be  sick. And this is, after all, just an
engram. So repeater technique is used on the word die
and an  ally is uncovered that the preclear never knew
existed and a charge is blown.
   Much  valuable data can be recovered by clever use of
the flash answer. If there is no answer at all, it means that
the answer is occluded and that is almost as good a reply
as actual data since it means some kind of a coverup.

                Dreams
   Dreams  have been  used considerably by various
schools of mental healing. Their "symbology" is a
mystic foible forwarded to explain something which the
                             413
                 L. RON HUBBARD

mystics did not know  anything about. Dreams  are
crazy-house" mirrors by which the analyzer looks down
into the engram bank.
   Dreams  are puns on words  and situations in the
engram bank.
   Dreams are not much help, being puns.
   Dreams are not much used in Dianetics.
   You  will hear dreams  from patients. Patients are
hard to shut off when they start telling dreams. If you
want to waste your time, you will listen.

                 Valence  Shift
   A mechanism   used in Dianetics is the valence shift.
   We  know the way a patient gets into valences when
he dramatizes his engrams in life. He becomes a win-
ning valence and he says and does rather much what the
person in the winning valence did in that engram.
   The  theory behind it is this: returned to a time the
patient may consider too painful to enter, he can be
shifted into a valence which felt no pain. A dull way to
persuade him is to tell him he does not have to feel the
pain or the emotion and let him go through it. This is
very bad  Dianetics because it is a positive suggestion
and every safeguard must be taken to keep from giving
suggestions to the patient, for he may be very suggest-
ible even when he pretends not to be. But there is the
valence shift and  this permits the patient to escape
the pain and still remain in the engram until he can
recount it.
   Example:  Father beating  Mother, unborn  child
knocked  "unconscious." The  data is available in the
11. crazy house: a fun house: an attraction at an amusement park
consisting of a series of rooms and passageways with sloping or
moving  floors, distorting mirrors and other devices designed to
surprise or amuse.
                             414
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

father valence with no pain, in the mother valence with
her pain, in the child's valence with his pain.
   The  way  to  handle this, if the patient positively
refuses to enter it although he has somatics, is to shift
him in valence. The auditor says, "Go into your father's
valence and be your father for the moment." After some
persuasion the patient does so. "Bawl your mother out,"
says the auditor. "Give  her a  fine talking-to." The
patient is now on that circuit which contains no "uncon-
sciousness" and approximates  the emotion and  the
words  his father used to his mother. The auditor lets
him  do this a couple or three times until the charge is
somewhat off the engram. Then he turns the patient's
valence into the mother: "Be your mother for the mo-
ment  now  and  talk back to your  father," says the
auditor. The patient shifts valence and is his mother and
repeats his mother's phrases. "Now be yourself," says
the auditor, "and recount  the entire incident with all
somatics and emotion, please." The patient is able to
reexperience the incident as himself.
   This works very well when one is trying to get at an
ally. "Shift valence," says the auditor to the returned
patient, "and plead with your  mother not to kill the
baby." "Now   be a nurse," says the auditor, with the
preclear returned to some incident he seems very fear-
ful about entering, "and plead with a little boy to get
well." The patient will correct the auditor's concept of
the script and usually will proceed.
   The  patient will often refuse to go into a valence
because he hates it. This means there must be consider-
able charge in the person he refuses to be.
   This mechanism is rarely used but is handy when a
case is stalling. The father did not obey the holders or
commands,  he uttered them. The nurse would not obey
her own commands. And so forth. Thus many holders
                             415
                 L. RON HUBBARD

and denyers can be flushed12 to view. It is useful in the
beginning of a case.*

              Types of Chains
   Engrams,  particularly in the prenatal area, are in
chains. That is to say, there is a series of incidents of
similar types. This is useful classification because it
leads to some solutions. The chains one can most easily
contact in a preclear are the least charged. The most
aberrative chains will usually be the hardest to reach
because they contain the most active data. Remember
the rule that what the auditor finds hard to reach, the
analyzer of the patient found hard to reach. Here is a
list of chains—not  all the  possible chains by  any
means—found  in one case which had passed for "nor-
mal"  for thirty-six years of his life.
Coitus  chain, Father. First incident, zygote. Fifty-six
     succeeding incidents. Two branches, Father drunk
     and Father sober.
Coitus chain, lover. First incident, embryo. Eighteen
     succeeding  incidents. All painful because of en-
     thusiasm of lover.
Constipation  chain. First incident, zygote. Fifty-one
     succeeding incidents. Each incident building high
      pressure on child.
* Valence shift is seldom used except where an engram  is
suspected which will not otherwise be approached by the pa-
tient. He will often approach the engram with valence shift when
he will not approach it as himself. Valence shift is somewhat
undesirable when employed  on a suggestible subject since it
violates the Dianetic rule that no positive suggestion be used
beyond those absolutely necessary in returning and recounting
and uncovering data. Therefore valence shift is seldom employed
and rarely on a suggestible person. It should be considered a last
resort and practiced only when the preclear is entirely and
completely unable to confront and attack an engram which
the auditor is certain is present: and this is rare. —LRH

12. flushed: revealed; brought into the open; driven out.
                             416
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

Douche  chain. First incident, embryo. Twenty-one suc-
     ceeding incidents. One each day to missed period,
      all into cervix.
Sickness chain. First incident, embryo. Five succeed-
     ing incidents. Three colds. One case grippe.'3 One
     vomiting spell—hangover.
Morning   sickness chain.  First incident, embryo.
     Thirty-two succeeding incidents.
Contraceptive  chain. First incident, zygote. One inci-
     dent. Some paste substance into cervix.
Fight chain. First incident, embryo. Thirty-eight suc-
     ceeding  incidents. Three falls, loud voices, no
     beating.
Attempted  abortion, surgical.14 First incident, embryo.
     Twenty-one succeeding incidents.
Attempted  abortion,  douche.  First incident, fetus.
     Two  incidents. One using paste, one using Lysol,
     very strong.
Attempted  abortion,  pressure. First incident, fetus.
     Three  incidents. One Father sitting on Mother.
     Two Mother jumping off boxes.
Hiccup  chain. First incident, fetus. Five incidents.
Accident chain. First incident, embryo. Eighteen inci-
      dents. Various falls and collisions.
Masturbation  chain. First incident, embryo. Eighty suc-
     ceeding  incidents. Mother  masturbating with fin-
      gers, jolting child and injuring child with orgasm.
Doctor chain. First incident, first missed period. Eight-
     een visits. Doctor examination painful but doctor
     an ally, discovering Mother attempting an abor-
     tion and scolding her thoroughly.
Premature labor pains. Three days before actual birth.
13. grippe: influenza.
14. surgical: pertaining to or involving manual  or operative
procedures.
                             417
                 L. RON HUBBARD

Birth. Instrument. Twenty-nine hours' labor.
   In that Mother was a subvocal talker, this made a
sizable quantity of material to be erased,  for the re-
mainder of the patient's life was in addition to this. This
was a five-hundred-hour case, nonsonic, imaginary re-
calls which had to be cancelled out by discovering lie
factories before the above data could be obtained.
   There  are other chains possible but this case was
picked because it contains the usual ones found. Moth-
er's lover is not very unusual, unfortunately, for he puts
secrecy into a case to such an extent that when the case
seems very, very secret, then a lover or two will seem
indicated. But don't suggest them to a preclear. He may
use them for an avoid.

                Dianetic Don'ts
   Don't  give any  patient a positive suggestion  as
therapy in itself or to assist therapy.
   Don't  fail to give a  canceller at every  session's
beginning and use it at every session's end.
   Don't ever tell a patient he can "remember this in
present time" because the somatic will come to present
time and that is very uncomfortable.
   Don't ever, ever, ever, ever tell a patient that he can
remember  everything that ever happened to him in
present time because that groups everything in present
time if the patient has slid into a deep trance. And that
makes  it necessary to unsnarl a whole case. Want to
waste two hundred hours?
   Don't ever retaliate in any way when  a patient in
reverie gets angry at you. Follow the Auditor's Code. If
you get angry with him you  may throw him  into an
apathy which will take you many hours to undo.
   Don't evaluate data or tell a patient what is wrong
with him.
                            418
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

   Don't crow.15 If the preclear is your wife or husband
or child, don't rub  it in that the favorite argument
phrase was out of an engram. Of course it was!
   Don't question the validity of data. Keep your reser-
vations to yourself. Audit the information for your own
guidance. If the patient doesn't know what you think,
the engrams will never get a chance to evade.
   Don't ever snap a patient to present time just be-
cause he begs for it. If he is in the middle of an engram,
the only way out of it is through it. The power of the
engram  is slight when the patient is returned to it. It
turns on hard when the patient comes to present time.
The patient will have a nervous shock if he is snapped
to present.
   Don't ever get frightened, no matter what kind of
squirming  or squalling16 a patient may  do. It isn't
serious, any of it, although it is sometimes dramatic.
   Don't ever promise to clear a case: promise only to
release it. You may have to go away or work on some-
thing more urgent. And a broken promise to a preclear
will be taken very hard.
   Don't  interfere with the private life of a preclear or
give him guidance. Tell him to make up his own mind
about what he should do.
   Don't break the Auditor's Code. It is there to protect
you, not just the preclear. Therapy can't hurt him if you
do but half a job on  it and do half of that wrong;
breaking the code can make you very uncomfortable
because it will make you a target of the preclear and
cost you considerable extra work.
   Don't leave engrams half-reduced when you  are
given them by the file clerk.
15. crow: boast in triumph; exult.
16. squalling: the condition or action of crying or screaming
loudly and harshly.
                             419
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   Don't  get inventive about Dianetics until you have
worked at least one case out. And don't get too inventive
until you have worked  a case which has  sonic, a case
which has shut-off sonic and a case which has imaginary
sonic. Clear these and you will know. And you will have
met enough engrams to get some ideas that can be of great
benefit to Dianetics. If you don't get ideas after that and
after you  yourself are in therapy  and cleared, there's
something wrong. Dianetics is an expanding science; but
don't expand it until you know which way it travels.
   Don't mix  gasoline and alcohol, or Dianetics and
other therapy except purely medical, dispensed by  a
professional medical doctor.
   Don't get a case snarled up and then take it to a
psychiatrist who knows no  Dianetics. Only Dianetics
can unsnarl Dianetics and yesterday's methods won't
help your patient one slightest bit when all he needs is
another run through the one you snapped him out of too
fast. Take a cinch17 on your nerve and send him  back
through the incident again. In Dianetics, today's obvious
nervous breakdown is tomorrow's most cheerful being.
   Don't quit, don't balk. Just keep running engrams.
And  one day you'll have a Release. And another day
you'll have a Clear.

             Types of Somatics
   There are two kinds of somatics, those which prop-
erly belong to the patient and those which belong to his
mother  or some other person. The first actually hap-
pened, so did the second. But the patient should not
have his mother's somatics. If he does, if he is found
complaining of headaches whenever his mother has a
headache, there is an engram, very early, which says he
must have whatever she has: "The baby is part of me,"

 17. cinch: (colloquial) a firm grip.
                           420
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

"I want  him to suffer as I suffer," etc. Or the phrase
may  be  some  entirely misunderstood thing  literally
taken. However, all this "comes out in the wash"18 and
should be no great concern of the auditor's.

             "Unconsciousness"
   While  "unconsciousness"  has been  covered else-
where  in various ways, in therapy it has two special
manifestations: the yawn and the "boil-off."
   The engram of physical pain contains deep "uncon-
sciousness"  and if it is going to lift, particularly in the
basic area, it comes off in yawns. After a first or second
recounting, the patient starts to yawn. These yawns are
turning on his analyzer.
   In a very extreme engram—a prenatal electric shock
which Mother  received—five hours of "unconscious-
ness" "boil-off" have  taken place during therapy. The
shock lasted for less than a minute but so close did it bring
the individual to death that when the incident was first
contacted in therapy, he swam and floundered and had
strange dreams, muttered and mumbled for five hours.
That is a record. Forty-five minutes of this "boil-off" is
rare. Five or ten minutes of it is not uncommon.
   The  auditor will take a patient into an area. No
somatic turns on. But the patient begins to drowse into a
strange kind of sleep. He rouses from this from time to
time, mutters something, usually idiotic, rouses again
with a dream  and generally makes no progress to all
appearances. But progress is being made.  A period
when he was almost dead is coming up to the surface.
Soon a somatic will turn on and the patient will run an
engram a few times on command, will yawn a little and
then brighten up. Such a quantity of "unconsciousness"
was, of course, sufficient to keep his analyzer about

18. comes out in the wash: is revealed; becomes known.
                            421
                 L. RON HUBBARD

nine-tenths shut off when he was awake, for, if it was
near basic, it was part of every other engram. Such an
engram, with such deep "unconsciousness," when re-
leased, produces a marked improvement in a case, as
much as a painful emotion engram at times.
   It is up to the auditor to sit it through no matter how
long it takes. It may make an uncleared auditor very
sleepy to watch all this but it should be done. He will
rarely strike one that lasts an hour but every case has
such a period lasting from ten minutes to a half-hour.
   He  should stir the patient up once in a while and try
to make him go through the engram. There is a very
special way  to stir a patient into life: don't touch his
body for it may be highly restimulative and make him
very upset. Touch only the bottoms of his feet with your
hand or your own feet and touch them just enough to
jog19 him into attention for a moment. That keeps the
"boil-off" in progress and does not permit the patient
to sag into ordinary sleep.
   The  "boil-off" can be confused, by an inexperienced
auditor, with an engram command to sleep. However, if
the auditor will observe the patient closely, he will find
that in the "boil-off" the patient gives every appearance
of being drugged, while in a sleep command he simply
goes to sleep and does it very smoothly. The "boil-off" is
a trifle restless, full of mutterings and flounderings and
dreams. The sleep is smooth.
   An engramic command  to go to sleep, acting on the
returned preclear, is broken by sending the  somatic
strip to the moment when the sleep command is given.
If the preclear contacts it and  goes over  it, he will
quickly awaken on the track and continue with therapy.
   The "boil-off" may be full of yawns, mutterings or
grunts. Sleep is usually quiet and gentle.

 19. jog: stir or jolt into activity or alertness, as by a  hint or
reminder.
                           422
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

   Just why  this is called a  boil-off and just why
auditors are fond of the term is obscure. It was origi-
nally and sedately named  "comatic20 reduction" but
such erudition21 has been outvoted by the fact that it has
never been used.
   If you are fond of listening to dreams, you will find
them  in plenty in the "boil-off." As images on the
desert are distorted by the glass snakes of heat waves,
so are the engramic commands distorted to the analyzer
through the veil of "unconsciousness."

                  Locks
   It is one of the blessings of nature that the lock is
something which needs minor  attention. A lock is an
incident which, with or without charge, is in conscious
recall and which seems to be the reason the aberree is
aberrated. Perhaps this was another way the bank pro-
tected itself. A lock is a moment of mental discomfort
containing no physical pain and no great loss. A scold-
ing, a social disgrace: such things are locks. Any case
has thousands and thousands of locks. The auditor will
discover them in plenty if he cares to waste time look-
ing for them. The treatment of these locks was the main
goal of an old art known as "hypnoanalysis." Most of
them can be reduced.
   The key-in of an engram takes place at some future
date from the time the engram was actually received.
The key-in moment  contains analytical reduction from
weariness  or slight illness. A situation similar to the
engram,  which contained "unconsciousness," came
about and keyed in the engram. This is a primary lock.
Breaking it, if it can be found, produces the effect of
2O. comatic: of a coma (a period of deep, prolonged uncon-
sciousness usually resulting from a severe injury or illness).
21. erudition: exhibition of knowledge not easily understood by
the average person.
                           423
                 L. RON HUBBARD

keying out the engram. But it can be considered a waste
of time even if it has some therapeutic value and was
used, without understanding, by some past schools.
   If an auditor wants to know  how  the case was
reacting to life, he can find some of these thousands
and thousands of locks and look them over. But that is
probably  all the interest he has in them, for locks
discharge. They discharge automatically the moment
the engram holding them is erased. A whole life rebal-
ances itself when the engrams are gone and the locks
need  no treatment. Neither does  the preclear, now
cleared, need education as to how  to think: like the
blowing of locks, this is an automatic process.
   These locks lie down amongst the engrams some-
times. The preclear may be deep in the prenatal area
and suddenly think about a time when he was twenty or,
as is common  in therapy, think about an engram he
heard from somebody else. This is a good clue. Pay no
further heed to the lock: find the engram to which it
attached itself, for there is an engram immediately with
it. In dreams, these locks in distorted form come swim-
ming up out of the bank, complicating the dream.

              The Junior Case
   Do not take on a Junior for your first case if you can
avoid it. If Father was named George and the patient is
called George, beware of trouble. The engram bank
takes George  to mean  George  and  that is identity
thought deluxe.
   Mother says, "I hate George!" "That means Junior,"
says the engram, though Mother meant Father. "George is
thoughtless." "George must not know." "Oh, George, I
wish you had some sex appeal, but you haven't." And so
go the engrams. A Junior case is seldom easy.
   It is customary to shudder, in Dianetics, at the thought
of taking on a Junior case. An auditor can be expected
                           424
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

to slave his hardest when he has a case with nonsonic,
which is off the time track and which is named after
Father or Mother. Such cases resolve, of course, but if
parents knew what they did to children by giving them
any name which might appear in the engram bank, such
as that of  parents or grandparents  or  friends, it is
certain the custom would vanish instanter.22

          Restimulating the Engram
   "Ask often enough and you will receive," is always
true when working the engram bank. Simply by return-
ing into an area enough times engrams will appear. If it
is not there today, it will be there tomorrow. But if it is
not there tomorrow, it will be there the day after and so
forth. Emotional discharges are most certainly located
by asking for them time after time, returning the patient
over the part of the track where the charge is expected to
lie. What repeater technique will fail to do can be done by
returning the patient, session after session, to a portion of
his life. Sooner or later it will come into view.

       Occluded Life Periods and People
   Whole  areas of the time track will be found oc-
cluded. These contain suppressors by way of engram
command,  ally computations and painful emotion. Per-
sons can  vanish utterly from sight for these reasons.
They come to view after a few engrams have been lifted
in basic or the area has been developed as above.

          Animosity Toward Parents
   It always happens, when one  clears a child or adult,
that the preclear goes through stages of improvement
which bring him  up the Tone Scale and cause him, of
course, to pass through the second zone, anger. A preclear

22. instanter: immediately; at once.
                            425
                 L. RON HUBBARD

may become  furious with his parents and other offenders
in the engram bank. Such a situation is to be expected. It
is a natural byproduct of therapy and it cannot be avoided.
   As  the case progresses, the tone level, of course, rises
and places the preclear in a state of boredom toward the
villains who have wronged him. At last he reaches tone 4,
which  is the tone of the Clear. At this time he is very
cheerful and willing to be friends with people whether
they have wronged him or not: of course he has the data
about what to expect of them, but he nurses no animosity.
   If a parent feels that the child, knowing all, would
turn against him, then the parent is mistaken. The child
has already, as an  aberree, turned very  thoroughly
against the parent whether his analyzer knows all or
not, and the most uncertain and unlovely conduct may
result from further hiding of the evidence.
   It is a matter of continual observation that the good
Release and the Clear feel no animosity whatever toward
their parents or others who had caused their aberrations
and indeed stop negating, defending and fighting so irra-
tionally. The Clear will fight, certainly, for a good cause
and he will be the most dangerous opponent possible, but
he does not fight for irrational reasons like an animal, and
his understanding of people is very much enlarged and his
affection can at last be deep. If a parent wishes love and
cooperation from a child, no matter what he has done to
that child, permit therapy and achieve that love and co-
operation with the child self-determined and no longer
secretly in apathy or rage. After all, the Clear has learned
the source of his parents' aberrations as well as his own;
he recognizes that they had engram banks before he did.

                  Propitiation
   In the process of work a stage will be passed, in the
upper range of apathy, of propitiation. This conciliation
is an  effort to feed or sacrifice to an  all-destructive
                           426
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART ONE

force. It is a state wherein the patient, in deep fear of
another, offers expensive presents and soft words, turns
the other cheek, offers himself as a doormat and gener-
ally makes a fool out of himself.
   Many, many  marriages, for instance, are marriages
not of  love but of that shabby  substitute, propitiation.
People have a habit of marrying people who have similar
reactive minds. This is unfortunate, for such marriages
are destructive to both partners. She has a certain set of
aberrations: they match his. She is pseudomother, he is
pseudofather. She had to marry him because Father tried
to murder her before she was born. He had to marry her
because Mother beat him when he was a child. Incredible
as it may seem, these marriages are very common: one or
the other partner becomes  mentally  ill, or both may
deteriorate. He is unhappy, his enthusiasms crushed; she is
miserable. Either with another partner might be a happy
person, yet, out of fear, they cannot break apart. They
must propitiate each other.
   The  auditor who finds a marriage in this condition
and attempts to treat one of the partners had better treat
both simultaneously. Or such partners had better treat
each other and soon. Tolerance and understanding are
almost always fostered23 by mutual help.
   Propitiation is mentioned here because it has a diag-
nostic value. People who start bringing the auditor expen-
sive gifts are propitiating him, and it probably means that
they have a computation which tells them, engramically,
that they will die or go crazy if they become sane. The
auditor may enjoy the gifts, but he had better start looking
for a sympathy engram not yet suspected or tapped.

                   Love
   Probably no single subject in the concerns of man
has received as much attention as love.

23. fostered: helped to grow or develop; stimulated; promoted.
                           427
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   It is not untrue  that where one  finds the greatest
controversy, there he will also find the least comprehen-
sion. And where the facts are least precise there one can
also find the greatest arguments. And so it is with love.
   Without doubt, love has ruined more lives than war
and made more happiness than all the dreams of paradise.
   Entangled with a thousand songs a year and sub-
merged beneath a solid tonnage24 of poor literature, love
should have a proper chance to be defined.
   It has been discovered that there are three kinds of
love between woman and man: the first is covered under
the law  of affinity and is the affection with which
mankind holds mankind; the second is sexual selection
and is a true magnetism between partners; the third is
compulsive "love" dictated by nothing more reasonable
than aberration.
   Perhaps in the hero and  heroine legends there have
been cases of the second kind, and surely as one looks
about him  in this society he can discover numbers of
happy partnerships based on a natural and strongly affec-
tionate admiration. The  third kind we  find in plenty:
tabloid25 literature is devoted to it and its travails; it crams
the courts with urgent pleas for divorce, with criminal acts
and civil suits; it sends children weeping into the corner
away  from quarrels; and it launches from  its broken
homes broken young women and men.
   Dianetics  classifies this third kind of love as "reac-
tive mind partnership." Here is a meeting of minds—
but the minds are on the lowest computational level
possessed by man. Driven together by compulsion, men
and women  mate who will find in that mating nothing
but sorrow and reduction of their hopes.
   He  is pseudobrother who beat her regularly or he is

24. tonnage: weight, measured in tons.
25. tabloid: a newspaper usually half the normal size, with many
pictures and short, often sensational, news stories.
                           428
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

pseudofather whom she had to mind. Maybe he is even
pseudomother who screamed ceaselessly at her but whom
she had to placate,26 and he might be the doctor who hurt
her so  savagely. She may  be  his pseudomother,  his
pseudograndmother whom he had to love despite the way
she undermined his decision; she may be a pseudonurse in
some operation long gone or the pseudoteacher who kept
him after school to whet27 her sadism upon him.
   Before the marriage  takes place they only know
there is a compulsion that they must be together, a
feeling that each must be extremely nice to the other.
And then the marriage takes place and more and more
restimulation of ancient pain is felt until at last each is
ill and life, complicated now perhaps by unhappy chil-
dren, is an unhappy ruin.
   The mechanism   of propitiation carries with it covert
hostility. Gifts given without cause and  beyond  the
ability to expend, self-sacrifices which seem so noble at
the time compose propitiation. Propitiation is an apathy
effort to hold away a dangerous "source" of pain. Mis-
taken identity is one of the minor errors of the reactive
mind. To buy off, to nullify the possible anger of a person
perhaps long  since dead but  living now again in the
partner, is the hope of propitiation. But a man is dead who
will not sometimes fight. The hostility may be masked, it
may  be entirely "unknown" to the individual who in-
dulges it. Certainly it is always justified in the mind of the
person who  exerts it and is supposed to be a  natural
consequence of some entirely obvious offense.
   The wife who makes inadvertent blunders before the
guests and by them accidentally gives away the truth of
her husband's favorite myth, the wife who forgets the
little favors he has asked, the wife who suddenly stabs

26. placate: stop from being angry; appease; pacify; mollify.
27. whet: make keen or eager; stimulate.
                           429
                 L. RON HUBBARD

him  with a "logical" pin in the region of his hopes:
these are wives who live with partners whom they must,
out of some wrong done years before the courtship and
by some  other man,  propitiate, and these are wives
who, propitiating, numb the hopes and misunderstand
the sorrows of their mates.
   The husband who  sleeps with another woman and
"accidentally" leaves the lipstick on his tie, the husband
who  finds her excellent cooking bad and idleness in her
days, the husband who  forgets her letters he must mail,
the husband who  finds her opinions silly: these are hus-
bands who live with partners whom they must propitiate.
   A  soaring, roller-coaster curve of peace and war in
the home, failures to understand, mutual curtailment of
liberty and self-determinism, unhappy lives, unhappy
children and divorce are caused by reactive mind mar-
riages. Compelled by an unknown  threat to marry,
repelled by fear of pain from trust, this "meeting of
minds"  is the primary cause of all marital disaster.
   The  law  lacked definition and so invoked  great
difficulty in the path of those involved in such marriages.
The  track of it is the dwindling spiral of misery which
accompanies  all chronic restimulation and leads only
down  to failure and to death. Someday there will, perhaps,
exist a much more sentient law that only the unaberrated
can marry  and bear children. The present law only pro-
vides that marriages must be at best most difficult to part.
Such a law is like a prison sentence for the husband, the
wife and the children—all and every one.
   A  marriage can be saved by clearing its partners of
their aberrations. An optimum solution would include
this in any case since it is most difficult for a wife or a
husband  to rise, even when  divorced, to any future
plane of happiness: and  where  there are children, if
clearing is not effected, a great injustice has been done.
   It is usually discovered that when both partners in a
                           430
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

reactive mind marriage  are cleared of aberration, life
becomes considerably more than tolerable; for human
beings often have a natural liking even when no sexual
selection has been present. The restoration of a mar-
riage by clearing the partners may not bring about one
of the great loves that poets strummed about, but it will
at least bring a high level of respect and cooperation
toward the common  goal of making life worthwhile.
And  in many  marriages so cleared it was discovered
that the partners, beneath the dirty cloth of aberration,
loved each other well.
   A  major gain to such a clearing is for the children's
sake. Nearly  all marital discontent has as its major
factor aberration on the second dynamic, sex. And any
such aberration includes a nervous disposition28 toward
children.
   Where  there are children, divorce does not answer,
clearing does. And with clearing comes a fresh new
page of life on which happiness can be written.
   In the case of the reactive mind marriage, turnabout
clearing is often complicated by the concealed hostili-
ties which lie below the propitiative mechanism. It is
wise for the partners to look outside the home, each
interesting a friend in a  therapy turnabout. If such
mutual clearing is begun, with the partners working on
each other, much  restraint of anger and exertion of
patience must be  practiced, and the Auditor's Code
must be  most severely followed. It requires a saintly
detachment to bear the tone 1 of  the partner who,
returned to a  quarrel, seasons the recountings  with
further recrimination. If it must be done, it can be done
but, when  many  quarrels and  travails have beset29 a

28. disposition: state of mind regarding something; inclination.
29. beset: encompassed; surrounded; assailed; possessed detri-
mentally: said of the difficulties, perils or obstacles which sur-
round an action, work or course.
                           431
                 L. RON HUBBARD

couple, it is easier if they each look without30 the home
for a therapy partner.
   Additionally, there is a kind of "rapport"  estab-
lished between any auditor and preclear and, after the
therapy session is done, a strengthening of the natural
affinity is such that a small deed or word may be taken
as a savage attack with the result of a quarrel and the
inhibition of therapy.
   Men  can be considered to be best audited by men
and women by women. This condition is changed when
one deals with a woman who  has such severe aberra-
tions about women that she is in fear around them or
when one is auditing a man who has deep fear of men.
   The dynamics of men and women are somehow
different and a wife, particularly if there have ever been
quarrels of any magnitude, sometimes finds it difficult
at times to be sufficiently insistent to audit her husband.
The husband may  audit, in the usual case, without great
difficulty but when in therapy himself, his feeling that
he  must rise superior to the  situation forces him to
attempt autocontrol,31 a thing which is impossible.

                The Erasure
   Sooner  or later—if you keep trying—you  will get
basic-basic, the earliest moment of "unconsciousness"
and physical pain. You will know when  you have it,
perhaps, only because  things start to erase rather than
reduce. If the patient still has a sonic shut-off, you can
still erase: sooner or  later that sonic  will turn on,
30. without: on the outside; outside.
31. autocontrol: autohypnosis or an attempt to process oneself
without an  auditor. If attempted in Dianetics, autohypnosis is
probably  as close to fruitless masochism as one can  get. If a
patient places himself in autohypnosis and regresses himself in an
effort to reach illness or birth or prenatals, the only thing he will
get  is ill.
                           432
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

perhaps not even until the case is almost finished. You
will reach basic-basic sooner or later.
   The erasure, then, is more or less the same pro-
cedure as the entrance. You erase all the early engrams,
always the earliest you can find, and you keep discharg-
ing painful emotion engrams either in the basic area or
in the later periods  after birth and later in life. You
erase as much as you can find in the early part of the
case, then you release all the emotion you can find later
in the case (erase everything in each engram you touch)
and then you come back and find early material.
   The reactive engram bank is a hurrah's nest.32 The
file clerk must have a great deal of trouble with it. For
things are keyed in early and late, sometimes all he can
get is material under certain topics; sometimes all he
can get is material under certain somatics (all teeth, for
instance); sometimes he can go in an orderly parade
forward in time and give consecutive incidents: this last
is the most important proceeding.
   Not until you have worked out every moment of
physical pain and discharged all the moments of painful
emotion will the case be cleared. There will be times
when you are sure that you are almost to the goal only
to discover, going into the prenatal area again, a new
series of material uncovered  by  the later life painful
emotion you have released.
   One day you will find a case which will not have any
occlusions anywhere on the track, which will no longer
be interested in engrams (apathy cases aren't interested
at the start; Clears, at the top level, are not interested
either, making a cycle, though the Clear is a long way
from apathetic), which will have all recalls, which will
compute  accurately and make  no errors (within the
limitations of the data available) and which, in short,

32. hurrah's nest: state of utmost confusion; a mess.
                           433
                 L. RON HUBBARD

has an exhausted engram bank. But do not be too optimis-
tic, ever. Keep looking until you are sure. Observe the
case to make  certain no aberrations are displayed about
anything, that dynamics are  high in it and that life is
good. If this person now feels he can solve all the prob-
lems of life, lick33 the world with one hand tied behind him
and feel a friend to all men, you have a Clear.
   The only way you can go wrong is to compute with the
idea that human beings are full of error and evil and sin
and that if you have made a person less unhappy and
above normal he is to be judged a Clear. This is a Release.
   In gold panning,34 it is true that every tenderfoot35
mistakes iron pyrites—fool's gold—for gold. The ten-
derfoot will crow  with  delight over a  bright bit of
something in his pan which, actually, is worth a few
dollars a ton. And then he sees real gold! The moment
he sees real gold in that pan, he knows what gold really
looks like. It cannot be mistaken.
   Aside from the fact that psychometry36 would show a
Clear phenomenally  intelligent, would show his apti-
tude and  versatility wide, there is another quality, the
human  quality of a freed man. You take a Release
through psychometry and show him to be above normal,
too. But a Clear is a Clear and when you see it you will
know  it with no further mistake.
   That  a Clear is no longer interested in his extinct
engrams  does not mean  he is not interested in the
troubles of others. That a person is not interested in his
own  engrams does not necessarily argue a Clear but
may well be another mechanism, the apathy of neglect.

33. lick: overcome or defeat, as in a fight, game or contest.
34. gold panning: separating (gold, etc.) from gravel by washing
it in a pan.
35. tenderfoot: a raw, inexperienced person; novice.
36. psychometry: measurement  of psychological variables, as
intelligence, aptitude and emotional disturbance.
                           434
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

To have engrams and neglect them is a common aberra-
tion with the reactive mind on a  Tone Scale level of
apathy. To have no engrams and neglect them is another
thing. Every apathy case, neglecting his engrams as an
answer to his woe, insisting he is happy, insisting, as he
racks himself to pieces, that there is nothing wrong with
him,  will, in work,  particularly  after basic-basic is
lifted, become interested in his engrams and more
interested in life. It is easy to tell the apathy case from
the Clear  for the two are  at opposite ends of  the
spectrum of life: the Clear has soared up toward victory
and triumph; the apathy case knows victory and tri-
umph  are not for him and explains they are not worth it.
   What the life span of a Clear is cannot be answered
now; ask in a hundred years.
   How  can you tell a Clear? How close does the man
measure to optimum  for man? Can he  adjust to his
environment smoothly? And far more important, can he
adjust that environment to him?
   Sixty days and again six months  after a Clear has
apparently been effected, the auditor should again make
a search for any neglected material. He should question
the possible Clear carefully as to the events of the past
interval. In such a way he can learn of any worries,
concerns or illnesses which may have taken place and
attempt to trace these to engrams. If he cannot then find
engrams, the Clear is definitely and without question,
cleared. And he will stay that way.
   If a case merely stalls, however, and while aberra-
tion seems to be present, engrams cannot be found, the
cause probably  lies with thoroughly masked  despair
charges—painful emotional engrams. These  are not
necessarily postnatal, they can be within the prenatal
period  and  involve circumstances which  are  very
secret—or so the engrams announce. Also, some cases
have stalled and proven "impenetrable" because of a
                            435
                 L. RON HUBBARD

current or immediately past circumstance  the patient
has not revealed.
   There are two reasons which can delay a case:
   a.  The person may be so aberratedly ashamed of
        his past  or  so certain  of retribution37 if he
       reveals it that he does nothing but avoid; and
   b.  The person may be  in fear because of some
       existing circumstance or threat.
   The  auditor is not interested in what the  patient
does. Or in what the patient has done. Dianetics treats38
of what  has been done  to the person exclusively in
therapy. What has been  done by  a patient is of no
concern. The auditor who would make it any concern is
practicing something other than Dianetics. However, a
patient, because of his engrams, may become obsessed
with the idea that he must hide something in his life
from the auditor. The two general classes above cover
the general conditions.
   These active reasons, as under (a), may be such a
thing as a prison sentence, a murder hitherto unknown
(although many people think they have done murder
who  have not even threatened it to anyone), abnormal
sexual practices or some such circumstance. The audi-
tor should promise not to reveal any confidential mat-
ter, purely as  a matter  of routine and  explain  the
principle of "done to, not done by." And no  auditor
would  taunt or revile a patient for having been victim-
ized by his engrams. As under (b) there may exist some
person, even the wife or husband, who has cowed3' the
patient into secrecy. One case is at hand where  no
advance was made although there were many incidents
37. retribution: punishment one deserves for a wrong that he has
done.
38. treats: deals with a subject in writing or speech; speaks or
writes (of).
39. cowed: subdued by frightening with threats or force.
                           436
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART ONE

contacted: the incidents would not reduce or erase no
matter where they were. It was discovered that this case,
a woman,  had been beaten savagely and often by her
husband and that she had been threatened with death if
she told the auditor a word of these acts; and yet these
acts contained the whole despair charges of the case and
had to be released. Seeing this, finally suspecting, the
auditor was able to gain her confidence and locate the
despair charges. Even if he had not gained her confi-
dence, by  constant restimulation of late-life areas he
would have provoked her tears. In another case, that of
a small child, "dub-in" recall was so obvious and lie
factories were so busy  that the auditor at last realized
that he was attempting to penetrate not just the secrecy
on an engram but the secrecy imposed upon a child by
someone at hand. The mother, in this case, out of the idea
that she would be apprehended, had furiously threatened
the child to say nothing about his treatment at home.
There was  more than this behind the case: there were
eighty-one attempted abortions, an incredible number.
   Anything is the business of an auditor if it has become
an engram. If society has jailed a man, if all is not well in
the home, these are things done to a person. What the
person did to "deserve" this treatment is of no concern.

         The Foreign-Language Case
   Now  and again an auditor will encounter a strange sort
of holdup in a case. He will be unable to get anything to
clear or make sense in the prenatal area, and sometimes in
childhood as well as the prenatal area. He may be encoun-
tering a "foreign-language case." Occasionally, the child
did not know he was born to other parents (who may have
spoken a foreign tongue) than those he has known as his
parents. This is a special sort of mix-up of its own which
is rather easily resolved simply by running engrams. It is
always  possible for the patient to forget that his parents
                            437
                 L. RON HUBBARD

spoke some other tongue in the home. Another tongue
than the one the patient is using or other than that of the
country in which  the patient resides is, in one way, an
asset: it gives a prenatal area which  is very difficult to
restimulate although it may still be acting upon the pa-
tient's mind. But it is no asset to the auditor, who must
now deal with a patient who does not know the language,
who  may not have sonic recall and yet has an engram
bank full of data which once had meaning and really is his
basic language.
   The best remedy for such a case is to get an auditor
who knows  both the language used in the prenatal area
and the present tongue. Another remedy is to take a
dictionary to the case and figure out the bouncers, et
al., from the dictionary. Another way is to return the
patient often enough  into the infant period  that he
begins to pick up the language again (making the file
drawer of it come forth) and then ask the patient for
phrases which, in the foreign tongue, would mean this
or that. Gradually he may recover the language and so
exhaust the bank. This is an extremely difficult case
only when  there was no  childhood use of the other
tongue. Given childhood use of that tongue, the auditor
simply keeps returning the patient to childhood when he
knew  the tongue and then returning him into the prena-
tal area; the patient can translate what is happening.
The  cliches of other tongues  -than that the auditor
speaks are often quite productive of other literal mean-
ings than comparable cliches in the auditor's tongue.
This difference of cliche is a very responsible agent in
the social aberrations of one nation as they differ from
those of another. "I have hot," says the Spaniard. "I
am  hot," says the Englishman.  Engramically, they
mean  different things, even if they mean the same to the
analyzer.

                           438
                     CHAPTER NINE


 Mechanisms and Aspects of
    Therapy—Part Two
            Extrasensory Perception
   Every  time the auditor has a case with dub-in recall
or which is highly charged with emotion, the case may
return into the prenatal area and start describing sce-
nery. This is the awe and wonder of some beholders.
There is the patient in the womb and yet he can "see"
outside. The patient tells about Father and Mother and
where they are sitting and what the bedroom looks like,
and yet there he is in the womb. Some pretty theories
can  be advanced  for this: one of them  is that the
tortured fetus develops extrasensory perception in order
to see what is coming next. ESP is an excellent theory
and some  observation may confirm it, but not in the
fetus.
   One  must recall that the fetus, even if it has highly
developed  and  clever cells, is yet not a truly rational
organism. The presence of the engram does not neces-
sarily mean  that the fetus could think. The engram
became  most severely aberrative when the child finally
learned speech. The engram is not a memory but a
recording of pain and percepts.
   Returning a grown man  or a child into the prenatal
area returns there an experienced mind which, connect-
ing with these engrams, forms conclusions. To listen to
some  preclears one would think they read Keats' and
drank lemonade every afternoon at four throughout the
prenatal period.
 1. Keats: John Keats (1795-1821), English poet, considered one
of  the greatest English poets. His poems are  unequaled for
dignity, melody and richness of imagery.

                           439
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   To return reason and analytical power back into a
period when  neither reason nor analytical power ex-
isted, of course, impinges upon the returned individual
many ideas. All he is supposed to run are the engrams
and  their contents. He may  additionally, by dream
mechanisms  and current computation, try to fashion in
a whole technicolor picture of the scenery.
   This prenatal ESP does not in fact exist. It has been
proven, after considerable test, that whenever the re-
turned preclear thinks he sees something, the scenery
itself is mentioned in the engrams and gives him an
imaginary picture of it. There is no prenatal ESP, in
other words. There  are only descriptions and actions
which suggest scenery and these suggestions, operating
now  upon the imagination, bring about the supposed
visio.
   This is most chronic with patients who have high-
powered  lie factories. When the auditor sees this, he
begins to form a notion of the case he is engaged upon;
he knows "dub-in sonic" may be used and he should
find and discharge all painful emotion he can reach, for
it is this painful emotion which so disposes a case to
avoid. He  can find, then, the lie factory itself, not the
lie factory of the lie factory which produces lie facto-
ries, but the actual engram which causes all this delu-
sion.
   However,  never bring a preclear up short on this
material. Don't tell him it is imaginary, you'll drive the
lie factory into higher effort. For there are sympathy
computations  here, despairful losses, great prenatal
pain and childhood neglect. And it would take little to
shatter what self-confidence this patient has managed to
assemble.  Therefore walk   softly, look for despair
charges, allies, sympathy engrams and get the lie fac-
tory. Then the case will settle down and progress to
Clear.
                            440
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

                Electric Shock
   It has been found important, in entering a case, to
locate and relieve all engrams caused by electric shock
of whatever kind. These seem to produce a grouping of
engrams, whether they are received prenatally (as some
have been), accidentally or at the hands of psychiatrists.
Any electric shock seems to have more than usual force
in the engram   bank  and apparently deranges  the
memory  files of both past and future events surrounding
the shock area. Further, electric shock injury contains a
great depth  of "unconsciousness"   which  thereafter
holds the analytical mind in a reduced state.

                Tacit Consent
   In the case of two preclears working on each other,
each one  assuming  in his turn the auditor's role, a
condition can arise where each prevents the other from
contacting certain engrams.
   For example, preclear A has an ally computation
concerning a dog. He unknowingly seeks to protect this
"prosurvival"  engram  within himself  although, of
course, failure to release it will hinder therapy. As he
audits preclear B he has a tendency to project his own
problems into preclear B, which is to say he has some
slight confusion of identity. If preclear B is known to
have some  "prosurvival" engram about a dog, then
preclear A, auditing, will actually avoid making pre-
clear B contact B's own engram. This is a mistaken
2. tacit consent: in the case of two preclears working on each
other, each one assuming in his turn the auditor's role, a condi-
tion can arise where  each prevents the other from contacting
certain engrams. This is tacit consent. A husband and wife may
have a mutual period of quarrels and unhappiness. Engaged upon
clearing each other, working  alternately as auditor, they avoid,
unknowingly, but by reactive computation, the mutual period,
thus leaving in place painfully emotional engrams.
                            441
                 L. RON HUBBARD

idea that by letting B keep his dog engram, A can retain
his dog engram.  This is "tacit consent." It might be
summed  as a bargain: "If you don't make me get well, I
won't  make you  get well." This should be guarded
against: once known  that such a condition exists and
that such reluctance to clear the other is manifested,
 "tacit consent" ceases.
   It may also happen that a husband and wife may
have a mutual period of quarrels or unhappiness. En-
gaged  upon clearing each other, working alternately as
auditor, they avoid, unknowingly but by reactive com-
putation, the mutual period, thus leaving in place pain-
fully emotional engrams.
    Tacit consent is not easily recognized by the individ-
uals so involved, and preclears, alternating as auditors,
should be very wary  of it for it cannot do other than
slow a case.

         Emotion and Pain Shut-offs*
   A  case which manifests no emotion or cannot feel
pain when emotion and pain should be present in some
incident is suffering from  a  "feeling" shut-off: this
most likely will be found in the prenatal area. The word
feeling means both pain and emotion: thus the phrase,
 "I can't feel anything," may be an anesthetic for both.
   If an exteriorized view of the incident (where the
patient sees himself and is not in himself) or what
pretends to be prenatal "ESP" is present, the emotional
shut-off probably stems from painful emotion engrams
in late life or at least postbirth. If there is no exterior-
ized view and the patient is within himself, and yet no
sharpness of pain or emotion manifests itself while he is
 * The somatic strip works in all shut-off"s whether the patient
feels it or not. The somatic strip also obeys but no somatic
 turns on when the incident is occluded by "unconsciousness,"
the somatic appearing after the "boil-off." —LRH
                          442
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two
                                                      /
running through an engram, an early emotional shut-off
or an  early pain shut-off should  be suspected  and
should be located by repeater technique. Run the words
"no  emotion" until a paraphrase is obtained: run the
words "I can't feel," or some other phrase meaning the
same  thing and the patient, if the engrams are available
and are not suppressed by others, will eventually respond.
   It may happen that a case may "work" very well,
which is to say, that engrams present themselves and
can be run and reduced, without emotion manifesting
itself as part of the content and with somatics which are
dull and not so much  pain as simply pressure. If the
pain and  emotion  shut-offs do  not yield at first to
repeater technique, many engrams may have to be run
in the basic area without pain or emotion but only with
pressure and word  content. In such a case, pain and
emotion can eventually be contacted, after which ther-
apy is more beneficial.

             Exteriorized Mews
   Whenever  you find a patient, returned, outside him-
self and seeing himself, that patient is off the track. He
should not be told so, but the despair charges, which is
to say, the painful emotion engrams, should be found as
soon as possible and discharged. This is something of
the same mechanism as the ESP described above.

                   Telepathy
   Every few cases some preclear may try to palm off
telepathy as an aberrative factor. This is more rainbow
chasing. There may be telepathy but, so far as research
has shown, the fetus doesn't receive any and even if he
receives it, it is not aberrative in any way.
   Exhaustive tests were made on telepathy and ESP
and in every case an explanation was found which did
not need to go into mind reading or radar sight.
                           443
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   When   a patient tries to tell the auditor that he is
reciting Mother's thoughts received prenatally, be cer-
tain that somewhere around there is an engram in which
she says these exact, words aloud. Mothers, especially
when  aberrated severely and especially when aberrated
severely enough to attempt abortion, have many en-
grams they dramatize. The power of the dramatization
commonly  manifests itself as monologues. Some moth-
ers have a very great deal to say to themselves when
alone. All of this speech is, of course, transmitted to the
child when he is injured, and he may be injured without
Mother  being injured as in an attempted abortion. For
considerable time after such an injury the child is usually
"unconscious"  and in pain; he therefore records in en-
grams  these monologues (and  often the voice is quite
loud). He doesn't hear it: it is simply cellularly recorded.
All such monologuing  is aberrative, of course, and pro-
duces some remarkable patterns of insanity and neurosis.
   But of telepathy, there is none that is aberrative so
far as we know at this time. So the auditor should not
accept telepathy any more than he would accept ESP.

          Prenatal Living Conditions
   It is very noisy in the womb. A person may think he
has sonic and yet hear no "womb"  sounds, which
means that he does not have sonic but only "dub-in."
Intestinal squeaks and groans, flowing water, belches,
flatulence and other body activities of the mother pro-
duce a continual sound.
   It is also very tight in later prenatal life.
   In a high blood pressure case, it is extremely horri-
ble in the womb.
   When  Mother  takes quinine,3 a high ringing noise
3. quinine: a bitter medicinal drug used to treat malaria and in
tonics,
                          444
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

may  come  into being in the fetal ears as well as her
own—a   ringing which will carry through a person's
whole  life.
   Mother gets morning sickness, has hiccups and gets
colds, coughs and sneezes.
   This is prenatal life.
   The only reason anybody "wanted" to "return to the
womb"  was because somebody hit Mother and yelled
"Come  back here!" so the person does.

         The Engram  Filing System
   Engrams  are not filed in the orderly fashion man-
aged by a cleared standard bank. Engrams are filed in a
way which  would defy Alexander. Hence, it is difficult
to know when the proper consecutive item will appear.
   Time, topic, value, somatic and emotion are the
methods  of filing.
   The  return from basic-basic may be an  apparent
orderly progress  into  late life. Suddenly  a despair
charge is triggered and discharged. The auditor looks
back at the prenatal area and finds a whole new series
of incidents in view. Progress is then begun back to
present time, step by step, another discharge is trig-
gered and another series of prenatals comes into sight.
These are erased and progress is made back toward
present time when  still another despair charge is re-
leased and still more prenatals come to view. These are
erased and so forth and so on.
   The engram filing system gives out data by somatic,
time, topic, value or emotion. Usually the file clerk
hands  out material on the basis of time and  topic.
Emotion in the bank keeps the file clerk from getting at
a certain series of incidents; when the emotion is dis-
charged, the incidents become available and incidents
are brought out until another emotional charge stops the
file clerk. The wit of the auditor is most used, not in
                           445
                 L. RON HUBBARD

getting prenatals, but in finding these later-life emo-
tional charges and discharging them.
   All in all the engram  filing system is very poor,
unlike the standard bank. But it is also very vulnerable
now that we understand it.
   The engram filing system data can be erased. Stand-
ard bank  data cannot be erased. Pain is perishable—
pleasure endures.

                    Alleviation
   The psychoanalyst or general counselor in human
relations is occasionally faced with a type of problem
which Dianetics, applied in small quantity, can resolve
easily.
   It is possible, when a person has been too disturbed
by an event of the day to address himself to the problem
at hand, to alleviate his disturbance with a few minutes
of work.
   A sudden change in the aspect of a patient, a sudden
deterioration of his serenity, generally stems from some
incident which has caused him  mental  anguish. Al-
though this change of mind  has its source in the re-
stimulation of an engram, the moment of restimulation,
which is a lock, may be addressed and alleviated with
success.
   Using  reverie or merely asking the patient to close
his eyes, the analyst can request him to return and be in
the instant wherein he was disturbed. That instant may
be in the same day or the same week as the office call.
A  moment  of analytical shutdown will be discovered
wherein some restimulative person or circumstance up-
set the equilibrium4 of the patient. This moment is a
lock. It can be recounted, ordinarily, as an engram and

4. equilibrium: mental or emotional balance; evenness of mind
or temper; composure.
                           446
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

the latest source of tension will relieve so that work can
be continued. The engram itself, upon which the lock
depended, may  not be accessible without a full Dianetic
address to the problem.
   The  auditor, finding a patient much disturbed, can
often save time by relieving the lock which caused the
immediate  disturbance of the preclear.
   Locating locks on a wholesale basis is unremunera-
tive from a Dianetic viewpoint  since there are thou-
sands and thousands of them in every case. Locating the
last lock, which is hindering work, may be of benefit.

   The Tone Scale and Reduction of Engrains
   Because it is very important, the mechanism of the
reduction of a late painful emotion engram must be
specifically detailed.
   The uses of reduction on late engrams are wide and
various. When  the auditor gets into trouble with his
preclear by some violation of the Auditor's Code, he
can treat the violation as a painful emotion engram and
reduce it, at which moment the effect of his blunder
will be gone in the preclear. The auditor merely returns
the preclear back to the blunder and runs the error itself
as an engram. When the husband has quarreled with his
wife or she has found out some unpleasant thing about
his activities, he can treat the quarrel or the discovery
as a painful emotion engram  and release it with the
result of no further worry about it by his wife. When
the little boy's dog has just been run over, the incident
can be treated as a painful emotion engram and released.
When   the preclear's wife has just left him, treat the
leaving as a painful emotion engram and release it. What-
ever the shock or upset, it can be reduced in an individual
by regular reduction technique and  the individual will
cease to be troubled by it in the painful emotion sense.
   It does not matter whether the engram occurred two
                           447
                          L. RON HUBBARD

          hours or ten years ago, painful emotion can be reduced
           from it. It is run exactly like any other engram, begin-
           ning at the beginning of the first shock with the patient
           returning to it and continuing far enough along it to
           adequately embrace its first impact.
              The aspect of this reduction is a pattern which does
           not much vary. If the news struck the individual into
           apathy, then, as he recounts, he will, unless there is a
           severe emotional shut-off elsewhere, progress through
           the incident a time or two, perhaps, before he contacts it
           properly. Then there will come the tears and despair of
          apathy. Another  two or three runs should  bring up
          anger. Then further recounting (always from beginning
           to end as reexperience) brings the tone up into bore-
          dom.  Further recounting should bring it to tone 3 or 4,
           release or, most favorably, laughter.
Iff:          This progress of the tones is the clue which led to
           the establishment of the Tone Scale from 0 to 4. A tone
           4 is laughter.
             There is sometimes a stage in the tone 2 area where
           the patient begins to be offhand and flippant.5 This is
           not tone 4, it denotes more data present. He may resist
           recounting at this point, saying the incident is released.
           The auditor must insist on further recounting whenever
           he finds the preclear unwilling to recount again, for
           here is data being suppressed  and more   charge is
           present. The flippancy  is generally found to be an
          escape mechanism and is sometimes uttered in the very
           words which are yet concealed. More recounting (with-
           out the auditor insisting any certain words be found) is
           then done until the patient reaches tone 4.
              Here we have, in vignette,6 the behavior of the whole
            5. flippant: joking or trying to be funny when one should be
            more serious or show more respect.
             6. vignette: a short description or character sketch.
                                      448
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

engram bank  in the process of therapy. The entire bank
rises from its initial tone level eventually up to tone 4,
higher and higher as more and more engrams are erased
or reduced. The bank's rise is not, however, a smooth
upward curve for new engrams will be contacted with
apathy in them and some have manics in them. The
painful emotion engram, however, does a rather smooth
rise. If it is going to release at all it will rise up the
scale. If it does not rise up the scale—apathy to anger,
anger to boredom, boredom to cheerfulness or at least
no concern—then   it is suppressed by an incident with
similar content.
   An engram  may begin at tone 1 —anger—and rise
from  there. If it is found to  be in  tone 2  at the
start—boredom—it  is hardly an engram.
   It may, however, be in a false tone 2 and suppressed
by other data so that the patient merely appears bored
and  careless about it. A few recountings may bring
about release of it, at which moment it will sag in-
stantly to apathy—tone 0—and then come on up  the
scale of the tones. Or another engram may have to be
contacted.
   The  whole physical being follows this Tone Scale
throughout a course of therapy. The mental being fol-
lows this Tone Scale. And painful emotion engrams
follow it.
   On  an erasure down  in the basic area or when
returning from basic-basic, two or three runs will erase
an engram  of whatever kind unless it is the basic on a
new  chain of similar incidents. But engrams which
show no emotion anywhere on the track are suppressed
by emotional or feeling shut-offs, late painful emotion
or early engrams, which simply shut off the pain or
emotion in so many words.
   A  case should be kept "live." There must be vari-
ability of emotion. A monotone recounting, which is to
                           449
                 L. RON HUBBARD

say, one which does not vary the engramic tone but
merely reduces, is necessary in the basic area at times,
but any time a  patient becomes orderly and "well
drilled" and expresses no concern over his engrams as
he recounts them, there is late painful emotion to be
tapped or early emotional shut-off. Conversely, if the
patient is too continuously emotional about all and
anything, if he weeps awhile and then laughs hysteri-
cally, therapy is being done but one should be alert for
something engramic in the prenatal area which says he
has to be "too emotional"—which   is to say, he has
engrams which make him emotional by their command
content.
   The Tone Scale is very useful and is a good guide. It
will be most prominent  in reducing postspeech en-
grams, but will also appear earlier.
   Any  painful emotion engram can be run. If it is
properly reducing and  not suppressed  elsewhere, it
follows the Tone Scale upwards to tone 4.

            If the Patient Does Not
      Work  Well on Repeater Technique

   If, when  the patient repeats a line the auditor has
given him, the patient does not move to an incident,
three things can be  wrong:  first, the patient cannot
move  on the track; second, the phrase may be sensibly
withheld by  the file clerk until such time as it can be
cleared; or third, the phrase does not exist as engramic
material.
   The patient may also have strong "control yourself"
engrams  which manifest themselves by his snatching
control from the auditor, being very bossy or simply
refusing cooperation. Repeater  technique, when  di-
rected at "control yourself" and "I've got to operate"
and allied phrases, can then work.
                           450
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two.

   The usual reason repeater technique does not work
is that the patient is in a holder. If he is returned but
does not shift on the track when repeater technique is
given him, use repeater technique on the holders.
   Remember  that a "feeling" shut-off can deny all
somatics so that the patient does not feel them. If the
patient seems insensible to trouble on the track, be sure
that he has a feeling shut-off.
   A  large emotional charge may also inhibit repeater
technique. The  somatic strip does not go well into
emotional charges—painful emotion engrams—and re-
peater technique is therefore indicated.
   If repeater technique does not work, although it is
seldom necessary, one may request the patient to imag-
ine "the worst thing that could happen to a baby" and
so forth, and from his conversation may be garnered
new  phrases for repeater work which  will take the
patient into an engram.

           Single Word Technique
   Words as well as engrams exist in chains. There is
always a first time for the recording of each word in a
person's life. The whole common  language may lie
within the engram bank. The possible combinations of
that common language may well approach infinity. The
ways various denyers, bouncers, et al., can be phrased
are always beyond count.
   Two  "happy"  facts exist, however, to reduce the
auditor's labors. First, the dramatis personae7 of his
engrams  are at this date aberrated. Each aberree has
standard dramatizations which he repeats over and over
in restimulative situations. The reaction, for instance,
of the father to the mother is repetitious: if he utters a

7. dramatis personae:  the characters in a play or story (used
here to refer to people present in the engrams of the aberree).
                            451
                 L. RON HUBBARD

set of phrases in one engramic situation, he will utter it
in subsequent  similar situations. If the mother, for
example,  has an accusative attitude toward the father,
then that attitude will be expressed in certain terms and
these terms will appear in engram after engram. The
second fact is that where the father or mother is abusive
to the other, the other will eventually begin  to suffer
contagion  of aberration and  will repeat the other's
phrases. In a firstborn child, where parental brutality is
present, one can observe the parents through the en-
grams  of the patient and see one or the other gradually
take up the other's phrases either to worry about them-
selves or to redeliver them. All this tends to make the
engrams  appear in chains of incidents, each incident
much  like the next. When one has the basic on each
type of chain, the subsequent incidents on that chain are
sufficiently similar to permit many  incidents to be
reduced  or erased immediately after the first is found.
The first incident on the chain, the basic for that chain,
holds the others more or less in place and out of sight;
therefore, the basic of the chain is the goal.
   Each  word in the bank can be discovered to have
been delivered to the bank for the first time. Words also
reduce in chains with the virtue that each subsequent
appearance of the word in the bank locates automati-
cally a new engram, which, of course, is reduced or
erased as soon as it is contacted or as soon as its basic
can be located.
   Single word technique is very valuable and useful. It
is a special kind of repeater technique. On most pa-
tients, the repetition by themselves of one word will
cause the associated words to suggest themselves. Thus,
one  asks the patient to repeat and return on the word
forget. He starts repeating the word forget and shortly
has an associated set of words, making a phrase, such
as "You can never forget me." Here we have a phrase in
                           452
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

an engram and the remainder of the engram can then
be run.
   When   a late engram  has had to be  contacted to
progress a case and yet will not relieve, it is possible to
take each word or phrase of that late engram and run it
back with repeater technique. Thus the earlier engrams
which hold this Sate engram in place can be located and
reduced, and eventually one will have reduced the late
engram  itself. This, by the way, is a common and useful
practice.
   There is a Saw about this: When any phrase or word
in an engram will not reduce, the same phrase or word
occurs in an earlier engram. One may have to discharge
late emotion  to get the earlier phrase, but ordinarily
single word repeater or phrase repeater will attain it.
   There are only a few dozens of words necessary to
get almost any engram. These would be the key single
word  repeaters. They are such words as these: forget,
remember, memory,  blind, deaf, dumb, see, feel, hear,
emotion, pain, fear, terror, afraid, bear, stand, lie, get,
come, time, difference, imagination, right, dark, black,
deep, up,  down,  words, corpse, dead,  rotten, death,
book, read, soul, hell, god, scared, miserable, horrible,
past, look, everything, everybody, always, never, every-
where,   all, believe,  listen, matter,   seek, original,
present, back, early, beginning, secret, tell, die, found,
sympathy,  mad,  crazy, insane, rid, fight, fist, chest,
teeth, jaw, stomach, ache, misery, head, sex, Anglo-
Saxon four-letter words of sex and profanity, skin, baby,
it, curtain, shell, barrier, wall, think, thought, slippery,
confused,  mixed, smart, poor,  little, sick, life, Father,
Mother, familiar names of parents and any others of
household  during  prenatal  and  childhood period,
money, food, tears, no, world, excuse, stop, laugh, hate,
jealous, shame, ashamed, coward, etc.
   Bouncers, denyers, holders, groupers, misdirectors,
                           453
                    L. RON HUBBARD

et al., each have their common single words and these
are few. The bouncer would contain: out, up, return, go,
late, later, etc.
   The  holder  would  contain: catch, caught,  trap,
trapped, stop, He, sit, stay, can't, stuck, fixed, hold, let,
lock, locked, come, etc.
   The  grouper would  contain: time, together, once,
difference, etc.
   The single word technique shines nowhere brighter
than in the Junior case—where the patient carries the
name  of one or another parent or grandparent. By
clearing out the patient's name from the prenatal en-
grams (where it is applied to another person but misin-
terpreted by the patient as himself), the  patient can
regain his own definition and valence. Always use the
patient's first name and last name (separately) as re-
peater, Junior or not.
   If the engram bank is blank on a phrase, it probably
is not blank on a common word. Any small dictionary
will provide an ample fund for single word technique.
Use  also any list of familiar first names, male and
female, and you may discover allies or lovers not other-
wise contactable.
   The  painful emotion engram  sometimes yields
slowly by  simply  directing the somatic  strip to it.
Sometimes  the patient finds it difficult to approach an
overcharged  area. Single word  technique  using the
name  of the ally, if known, or words of sympathy,
endearment, death, rejection or farewell, and the love
name  of the patient as a child in particular, will often
yield swift results.
   By  the way, in using repeater technique, word or
phrase, the auditor must not stir the case up too much.
Get what shows and reduce that. Reduce the somatic the
person manifests when he goes into reverie and always
try to find it for a while, even if you don't succeed. If
                           454
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

you stir up something en route down a chain which
won't reduce, mark it to be reduced when you have the
basic.
   Using  single word   technique one  often obtains
phrases which  would  otherwise remain hidden  but
which come  into view when the key word is tapped.
Using hear as a single word, for instance, the following
phrases came to light which had thoroughly impeded
the progress of the case. No effort was being made to
contact such an engram  in the prenatal area. Indeed,
the "fight" chain had never been suspected since the
patient had never dramatized it, and, because such a
violent prenatal fight chain  existed, the fact that his
parents fought violently in the home was utterly struck
from the standard banks so that he would have denied
such a thing with  shocked surprise had it been sug-
gested. The somatic was unusually severe, caused by
the father kneeling on the mother and choking her.
   Patient repeated "hear"  several times, the auditor
asking  him  to return to an  incident containing that
word. The  patient continued to repeat and then sud-
denly sank into a stupor when he reached the prenatal
area. He remained  in this "boil-off" for about thirty
minutes and then, the auditor rousing him occasionally
to make  him  repeat the word "hear," manifested a
strong somatic. "Hear" became "Stay here!" The so-
matic became stronger and "Stay here" was repeated
until the patient could move freely on the track through
the engram.  He contacted his father's voice and was
most reluctant to carry on with the engram, due to its
intense emotional violence. Coaxed and edged into it by
the auditor, the engram was recounted.
Father: "Stay here! Stay down, damn you, you bitch!
     I'm going to kill you this time. I said I would and
      I will. Take that!"  (Intensified somatic as his
     knee ground into the mother's abdomen.) "You
                            455
            L. RON HUBBARD

better start screaming. Go on, scream for mercy!
Why  don't you break down? Don't worry, you
will! You'll be blubbering'around here, screaming
for mercy! The  louder you scream  the worse
you'll get. That's what I want to hear! I'm a punk
kid, am I? You're the punk kid! I could finish you
now but I am not going to!" (Auditor suddenly
has trouble, patient taking last phrase literally and
stopping his recounting; auditor starts him again.)
"This is just a sample. There's a lot more than
that where it came from! I hope it hurts! I hope it
makes you cry! You say a word to anybody and
I'll kill you in earnest." (Patient now running
ahead with such an emotional surge that com-
mands are less active on him. This command to
remain  quiet disregarded.) "I'm going to bust
your face in. You don't know what  it is to be
hurt!" (Somatic lessened by removal of the knee.)
"I know what I'm going to do to you now! I'm
going to punish you! I'm going to punish you and
God  is going to punish you! I'm going to rape
you! I'm going to stick it into you and tear you!
When  I tell you to do something you've got to do
it! Get up on the bed! Lie down! Lie still!" (Crack
of bones  as she is struck in the face with a fist.
Blood  pressure coming  up and  hurting baby.)
"Lie  still! You'll always be here! I'm going to
finish this! You're unclean!  You  are dirty and
diseased! God's punished you and now I'm going
to punish you!"  (Coitus somatic begins, very
violent, further  injuring child.)  "You've  got
something terrible in your past. You think you've
got to be mean to me! You try to make me feel
like nothing! You're the one that's nothing! Take
it, take it!" (String of sexual banalities screamed
for about five minutes.)
                     456
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   The  patient recounted this three times and it erased.
It was  basic-basic! Three days  after conception, as
nearly as could be judged by the subsequent days to the
missed  period. It threw into view almost all the other
important data in the case, which then resolved and was
cleared.*
   The single word might have landed the patient on some
other of the hears in the case. In this event it would be
necessary  to pick it up at its earliest moment or the
remainder of the engram might not erase or reduce.
   The  word hear might also have landed the patient
later on the track, in which case the engrams would
have had to have been traced back earlier until one was
found which would  erase, reducing each one as it was
encountered  until the earliest was reached, when all
would  erase.

* Apropos  of* this text, it crossed the "fight chain" with the
 "coitus chain," occluding both. Wherever this engram origi-
nated or where the engrams which are compounded into it
came from, is of course a matter of antiquity. This was home
conduct for Papa, a character confirmed by the fact that both
his wife and  child were  almost psychotic. Papa  was not
 "psychotic." He was  a  "bold, forceful" and  "forthright"
man, president of a bank and renowned for his hardheaded-
,iess. The son was  a drunkard,  a soapbox9  atheist, and
negated  against everything his father represented including
money.  The  son, while still in therapy, incautiously told his
father of this engram  and the father raved  wildly against
Dianetics for two days and then came down with "rheumatic
fever,"10 in which state he sent for the auditor in the case to
clear him, which was  done. Both cases were sonic shut-offs,
pain and emotion shut-offs. —LRH


8. apropos of: with reference to; in respect or regard to.
9. soapbox:  of, pertaining to, or characteristic of a speaker or
 speech from a soapbox: any  improvised platform used by a
person making an informal, often impassioned speech to a street
 audience, as on a current, controversial issue.
 10. rheumatic fever: a disease more common among children
 than adults, characterized by fever, pains in the joints and often
damage  to the heart.

                            457
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   In using  single word repeater, as in phrase repeater,
the auditor should not permit a rapid, unmeaning repeti-
tion but a slow repeat, the auditor requesting the somatic
strip to return the while and asking the patient to contact
anything else which might associate with the word.
   Caution: If the patient is not moving on the track, do
not give him repeater words or phrases at random as these
will pile up engrams where the patient is stuck. Use only
efforts to get the patient moving on the track by discover-
ing and reducing the phrase that is holding him.
   Caution: Basic-basic does not always have words in
it, often being only painful and accompanied   with
womb  sounds. It will, nevertheless, hold everything in
place by its perceptics.

        Special Classes of Commands
   There  are several distinct classes of commands.
They  are outlined here for ready reference with some
samples of each.
   Aberrative commands  can  contain anything. The
auditor does not much concern himself with them. Refer
back to our young man and the coat in Book Two and
there we find, in the guise of hypnotic commands, some
idea of what aberrative commands are. "I am a jub-jub
bird," "I can't whistle Dixie,""  "The  world  is all
against me," "I hate policemen,"  "I am  the ugliest
person in the world," "You haven't any feet," "The
Lord is going to punish me," "I always have to play
with my  thing," may be very  interesting to the patient
and even amusing to the auditor and may have caused a
considerable amount  of  trouble in the patient's life.
Where  Dianetic therapy is concerned, these all come

11. whistle Dixie: engage  in wishful thinking. Dixie is a lively
song about  the Southern states of the United States, written in
1859 by  Daniel D. Emmett  (1815-1904). It was used to build
enthusiasm for the South during the Civil War.
                           458
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

up in due course. Looking for a specific aberration or a
specific somatic is sometimes of interest and sometimes
of some use, but it is not usually important. These aberra-
tive commands  may contain enough data to make the
patient a raving zealot, a paranoid or a catfish, but they
are nothing to the auditor. They come up in due course.
Working on them or about them is secondary and less.
   The primary business of the auditor in any case is to
keep the patient moving on the track, keep his somatic
strip free to come and go and reduce engrams. The
moment  the patient acts as though or responds as though
he was not moving, or the moment the file clerk will not
give forth data, then something is wrong and that some-
thing has to do with a few classes of phrase. There are
thousands of such phrases contained in engrams, vari-
ously worded, but only five classes:

                  Denyers
   "Leave  me alone," which  means, literally, that he
must leave the incident alone.
   "I can't tell" means he can't tell you this engram.
    "It's hard to tell" means it is hard to tell.
   "I don't want to know" means he has no desire to
know this engram.
   "Forget  it" is the classic of the subclass of denyer,
the forgetter mechanism. When  the engram simply
won't come to view but there is a somatic or a muscle
twitch, send the somatic strip to the denyer. It is often
"Forget it" or "Can't remember" as a part of the
engram. "I don't know what's going on" may be Mama
telling Papa something,  but the preclear's analyzer,
impinged, then doesn't know what's going on.
   "It's beyond me"  means  he is right there but he
thinks he isn't.
   "Hold  on to this, it's your life!" makes the engram
"vital" to existence.
                           459
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   "It can't be reached," "I can't get in there," "No-
body must know,"  "It's a secret," "If anybody found
out, I'd die," "Don't talk," and thousands more.

                   Holders
   The holder is the most frequent and the most used
since whenever the preclear can't shift on the track or
come to present, he is in a holder. A holder combined
with a denyer will still hold: if it can't be found, look
for the denyer first, then the holder.
   "I'm  stuck" is the classic phrase.
   "That fixed it" is another.
   "I'm  caught" doesn't mean to the preclear what
Mama  meant when she said it. It may mean to her that
she is pregnant but it tells the preclear he is caught on
the track.
   "Don't move,"  "Sit there until I tell you to move,"
"Stop  and think." (On  this last phrase, when it is
uttered on a first recounting, the auditor may have to
start him going again for he does just that: he stops and
thinks, and he would stop there and think for some
time. The auditor will see this strange obedience to this
literal nonsense as he works a case.)
   And thousands more. Any way words literally under-
stood can stop a person or keep him from moving.

                 Bouncers
   The bouncer could best be demonstrated by a curve.
The  preclear goes back into prenatal and then finds
himself at ten years of age or even present time. That's
a bouncer at work. He goes early on the time track: it
says come back up.
   When  the preclear can't seem to get earlier, there is
a bouncer ejecting him from an engram. Get a comment
from him on what's happening. Take the comment or
some phrase which would be a bouncer and use repeater
                            460
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

technique until he settles back down on the engram. If
he contacts it easily, it won't bounce him again.
   "Get out" is the classic bouncer. The patient usually
goes toward present time.
   "Can't go back at this point" may mean Mama has
decided she will have to have the baby after all or finish
the abortion, but to the preclear it means he must move
on up  the time track or that he can't get any earlier
period.
   "Get up there."
   "Run a mile." ("Beat it," would not be a bouncer; it
would mean the preclear should beat the engram.)
   "I must go far, far away," so he does.
   "I'm growing up," "Blow  you higher than a kite,"
"Batter up."
   And thousands more.

                 Grouper
   The grouper is the nastiest of all types of command.
It can be so variously worded and its effect is so serious
on the time track that the whole track can roll up into a
ball and all incidents then appear to be in the same
place. This is apparent as soon as the preclear hits one.
The  grouper will not be discovered easily, but it will
settle out as the case progresses and the case can be
worked with a grouper in restimulation.
   "I have no time" and "Nothing makes any differ-
ence" are the classic groupers.
   "Everything comes in on me at once" means just
that.
   "They're  all in there together," "Screwed  up,"
"Balled up,"  "It's all right here."
   "You can  remember all this in present time" (a
serious auditor error if he  uses this to a suggestible
patient, for it will gloriously foul a case).
   "You  associate everything."
                           461
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   "I am  tangled up,"  "Jam  everything in there at
once," "There's no time," and thousands more.

                  Misdirector
   This is an insidious character, the misdirector. When
it appears in an engram, the patient goes in wrong
directions, to wrong places, etc.
   "You're doing it all backwards."
   "All up now" is a grouper and a misdirector.
   "Always throwing it up to me" puts the preclear up
the track some distance and from there he tries to pick
up engrams.
   "You  can't go down"  is partly bouncer, partly
misdirector.
   "We  can't get to the bottom of this" keeps him off
from basic-basic.
   "You can start over again" keeps him from finishing
the recounting, whereupon he goes back to the begin-
ning of the engram instead of running it.
   "Can't go through that again" keeps him from re-
counting.
   "I can't tell you how it began" keeps him starting
his engrams in the middle and they will not then reduce.
There are many such phrases.
   "Let's settle down" and all "settlings" make him
drift backwards down the track.
   "I am coming down with a cold" puts the aberree in
a common  cold engram. This can be counted upon to
make every cold much worse.
   "Come  back here" is really a call back but it directs
him  away from where  he should be. A patient who
reaches present time with difficulty and then begins to
go back has a "Come back here" or a "Settle down."
   "Down  and out" misdirects him, not only away
from present time but to the bottom of the track and off
it. This is a misdirector and a derailer all at once.
                           462
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   "Can't get past me" is a misdirector on the order of
a reverser. "You don't know down from up" is the classic
phrase.
   "I'm all turned around."
   A special case is the derailer which "throws him off
the track" and makes  him lose touch with his time
track. This is a very serious phrase since it can make a
schizophrenic and something of this sort is always to be
found in schizophrenia. Some of its phrases throw him
into other valences which have no proper track, some
merely remove time, some throw him bodily out of
time.
   "I don't have any  time" is a derailer as well as a
grouper.
   "I'm beside myself"  means that he is now two
people, one beside the other.
   "I'll have to pretend I am somebody else" is a key
phrase to identity confusion.
   "You're behind the times" and many more.
   There is another special case of the misdirector. The
auditor says to go to "present time" and the file clerk
throws out a phrase with present in it. It does not matter
if the present in the phrase was a Christmas present, if
it is in the prenatal area, the preclear goes there, ignoring
what the auditor meant.
   "That's  all at present," is a vicious phrase, putting
everything in present time.
    "It's a lovely present."
   And  others.
   Now  is sometimes confused with present time but
not often. The auditor should not say "Come to now,"
because if he did he would find more nows  than he
could comfortably handle. Present is a rarer engramic
word and is therefore used. Now appears too frequently.
   Several severely aberrated persons  who  had  little
memory  of the past have been found to be entirely off
                           463
                 L. RON HUBBARD

their time tracks, regressed into the prenatal area and
stuck, when the case was entered. As far as their wits
were concerned, they had only a few months of past
from where they were back to conception. And yet these
people had managed somehow to function as normals.
   Emotional charges usually hold the person off his
track and, indeed, are the only things which give these
engram commands  any power according to current find-
ings.

                   Differences
   There are two axioms  about mind function with
which the auditor should be familiar.
    I. The  mind  perceives, poses and re-
      solves problems relating to survival.
   II. The analytical mind computes in dif-
      ferences. The reactive mind computes
       in identities.
   The  first axiom is of interest to the auditor in his
work because with it he can clearly establish whether or
not he is confronting a rational reaction. The seven-
year-old girl who shudders because a man kisses her is
not computing; she is reacting to an engram since at
seven she should see nothing wrong in a kiss, not even a
passionate one. There must have been an earlier experi-
ence, possibly prenatal, which made  men  or kissing
very bad. All departures from optimum rationality are
useful in locating engrams, all unreasonable fears and
so  forth are grist to the auditor's mill.12 The auditor,
with the above law, should study as well the equation of
the optimum  solution. Any departure from optimum
is suspect. While he  cares little about aberrations, at
 12. grist to (one's) mill: something employed to one's profit or
advantage, especially something seemingly unpromising.
                           464
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

times a case will stall or seem to have no engrams. He
then can  observe the conduct of his patient and his
patient's reactions to life in order to gain data.
   The  second law is Dianetics' contribution to logic.
In the philosophic text this is more fully entered. Aris-
totle's pendulum and his two-valued logic were aban-
doned,  not because  of any  dislike of Aristotle but
because broader yardsticks were needed. One of these
yardsticks was the spectrum principle whereby grada-
tions from zero to infinity and infinity to infinity were
used  and absolutes were  considered utterly unobtain-
able for scientific purposes.
   In the second axiom the mind can be conceived to
recognize  differences very broadly and accurately, in
its nearest approach to complete rationality and then, as
it falls away from rationality, to perceive less and less
difference until at last it achieves a near approach to
utter inability to compute any difference in time, space
or thought and so can be considered completely insane.
When  this follows one thought only, such as a sweeping
statement that "All cats are the same,"  it is either
careless or insane, since all cats are not the same, even
two cats who look, act and sound alike. One could say,
"Cats are pretty much the same," and still be dealing
with rather irrational thought. Or one could recognize
that there was a species Felix domesticus but that within
it cats were decidedly different, not only from breed to
breed  but cat to cat. That would  be  rationality, not
because one  used Latin but because he could tell the
difference amongst  cats. The fear of cats has as its
source an engram which usually does not include more
than one cat and that is a very specific cat of a specific
breed with a certain (or perhaps uncertain) personality.
The  preclear who is afraid of all cats is actually afraid
of one cat and a cat which is most likely dead these
many years at that. Thus, as we swing from complete
                          465
                 L. RON HUBBARD

rationality down to irrationality, there is a narrowing of
differences until they nearly vanish and become simi-
larities and identities.
   Aristotle's syllogism13 in which two things equal to
the same thing are equal to each other simply does not
begin to work in logic. Logic is not arithmetic, which
is an artificial thing man invented and which works. To
handle a problem in logic the mind flutters through an
enormous mass of data and computes with dozens and
even hundreds of variables. It does not and never did
think on the basis that two things equal to the same
thing are equal to each other, except when employing
mathematics it had conceived the better to resolve ab-
stract problems. It is an abstract truth that two and two
equal four. Two what and two what equal four? There is
no scale made, no yardstick or caliper'4 or microscope
manufactured  which  would  justify the actuality, for
instance, that two apples plus two apples equal four
apples. Two apples and two apples are four apples now
if they are the same apples. They would not equal four
other apples by any growth or manufacturing process
ever imagined. Man is content to take approximations
and call them, loosely, exactitudes. There is no absolute
anything save in abstract terms set up by the mind to
work  out exterior problems and achieve approxima-
tions. This may seem to be a stretched conception, but
it is not. The mathematician is very well aware that he
is working with digit and analogue approximations set
up into systems which were not necessarily here before
man  came and will not necessarily be here after he is
gone. Logic, even the simple logic of wondering about

13. syllogism: a form of reasoning in which a  conclusion is
reached from two statements, as in "All men must die; I am a
man;  therefore, I must die."
14. caliper: a compass for measuring the diameter of tubes or of
round objects.
                          466
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

the wisdom  of  going shopping  at ten, is handling
numerous  variables, indefinites and approximations.
Mathematics can be invented by the carload lot. There
is no actual absolute, there is only a near approach. Our
grammarians  alone, much  behind  the times, insist,
probably in memory of the metaphysician, on absolute
reality and truth.
   This is here set down partly because it may be of
interest to some but mainly because the auditor must
realize that he has  an accurate  measuring  stick for
sanity. Sanity is the ability to tell differences. The better
one can  tell differences, no matter how minute, and
know  the width of those differences, the more rational
he is. The less one can  tell differences and the closer
one comes to thinking in identities (A = A) the less sane
he is.
   A man  says, "I don't like dogs!" Spot it, auditor; he
has an engram about one or two dogs. A girl says, "All
men  are alike!" Spot it, auditor; here's a real aberree.
"Mountains  are so terrible!" "Jewelers never go any-
place!" "I hate women!" Spot them. Those are en-
grams right out in broad daylight.
   Those engrams which inhibit the analytical mind in
differentiating are those engrams which most seriously
inhibit thinking.
   "You  can't tell the difference," is a common en-
gram.  "There is no difference," "Nothing will ever
make  any  difference to me again," "People  are all
bad," "Everybody  hates me." This is insanity bait, as
the auditors say, and puts a man "spinbin15 bound."
   There is another class of identity thought and that is
the group which  destroys time differentiation. "You
don't know when  it happened!" is a classic phrase. "I
don't know how  late it is," and others have a peculiar

15. spinbin: (slang) a mental institution.
                           467
                 L. RON HUBBARD

effect on the mind, for the mind is running on a precision
chronometer16 of its own and the engrams can thoroughly
misread the dial. On a conscious level, one goes along
fairly well on analytical time. The engrams slide around
back and  forth according to when they are keyed in or
restimulated. An engram  may   underlie today's action
which  belonged forty years ago on the time track and
should be back there. It is not remarks about time differ-
ence so much that aberrate, it is the untimed character of
engrams. Time  is the great charlatan; it heals nothing; it
only changes the environmental aspects and a man's
associates. The engram   of ten years ago,  with all its
painful emotion, may be encysted and "forgotten," but it
is right there, ready to force action if restimulated today.
   The reactive mind runs on a dime-store wristwatch,
the analytical mind  runs  on a  battery17 of counter-
checking18 chronometers of which  a liner19 could be
proud. The  cells think that wristwatch is a pretty fair
gimmick—and   it was, it was, back there in the days
when man's  ancestor was washed in by the waves and
managed  to cling to the sand.
   Thus, a primary test for aberration is similarity and
identity, the primary  test for rationality is differentia-
tion and the minuteness or largeness with which it can
be done.
   "Men  are all alike," she says. And they are too! To
her. Poor thing. Like the fellow who raped her when she
was a kid, like her detested father who said it.
16. chronometer: an instrument for measuring time precisely;
highly accurate kind of clock or watch, as for scientific use.
17. battery: a group of similar things arranged, connected or
used together; set or series; array.
18. counter-checking: controlling or confirming by a second
check.
19. liner: a steamship, passenger airplane, etc., in regular serv-
ice for a specific line.
                           468
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

          Relative Importances and
        "Believe" and "Can't Believe"
   The  auditor will find himself confronted with two
archenemies in "You  must believe it," and "I can't
believe."
   The mind has its own equilibrium and ability and it
is aided no more by engrains than an adding machine is
aided by a held-down seven.* One of the most impor-
tant functions of the mind is the computing of the
relative importances of data.
   In  discovering and conducting  research on  Dia-
netics, for instance, there were billions of data about
the mind accumulated throughout the last few thousand
years. Now, with-a  six-foot rear-vision mirror we can
look back  and see  that here and there people had
expressed  opinions  or turned  up unevaluated  facts
which are now data in some of the axioms of Dianetics
or parts of  its discoveries. These facts existed in the
past, some exist now in Dianetics, but with a tremen-
dous  difference: they are evaluated. Evaluation of the
data for its importance was vital before the information
was  of value. Dr. Sententious20 might have written in
1200 A.D. that he believed actual demons did not exist
in the mind; Goodwife Sofie,21 in 1782, was heard to say
that she was certain that prenatal influence had warped
many  a life; Dr. Zamba22 might have written in 1846
* Or a five as in a recent case at Harvard where a spot of
solder held down five in an electronic computer, much to the
dismay of the gentlemen who depended upon it for answers.
-LRH

20. Dr. Sententious: made-up name for an "authority." Senten-
tious: putting on an air of wisdom; dull and moralizing.
21. Goodwife Sofie: made-up name for a woman who was the
mistress of a household. Goodwife is an archaic title of respect
for a woman.
22. Dr. Zamba: a made-up name for a doctor.
                           469
                 L. RON HUBBARD

that a hypnotized patient could be told he was crazy and
that he  would  thereafter act crazy. Dr. Sententious
might have said also that angels, not demons, caused
mental illness because the patient had been evil; Good-
wife Sofie also might have said that punk water23 poul-
tices24 cured "ravings"; Dr. Zamba might also have
declared that hypnotized patients needed only  a few
more  positive suggestions to make them  well and
strong. In short, for every datum which approached
truth there were billions which were untrue. The miss-
ing part of each datum was a scientific evaluation of its
importance  to the solution. The selection of a few
special drops of water from an ocean of unspecial drops
is impossible. The problem  of discovering true data
could be resolved only by jettisoning all former evalu-
ations of humanity and the human mind and all "facts"
and opinions of whatever kind and starting fresh, evolv-
ing the entire science from a new highest common
denominator (and  it is true that Dianetics borrowed
nothing but was  first discovered and organized; only
after the organization was completed and a technique
evolved was it compared to existing information).
   The point here is that monotone importance in a
class of facts leads to nothing but the most cluttered
confusion. Here  is evaluation: Opinions are nothing,
authority is useless, data is secondary; establishment of
relative importance is the key. Given the world and the
stars as a laboratory and a mind to compute the relative
importance of what it perceives, and no problems can
remain unsolved. Given masses of data with monotone

23. punk water: another name for spunk water, rain water that
collects in hollow tree stumps, popularly thought to be a cure for
warts.
24. poultice: a hot, soft, moist mass, as of flour, herbs, mustard,
etc. Sometimes spread on cloth, applied to a sore or inflamed
part of the body.
                           470
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

evaluation and one has something which may be pretty
but isn't useful.
   The  stunned look of fresh-caught ensigns25 of the
Navy  when they first see in the metal the things about
which they have so laboriously read is a testimony to
more than the faulty educational system currently em-
ployed: The system seeks to train something which is
perfect—the  memory;  it aligns little or nothing with
purpose or use, and ignores the necessity of personal
evaluation of all data, both as to need for it and its use.
The stunned look comes from the overwhelming recog-
nition that whereas they have thousands of data about
what they see, they do not know whether it is more
important to read the chronometer when they take a
sextant26 sight or use only blue ink in writing a logbook.
These gentlemen have been wronged educationally, not
because they have not been  given thousands of data
relative to ships, but because they have not been told the
relative importance of each datum and have not experi-
enced that importance. They know more facts than the
less educated but they know less about factual relation.
   More  pertinent to the auditor, there are two species
of engramic commands  which give monotone evalua-
tion to data. The persons who have either of these as a
major content in the engram  bank will be similarly
aberrated even  if each manifests the aberration with
opposite polarity.
   Every now and then some unfortunate auditor finds a
"Can't believe it" on his hands. This case is extremely
trying. Under this heading come the "I doubt it," the "I
can't be sure," and the "I don't know" cases.
25. ensigns: in the US Navy, commissioned officers of the lowest
rank.
26. sextant: an instrument used by navigators for measuring the
angular distance of the sun, a star, etc., from the horizon, as in
finding the position of a ship.
                           471
                    L. RON HUBBARD

   Such a case is easy to spot for when he first comes
into therapy he begins by doubting Dianetics, the audi-
tor, himself, the furniture and his mother's  virginity.
The  chronic doubter is not an easy case because he
cannot believe his own data. The analyzer has a built-in
judge which takes in data, weighs it and judges it right,
wrong or maybe. The engramic doubter has a "held-
down  seven" to the effect that he has to doubt every-
thing, something much different from judging. He is
challenged to doubt. He must  doubt. If to doubt is
divine, then the god is certainly Moloch.27 He doubts
without inspecting; he inspects the most precise evi-
dence, and he still doubts.
   The  auditor will return this patient to a somatic
which  tears half his head off, which is confirmed by
scars, which is confirmed by aberration, and which is
doubted as an incident.
   The  way to handle this case is to take his pat phrases
and  feed them to him in reverie or out of reverie with
repeater technique. Make him go over and over them,
sending his somatic strip back to them. Shortly a re-
lease of the phrase will take place. Feed  all doubter
phrases which the patient has used in this manner. Then
continue the case. The object is not to make him  a
believer but to place him in a situation where he can
evaluate his own data. Don't  argue with him  about
Dianetics—arguing  against engrams is senseless since
the engrams themselves are senseless.
   In ten or twenty hours of therapy such a patient will
begin to face reality enough so that he no longer doubts
the sun shines, doubts the auditor or doubts that he had
a past of some  sort. He is only difficult because he
27. Moloch:  in the Bible, an ancient god of the Phoenicians,
etc., to whom  children were sacrificed by burning. Moloch has
come  to mean anything demanding terrible sacrifice.
                           472
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

requires these extra hours of work. He is usually, by the
way, very aberrated.
   The  "Can't believe it" finds difficulty in evaluation
because he  has difficulty giving credence28 to any fact
more  than any other fact: this produces an inability to
compute relative importances amongst data, with the
result that he may be as concerned with the shade of his
superior's tie as with the marriage he himself is about
to undertake. Similarly, the "You must believe it" case
finds difficulty in differentiating amongst importances
of various data and may hold equally firmly the idea
that paper is made from trees and that he is about to be
fired. Both cases "worry," which  is to say they are
unable to compute well.
   Rational computation depends upon the personal
computation of  the relative importances of various
data. Reactive "computation"  deals exclusively with
the equation that widely different objects or events are
similar or equal. The  former is sanity, the latter is
insanity.
   The "Must  believe it" case will present a confused
reactive bank, for the bank embraces the most unlikely
differences as close similarities. The "Must believe it"
engram command  can dictate that one person, a class of
persons or everyone must be believed, no matter what is
written or said. The auditor, returning the patient, will
find major aberrations held in place by a lock contain-
ing only conversation.
   When  Father is the actual source and is an ally of
the patient, the auditor will discover that almost every-
thing Father said was accepted literally and unquestion-
ingly by his child. The father may not have been aware
of having established this "Must believe it" condition

28. credence: belief as to the truth of something.
                           473
                 L. RON HUBBARD

and he may  even be a jocular man, given to jokes.
Every joke will be found to be literally accepted unless
the father carefully labeled it a joke, which meant it
must  not be literally accepted. One case folder is to
hand here where Father was the source of "Must be-
lieve": one day the father took his daughter, three years
of age, down  to the seacoast and, through the fog,
pointed to a lighthouse. The lighthouse gave an eerie
aspect in the  foggy night. "That's  Mr.  Billingsly's
place,"  said the father, meaning   that Billingsly, the
lighthouse keeper, lived there. The child nodded faith-
fully, if a little frightened, for "Mr. Billingsly" threw
around a mane of hair—shadows—glared  to seaward
with one eye sweeping the water and stood a hundred
feet tall and "Mr. Billingsly" let out moans which
sounded  quite ferocious. His "place" was a ledge of
rock. As a preclear, twenty years later, the daughter was
discovered to be frightened of any low moaning sound.
The auditor patiently traced down the source and found,
much  to the delight of himself and the daughter, "Mr.
Billingsly." Vast quantities of aberration, peculiar con-
ceptions and strange notions were found to derive from
casual statements the father had made. Being skilled in
his task, the auditor did not bother to try to locate and
erase everything the father had  said—a  task which
would have taken years and years: He located, instead,
the prenatal "You must believe me" and its engramic
locks, and all the nonengramic locks, of course, disap-
peared and  were automatically reevaluated as experi-
enced data rather than "held-down sevens." Of course,
there is always much more wrong with a case than a
mere "You  must believe me," but the change of view-
point which the patient experienced immediately after-
wards  was startling: she was now at liberty to evaluate
her father's data, which she had not been before.
                           474
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   Because they teach in terms of altitude* and author-
ity, educational institutions themselves form a social
"You  must believe it" aberration. It is impossible to
reduce an entire university education even if it some-
times appears desirable, but by addressing the moments
when  the patient was hammered into believing or ac-
cepting school, from kindergarten forward, many  a
fact-clogged mind can again be made facile29 which was
not so before, for the facts will be reevaluated automati-
cally by the mind for importances, not accepted on mono-
tone evaluation as is the case in "formal education."
   The  "Can't believe it" is a subject so weary and
dreary to the auditor that he may find himself, after a
few finished cases, running adroitly away from one.
The "I don't know" and the "I can't be sure" cases are
not as bad as the "I can't believe it." The prize case in
difficulty in Dianetics is a  patient who  is a Junior
named  after either Father or Mother, who has not only
shut-down pain, emotion, visio and sonic recall but also
"dub-in"  for them on a false basis, with a lie factory
working full blast, who is uncooperative and who is a
"Can't believe it."
   Monotone  evaluation hinders the "Can't believe it"
case's acceptance of all facts. Any case may  have a
few "Can't  believe its," but some cases are so thor-
oughly  aberrated by  the phrase  that they disbelieve

* By altitude 15 meant a difference in level of prestige—one
on  a higher altitude carries conviction to one on a lower
altitude merely because  of altitude. The auditor may find
himself unable to gain sufficient altitude with some patients to
work them smoothly and he may have so much altitude with
others that they believe everything he says. When he has too
little altitude, he is not believed; when he has too much, he is
believed too well. —LRH
29. facile: acting, working or done easily, or in a quick, smooth
way; fluent; ready.
                           475
                 L. RON HUBBARD

not only reality but also their own existence.
   The  mind has a "built-in doubter" which, unhin-
dered by engrams, rapidly sorts out importances and,
by their weights, resolves problems and arrives at con-
clusions. The rational mind  applies itself to data pre-
sented, compares it to experience, evaluates its veracity
and then assigns it relative importance in the scheme of
things. This is done, by a Clear, with a rapidity which
sometimes requires the splitting of seconds. By a nor-
mal, the time required is extremely variable and the
conclusions are more  apt to be referred to another's
opinion or compared  to authority rather than to per-
sonal experience. That is the fundamental effect of
contemporary education which, through no particular
fault of its own and despite every effort it has made to
free itself, yet, through lack of tools, is forced to follow
scholastic methods. These, by contagion of aberration,
persist against all efforts of advanced educators. The
normal is taught on one hand to believe or else he'll fail
and on  the other to disbelieve as a scientific necessity:
Belief and disbelief cannot be taught, they must be
personally computed. If a mind could be likened to a
general served by his own staff, it could be seen to have
a G-230 which, as a combat intelligence center, collected
facts, weighted them for importance and formed an
estimate of a situation or the value of a conclusion. As
the intelligence officer would fail if he had a signed
order to disbelieve everything, so does  the mind  fail
which has a reactive command  to disbelieve. Certainly
a military organization would lose to every puny enemy
if it had, conversely, a command to believe everything,
and a man  will fail if he has a reactive mind order to
believe all information in the world around him.
30. G-2: military intelligence section of the Army or Marine
Corps.
                           476
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   The believe and disbelieve engrams present different
manifestations, and while one  cannot be said to be
either more or less aberrative than the other, it is certain
that the disbelieve engram, by and large, seems to make
the less sociable man.
   Disbelief occurs  in  various degrees,  of course.
There is, for instance, a social disbelief engram which
promotes  a class of literature which is as insincere as it
is unwitty. Insincerity, shame of emotional demonstra-
tion, fear of praising may stem from other things than
merely a disbelief engram, but a disbelief engram is
most certainly present in the majority of such cases.
   The  auditor will find, when he is trying to enter a
very strong "Can't believe it" case, that experience is
disbelieved, the auditor is disbelieved, hope of results is
disbelieved and that the most ridiculous and unreason-
able insults and arguments may  be  presented. The
patient may squirm in a veritable31 snake pit of somatics
and still disbelieve that he is reexperiencing anything.
   It is a sadly chronic  fact that an aberree  has a
certain set of cliches from out of his engram bank. He
will repeat these cliches for all occasions and circum-
stances. Mother, having an engram bank of her own
and  Father having his, will be found  to be  uttering
pretty much the same sort of statement time after time.
These are dramatizations. One of the parents may have
had an "I don't know" ready to precede everything he
or she said, which makes a whole "stack" of "I don't
knows" in the engram bank which much undermines
understanding. In the same way, "You must believe!"
or "You can't believe!" may become "stacked" in the
engram bank. Once one has heard a few engrams from
a patient, he knows he will have many, many more
31. veritable: having all the qualities or attributes of the speci-
fied person or thing.
                           477
                 L. RON HUBBARD

similar engrams from that source. Once an auditor has
listened to the personnel in the patient's engram bank
for a very short time, he knows pretty much what he
will have in many, many more engrams. Hence, any
phrase is liable to be much repeated in the engram
bank, with varying somatics and accompanying percep-
tics. If Mother is troubled with high blood pressure, and
it is raised by Father—to the intense discomfort of the
child and a degree which  often produces a later mi-
graine headache—she   is apt to utter, "I can't believe
you would treat me this way." Privately, she must have
been  hard to convince (one doesn't convince much
against engramic "reasoning"), for he treated her this
way  about every three days; and every three days she
was  saying, "I can't believe you" or "I can't believe
you would  do this to me" or "I can't believe anything
you say " or some such thing.
   The  "Can't believe" is apt to be rather hostile since
"Can't believe" is often hostile conversation. "You've
got to believe me"  is more apt to be  a pleading or
whining sort of an engram. "Believe what I tell you,
goddamn  it," is, however, fully as hostile as an auditor
might expect.
   An  auditor who finds a case intensely and unreason-
ably skeptical should expect a "Can't believe" stack in
the engram  bank. If he finds a patient incapable of
holding an opinion of his own but weather-vaning32 to
each new  person or quoting an authority (all authorities
get easily identified with Father in the reactive bank),
he should suspect a "Must believe" in some form, as
well as other things. There are many manifestations of
either case. The chronic aspect in therapy is that the
32. weather-vaning: acting like a person or thing that is change-
able or inconstant, especially one who veers easily to conform to
the prescribed attitudes or popular beliefs of the moment.
                            478
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

"Can't believe" suspects his own data so strongly that
he alters it continually and the engrams which, after
all, have just one exact package of content, will not
properly reduce; the  "Must  believe" takes up  every
engram he hears about as his own and that does him
little good.
   Do not suppose that any case has a standard aspect,
however. The language contains many words and com-
binations of words, and aberrees are not unusual who
have the entire basic language and all its idioms se-
curely connected up to some somatic or other. Cases
ordinarily contain "Can't believe" and "Must believe"
phrases in the same bank. Only when  these phrases
become  top-heavy does the person respond in a set
pattern. When  the set pattern is of either species of
phrase, then the auditor confronts a patient who must
have had, at best, a most unhappy life. But either case
clears. They all clear, even Juniors.

 Physical Pain and Painful Emotion Commands
   Besides visio and sonic, another vital recall to ther-
apy is the somatic, which is to say, the physical pain of
the incident. Running   a physically painful incident
without a somatic is worthless.
   If physical pain is present, it may come only after
considerable "unconsciousness" has been "boiled off."
If the incident contains pain but the somatic is not
turned on, the patient will wriggle his toes and breathe
heavily and nervously or he may have jumping muscles.
The foot wriggling is an excellent clue to the presence
of any somatic, turned on or not turned on. Breathing
heavily and jumping muscles and various twitches with-
out pain denote two  things: either a denyer is in the
incident and the content isn't being contacted; or, if the
preclear is recounting, the somatic may be shut off in
the incident or elsewhere, either earlier by command or
                           479
                 L. RON HUBBARD

late by painful emotion. The patient who wriggles a
great deal or who does not wriggle at all is suffering
from a pain or emotion shut-off or late painful emotion
engrams or both.
   There is a whole species of. commands which shut
off pain and emotion simultaneously: this is because the
word/ee/ is homonymic. "I can't feel anything" is the
standard, but the command varies widely and is worded
in a great many ways. The auditor can pick up his own
book of these from patients who, describing how they
feel—or rather, how they don't feel—give them away.
"It doesn't  hurt"  is a class of phrases  specifically
shutting off pain, a class which  includes, of course,
such things as "There isn't any pain," etc. Emotion is
shut off by a class of phrases which contain the word
emotion or which  specifically (literally translated) shut
off emotion.
   The  auditor should keep a  book  of all denyers,
misdirectors, holders, bouncers and groupers which he
discovers, each listed under its own heading. In this way
he adds to material he can use for repeater technique
when  he sees something is wrong with the way the
patient is moving on the track. But there are four other
classes of phrases which he should also study and list:
shut-offs, exaggerators, derailers and lie factories. He
can also add to his classes.
   He will discover enormous numbers of commands in
engrams which  can accomplish these various aspects.
And  he should be particularly interested in the pain and
emotion shut-offs and the exaggerators, which is to say,
those engramic commands which give the aspect of too
much pain and too much emotion. There is no reason to
give large numbers of them here. They are quite vari-
ous, language being language.
   Many  combinations are possible. A patient can be
found to weep over the most trivial postspeech things
                           480
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY —PART Two

and yet have few  or no somatics. Several things can
cause this. Either he had a mother or a father who wept
for nine months  before he  was born  or he has an
exaggerator at work which commands that he be emo-
tional about everything: "too much emotion." In com-
bination with this, he can have something which says he
can feel no pain or can't hurt or even can't feel.
   A  patient who aches and  suffers and yet cannot
weep would have a reverse set of commands: he has a
"no emotion" command  early on the track or a long
chain of them, and yet has commands which  dictate
pain to excess: "I can't stand the pain," "The pain is
too great," "I always feel I'm in agony," etc. "I feel
bad," on  the other hand, is a shut-off because it says
there is something wrong  with the mechanism  with
which  he feels and implies disability to feel.
   Both pain and emotion can be commanded   into
exaggeration. But it is a peculiar thing that the body
does not  manufacture  pain to be felt. All pain felt is
genuine, even if exaggerated. Imaginary pain is nonex-
istent. A person "imagines" only pain he has actually
felt. He cannot imagine pain he has not felt. He may
"imagine"  pain at some  time later than the actual
incident, but if he feels pain, no matter how psychotic
he is, that pain will be found to exist somewhere on his
time  track. Scientific tests have been carefully con-
ducted  in Dianetics to  establish this fact and it is a
valuable one. You can test it yourself by asking patients
to feel various pains, "imagining them"  in present
time. They will feel pains for you so long as you ask
them to feel pains they have had. Somewhere you will
find the patient unable to actually feel the pain he is
trying to "imagine." Whether he is aware of it or not,
he has had  pain wherever he  "imagines" it and is
simply doing a somatic strip return for you on a minor
scale.
                            481
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   This aspect of pain is quite interesting in that many
patients have, at one  time or another  in their lives,
pretended to the family or the world that they had a
pain. The patient thought, when he asserted this "make-
believe" pain, that ha was lying. In therapy, the auditor
can use these "imaginings,"  for they lead straight to
sympathy  engrams  and actual injury. Further, these
"imaginary"  pains are generally displayed to the per-
son or pseudoperson who was the sympathy ally present
in the engramic moment. Thus, if a small boy always
pretended to his grandmother, and  thought he was
pretending, that he had a bad hip, it will be discovered
eventually that some time in his early life he hurt that
same hip and received sympathy during the engramic
moment,  which is now  eclipsed from the analyzer.
Patients often  feel quite guilty over  these pretenses.
Sometimes soldiers in the recent war have come home
pretending they had been wounded and, when in ther-
apy, are afraid the auditor will find out or give them
away to their people. This soldier might not have been
wounded in the war, but an engram will be found which
contains sympathy for the injury of which he complains.
He  is asking for sympathy with a colorful story and
believes he is telling a He. Without informing him of
this Dianetic discovery, the auditor can often flush into
view a sympathy engram which might otherwise have to
be arduously hunted down.
   "Cry baby"  is a phrase against which the preclear
will negate in an engram,  thus inhibiting tears. It is
quite ordinary to find the preclear confusing himself
with older brothers and sisters who are in his prenatal
life: their jeers, Mother's orders and so forth, then, all
register. If the preclear knows of any older children, the
auditor should look for them in the engrams of prenatal
life, for children are quite active and often bounce up
and down  on Mother  's lap or collide with her. Any
                           482
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

childish phrases of derision are then not always post-
birth.
   It has been said during Dianetic research that if one
could release all the painful emotion of a lifetime, he
would have 90 percent of the clearing done. However,
the painful emotion is only a surface manifestation of
the physical pain engrams and would not be painful if
the physical pain did not coexist or exist priorly.
   When  emotion and pain shut-offs exist in a case, the
patient is normally tense of muscle and nervous, given
to twitching or merely tension. When pain and emotion
are exaggerated by commands, one has a highly drama-
tizing case on his hands.

        The Ally Versus the Antagonist
   It is necessary for the auditor to know the reactive
mind's evaluation of importances. Moronic or not, the
reactive mind  distinguishes violently between  friend
and foe, about the only piece of differentiation it does.
   There is a prime test for an ally. And recall that the
ally is a part of sympathy engrams, the things which are
most likely to produce psychosomatic illnesses, imma-
turities and confusion on a grand scale. As long as it
can rebel and negate, the reactive mind takes care of the
enemies so far as it is able. It can, of course, be twisted
by circumstance into the valence of the enemy and so
cry havoc33 and abreact34 in general if this was a win-
ning valence. But it will not ordinarily use the data of
the enemy contained in a contrasurvival engram save to
negate against it. When the general tone nears zone 1,
of course,  the reactive mind  starts picking up  and
obeying antagonistic commands. Thus, if Father is the

33. cry havoc: sound an alarm. Used figuratively.
34. abreact: (psychoanalysis) release (repressed emotions) by
acting out, such as  in words, action or the imagination, the
situation causing the conflict.
                           483
                 L. RON HUBBARD

villain of the piece, an antagonist, Father's commands
are not the reactively obeyed commands but the com-
mands the aberree will usually negate against or avoid.
   This is not the case, however, with the ally. The ally,
the person from whom sympathy came when the patient
was  ill or injured, is heeded and obeyed  since his
"purpose" is apparently aligned with the purpose of the
individual, to survive. If one thing about a person is
right, then—according to our moronic little friend, the
reactive mind—everything  about that person is right,
everything that person says and does is right and partic-
ularly is right whatever that person said in the engram.
   The chronic psychosomatic illness is ordinarily from
a sympathy engram. This is quite important, for the
sympathy engram  will be the last or hardest to reach,
being aligned with survival purpose.
   A  "Must  believe" from an  ally means  that the
person must believe. A "Must believe" from an antago-
nist ordinarily brings about a circumstance  that the
person must not believe.
   Here, in the ally and the antagonist, we have the
age-old tale of the hero and the villain, the heroine and
the villainess, Mazda and Ahriman,31 the cowboy in the
white hat and the cowboy  in the black. The Hindu
trinity36 is found, as source, in father, mother  and
unborn baby. But the war of "good and evil" is found as
reactive data in the engram bank in the form of the ally
and the antagonist.

35. Mazda  and  Ahriman:  the deities in Zoroastrianism, the
religious system of the Persians before their conversion to Islam.
Mazda  is the spirit of universal good and Ahriman is his archrival
as the spirit of evil.
36. Hindu  trinity: Hindu representation of the three manifesta-
tions of the Supreme Being—Brahma, Vishnu and Siva—each
with a specific cosmic function: Brahma  was associated with
creation; Vishnu was associated with preservation and renewal;
and Siva with destruction and disintegration.
                           484
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   The  very best logic of which the reactive mind is
capable is two-valued, white and black, and two-valued
logic finds its response only in the reactive bank. And
the reactive mind works out all problems in absolutes,
bringing about  logical monstrosities, for there is the
absolute of good, the absolute of evil and the absolute
of identity thought. Any rational computation demon-
strates an absolute to be impossible from a standpoint
of truth or workability: but the reactive mind  never
quibbles, it just reacts. It knows a champion when it
sees one (it thinks) and it knows a villain (it supposes).
The  ally, the champion, is everybody who has any
characteristic of the ally; and the antagonist, the villain,
is everyone who has any characteristics of the antago-
nist. Further, anything  associated  with the  ally is a
champion  and everything associated with the antagonist
is villainous. If the ally is an aunt, then aunts are good.
If the antagonist is a sign painter, then sign painters are
all evil. Further, the doilies37 Auntie crocheted3* mean
that doilies are good and that all lacework is good and
that anything on which lacework sits is good and that
anything which looks like lacework is good and so on in
the ad absurdum39 which only the reactive mind can
manage  without a qualm. And  the signs the painter
painted are evil and where they sit is evil and paint is
evil and smell of paint is evil and brushes are evil so
hairbrushes are evil so the dresser on which hairbrushes
sit is evil and so on.
37. doilies: small mats, as of lace or paper, put under a dish, vase
or the like, as a decoration or to protect a surface. Named after a
17th-century draper (dealer in cloth and dry goods) whose name
was Doily or Doyley.
38. crocheted: done in a kind of needlework in which loops of a
thread or yarn are interwoven by means  of a  single hooked
needle.
39. ad absurdum: to the point of ridiculousness.
                           485
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   There is an axiom here which it is well not to slight
in working a patient:
   Any chronic psychosomatic illness has at
   its source a sympathy engram.
   And another:
   A reactive mind will not permit an indi-
   vidual to be aberrated or chronically psy-
   chosomatically ill unless the illness has
   survival value.
   This does not mean that the individual has a power
of choice analytically. It does mean that the reactive
mind,  working  quietly and hitherto hidden so  well,
chooses, on identity computation, physical and mental
conditions to match any circumstances even remotely
similar to any concept in the engram bank.
   There  is such a thing as necessity level. This rises
and keys out engrams and can key out the control of the
reactive mind  itself. Necessity level often rises. The
individual can force it to rise analytically whether or
not actual cause exists. A person may have no engram
about going to the electric chair for murder and yet have
an  engram  about murdering people. Necessity level
rises and analytically overwhelms all impulse to kill,
for the analyzer knows all about electric chairs. When
the necessity level cannot rise, then one is dealing with
a low dynamic  individual. An artist, terribly aberrated
about his work  through the kind efforts of obligingly
caustic* critics, can yet boost himself by his necessity
bootstraps41 to do another piece of work and damn the
aunt who said he gave her too many chins in her portrait
and ripped the work to shreds, or damn the critics who
said he was too new and his work too swift. Necessity

40. caustic: severely critical or sarcastic.
41. bootstraps: means of advancing oneself or accomplishing
something.
                           486
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

level can soar above the reactive mind by, as the marine
sergeant said, "Sheer guts."
   Given too many current restimulators, used too hard
by life, an individual, caught in the dwindling spiral of
reactivated engrams, may come at last to a point where
he cannot longer remain well. If this is his first serious
sag and if the sag is deep, a psychosomatic illness will
appear and become  more or less chronic and, this is
important, it will stem directly from a sympathy en-
gram.
   All psychosomatic ills carry with them, if less obvi-
ous, aberrative commands, which means that a person
suffering from psychosomatic illness, whether he rel-
ishes the idea or not, is also suffering from the aberra-
tion which is part of the same engram.
   If the auditor wants to find the real holders, the real
reasons his case appears to resist getting well, the real
aberrative factors and illnesses, he will look to the ally
or allies, for any case may have many. He will exhaust
from them  the painful emotion of loss or denial and
backtrack immediately to find the underlying engrams.
   Remember,  too, that the reactive mind is not bright
enough to realize that two sides of the same person are
the same person. Hence we can have Mother-the-white-
angel and Mother-the-howling-harridan.42 As the white
angel she is implicitly followed, as the harridan she is
negated against. Father may be Father-the-beneficent43
and Father-the-baby-killer. And  so with all allies. But
only the pure,  the absolute, the never-changing ally
who, resolute and firm, stayed the cold, sharp hand of
death and placed tenderly in the expiring hand of the
wistful child the strong and flaring torch of life (or at
42. harridan: a scolding, vicious woman; hag; shrew.
43. beneficent: doing good or causing good to be done; confer-
ring benefits; kindly in action or purpose.
                           487
                 L. RON HUBBARD

least said, "Poor baby, you feel so bad; please don't
cry,") is the model, the paragon,44 the gold-footed idol
with free access to the gods. (This was Grandpop: He
drank too much and he cheated at cards, but the reactive
mind doesn't see it that way because Grandpop hauled
baby through pneumonia and was darned sure baby got
well—good  acts if he hadn't been so melodramatic
about it and if he hadn't talked so much while the poor
kid was "unconscious.")
   Question the patient adroitly about Father and Mother:
If he isn't much disturbed by their deaths (if they are dead)
or if he is simply careless of them or if he bares his teeth,
they  are antagonists; the  allies are elsewhere. If  the
mother  and father are indifferently or angrily or propi-
tiatively regarded, be very sure, then, that the patient had
a rough time of it between conception and birth and later
and  be sure, if this is the case, that there will be allies in
plenty, for the child will have sought them out in every
scrape or injury. But you will not find the allies, usually,
by mere questions. The reactive mind considers them to be
pure gold even if the engrams in which they appear have
somatics enough to wreck a person for life. It hides allies.
The  auditor has to look for them through discharging
painful emotion. The death, departure or denial by an ally
is a certain painful emotion engram. One way or another,
working  at it from later painful emotion or earlier physi-
cally painful engrams, the ally will eventually uncover
and can be entered as memory in the standard banks and
erased as illness out of the engram bank.
   The  solution of  chronic psychosomatic  ills lies
largely in the field of sympathy engrams. These will not
erase early, however, for they are  the inner bastion45

44. paragon: a model or pattern of excellence or of a particular
excellence.
45. bastion: something serving as a stronghold.
                           488
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

behind which the reactive mind crouches and observes
the storming of the outer defenses by antagonists. The
painful emotion of ally losses masks, at times, not only
allies but antagonists as well. The sympathy engram is
not the only source of psychosomatic illness by far, but
it is the source of the chronic psychosomatic ill.
    By the way,  nothing in this dissertation about allies
should be construed to mean that one should not show
love to a child. Observers in the past have jumped at
questionable conclusions when they felt that demonstrated
affection aberrates a child. Lack  of affection may  kill
him, but the reverse is not true. The only way an ally can
aberrate a child is by talking to and sympathizing with a
child who is very ill or "unconscious" from injury. If he
does this, he alloys46 the child's personality with his own,
creates an eventual possibility of psychosomatic illness
and aberration and may generally disable the child for life
(except for Dianetics, of course). Love a child best and do
for him best when he is well. Do anything you please with
him when he is well, say what you please. When he is sick
or hurt, it is best to, as the bosun said, "Patch him up and
keep goddamned quiet!"

                   Tokens
   The tale of the magic amulet,47 the lucky talisman,48
the belief in the charm and  the long catalog of fet-
ishes,49 the objects and mannerisms which one keeps as
sakes50 are the "dearly beloveds" of the reactive mind.

46. alloy: to weaken or spoil by adding something that reduces
value or pleasure.
47. amulet: something worn on the body because of its supposed
magic power  to protect against injury or evil; a charm.
48. talisman: an object supposed to bring good luck.
49. fetishes: objects, ideas, etc., eliciting unquestioning rever-
ence, respect or devotion.
50. sakes: remembrances.
                           489
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   There is nothing wrong with a man keeping llamas51
in the parlor or wearing purple and green suspenders or
rubbing fireplugs52 for luck, nor is there anything wrong
with sighing over a stolen lady's slipper or smoking
Pittsburgh53 stogies.54 Any Rights of Man should provide
for such eccentricities. But the auditor can use this data
to detect vital information.
   In Dianetics, the term token is defined to embrace
the objects and habits which an individual or society
keeps by not knowing they are extensions of an ally.
   By  identity thought there are associative restimula-
tors for every restimulator in the environment—those
things connected with the restimulator. Being blank on
the subject, the analytical mind, apprised by physical
reaction that a restimulator of something is nearby, then
picks up the associative restimulator but does not select
the actual restimulator. (In Book Two, the young man's
signal to remove his coat was a touch of the tie: he did
not cite the tie in his complaint; the nearest he came to
it was the person and clothing of the hypnotic operator.
These were  associative restimulators.)
   A restimulator for a contrasurvival engram might be
an electric light; the aberree looks to the shade, the pull
chain, the room or the person under the light to be a
source of annoyance, and not only does he not know
that a restimulator is present but supposes that the
associated objects have some evil in themselves.
   The  associative restimulator for a  contrasurvival
engram  needs no  name  other than that, associative

51. llamas: South American animals related to the camel but
smaller and without humps: the llama is used as a beast of burden
and for its wool, flesh and milk.
52. fireplugs: street hydrants to which hoses can be attached for
fighting fires.
53. Pittsburgh: city in southwest Pennsylvania.
54. stogies: long, slender, roughly made, inexpensive cigars.
                           490
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

restimulator. The pain is the thing, the things associated
in any way with the thing are the thing, are other things,
etc., is the reactive equation which fills the world of the
aberree full of fear and fills him full of anxiety. Leave a
child in a place or a room where he has been unhappy
and he may become ill, for he is confronted with some
restimulator and he can at best explain, like the adult,
his fear in terms of things not rationally connected to
the restimulator. This is the mechanism of engramic
restimulation.
   It is most terribly uncomfortable to any aberree
who, try as he might, cannot say why he does not like
some person or object or locale, and who cannot con-
nect any of the three with the actual item which is the
restimulator and does not know he has an engram about
it. This method of detecting engrams leads nowhere
quickly  since one cannot  select objects, persons or
locales and know they are restimulators. They may be
only associative restimulators to the actual restimuiator
item in the environment. (Words contained in engrams,
by  the way, and  any other precise restimulator can
"push  button" the aberree into action or apathy if they
are used upon him. In words it has to be the exact word;
for instance, painted will not do when painter is in the
engram. What is painted, however, may be an associa-
tive restimulator and the aberree may declare he does
not like it; that he does not like it does not mean that it
will "push his buttons" and make him cough or sigh or
get angry or get sick or whatever the engram containing
the word dictates he should do.)
   The  token is a very special kind of  restimulator.
While the auditor may not find much use for the asso-
ciative restimulator as applied  to contrasurvival en-
grams, he can employ the token as a means of detection
to locate allies.
   The  token is any  object, practice or mannerism
                            491
                 L. RON HUBBARD

which one or more allies used. By identity thought the
ally is survival; anything the ally used or did is, there-
fore, survival. The valence of the ally is that one most
frequently employed by the aberree. While the Clear
can shift himself into valences he imagines or beholds
at will and convenience, and out of them at will and can
stabilize his own at will, the aberree skids around into
valences without his knowledge or consent and is most
likely to be in any valence but his own. The person who
seems to be a different person every time he is met or a
different person to each person he meets, with special
valences manifesting here and others manifesting there,
is shifting into various winning   valences; interfered
with in his shifts, he goes into secondary valences; if
forced into his own valence he becomes ill. It is under-
stood, of course, that all valences manifest something
of himself.
   Shifting into ally valences is the fundamental prac-
tice of the aberree. He will feel most at ease when his
own  valence is alloyed to some degree with an ally
valence. So long as the ally or the pseudoally is not
available, the aberree reminds himself of the ally va-
lence with tokens. These tokens are the things the ally
possessed, practiced or did.
   An  aberree will often inextricably associate himself
with a pseudoally, as in marriage, and then make the
astonished discovery that he is not partnered with the
optimum  ally conduct. (Mother was an ally, Mother
baked bread; wife is pseudomother though she nor he
knows it, wife does not bake bread. Mother frowned on
lipstick; wife wears lipstick. Mother gave him his way;
wife has a bossy attitude. Wife is pseudomother because
she has  similar voice tones only.) The aberree then
reactively and unknowingly attempts to coax wife or
partner into the ally valence  by assuming  that the
moment  of the sympathy engram is present time—a
                           492
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

mechanical shift caused only by the restimulation of the
sympathy engram because of voice tones or some such
thing—and  proceeds to manifest the ghost of the en-
gram  illness or injury or operation as a psychosomatic
sickness. The  computation of the  reactive mind is
simple—just like Simple Simon—one  forces the ally
into being by manifesting the somatic with which the
ally sympathized. This can also be an effort to turn a
partner, in which the reactive mind thinks it has dis-
covered an ambivalent friend-enemy, into the sympathy
valence. Wife  is cruel. Mother  was  cruel until the
injury, then she was  nice. Manifest the  injury as a
chronic psychosomatic  illness and wife will be nice.
Actually wife isn't nicer, so the computation gets stron-
ger, the illness gets stronger, and down into the dizzy
dwindling spiral we go. The psychosomatic  illness is
also a denial of dangerousness, a plea of helplessness—a
shade of opossum playing,55 fear paralysis: "I'm no men-
ace to you. I'm sick!"
   The aberree goes into his own valence of the time of
the sympathy engram in his bid for sympathy and his
denial of his own dangerousness. The valence of him-
self, of course, is complicated by  the age-tab and
somatic of the engram in which he was immature and
not well.
   The psychosomatic illness is, as well, a token, which
is to say it is a reminder of a time when he once had
love and care and was told so. He needs it about as
much  as he needs to be atom bombed, of course, but
this is good, solid, reactive mind "survival" and the
reactive mind is going to make it so he can survive if it
kills him.
55. opossum  playing: pretending to be dead, a trick used by
opossums  (small, tree-dwelling mammals which are active at
night) to defend themselves from predators.
                           493
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   This is all mechanical and  is actually merely re-
stimulation of an engram, but it is better understood as
a low order of computation.
   In the absence of an ally, and even in the presence of
the ally, he uses reactive mimicry. Conscious mimicry
is a wonderful way to learn. Reactive mimicry is most
alloying to the personality. Reactively, he once had an
ally and imitates the ally. Consciously he may not even
recall the ally or the habits of the ally.
   The ally, remember, is somebody who has entered
the interior world of the mind when the analyzer was
shut down by illness or injury or an operation and gave
forth sympathy or protection. The ally is part of the
sympathy engram. If a child had grandparents he liked
and was lucky enough not to be ill around them or be
talked to by them in sympathetic terms when he was ill
or injured, the grandparents would still be much loved.
In Dianetics an ally is only someone who has offered
sympathy or protection in an engram. We don't have to
have engrams  to be loved or to love: quite the contrary,
one is better loved and loves more without engrams.
   The  token applies, Dianetically, only to the ally and
is an object, practice or mannerism similar to an ob-
ject, practice or mannerism of the ally.
   The  ally smoked Pittsburgh stogies, so the aberree
may smoke  Pittsburgh stogies no matter what they do to
his throat or his wife. The ally wore bowlers,56 the lady
aberree dotes on riding habits57 but has never ridden a
horse. The ally knitted, the aberree specializes in wear-
ing knit things or a lady at least makes a pretense of
knitting and sometimes wonders why she ever took it
up,  she is so bad at it. The ally used profanity, the

56. bowlers: stiff felt hats with rounded crown and narrow brim,
worn  chiefly by men. Also called derbies.
57. riding habits: dresses or suits worn by horseback riders.
                           494
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

aberree uses the same  profanity. The ally wipes his
nose on his sleeve and picks his nose, the aberree wipes
his nose on a dinner jacket and fiddles with his nostrils.
   The token may be a reminder of pure ally or it may
be a reminder  of the friend side of an ambivalent
friend-enemy. And it may be a winning valence that
was also ambivalent toward the aberree. The token is
never an associative restimulator in the meaning that it
reminds of some  antagonist, for associative restimula-
tors are abhorred.
   The most  chronic token, the most constant habit,
practice or mannerism of the preclear is a direct arrow
to the pure ally. And the pure ally is the one the reactive
mind  will guard to its highest level of the beset donjon58
keep.59 And that is the target of the auditor. He may
have to relieve the majority of the engram bank before
he can erase the engram which is most likely to aberrate
the individual, to saddle him with strange practices and
to make him  chronically ill.
   Observe your preclear and see what he does and
says that is strange to his personality, things he does but
does not much seem  to enjoy. See what he uses and
what his mannerisms are. Amongst this collection you
may, by  asking discreet questions, jog an ally into his
memory  which he had forgotten and so jogging, reach
swiftly toward the sympathy engram in which that ally
is contained or reach toward, for an emotional dis-
charge, the painful emotion engram of the loss of that
ally, his illness or incidents concerning him.
   Another  but special token is that which  stems
from a "die if you don't" command. Fathers, for in-
stance, suspicious of paternity,60 sometimes claim while

58. donjon: the fortified main tower of a castle.
59. keep: the strongest, innermost part or central tower of a
medieval castle.
60. paternity: the state of being a father; fatherhood.
                           495
                 L. RON HUBBARD

trouncing  or upsetting mothers that they will kill the
child if it isn't just like Father. This is a very unhappy
type of token, to say nothing of being, usually, a bad
engram; it can go to the extent of remodeling structure,
of making noses long or hair absent; it may compel an
aberree into a profession he does not admire and all out
of the engramic command  that he must be like the
parent. As  this type of command   is usually given
before birth it is often addressed, unknowingly, to a
girl, fathers not being gifted ordinarily with  clairvoy-
ance;61 in such a case it will bring about a most remark-
able structural change in a woman and form some
unusual mannerisms, "ambitions" (like a dog that gets
whipped if he doesn't fetch the duck) and some habits
which,  to say the least, are astonishing. Father, post-
birth, to accomplish the reactivation of such an engram,
must be  quite ambivalent so that the friend-enemy
computation comes into being. Not to be like Father is
to die: to force Father into his sympathy-engram self the
reactive mind must manifest the token of illness. Token
and likeness is the answer to such a computation. And
recall, all such computations are not simple but are
made further complex by the addition of dozens of other
engramic computations.
   The friend-enemy is rather easy to find as an enemy,
not too hard to find as a friend. Standard technique with
its repeater and return, et al., would in themselves at last
locate any engram and erase the bank so that it properly
refiles. The use of the token facilitates the auditing.
   In the case of the pure ally, the champion of the
right, standard technique also at last arrives. But here,
how smooth the use of the token sometimes makes the
road! For the token may be as alarmingly strange as an
61. clairvoyance:  the ability to perceive things that are not in
sight or that cannot be seen.
                           496
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

elephant in a bird cage. It takes a real ally to keep some
of these odd habits around.
   Measure  the preclear against his environment and
education and  his society and profession. See what
doesn't seem to belong amid  the things he uses, the
objects he adores and the mannerisms his friends find
so strange. Then find out if he or the spouse knew of
anyone who  did those things or liked those things.
   Do  not suppose from  all this that our Clear has
jettisoned all strange mannerisms. Self-determinism is
individuality in the extreme; personality is inherent
and, revealed by clearing, looms up high above the
aberree. The engrams compress a man and make him
small and afraid. Released, his power comes into play.
The sympathy engram is to a man like a crutch when he
has two sturdy legs. But oh, the preclear sobs where he
loses old Uncle Goston, whose habit of spitting on the
floor, as  transplanted, so astonished  our preclear's
friends and  business associates. But the grief is brief,
usually the half-hour it takes to run  the sympathy
engram  out. Suddenly the preclear recalls Uncle Gos-
ton, recalls a thousand things Uncle Goston and he used
to do, for the engram had Uncle Goston occluded and
amongst those missing from the sight of "I." Although
it might have  said in the engram,  "All right, there,
there, there, Billy. I'll take care of you. Don't thrash
around  so. You'll be all right. There, there, there. Poor
little fellow. What  a terrible rash you've  got. How
feverish. There, there, there, Billy. You'll be all right as
long as I am here. I'll take care of my Billy. Go to sleep
now. Go  to sleep and forget it." And Billy was all the
time "unconscious" and never "knew" about it.
   Afterwards he got a partner who looked like Uncle
Goston (but happened to be a fool), and when bankrupt
somehow  developed a rash and a chronic cough and got
very "feverish" about  his business affairs. He took to
                            497
                 L. RON HUBBARD

spitting on the floor no matter where he was; and his
health got worse and he got worse: but if you had asked
him about any uncks before he went into therapy, he
would have been very vague. "Give me a flash reply,"
says the auditor. "Who  used to spit on the floor?"
"Uncle Goston," answers the preclear. "Gosh, that's
funny (hawk,62 spit), I hadn't thought of him for years.
He was never around much, though." (Not more than
ten years constantly, the auditor may discover.) "Don't
suppose he's important. Let's take up Mrs. Swishback,
that teacher I had ———" "Let's return now to the time
Uncle Goston  helped you,"  says the auditor. "The
somatic strip will now go back to the time your Uncle
Goston helped  you." "I feel like my skin's on fire!"
complains the preclear. "This must be—hey, it's my
allergy! But I don't see anybody. I don't ——— Wait, I
get an impression of somebody. Somebody ——— Why,
it's Uncle Goston!" And he runs it and the rash goes
away. But maybe  the auditor had to get a hundred
engrams before he got this one. And then the preclear
suddenly remembers about him and Uncle Goston and
the time—but get on with therapy.
   Complete remembering seems to be a synonym for
complete sanity. But don't suppose that just because a
Clear gets rid of his Uncle Gostons and  his habit of
spitting on the floor that he will not now indulge in any
eccentricity. The difference is, he is not compelled into
eccentricity without his consent. Good Lord, what a
cleared mind  can think up to keep itself from being
bored!

    What  to Do If a Case Stops Progressing
   Even in the easiest cases there will come times when
62. hawk: make  an effort to raise phlegm from the throat; clear
the throat noisily.
                           498
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

progress seems  to stop. Here is a list of possibilities
of why:

   1.  The  preclear is not moving on the track despite
       appearances, but is being subject to one of the
       five types of commands which can inhibit his
       free motion or information. The commonest of
       these is a holder and the preclear may be found
       to be in an engram and in a strange valence.

   2.  There is an emotional or pain shut-off. These
       can always be detected even at the beginning of
       a case. The  patient's muscles will tremble or
       twitch when he is in an engram but he will not
        feel the somatic: this is inevitably a pain shut-
       off. Out  of therapy the patient may be  very
       tense, his neck muscles  in particular may be
        tight: this is often an emotional shut-off. Either
       of these conditions can be observed in many
        aberrees before beginning therapy. If they ap-
       pear while therapy is in progress, look for pain
       or emotional shut-offs.
   3.  There is an exaggerator of emotion and a pain
        shut-off so that the patient weeps over anything
       but wriggles and twists when asked to approach
       pain. He is feeling emotion without feeling the
        pain.
   4.  There is an emotional charge in some area which
        has not been discharged but which is ready to
        discharge. Or, conversely, if you have been trying
        to get an emotional discharge in a late painful
       emotion engram and have had no success, there is
        a feeling shut-off in the prenatal area.
   5.  The Auditor's Code has been broken. Change
       auditors or reduce the moments when the code
       was broken.
                           499
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   6.  There  is an emotional upset in the patient''; life
       current with therapy. Question him closely and
       remove the charge, if possible, of the emotional
       upset as an engram.
   7.  The auditor has missed an important point in
        this book. Study it.

       If a Case "Refuses" to Get Well
   It has long been a popular idea, if an erroneous fact,
that people desire to retain their neuroses. In any case
which  "resists" therapy, you may be certain that the
engrams  are resisting, not the patient; do not, therefore,
attack the patient but the engrams.
   There are many computations which give the ap-
pearance of resistance. The commonest of these is the
ally computation, which derives from engrams contain-
ing allies who seem to plead that the patient is not to rid
himself of anything. An  ordinary situation is one in
which some  relative or friend of the mother's is advis-
ing the mother against aborting the child. The ally is
pleading, "Do not get rid of it!" The preclear knows
this person to be a friend of his of the highest order.
The preclear may interpret this to mean that he is not to
get rid of his engrams.
   Another computation is the stupidity computation,
wherein the preclear begins to believe he will be stupid
or lacking a mind if he gives up engrams. This stems,
for example, from the mother saying she will lose her
mind  if she loses the child: she calls the child "it." A
whole chain of these may appear in a case, giving the
preclear the idea that if he parts with any engrams, he
will lose his mind. This is the primary reason why past
schools believed that the mind was composed of neuro-
ses instead of an inherent personality. The engrams,
even though unknown, appeared very valuable, which
they are not—none of them.
                           500
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   Yet another computation is one of secrecy. It seems
to the preclear that his life depends upon holding some
secret. This is common in a case where the mother has
had a lover. Mother and the lover both enjoin63 secrecy.
The  preclear, obeying engramic commands, believes
that he has much   to lose if he tells this secret even
though those who enjoined it were not even aware that
he was present, or if they knew, that he was "listening."
One secrecy computation stems from the mother'i: tear-
ing to tell the father that she is pregnant: if the mother is
an ally of the child, then the child will be extremely
tenacious of this type of engram.
   All cases have one or more  computations which
inhibit a delivery of engrams. Some have all the above
and more. This is no great worry to the auditor for by
repeater technique, he can open the engram bank

                  Drugs
   The  so-called hypnotics <iaw oo great use in Dia-
netics except, on occasion, ^/hep  patient is psychotic
and narcosynthesis is employe!1 Hv hypnotic; is meant
such   preparations   as   pherioo.-'.rbitai,"1 hyoscinc, '
opium66 and  so on. These   •,-^.-.\i-producing drugs art:
undesirable save only as a sedative and would bu ad-
ministered as sedatives by a medical doctor. Any patient
who  needs a  sedative already has a medical doctor
whose  business it is. The auditor should not  then,
concern himself with hypnotics or anything producing

63. enjoin: order, command.
64. phenobarbitai: a medicinal drug used to calm the nerves and
induce sleep.
65. hyoscine: same as scopolamine, an alkaloid used in medicine
as a sedative, hypnotic and sometimes with other drugs to relieve
pain.
66. opium:  a drug made  from  the juice of certain poppies,
smoked  or chewed  as a stimulant or narcotic, and used in
medicine  as a sedative.
                            501
                 L. RON HUBBARD

sleep. Some  preclears will beg to be given sleeping
drugs to "facilitate therapy" but any such drug is an
anesthetic and shuts down somatics, inhibiting therapy.
Further, none but the insane should be worked in amne-
sia trance, particularly a drug trance, for the work is
longer than necessary and the results slow, as elsewhere
explained. Dianetics wakes people up; it does not try to
drug them or hypnotize them. Hence, the hypnotic drug
is worthless to the auditor.
   Patients who wish to be knocked over the head with
lead pipes or otherwise put into a deep trance should
not be allowed to have their way even when they humor-
ously present their own lead pipes.
   The  trick is to put "I" in contact with the file clerk.
All hypnotics work to shut down "I." While  the file
clerk can be reached and sonic and visio are available
and even while, with much labor, a clearing can be so
effected, even the most "hopeless" case is better worked
in contact; the work is faster, more satisfactory and less
troublesome.
   When  one discovers the science of mind, he inevi-
tably discovers numerous other things not properly in
his province. Amongst these is the confusion which has
unwittingly existed about hypnotics. Those things la-
beled "hypnotics" as named above are not hypnotics at
all but anesthetics. And those things labeled anesthetics
are not anesthetics but hypnotics. This will become
brilliantly clear to the auditor when he finds himself
tangling with  his first "anesthetic" nitrous oxide en-
gram  in some preclear. Perhaps there will have been
another engram wherein morphine67 was administered
for days and even weeks, leaving the patient in a stupor
which, by the definition "hypnotic," should have been a
trance: the aberrative material will be there but it will

67. morphine: a drug made from opium, used for relieving pain.
                           502
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

be found to be slight compared to a chloroform68 or
nitrous oxide engram.
   Ether, chloroform  and nitrous oxide, the  "anes-
thetics," place the patient in a deep hypnotic trance: the
reactive bank is wide open and all reception is sharp,
clear and  aberrative in the extreme.  Of the  three,
nitrous oxide is easily the worst, being no  anesthetic
which  would dull pain at all but a first-class hypnotic.
In nitrous oxide the pain is filed and the content is filed
with high and brilliant fidelity.6' Some years ago some
investigator wondered if nitrous oxide did not make the
brain decay. Fortunately brains do not decay that easily;
but nitrous oxide  does  bring into being particularly
severe engrams. The serious, late-life engrams which
the auditor will encounter may include, at the list's top,
a nitrous oxide dental  or surgical or obstetrical™ en-
gram. Nitrous oxide engrams are particularly bad when
they involve exodontistry; they often form the  most
severe late-life engram. Aside from  the fact that all
exodontists have in the past talked too much and have
offices which  are far too  noisy with street sounds,
running water and  flapping drill belts, nitrous oxide is
not at all anesthetic and sharpens rather than dulls pain.
   In reverse, nitrous oxide makes an  excellent hyp-
notic for institutional therapy. It is far from the best
obtainable from the chemists, that is certain, for some
brilliant chemist will certainly be able to bring out a
good gas hypnotic now that Dianetics is known and the
need of it in institutions is realized.

68. chloroform: a colorless liquid with a sharp, sweetish smell
and taste. Chloroform evaporates quickly and  easily. When its
vapor is inhaled, it makes a person unconscious or unable to feel
pain.
69. fidelity: accuracy; exactness.
70. obstetrical: of or regarding obstetrics, the branch of medi-
cine concerned with the care and treatment of women during
pregnancy, childbirth and the period immediately following.
                           503
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   There are some drugs which assist reverie, however.
The  commonest  and most  easily obtainable is plain,
strong coffee. A cup or two of this occasionally alerts
the analyzer enough so that it can reach through deeper
layers of "unconsciousness."  Benzedrine7' and other
commercial stimulants have been used with some suc-
cess, particularly on psychotic patients. These bring the
mind enough awake to permit it to overcome engramic
commands.  Such commercial stimulants have the disad-
vantage of exhausting a Q72 quantity in the mind.
   This Q quantity has not been much studied. It is as
though the brain burns a certain amount of Q when it is
exhausting engrams. For instance, therapy every day
may  bring results more  rapidly but it will also bring
some  stale sessions. Therapy every two or three days
produces the best results as observed. (Therapy once a
week permits the engrams to sag and slows a case, one
week being too long.) Benzedrine burns up Q. After a
few  sessions with Benzedrine the current stock of Q
is exhausted and the work has been observed to deterio-
rate either until a higher dosage was administered—and
there is a close limit to that—or until more Q  was
manufactured.
   Here, with all this, must be included an important
and  vital fact. It should be on a page  by itself and
underscored. All  patients in therapy should be given
a  dosage  of vitamin  B,  orally or by  injection at
the minimum  of 10 mg per day. Reducing engrams
exhausts Q which seems to depend in some measure on
B,. You  can be absolutely certain of nightmares in a
patient who is not taking his B,. Taking liberal doses of
71. Benzedrine: (trademark) an amphetamine, a drug used as a
stimulant.
72. Q: symbol used to represent an undefined, but observable as
existing, form of energy or force.
                           504
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

that, he will have no nightmares. DTs73 are probably
caused by a similar exhaustion of Q quantity. DTs are
best treated by B, and Dianetics. Something like DTs on
a very minor  scale has been observed  to develop in
occasional patients who were negligent about their B,.
With  it, in therapy, they thrive.
   Alcohol  is rarely an  assist to the auditor. In fact,
alcohol is rarely an  assist to anyone. A  depressant,
classifiable at best as a poison, alcohol has the single
virtue of being highly taxable. All alcoholics are alco-
holic because of their engrams. All alcoholics, unless
they have injured their brains—which case is cited only
because it is possible, not because research in Dianetics
demonstrated any real evidence of it—can be released.
Alcoholism is engramic. It has become, in some very
understandable way,  a class of contagious aberration
whereby the reactive mind confuses alcohol and "being
a good sport" or "having fun" or "forget your trou-
bles." Some  of these things can also be obtained by
strychnine74 and cyanide.75 Alcohol has its uses: one can
put specimens of frogs and such in it; one can clean the
germs  off needles with it; it burns well in rockets. But
one would  not consider preserving his stomach in a
glass jar and, unless insane, does not think of himself
as a needle. While some  drunks think they act like
rockets, few have been observed to reach an altitude of
more  than the floor. It is not only a poor stimulant-
depressant, it is also a hypnotic in the finest sense: what

73. DTs: delirium tremens: a violent delirium (temporary state of
extreme  mental excitement, marked by  restlessness, confused
speech and hallucinations) resulting chiefly from excessive drink-
ing of alcoholic liquor and characterized by sweating, trembling,
anxiety and frightening hallucinations. Delirium tremens comes
from Latin, and means literally "trembling delirium."
74. strychnine: a bitter, highly poisonous substance, used in
very small doses as a stimulant.
75. cyanide: a very poisonous chemical substance.
                           505
                 L. RON HUBBARD

is done to a drunk becomes an engram.* The chronic
alcoholic is physically and mentally ill. Dianetics can
clear him or even merely release him without too much
trouble for alcohol is apparently not physiological in its
addictive effect. With the whole range of chemistry to
choose stimulants and depressants from, why the gov-
ernment chooses a superiorly aberrative and inferiorly
stimulative compound to legalize is a problem for the
better mathematicians, possibly those who deal exclu-
sively in tax income problems. Opium is less harmful,
marijuana76 is not only less physically harmful but also
better in the action of keeping a neurotic producing,
phenobarbital does not dull the senses nearly as much
and produces less aftereffect, ammonium chloride77 and
a host of other stimulants are more productive of results
and  hardly less severe on the anatomy: but no, the
engrams, contaging78 unpleasantly along from the first
crude brew which made  one of our ancestors drunk,
decree that alcohol is the only thing which  is to be
drunk if a person wants to "forget it all" and "have a
good time." There is really nothing wrong with alcohol
save that it depends mainly on engrams  and  other
advertising for its effect and is otherwise remarkably
inferior in performance: that it makes such aberrative
engrams  is probably its main claim to  fame and
* I am not being paid by the WCTU79 to write this; it is only
that I have had to clear too many alcoholics. —LRH

76. marijuana: the dried leaves and flowers of the hemp plant,
used in cigarette form as a narcotic or hallucinogen.
77. ammonium   chloride: a white, crystalline compound pro-
duced  by the reaction of ammonia with hydrochloric acid: it is
used in medicine, and also in dry cells, dyes, etc.
78. contaging: a verb coined from the word contagious, describ-
ing the act of spreading or tending to spread from person to
person.
79. WCTU:   Women's Christian Temperance Union, an organi-
zation that campaigns against alcohol use.
                           506
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

infame.80 Making one drug immoral  and another one
taxable is a sample of the alcohol engram  in society.
However, although it is immensely legal, it is doubtful if
the auditor will find any use for it in therapy.
   And  speaking of  drugs, that three-thousand-cycle
note81 in your ears came either from a nitrous oxide
engram  or Mother taking lots of quinine before you
were born in the hope that she would not be a mother,
saying the while, "It makes  my  ears ring so: it just
keeps on and on and on and will not stop!"

                 Autocontrol
   Since the beginning of Dianetics research in 1930,
patients have, in the majority, had some belief that they
could run their cases in autocontrol.
   Not understanding  that an auditor is only interested
in what has been done to, not done by a patient, some
shyness or imagined guilt often prompts this vain82 hope
that one can accomplish therapy alone.
   It cannot be done. That is a flat statement and it is a
scientific fact. The auditor  is necessary for  a large
number  of reasons. He is not there to control or order
the preclear about, but he is there to listen, to provide
insistence, to compute the trouble the preclear is having
and remedy it. The work is done on these equations:
   • The  dynamics of the preclear are less than the
     force in his reactive bank.
   • The dynamics of the preclear plus the dynamics
      of the auditor are greater than the force in the
     preclear's reactive bank.
   • The analytical mind of the preclear is shut down
80. infame: very bad reputation; notoriety; disgrace; dishonor.
81. three-thousand-cycle note: a ringing sound with three thou-
sand vibrations, or cycles, per second.
82. vain: without sense or wisdom; foolish; senseless.
                           507
                 L. RON HUBBARD

     whenever he reaches an engram and he is then
     unable to pursue it and recount it enough times to
     discharge it without auditor assistance.
   • The  analytical mind of the preclear plus the ana-
     lytical mind of the auditor can discover engrams
     and recount them.
   (There is another equation, not elsewhere men-
tioned, but germane to the Auditor's Code, which dem-
onstrates mathematically the necessity of that code:
   • The force of the preclear's engram bank plus the
      force of the auditor's analytical mind is greater
     than the analytical mind and the dynamics of the
      preclear.
   This explains the necessity of never attacking the
preclear personally. It also explains the behavior of the
aberree under attack in usual life and why he grows
angry and apathetic, for this equation overwhelms his
analyzer.)
   These equations demonstrate actual natural laws.
   Autocontrol finds the preclear attempting to attack
something which has never been overcome by his ana-
lyzer although his  analyzer has never  been trying,
interiorly, to do anything else but attack that bank so
long as the analyzer would operate. The fact that the
preclear's analyzer shuts down whenever he comes into
an area of "unconsciousness" was why the engrams
could take him over and use him as a puppet when they
were restimulated—they simply shut down the analyzer.
   Many  efforts by many patients have been made to
put Dianetics on  an autocontrol level. They have all
failed and  thus  far it is believed to be  utterly and
completely impossible. The preclear in autocontrol rev-
erie may be able to reach some locks; he can certainly
reach pleasant experiences and achieve data recall by
return; but he cannot attack his own engrams without a
standard auditor-preclear arrangement.
                           508
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

   Aside from  Dianetic reverie, some preclears have
been foolish enough to attempt autohypnosis and thus
reach their engrams. Hypnotism in any form is unwar-
ranted in Dianetics. Autohypnosis used in Dianetics is
probably as close to fruitless masochism as one can get.
If a patient places himself in autohypnosis and regresses
himself in an effort to reach illness or birth or prena-
tals, the only thing he will get is ill. Of course, people
will try. None are ever convinced until they have tried,
once they begin  to agitate about autocontrol. But be
sure to have a friend and this book handy so that he can
audit away the headaches and such that suddenly turn on.
   Dianetic reverie, which means with an auditor present,
is not dangerous  or severe. Autocontrol is often very
uncomfortable  and often fruitless. It should not be at-
tempted.
   The Clear alone can autocontrol his whole time track
back to conception and does when he wants specific data
from anywhere  in his life. But he is Clear.

          Organic Mental Alterations
   There are several things which can happen to the
nervous system, including the brain, which can cause
structural change. These are called, in Dianetics, or-
ganic mental alterations. They are not called "organic
neuroses" or  "organic psychoses"  because the alter-
ation of structure does not necessarily produce aberra-
tions. There has been a confusion in the past between
behavior caused by  organic differences and behavior
caused by engrams. This confusion came about because
the engram  bank  and  the reactive mind were  not
known.
   Any human  being with an organic mental alteration
also has engrams. The behavior dictated by the engrams
and the action caused by alteration are different things.
                           509
                 L. RON HUBBARD

Engrams carry dramatizations, delusions, tantrums and
various inefficiencies with them. Alterations establish
inabilities to think or perceive or record or recall. For
instance, the radio set may have new filters and circuits
added to it which change and vary its performance and
reduce it from optimum; these would be engrams. The
radio set might have original tubes or circuits deleted
from it or it might have some of the wires crossed; this
would be organic mental alteration.
   The  sources  of organic mental  alteration are as
follows:
    i. Variation of the blueprint of structure by reason
      of a changed gene pattern. Some parts of the
      body  would  grow  too much  or too  little to
       establish any   alteration of structure. This  is
       usually so gross a change that it is obvious. The
      feebleminded and so on may suffer either from
       engrams  or an  altered blueprint, but usually
       both.
   2.  Alteration of the nervous system by  disease or
       growths, which divides into two classes:
       a. Disease  destruction as in paresis.
       b. Additional construction as  in the case  of
      tumors.
   3.  Alteration of the nervous system by  drugs or
       poisons.
   4.  Alteration by physical disorder as in the case of a
       "paralytic stroke"  wherein  certain tissues are
       inhibited or destroyed.
   5.  Physical change in structure due to injury as in
      the case of a head wound.
   6.  Alteration of structure by surgery as a necessity
       to remedy injury or disease.
   7.  latrogenic alterations (caused by doctors) under-
       taken under a misapprehension  of brain func-
       tion. These can be divided into two classes:
                             510
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

       a. Surgical, to include such things as the trans-
      orbital leukotomy, prefrontal lobotomy, topec-
      tomy and so forth.
       b. Shock  "therapies" of all kinds including elec-
        tric shock, insulin shock, etc., etc., etc., etc., etc.,
        etc., etc., etc., etc., etc., etc., etc., etc.
   The  first six sources of organic mental alteration are
much less common than has been supposed. The body
is an extremely hardy mechanism  and its repair facili-
ties are enormous. If an individual can be made to
speak or follow orders at all, it is conceivable that the
techniques of Dianetics can be applied to reduce the
engrams in the engram bank, bringing about consider-
able improvement in the condition and mental ability of
the individual. When these various sources are so se-
vere that they inhibit any use of therapy, and when it is
certain that no recourse to therapy is possible and that it
is utterly impossible to reach the engram bank  by
standard technique, hypnotism or drugs, such cases can
be considered beyond help of Dianetics.
   Category 7 presents another problem. Here we have
selective experimentation at work and it would be flatly
impossible to conceive, without months of study of their
experimental subjects, how many brands and varieties
of operation have been performed and how many odd
and bizarre shocks have been used.
   All iatrogenic alterations of the nervous system can
be considered under the heading of "reduced ability,"
in other words, inability. In each case something has
been  done to reduce  the ability of the individual to
perceive, record, recall or think. Any of these compli-
cate a case for Dianetics, but they do not inevitably bar
Dianetics from working.
   In shock  cases, such as electric shock, tissue may
have been destroyed and the memory banks may  in
some way have been scrambled, the time track may be
                            511
                 L. RON HUBBARD

altered and other conditions may exist.
   In  all such  iatrogenic  alterations, the results of
Dianetics must  be considered equivocal. But  in all
such cases, particularly those of electric shock, Dia-
netics should be used in every possible way  in an
effort to improve the patient.
   All shocks and operations should be picked up for
what they are—engrams.
   No person  who can  perform routine tasks or
whose  attention can be attracted and fixed should
feel despair or be considered hopeless.
   Any  person who has been subjected to such treat-
ment may  not be able to reach optimum mental effi-
ciency but he may be able to reach a level of rationality
even yet in excess of the current normal. The thing to
do is try. In spite of what has happened or what has
been done, in the large majority of cases there may be a
chance of excellent recovery.*

           Organic Derangement
   A  standard class of prenatal engrams  has as its
content the worry of the parents that the child will be
feebleminded if not now aborted in earnest. This adds
an emotional overload to such engrams and it adds, as
importantly, an aberrative condition in the now grown
patient that he is "not right," "all wrong," "feeble-
minded"  and  so forth. The difficulty of aborting the
child is nearly always underestimated: the means used
are often novel or bizarre: the worry because the child
has not come out of the womb after the abortion attempt
is acute, and the concern that he is now damaged
beyond repair all combine to make severely aberrative
* Attempted abortion sometimes may do strange things to a
brain. This can be considered under the heading of injury. Most
sonic recalls can be  recovered. If various recalls cannot  be
recovered, engrams can  still be removed. Intelligence in such
cases will rise and is often already extremely high. —LRH
                             512
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

engrains and, because of their content, engrains which
are difficult to reach.
   The aberrative quality of the "feebleminded" spe-
cies of remark is, of course, high. The worry that the
child may be born blind or deaf or otherwise incapaci-
tated is common. The former class of engramic re-
marks  can bring about actual feeblemindedness; the
latter concern over blindness and so on bring about, at
best, impaired visio and sonic recall.
   The  shut-off of the recalls is occasioned as well by
an  engramic  belief in the society at large that the
unborn  child is blind, unfeeling and not alive. This
belief is introduced into AA (attempted abortion) en-
grams  by people's self-justification remarks while at-
tempting an abortion: "Well, he can't see, feel or hear
anyway." Or, "It doesn't know what's going on. It's
blind, deaf and dumb.  It's a sort of growth. It isn't
human."
   The  greater part of all sonic and visio recall shut-off
has as its source the remarks made at such times or by
painful emotion and other engramic data. Hundreds of
hours of therapy may pass before these recalls turn on.
   The bulk of all shut-offs will turn on in the course of
therapy. There are thousands of engramic remarks and
emotional situations which will deny the preclear his
recall and that recall can be  expected  ordinarily to
restore.
   A very low dynamic patient (for people have various
native strengths of the dynamic) may have recalls shut
off rather easily. A high dynamic patient would require
much  more   aberration before the recalls are closed
down. These recalls can be turned on simply by running
out the physically painful and painful emotion engrams.
   It must not pass unremarked,  however, that the
abortion attempts actually can, if rarely, derange the
brain and nervous mechanisms beyond  the fetal ability
                             513
                    L. RON HUBBARD

to repair. The  result of this is actual, physiological
disability.
   Children and adults now classified as feebleminded
may  then be  separated into two groups: the actual,
physiological class and  the aberrated class. Further,
recall shut-offs must be classified into two classes as
well, regardless of the dynamic and intelligence of the
individual: those occasioned by brain damage received
during an  attempted abortion and  those which are
solely aberrational and derived from engramic com-
mands and emotion.
   The ability of the fetus to repair damage is phenom-
enal. Brain damage can ordinarily be repaired perfectly
regardless of how many foreign substances were intro-
duced into it. Just because the brain was touched in an
attempted abortion is no reason to suppose that the
recall shut-off has this as a source, for this is the rarer
of the two causes.
   It is understood that this is being read by many with
recall shut-offs and it is understood that it may well
produce a considerable upset. But remember this, sonic
and  visio recall are not vital to a nearly full Release.
This comment about organic damage does not mean
that a Release cannot be effected which will leave the
person more competent and happier, for this can always
be done regardless of the recalls. And remember this,
recalls almost always  turn on even  if it takes five
hundred hours or more. This condition is only remarked
because it will be found in some few cases.
   The "tests" and "experiments" with human brain
vivisection in institutions are not, unfortunately, valid.
For all the pain and trouble and destruction caused by
these "experiments," they were done without a proper
knowledge  of aberration and  mental derangement.
None of such data is of any value beyond showing that
the brain can be cut in various ways  without entirely
                             514
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

killing the man. For the patients used responded both to
engramic disorder and the physical disorder caused by
the psychiatrist, and  there is no way  to  differentiate
between  these after the operation except by Dianetics.
Conclusions drawn from this data are then invalid con-
clusions, for the response of the patient after the opera-
tion might have stemmed from a number of sources:
engramic, the engram of the operation itself, attempted
abortion damage   early in life, brain disability on ac-
count of the operation and so forth. Hence, draw no
conclusions that impairment of conceptual thinking, for
instance, results only when   a part  of the brain  is
removed, that recall is shut off only when the brain is
vivisected and so on. From  a scientific standpoint no
such "findings" were conclusive of anything except that
the brain can be damaged  late in life without entirely
killing a man and that surgery of any kind often brings
about a mental change in the patient. True, it may have
been discovered that this or that portion of the switch-
board called the brain, when removed, removed also
some ability to perform.

               Dianetic First Aid
   It will be of interest to those associated with emer-
gency  hospital work particularly that the healing and
recovery of any patient can be enormously benefited
and  the term of illness shortened by removing  the
engram occasioned at the moment of injury.
   The  accident case sometimes dies, in a few days,
from  shock, or does not recover and  will not heal
swiftly. In any injury—a burn, cut, a bruise of whatever
kind—a  trauma83 lingers in the injured area. The mo-
ment of the injury created an engram. This engram

83. trauma:  a painful emotional experience or shock, often
producing a lasting psychic effect and, sometimes, a neurosis.
                             515
                 L. RON HUBBARD

inhibits the release of the trauma. The fact thai the
injured part still hurts is an organic restimulator which
depresses the ability of the patient to recover.
   Using reverie or merely working the patient with his
eyes closed, and working the patient as soon after the
injury as possible, the doctor, nurse or relative can re-
turn the injured person to the moment when the injury
was received and usually recover and exhaust the inci-
dent as a usual engram. Once the engram of the injury
is reduced, the general mental tone of the patient im-
proves. Further, the injured area is no longer inhibited
from healing.
   Some experimental work on this demonstrated that
some burns would heal and disappear in a few hours
when  the engram which accompanied their reception
was removed. On  more  serious injuries tests showed
definite and unmistakable  acceleration of the rate of
healing.
   In operations, when  anesthetics have been  used,
Dianetics is useful in two  ways: (1) as a preventive
measure and  (2) as a recovery measure. In the first, no
conversation of any kind should be held around or with
the "unconscious"  or semiconscious  patient. In the
second, the trauma  of the operation itself should be
recovered and relieved immediately afterwards.

        A Problem in Mutual Therapy
   R and his wife C cleared each other in eight months
with Dianetics, working four hours a night, four nights
a week, each of them auditing the other for two hours of
the four. This mutual arrangement had been compli-
cated by the fact that whereas R was very eager to be
cleared, his wife was quite apathetic about the work: he
had managed  only after much  persuasion to get the
cases started.
                            516
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   He was  a high dynamic case with much emotion
encysted; she was an apathy case who entirely neglected
her troubles (black panther mechanism). He was trou-
bled with a chronic ulcer and anxieties about his job;
she was troubled with a general allergic condition and a
chronic carelessness in domestic affairs. They were not
to any great degree mutually restimulative, but they had
problems  about  tacit consent, avoiding the subjects
which had  most upset them while together, such as a
miscarriage she had had and the loss of their home by
fire many years before, as well as other shocks. Further
they were faced by R's intensity on the one hand and his
introversion, which caused  him to slight her therapy,
and C's apathy on the other hand, which at once aided
R's effort to take more time as the preclear than she
and which  made  her less interested in being a good
auditor.
   Further complication took place because C did not
understand the Auditor 's Code or its use and on several
occasions had become  angry and  impatient with R
when  he was in session and returned, an attitude which
tended to force R into an anger valence.
   Along  this uncertain course therapy had been con-
tinuing. R was then informed of tacit consent and told
he  had better release some  of their mutual painful
emotion. He  thereafter addressed the engram of the
burning home and suddenly found himself able to audit
some early sympathy engrams of his wife's which had
not heretofore been available. It was discovered that her
allergies stemmed from a father sympathy computation
and  that R was  the pseudofather. This resulted in a
marked improvement in C's case. She began to suffer
less from her allergies, and a chronic heart pain she had
had so long that she no longer heeded it vanished as
well. She became interested in being a good auditor and
studied the subject. She became slightly annoyed with
                             517
                 L. RON HUBBARD

R when  he demanded more than his share of therapy
time. (This increase of interest is always true of any
apathy case which began with neglect of engrams.)
   R, however, was much  inhibited by her periods of
anger and found that he now operated almost exclu-
sively under autocontrol, a condition wherein he  de-
cided what should be run and what should not be run in
himself. This autocontrol is, of course, useless, since if
he knew   about his aberrations and the  data in his
engrams, they would not be engrams. He, therefore,
started on a period of refusing to display any emotion
since she had mocked him about it, would not follow
her directions and was, in short, obeying the engrams
which she had given him when angry with him during
past sessions. C was advised to pick up the moments of
anger she had  displayed as an auditor during therapy
and when  these were reduced, it was found that R
worked well again and cooperated.
   His ulcer stemmed from an attempted abortion. His
father, an extremely aberrated individual, had sought to
abort the baby when it was seven months in the womb.
The mother remonstrated84 that the baby might be born
alive. The father said that if it were alive when born he
would kill it as soon as it came out. He had said,
further, that the mother  had  to hold  still while he
operated. On another occasion the father had said that
he would lock the mother in a closet until she decided to
abort the child. (This case was much complicated be-
cause the mother had been afraid to tell the father and
had  pretended not to be pregnant for three months,
giving  the husband  the belief that the child, seven
months  along, was actually only four months along.
Therefore, there was much secrecy in the case, much
84. remonstrated: presented and urged reasons in opposition or
complaint; protested.
                             518
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

confusion and conflicting data.) This meant that R had
a severe holder in the prenatal area: he was held by the
engram  which included a penetration of his stomach.
This was the key engram,  which is to say other en-
grams, by the mechanism of similar somatic and con-
tent, had gathered around it to suppress it. This was the
tangle of incident which C was confronting unknow-
ingly: it had become more tangled by her anger. R
would now cooperate but his time track had wound into
a ball around the holder engram, the key. Two exodon-
tistries for the removal of wisdom teeth with nitrous
oxide anesthesia were also suppressing the prenatals.
   C  worked for some  time trying to get at the late
extraction engrams, which  contained an enormous
amount  of conversation between the dentist and his
assistants and R's mother, who,  unfortunately for his
sanity, had accompanied him to the dentist's office.
   R was made  intensely uncomfortable by the contin-
ual restimulation of engrams which yet could not be
reached. He was no more uncomfortable than he had
often been in the past and his discomfort would have
been absent had C understood and followed the Audi-
tor's Code. The  case made  no progress for several
weeks.
   C's  therapy was progressing. It was intensely re-
stimulative to R to work upon  her and increased his
discomfort, but the more he worked on her the better
auditing she did and the more intelligent she was (her
IQ  went  up about  fifty points after five weeks of
therapy). C desired to know how she could break the
impasses85 in his case and was informed that she was
now  practicing tacit consent, for she had many times
85. impasses: situations offering no escape, as a difficulty with-
out solution, an argument where no agreement is possible, etc.;
deadlocks.
                             519
                 L. RON HUBBARD

been needlessly thoughtless of R long before therapy
was undertaken and she now realized what she had done
to him and  yet could not bring herself to face the fact
that she was a  responsible party to so much of  his
unhappiness. She had quite ordinarily used angry lan-
guage to him which she well knew would "push button"
him  into doing something  or into retreating from a
quarrel, which language had been restimulative to him
long before therapy.
   C thereupon entered into painful emotion engrams
late in R's life and, by working early physically painful
engrams which  said R could "feel nothing" alternately
with late engrams when he was feeling intensely on an
emotional plane  but could not exhibit it, began to
release the emotion in the case. R then showed steady
improvement. Late painful emotion was released and
early prenatals would show to be  reduced, at which
more late emotion would be visible for reduction.
   It was suddenly disclosed in the case that the reason
R was  so easily upset by C lay in the person of a nurse
who  had attended R during his tonsillectomy when he
was five years of age. C had some similarity of manner-
ism to this nurse. This was a sympathy engram, and
when  it was released the time track began to straighten
out and the abortion engrams could be  more easily
contacted.
   It so happened that R had been well off his time
track most of his life, his memory occluded, his recall
in poor condition. This was found to lie in the hidden
key engram, the abortion attempt wherein his father had
vowed to kill him if he came out and had added that the
child could not  see, feel or hear anything anyway,
engramic material which was demonstrated by R's in-
ability to move on his time track.
   The moment the key was found—two hundred and
eighty hours of therapy had elapsed—R came back on
                           520
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

the time track, could move on it, and the erasure of his
engrams proceeded in an orderly fashion.
   C  had been cleared about two months  before R
reached the final engram. C's allergies, however, disap-
peared long before her case was  cleared completely,
and R's ulcer and some other psychosomatic difficulties
also vanished well before his case was finally cleared.

      A Problem  in a Restimulated Case
   G  was cleared in ten months of sporadic sessions.
His case had the initial diagnosis of nonsonic, nonvisio,
pain and emotional shut-off, permanent light trance,
permanent "regression" at the age of three years. This
is to say that the instant he went into reverie he was
startled and frightened to find himself in a dental chair,
three years old, and having a tooth pulled, an engram in
which he had been situated, unknowingly, about half of
his ensuing  life. It had been  the partial cause of  his
chronic tooth decay and his inability to sleep as negation
against the anesthetic. The situation was obvious since he
immediately began to wrestle about and lisp, which con-
dition was instantly remedied by running the engram so
that he could come to present time, which he did.
   He  had  had considerable  difficulty in life, was a
high dynamic but manifested apathy. It was discovered
after seventy-five hours, at which  time release took
place, that his wife was sometimes his pseudogrand-
mother and  also, by ambivalence, was his pseudo-
mother. As his sympathy computation demanded that he
be ill so that his grandmother would stay with him and
as his contrasurvival engrams demanded that his mother
was  only nice to him  when  he was  ill, the reactive
computation added up  to the fact that he must be ill
continually, which demand had been obeyed by his body
for twenty-three years. All this was recovered and rem-
edied, of course, only by reducing engrams.
                            521
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   The erasure began to take place at the end of about
two hundred hours of therapy and was proceeding when
the case suddenly  stopped all progress. For fifty or
more hours of therapy, few engrams could be located;
those which  were located could not be reduced, no
painful emotion could be reached and  whatever en-
grams  were reached and reduced  were located and
treated only because the auditor in this case used highly
skilled forcing techniques which are almost never nec-
essary and should not be employed save in psychotic
cases. Such endeavor had  not been necessary at the
beginning of the case. Something was obviously wrong.
   On  close questioning it was discovered that G's wife
was violently opposed to Dianetics, that she never lost any
chance of leveling the most scathing86 attacks against it to
G  and particularly when he was  in the company  of
friends. She derided87 him as being psychotic. She sought
a lawyer to give her a divorce (announcing it after he had
entered therapy but actually having had continual consul-
tation on it with a lawyer for two years past) and generally
agitated and disturbed G to such an  extent that he was
continually receiving painful emotional engrams even
though he did not display any emotion against her.
   They had  a child, nine years of age, a boy. G was
very fond of the boy. The child had had an unusual
number  of childhood illnesses and suffered from eye
trouble and  chronic sinusitis; he was backward   in
school. The wife was somewhat sharp with the child.
Anything he did made her nervous.
   The  auditor in the case, on learning the facts about
her attitude toward her husband in general and Dia-
netics in particular, held a conference with her about
86. scathing: very harsh or bitter.
87. derided: laughed at in contempt or scorn; made fun of;
ridiculed.
                          522
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

her husband. She was found to be unopposed to therapy
for herself. Shortly after the conference, G  and  this
woman  had a brief quarrel in which G made the remark
that she must be aberrated. She took intense affront88 at
this and said that he must be the one who was crazy
since he was interested in Dianetics. He countered with
the fact that of the two he must be the least aberrated
since he was taking steps to do something about  it.
Further, he pointed out that she must be aberrated or
she would not be as quarrelsome with the child as she
was, a fact which definitely indicated that she must have
a block on her second dynamic, sex.
   The following day he came home from work and
found she had withdrawn the money from the bank and
gone to another town, taking the boy with her. He
followed and found her staying with some of her rela-
tives. She had told them that he beat her and had gone
so crazy that he had to have therapy. The truth of the
matter was that he had never touched her brutally in his
life. In this meeting, before witnesses, she began  to
rave and revile any "system of psychiatry" which be-
lieved in prespeech memory. He pointed out to her that
many  schools of the past had believed in prespeech
memory,  that the whole background of psychiatry had
long talked about "memories of the womb" without
knowing what they were, and so forth.
   Her  relatives, seeing him so calm about it, forced
her to return home with him. En route she made  a
dramatic gesture, although in no way  threatened, of
committing  suicide by leaping out of the car.
   The  auditor in the case had a private conversation
with her on her return. He had  somewhat  belatedly
deduced  the fact that there was something in her life
which she was afraid her husband would find out and

88. affront: open insult.
                           523
                 L. RON HUBBARD

that, confronted with a science which could recover all
memory, she had become  wildly emotional about it.
She at length admitted, under close questioning, that
this was the case, that her husband must never know.
She was so disturbed that the auditor, with her consent,
gave her a few  hours of therapy. It was instantly dis-
covered that her father had many times threatened to
kill her mother and that her father had not wanted her.
Further, it was found that her father's name was Q and
that her engram bank was strewn with remarks such as
"Q,  please don't leave me. I will die without you."
Additionally, when she was no longer in session, she
suddenly  volunteered what was  to her a hysterically
humorous  fact that all her life she had been having
affairs with men named Q no matter what their shape or
size or age. This was far from a Release but in view of
the fact that his other patient, G, was jeopardized by all
this unnecessary hubbub89 and that therapy was being
stalled, the auditor further questioned her. She divulged
that she had tried many times to abort their son because
she was  terribly frightened that he would be a blond
whereas she and her husband had dark hair. Further, the
engrams of that child, she knew, contained data which
she considered incriminating beyond  mere  abortion;
while pregnant she had had intercourse with three men
other than her husband.
   The  auditor pointed out to her that this guilt feeling,
no matter how real, was still engramic in her and that it
was doubtful if her husband would kill her on receipt of
these tidings.90 He told her that she was condemning a
child to a second-rate existence and that she was reduc-
ing her husband to apathy by her fears and causing the
auditor far more  work  than was  necessary. In her

89. hubbub: tumult; uproar.
90. tidings: news; information.
                           524
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

husband's and the auditor's presence she confessed her
infidelity91 and learned with some amazement that her
husband had known  about it for years. He had not
known  about her attempts on their child.
   She was requested to study a therapy manual and
clear the child which, with her husband's help, she did.
The auditor continued G on to Clear, who then cleared
his wife.

             Advice to the Auditor
   The hidden source of human aberration was hidden
for a number of very specific reasons. The auditor will
encounter all of these and, although with these tech-
niques the ability of the reactive engram bank to deny
him  is precisely nil, he should know the nature of the
beast he has under attack.
   The mechanisms  of protection which the engram
bank had—although they are not very good now that we
know how  to penetrate this armor of insanity's cause-
are as follows:
   1.  Physical pain.
   2. Emotion  in terms of captured units.
   3. "Unconsciousness."
   4.  The delayed character of the key-in.
   5.  Delay between restimulation and illness.
    6.  Utter irrationality.
   Of the physical pain we know much—that the mind,
in memory,  sought to avoid it just as the mind in life
seeks to avoid it as an outside source: hence, memory
blockage.
   Emotion of loss piles up to make a buffer between
the individual and the reality of death.
   "Unconsciousness" is not only a  mechanism  of
91. infidelity: unfaithfulness or disloyalty to another; especially,
sexual unfaithfulness of a husband or wife; adultery.
                            525
                 L. RON HUBBARD

hiding data, it is also a block to memory which cannot
jump the gaps of past moments when the fuses were
blown.
   An engram  might slumber for the better part of a
lifetime and then, given the correct set of restimulators
in the right moment of physical weariness or illness,
manifest itself, making an apparent cause of insanity or
lesser aberration many years after the actual incident
had taken place.
   Another aspect of the bank protective mechanism
was the restimulator lag, which is to say that when a
keyed-in engram was restimulated it often required two
or three days for action to take place. (Example: Say a
migraine headache  has as its restimulator a rhythmic
bumping  sound; that sound is heard by the individual
who  has the engram; three days later he suddenly has a
migraine.) Given  this lag, how could one  locate the
cause of a specific restimulation of a sporadic illness?
   The  utter irrationality of an engram, the ultimate in
irrationality, that everything equals everything else in
the engram  and that these are equal to things in the
exterior environment which are only vaguely similar is
a feat of idiocy which  any  sentient man might  be
expected to overlook as a "thought process."
   Man  has been  looking for this source for some
thousands of years; but he was looking for something
which  was complicated on the grounds that anything
which  could  be  so harrowing,92 so  destructive, so
vicious and so capable of producing complex manifes-
tations must therefore have a complex source; on exam-
ination it is remarkably simple.
   The  auditor will have very little to do with trying to
draw  a line between sanity and insanity, they are such
relative terms. He will be asked to compare Dianetics

92. harrowing:  extremely disturbing or distressing; grievous.
                           526
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY —PART Two

with old standards such as the complex classifications
of Kraepelin:'3 it can be done but it has the usefulness of
Aristotelian  natural history, of  interest only  to the
historian.
   If an individual is incapable of adjusting himself to
his environment so as to get along with or obey or
command   his fellows, or, more importantly, if he is
incapable of adjusting his environment, then he can be
considered to be  "insane." But  it is a relative term.
Sanity, on the other  hand, closely approaches,  with
Dianetics, a potential absolute meaning, for we know
the optimum  mind. Modifications of education and
viewpoint may make  the rational action of one person
appear irrational to another but this is not a problem of
sanity—it is a problem of viewpoint and education, with
which the auditor will have but small concern.
   Thus  the patients the auditor will encounter will fall
into the three  general Dianetic classes of  nonsonic
recall, imaginary recall and sonic recall. The question
of sanity does not arise: the question of how difficult or
how  long the case may be is fairly well determined by
the degree of these three conditions.
   However,  the auditor will find that he may have in
his hands a truly "insane" case, one which  is "psy-
chotic." The treatment of such a case depends on which
of the three above classes the psychotic patient may be
entered. The problem is to deintensify the engrams of
the patient as swiftly as possible.
   The conditions and mechanisms which hide the en-
gram  bank do  not vary: they are uniformly present in
every patient, in every human being. The techniques of
Dianetics may  be improved upon—and   what  scientific
technique, particularly in its first few years of existence,
93. Kraepelin: Emil Kraepelin (1856-1926), German psychia-
trist; divided mental disturbances into various classifications.
                           527
                 L. RON HUBBARD

cannot—but  they also do not perform selectively but are
applicable to all individuals.
   Hence, if we have an "insane"  patient, the funda-
mental problem  does not change and Dianetic tech-
nique works as in any other case. The task is to reduce
the intensity of charge in the case  so that it can be
resolved by standard technique.
   Insane patients are often found stuck on the time
track, in which case a holder is fed to them, one kind
after another, until they are moving again. If the patient
is regressed, he has become so thoroughly stuck that he
has lost touch with the present time. Any patient can
begin to relive instead of merely return and the auditor,
as the remedy for this, merely snaps at them that they
can remember  this, which places them in a returned
status again. Insane patients are often found listening to
one engram over and over, in which case it is again only
necessary to fix attention and feed them holders until
they are once more moving on the track. Insane patients
are sometimes discovered completely off the time track,
listening to demons or seeing illusion. The problems
are always the same: use repeater technique when, by
one means  or another, their attention has been fixed,
and then either get them moving on  the track or get
them  back on  the time track. The schizophrenic is
usually a long way off his time track.
   The  best way to deintensify a case so that it can be
entered in routine therapy is to discover and discharge
painful emotion engrams. If ordinary means fail, get
the help of a medical  doctor, place the patient under
nitrous oxide or sodium pentothal and reach a  deep
level of trance where the patient will be found, ordi-
narily, to be capable of moving on his track even though
he was  off his track when awake. Find a late despair
engram  and discharge it as described in the chapter on
emotion. The technique for deep trance is no different
                          528
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

except that very cautious safeguards must be taken to
say nothing which  will aberrate the patient further but
to limit all conversation to therapy patter, being very
careful to include the canceller.
   The insane patient is obeying some engramic com-
mand, perhaps many, no matter what he is doing. That
command   may  dictate, by the patient's misinterpreta-
tion, some strange action; it may dictate demons; it may
dictate anything. But diagnosis merely consists of ob-
serving the patient in order to discover, by his actions,
what the engramic command might be.
   This volume  does not cover Institutional Dianetics
beyond these few remarks, but an auditor who knows
the fundamentals in this volume and with any under-
standing can bring about a  "sanity" in patients in a
short time which the boards of these institutions nor-
mally  consider a miraculous  recovery. The  patient,
however, is very far from a Release, and many more
hours should  be spent in discharging further painful
emotion and reducing engrams before an auditor should
consider it safe to permit him to leave therapy.
   The  auditor should be extremely cautious, at least
for the next twenty years, about any case which has
been institutionalized, for he may be getting a case with
iatrogenic psychosis—caused by doctors—in addition to
the patient's other engrams. Dianetics may help a mind
a little in which the brain has been  "ice picked" or
"apple cored,"  but it cannot cure such insanity until
some clever biologist finds a way to grow a new brain.
Electric shock cases are equivocal: they may or may not
respond to treatment, for brain tissue may have been
burned away to a point where the brain cannot function
normally. In entering any such case, the auditor will be
perplexed by the scrambled condition of the standard
bank, to say nothing of the circuits by which he should
                           529
                 L. RON HUBBARD

be able to reach the engram bank. Syphilis94 and other
brain erosions should be similarly classified and should
be approached or undertaken only with the full knowl-
edge that Dianetics may not be able to help the dismem-
bered*5 machine at all. There have been many thousands
of these brain "operations" and hundreds of thousands
of electric shock treatments: thus the auditor should be
alert not to engage upon what may be a hopeless cause
when  there exist so many cases which can better be
helped.  Any  case which   has been  institutionalized
should be suspected. And  if anything unusual in the
way  of memory  scramble or lack of coordination is
observed, searching inquiry may reveal hidden institu-
tionalization. Further, an auditor called upon to assist a
case which  is about to be institutionalized should al-
ways  be wary. The  case which is being sent to an
institution may be a case which has been in one before,
regardless of the  protestations of relatives or friends
that such is not the circumstance.
   Similarly, combat  exhaustion96 cases should  be
warily undertaken, for the case was probably processed
before quitting the service, at which time electric shock
or brain operation or narcosynthesis may  have  been
applied without the knowledge or consent of the patient.
   These  warnings are given not because the auditor
will be in any particular physical danger—patients sel-
dom  do anything but cooperate, sane or insane, when
Dianetics is applied, even if they snarl about it—but
because much work may  be expended only to discover
94. syphilis: a contagious venereal disease affecting first some
local part, secondly, the skin and mucous membrane and, thirdly,
the bones and muscles and brain.
95. dismembered:  divided into parts; cut to pieces; mutilated.
96. combat  exhaustion:  (psychiatry) a neurotic condition in
which  one is anxious, irritable, depressed, etc., often as a result
of having been in combat or battle for a long time.
                           530
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

that the entire mental machinery  has been wrecked
beyond repair.
   If the auditor undertakes an electric shock case, he
should address his primary  attention to the release of
that shock as an engram, for there is all manner of
careless chatter  contained  in these  institutional en-
grams, which  may  further inhibit treatment. This is
aside from the fact that any electric shock, anywhere in
the body, has a tendency to derange the engram bank
and bind it so that its incidents are more than usually
snarled.
   For no other reason than the advance of Dianetics,
and the conservation of an auditor's time, it should also
be remarked  that the third-degree methods of some
police departments and general police abuse of crimi-
nals or ordinary citizens may have to be released in a
case before it can be further treated. Prison terms may
contain large despair charges sufficient to derange the
mind  and yet may be hidden by the patient under the
mistaken  idea that the auditor is interested or will be
disappointed in his "character."
   Various other things enter into the engram  bank
which would  not be suspected as obstacles to therapy
unless mentioned. Hypnotism can be extremely aberra-
tive and may hold up a case. An auditor should have
some working knowledge of it so that he can release the
engrams it makes, not so he can work Dianetics. Hyp-
notism is the art of implanting positive suggestions in
the engram bank. Here they may append themselves to
engrams and become locks on those engrams. As most
engram banks  contain a sample of most common
words, hypnotism  is almost certain to be aberrative.
The reduction of analytical power by artificial means
places the subject in an optimum   condition for the
receipt of an engram. The hypnotist uses the forgetter
mechanism  with most  of his suggestions and most
                            531
                     L. RON HUBBARD

people have similar engramic remarks which make it
impossible  for the hypnotist's suggestion to release.
Hypnotism can be considered as a "high-powered" lock
and may  be a serious obstacle in the patient's engram
bank. With  clearing, the suggestions, having no an-
chors of pain below them in engrams, vanish as locks.
But hypnotic suggestions may have to be found and
cleared before a case can proceed. Hypnotism is very
commonly   used in this society and it is very often the
case that, with the forgetter mechanism, the patient is
unable to recall whether he had ever been hypnotized or
not. Return  technique will discover ,„, . Jt ~ater tech-
nique,  making   the  patient return  with  repetition
of hypnotic patter (by the patient) such as "Go to sleep,
go to sleep, go to sleep," can be depended upon to
locate it.
   Not  all hypnotism  is in the parlor. Perverts quite
commonly   use it despite the fact that the "moral"
nature is supposed  to rise in  a hypnotized  subject.
Incidents even with people of repute have been found in
patients when examining their childhood. These inci-
dents were  often entirely occluded  to the patient, so
thoroughly cowing were the commands contained in the
hypnotic suggestion.
   Dianetics and hypnotism can be combined, but so
can  Dianetics and astronomy. The  auditor will find
himself working with hypnotic patients and will have to
be very careful with patter in order to install minimal
words of his own in the engram bank so as not to turn
Dianetics into hypnotism.
   Any benefit derived from hypnotism is in the field of
research or the installation of a temporary manic en-
gram. The latter has far more harm than value. Hyp-
notic anesthetic is vastly overrated. And hypnotism as a
parlor game is a thing which no society should tolerate,
for it may   be  sufficiently destructive to cause  the
                           532
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

engrams  to restimulate to a point of insanity. And the
hypnotist never knows the content of the engram bank.
Any  good hypnotist, if he can conquer his desire to talk,
should make  a good auditor: but if he tries to combine
Dianetics and hypnotism he will find himself with a very
thoroughly  sick patient on  his hands. Never  install a
positive suggestion of any kind in a patient no matter how
much  he may beg for one. It has proven nearly fatal.
   An  entire case can be worked in deep  amnesia
trance. It is often possible to waken a sleeping person
into a deep trance simply by speaking to him quietly
several nights in succession at the same hour and finally
getting him to respond to the invitation to talk. Dianetic
therapy can then be entered upon and pursued and will
succeed  particularly  if the auditor  is not  careless
enough  to artificially restimulate a late physical pain
engram, treating in the postbirth life mainly engrams of
painful emotion. If the person on whom the therapy is
being done is aware of the action, he can be put into
reverie so that earlier data can be reached, "I" being
more  powerful than the weak  if wise attention units
which  constitute basic personality. He  is alternately
worked in amnesia trance and then in reverie. The case
will resolve eventually even if reverie is not used. But
there are grave responsibilities with amnesia trance: a
canceller must always be  installed and used in every
session. Minimal conversation must be employed. All
auditor desires should be stated as questions if possible,
as these are not aberrative to the degree that commands
are. This method has been successful and can be used,
but reverie, even if it appears slower, even if sonic is not
present, is far more satisfactory for the excellent and
incontrovertible97 reason that the patient recovers more
97. incontrovertible: not open to question or dispute; indisput-
able.

                            533
                 L. RON HUBBARD

swiftly and recovers on  a steady upgrade, whereas
amnesia trance may incapacitate him for days together,
when  incidents are apparently lifted in deep trance but
nevertheless "hung up" in the awake  state. Amnesia
trance is definitely not advised: it has been subjected to
much research and has been found to be both uncom-
fortable for the patient and harassing  to the auditor.
However, if other methods cannot  be used for one
reason or another (and none of those reasons include the
desire of the preclear who, if the auditor would let him,
might crave drugs, hypnotism and positive suggestion in
an effort to escape his engrams and who, if allowed,
would have  himself a wonderfully messy case for the
auditor to unsnarl), amnesia trance can be employed,
but always with the greatest caution and always with the
full knowledge that the patient's recovery is retarded by
as much as a factor of three, for working on a level with
the engram bank leaves the analyzer circuits unused in
the discharge. Reverie is best.

       External Problems with Patients
   It may happen that a patient who has made progress
suddenly ceases to make further progress. The answer
may lie elsewhere than therapy. The environment of the
preclear may  be so  intensely restimulative that he is
distracted, always in  restimulation and thus  works
slowly. It may be discovered, in such a case, that the
preclear (as in one case) has made a bargain with a wife
or husband who desires divorce that he or she wait until
the preclear is cleared. Other situations of a life nature
can place an environmental value on not being cleared.
The  auditor has no business with the private lives of his
preclears, but in a case where therapy itself is made
difficult by  existing situations, the auditor,  with  his
time at stake, has every right to discover the reason. All
these reasons will compute into some environmental
                           534
      MECHANISI-.jy  AND  ASPECTS   OF  THERAPY   — PART  TWO

advantage in not being Clear. Removing the preclear
temporarily from his home, for instance, may change
his environment and advance therapy. The auditor has a
right to ask that, Clear or not, the patient resolve the
problem on his own  initiative. It is common with pre-
clears that they do not realize that they are Releases, for
so glittering is the goal of Clear  that they cease  to
compare  themselves to the normal which they have
already overpassed.
   A patient can commonly be expected to introvert98 to
a very marked degree in the course of Dianetic therapy.
As  the case progresses  this introversion reaches an
acute stage about three-quarters or thereabouts through
and thereafter recedes. Ambiversion" is a marked char-
acteristic of the Clear. When   introversion has been
marked, a fairly good gauge of the advance of the case
is in the preclear's interest in exterior things.
   Nearly  all preclears talk a great deal about their
engrams  up to the point when  they are very  solid
Releases. If they don't or won't talk about their en-
grams in common  conversation, the auditor can suspect
something highly protected in the engram bank con-
cerning the necessity to hide something: the auditor can
act accordingly. Although the auditor may  weary of
such conversation, it nevertheless reveals much new
material to him if he observes the phrases which the
preclear uses about engrams.
   It is very, very true that aberration is caused by what
has been done to not what has been done by the patient.
The actions of the patient in dramatizing, in committing
crimes and  so forth are not aberrative to the patient.
Therefore the preclear's activities need be no concern

98. introvert: look in on oneself.
99. ambiversion:  a condition or character trait that includes
elements of both introversion and extroversion.
                           535
                                          L.   RON       HUBBARD

whatever of the auditor's. Whole cases have been com-
pleted without the auditor's knowing what the preclear
did for a living. While  responsibility for his actions is
necessarily demanded of him  by an aberrated society,
antisocial activity is the result of engrams which dictate
it. The patient is not responsible for what he himself
has done. Cleared, the matter is different. A Clear can
be considered entirely responsible for his own actions,
for he  can compute  rationally on the basis of  his
experience. But the aberree has little or no real control
over his actions. Therefore, the auditor should make it
plain that he does not care  what the aberree  who
becomes a preclear has done in life. The problem on
hand between the auditor and the preclear is an engram
bank  which contains, exclusively, what other people
have done in life and what has been done to the preclear
in moments when  he could not protect himself. This
approach  is not only truth, it has a therapeutic value,
for in so explaining himself an auditor can often obtain
cooperation which would otherwise be denied.
   The auditor should never violate the Auditor's Code
with a patient. Extended terms  of therapy inevitably
result from such violations.

                Restimulation
   The mind  is a self-protecting mechanism—but so is
Dianetics. A science of thought which works would so
closely approximate the working principles of the mind
that it would follow in parallels the injunctions100 and
provisos101 of the mind  itself. Such is the case  with
Dianetics: The  mind  is diagnosed by its reaction to
therapy, therapy is improved by the reactions of the

100. injunctions: orders or commands that something must or
must not be done.
101. provisos: stipulations or conditions.
                           536
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

mind  to it. This is a working principle of great value
since it explains much observed phenomena and pre-
dicts most of the remainder. Part of this parallelism is
the self-protection feature.
   It is almost impossible to injure a mind: it is an
extremely tough organism. Of course, when one begins
to hew102 and saw upon it with metal or poison it with
drugs or bacteria or throw its natural armor aside as
with hypnotism, unfortunate things can occur.
   Charlatanism is almost impossible where Dianetics
in any of its principles is being practiced. One either
practices all Dianetics  and  gets results or  practices
himself into a decline: that is a mechanical, scientific
fact. Dianetics, as a self-protecting science, demands
practice by Clears or at least good Releases. A Clear
very closely follows in all his conduct the better aspects
of the Auditor's Code:  his ethical level is very high.
Hence, anyone  starting a practice of Dianetics is going
to find himself, no matter what his original intention,
thrust toward the goal of being a Clear.
   There  is an excellent reason for this. There is a
principle known  as restimulation of the auditor. We
have an understanding now of what makes an engram
come into restimulation. When it comes into restimula-
tion, it forces the pain or the action of the engram into
being in the organism. The observation of some percept
in the environment which  approximates a recording
(sound or sight or organic sensation) in the engram
brings the engram into greater or lesser play. Similarly,
when an auditor is not cleared himself or when he is not
in therapy himself working toward the goal of a Clear,
he  becomes  restimulated. He is, after all, listening
constantly to engramic material in a patient. This en-
gramic  material is the very stuff of which insanity is

102. hew: to chop or cut with an ax or sword, etc.
                           537
                 L. RON HUBBARD

made. Anyone has engrams: sooner or later a patient is
going to start going over an engram of his own which
will approximate the auditor's own engrams. This leads
to great discomfort for the auditor unless the auditor is
in therapy and can have the discomfort so brought forth
released. So long as one is merely working late locks
this is not so much the case and has made it possible for
practitioners and mental healers of the past to escape
much of the penalty of their own aberrations, but when
one deals with the root material of these aberrations, a
constant hammering  by restimulators can bring about
a serious condition. This is the mechanism   which
causes people in asylums103 to fall prey themselves to
psychoses, although one must have had them in the first
place for them to have been restimulated.
   The auditor may run one or two cases without any
serious repercussion: indeed, no matter what the reper-
cussion, it can be eliminated by Dianetics. To save his
own comfort, however, he should himself be cleared or
released as soon as possible. He can work as a Release
without too much trouble, and this makes it possible for
him to make a mutual compact where he is worked on
while he is working  the other. A condition can then
come about where two preclears are each auditors. This
alternation between the couch and  the auditor's chair
will usually work very well.
   Two persons, however, after they have begun work,
may  discover that they are mutually restimulative—
which  is to say each is a pseudoperson in the other's
engrams  or one is restimulated (voice tone, incidents)
by the other. This should be no bar to therapy. It has
been overcome and  therapy has gone forward despite
the most severe restimulative circumstances. A common

103. asylums:  institutions for the maintenance and care of the
mentally ill, orphans or other persons requiring specialized assist-
ance.
                          538
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

avoidance technique on the part of a subject is to claim
the auditor restimulates him: it is not sufficiently im-
portant to stop therapy. It may be, however, that two
people can  enter a third into the chain and, by one
clearing the next, considerably ease the tension. The
triangular work plan, where no person is working on
the person who is working him, is quite successful.
   A husband and wife who  have quarreled long and
often may find it too restimulative to clear each other. It
is possible to do if other arrangements cannot be made
and it is often done: but if therapy does not go well, he
should find a therapy partner and so should she. Moth-
ers who  have attempted abortion on their children or
otherwise maltreated them can accomplish therapy on
those children, but in any case of restimulative circum-
stance such  as this, the greatest precaution must be
taken by the auditor to adhere severely to the Auditor's
Code —to do otherwise might bring much more stress
into therapy than  is necessary. In such  a case, the
mother had better herself have at least a Release accom-
plished upon  her  before she attempts  to clear her
children—and  she should not touch those children until
they are at least eight.
   The subject of auditor-restimulation, where the audi-
tor restimulates the preclear or the preclear restimulates
the auditor, does  not include the routine  aspect of
therapy  that the preclear is always  being artificially
restimulated via standard therapy. An engram can be
restimulated by being touched several times and so it
will lift. The auditor-restimulation problem is a specific
one where the auditor is a pseudoenemy, a similarity to
a person who has harmed the patient. Wild antagonism
on the part of a patient to an auditor is usually traced to
this. Some patients have such a hatred of men that only
women  can work them, some have such a hatred of
women  that only men can work them. But even when
                           539
                 L. RON HUBBARD

there is a wild antipathy, if there exists no other auditor
or person who can be  trained quickly as one, therapy
can proceed anyway and it will accomplish results.

             Rebalancing a Case
   Any  case dropped  out of therapy will rebalance
itself in a few weeks, which is to say, it will settle to a
new high for the individual. Unless drug hypnotism or
some  other Dianetically illegal method is used,  all
cases will so rebalance, much benefited. Restimulations
can be expected to die down if they are due to therapy.
The  patient will gradually find his own level in the
released state. Cases do not have to be carried forward
to Clear if auditor time is short, but it is of course better
if they are and, indeed, the majority of patients will
insist that they be.

         Working Time in Therapy
   The  usual period of a Dianetic treatment is two
hours. In these two hours, with the usual patient, every-
thing is going to be accomplished which can be accom-
plished on that day. Working every day is not necessary,
but working  every two  days or every three days is
desirable. Working with periods  a week  apart is not
optimum, for the case tends to rebalance. Further, there
is a "sag" in a case, usually every fourth day when it is
not worked in periods as short as three days. The fourth
day "sag" is a natural mechanical thing: an engram,
keyed in, when  it is restimulated in life, takes about
four days to cut in sharply. In therapy, three days is
sometimes required to "develop" an engram. This does
not mean  that three days have to elapse before it is
available and it does not mean that work has to stop for
three days, but it does mean that engrams, not being
memories and articulate as such, take three days, some-
times, to come to the surface.
                           540
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

   To be more clear, an engram can be asked for on day
one and will be found on day three. Meanwhile the
auditor is getting other engrams. This process is so
automatic that it requires no attention and will not come
to notice except in cases that are being worked once a
week. The engram  is asked for on day one, is ready to
reduce on day three, sags on day four and is rebalanced
by day seven.
   The  three-day aspect is interesting in another sense.
This time of three days is just an observation of the
average behavior  of preclears. Precision investigation
may  fix it at 2.5 days or 3.6 days (it varies in individ-
uals), but three days is close enough for our purposes.
When  one  is doing just a release on a case, he will
sometimes find that it is necessary to take a late engram
and run it: the physical pain engram of later life (post-
birth) will appear to rise, will remain constant for three
days and then will "sag." When it sags, the auditor will
have to go back to it and run it again. Taking out these
"sags"  will eventually make the later-life engram stay
in a recessed state.
   Euphoria often sets in on a case when the auditor
touches an engram which contains a manic. The patient
will then go around saying how wonderful Dianetics is
because he is now in magnificent condition and is so
happy. Watch out. In three or four days this manic will
have sagged  back  to a depressive state. Be wary  if
somebody experiences one of these skyrocket "recover-
ies" for it is about as permanent as the fire of a burning
match. It goes out and  leaves very cold ashes. The
auditor, seeing this euphoria, had better enter the case
again and reduce the engram  it contains more thor-
oughly or get a more basic engram.
   The length of time it takes to clear a person is quite
variable. By blowing despair charges and working a few
early engrams, an auditor can get a better state of being
                           541
                 L. RON HUBBARD

in the patient than in any past therapy in twenty or thirty
hours: this is a Release. It compares to two or three
years of past therapeutic work. The length of time it
takes to get a Clear cannot be compared to any past
standard because a Clear is something no past standard
ever dreamed about.
   In a sonic case, where recall is in good condition, a
Clear can be obtained in a hundred  hours. In a case
which has thoroughly shut-down recalls, anything can
happen up to, in extremity, a thousand hours. Similarly,
the imaginative case which  has things which  never
happened may be long.
   Look  at it this way: We can get the results of two or
three years of psychoanalysis in a score or two of hours
of Dianetics, and what we accomplish with Dianetics
does not have to be done again, which is not true with
psychoanalysis. This is the Release. He can go about his
business in a far more competent fashion, his emotional
charges being  largely freed. In the Clear we are  at-
tempting and can achieve a supernormal state of mind.
Thousands and thousands and thousands of hours were
spent in the education of a man: the expenditure of two
or even ten thousand hours of work to make him rank
above what would formerly have been possible for him
is work  well spent. But we  do not have to  spend
anything like this amount of time. People have been
cleared in anything from thirty hours, when they had
sonic and little volume, to five hundred hours when
they had shut-down recall plus imaginary recall. What
an auditor can do with his first few cases by way of time
is a question mark. He will get to the Clear eventually
and  certainly in less than twelve hundred hours in a
severe case. All the time he is working toward a Clear
he is achieving a higher and higher Release which, after
at least fifty hours, rises well above the current norm
and keeps right on soaring. Improvement is such that
                           542
     'MECHANISMS  AND  ASPECTS  OF THERAPY  — PART TWO

from week  to week the change is physiologically no-
ticeable and psychologically startling. If one thinks the
reach for Clear is a short jump and a small gain, then he
has no conception of just how high that goal is.
   Most  auditors will try for Release at first and are
wise if they do. When their own case is finally cleared,
only then will they suddenly realize that the state was
worth far more time than was expended to attain.
   It is impossible to forecast, with a new auditor, just
how  much time he will consume in making  errors,
learning his tools, attaining skill. It is therefore impos-
sible to estimate for him how long it will take him to
gain a Clear in a patient. A well-trained auditor never
takes more than eight hundred hours with the worst of
cases: five hundred is high.

              Data from Relatives
   The auditor will always be plagued by the anxiety of
the patient to get data from relatives or friends. The
request for this data itself is restimulative both to the
preclear and the relative. Mothers have been made very
ill by being given the restimulators of their own past
illnesses by the child who has "suddenly found out."
   It is a uniform experience  that the data obtained
from  relatives, parents and friends by the preclear is
absolutely and utterly worthless. Here we are depend-
ing upon an aberree's memory when we have at hand,
with Dianetics, a reliable source of accurate material.
Auditors have had cases progress very smoothly and
then suddenly stop progress: on inquiry it is discovered
that the preclear has been running around to his parents
and  relatives for material and they, wanting nothing
more than that he forget all about what they have done
to him, throw  him  red herrings'04 which have to be
104. red herrings: things intended to divert attention from the
real problem or matter at hand; misleading clues.
                           543
                 L. RON HUBBARD

carefully eliminated. These are the villains of the piece,
the people who  have done the things to the preclear
which made  him  an aberree. If one expects accurate
data from them, one might as well expect the moon to
be green cheese.
   If the auditor wants data from  these people and
requests it, bypassing the preclear, he may get some-
where. But any data so received has a value which, in
intelligence, is used to label "Incompetent Source—
Improbable Material."
   Warn   a preclear not  to bother his relatives and
parents and explain to him that he can make them ill by
asking for data, on  the restimulator principle. If we
want confirmation of the data received, the only way to
get it is put the parent or relative in therapy. At such
time, we shall get the basic dramatization sources: in
the prenatal life and childhood of the parent. This is a
problem of research, not of therapy.
   If the auditor has Mama available, he can run off the
child's birth and then Mama giving birth, keeping the
two apart, and get his check on the accuracy of therapy.
And there are other data that can be so compared, using
proper safeguards.
   The  subjective reality, not the objective reality, is
the important  question to the auditor. First, last and
always, does the patient get well?

              Stopping Therapy
   The woman   scorned has a violent rival in the pre-
clear on whom  therapy has been stopped by the audi-
tor's decision.
   Keeping  the preclear in therapy, no matter how
seldom  are the sessions, satisfies in some measure the
effort his basic personality makes to fight clear of the
aberrations.
   The  basic personality, the file clerk, the core of "I"
                            544
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY — PART Two

which wants to be in command  of the organism, the
most fundamental  desires of the personality, may be
considered synonymous for our purposes. There is an
enormous  surge of this basic self—which is really the
individual himself—to conquer the engrams. The en-
grams, borrowing life from their host, appear as things
which do not want to be conquered. As mechanistic as
all this actually is, the auditor will often find himself
wondering at the resistance the engrams can make and
marveling  at the efforts of  the basic personality to
conquer the engrams. He works with the basic personal-
ity, the individual himself, and ignores the engramic
efforts to interfere. But there is a situation in which the
basic personality seems to give free play to the engrams
in an effort to accomplish therapy.
   In work,  a "patient" might  have been  skeptical,
sarcastic or even vicious to the auditor. Or the patient
may  have been thought to be completely neglectful of
his engram bank. Or the patient may even rage that he
hates therapy. For some of these reasons the auditor may
injudiciously decide to cease working the patient. The
patient is so informed. For a short while, perhaps, the
patient may manifest no reaction, but in a few minutes,
a few hours or a few days, basic personality, denied a
route out, may begin to use every weapon to hand to
compel the auditor to resume therapy.
   Disturbed by cessation of therapy, even though he
may have insisted upon its being stopped, the ex-patient
may  begin either to rapidly decline or to attack, to his
face or behind his back, the auditor and even therapy
itself. The woman scorned has rarely made such thor-
ough upsets as ex-patients who have been refused con-
tinuance of  therapy. Auditors have been  personally
reviled, have had  other preclears searched  out and
undermined  by violent attacks upon therapy itself, have
                            545
                 L. RON HUBBARD

been targeted by all manner of accusations and whis-
pering campaigns and have been made most uncomfort-
able by preclears who have had further therapy denied
to them before a Release had taken place. Even solid,
legitimate Releases, whose psychosomatic ills have dis-
appeared and who  should be quite cheerful, have been
observed to create turbulence when the auditor would
not take them through to Clear. Any number of mecha-
nisms may be used by the ex-patient, as many mecha-
nisms as men use to force other men into action. One of
the mechanisms is a resumption of apathy and a "swift
decline." Another is wild campaigning against therapy.
Another is personal attack of the auditor. Each has, as
its provable intention, the resumption of therapy.
   The mind knows how the mind works. And the mind
which has tasted a way out of pain and unhappiness may
be expected, if that way is blocked, to use all methods
to cause therapy to be resumed.
   No  matter how  thoroughly  disagreeable the ex-
patient has been, the moment the auditor starts therapy
upon  him again, the attitude alters. No further destruc-
tive efforts are made against the auditor or therapy but
all is almost as well as it was before the cessation was
declared.
   Do not suppose, however, that the preclear, if he has
been  neglectful, recalcitrant105 or generally uncoopera-
tive before, will now embrace therapy as a chastened106
patient. Far from the case, he is now at least as difficult
to work as he was before plus some additional antago-
nism engendered107 by the cessation order.
   In such a case the auditor is damned if he does and

 105. recalcitrant: disobedient, resisting authority or discipline.
106. chastened: restrained; subdued.
107. engendered: brought  into being; brought about; caused;
produced.
                           546
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

double-damned if he doesn't. But there is a way out of
this. The phenomenon  of "transference," where the
patient simply transfers his griefs to the practitioner, is
not the mechanism   here at work;  transference is a
different thing, bred  of a  thirst for attention and a
feeling of needed support in the world. Transference
can be expected  to keep up forever if permitted; the
patient of a doctor, for instance, may go on and on
having illnesses just to keep the doctor around. Trans-
ference may occur in Dianetic therapy, the patient may
lean on the auditor solidly, beg the auditor for advice,
appear to hold out engrams in an effort to keep the
auditor working hard  and available and interested; all
this is the result of a sympathy computation and is
aberrated conduct.  The  clever auditor will not give
advice or attempt to run anyone's  life, for a person
works  well only as a  self-determined organism. In
Dianetic therapy, no matter  what the attitude of the
patient, no matter how great his "desires to be ill" or
his transference of burden, no matter about even his
vicious remarks  to the auditor during  sessions, the
condition cannot  obtain forever. Basic personality is
trying to get through; "I"  is trying to integrate self.
Even  indifferent work will eventually release enough
charge from a case and reduce enough engrams to bring
a higher stability to the patient. Basic personality gets
stronger and stronger and  therefore more self-reliant.
The introversion occasioned by continual effort to reach
the interior world of the engram bank deintensifies and
extroversion comes more and more  into being as the
case advances. The  way  out is to work  the patient
smoothly and well and one day he will be well released
or Clear. But meanwhile, if you stop therapy on anyone,
don't be surprised at anything that happens; you can
only remedy it by resuming the case.
                           547
                 L. RON HUBBARD

             Auditor Evaluation
   The auditor must do much evaluation to himself. He
does not evaluate or force upon his preclear any compu-
tation. If the preclear computes that this was what was
making  him  ill, then this is what the auditor accepts.
Explaining to the preclear what it was in the engram
which affected him so and so is not only a waste of time
but also makes the preclear confused. The reason an
auditor evaluates is to make sure he is not accepting
imagined data or incomplete data as engrams.
   An  incident will not  lift unless the data in it is
correct: this is automatic. Change just one syllable in
the incident and it will stick. Or, if it seems to go away,
it will be back. So there is no fear that any incident
which decreases with recounting is incorrect. The data
in it must be more or less correct or it would not so
reduce. Thus the auditor who challenges incidents, data
or otherwise plays god is going to have a thoroughly
fouled-up case on his hands before he goes  very far,
and he is going to have a subject who is not progress-
ing. If the subject begins to run an engram  where
Mama  is having intercourse with five Eskimos, let him
run it and never, never, never, never tell him that you
feel it was untrue. If you tell the subject you think he is
imagining things, you may give him a serious setback.
Tell him you think Mama had her reasons; and you have
sided with the opposition: You  are not attacking the
engram, you are helping Mama attack the subject. To
criticize, correct or otherwise judge the preclear has no
slightest part in Dianetics and will do more to slow up a
case than  any other single action. An  auditor who
challenges the material given him  may  be practicing
witchcraft or Chinese acupuncture10' or shamanism or
108. acupuncture: Chinese practice of pricking the tissues of the
body with fine needles to relieve pain or as a local anesthetic.
                          548
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

voodoo,109 but he is not practicing Dianetics. And he
will not get results. One remark to the subject such as,
"I think that you are mistaken in believing your mother
would try to abort you," or "I feel that you are imagin-
ing it," may set your preclear back  fifty hours. The
auditor does not criticize or judge the preclear, nor does
he evaluate for the preclear that person's material.
   Auditing  is all done privately and to oneself. If the
patient has just recounted his fifth prenatal train wreck,
you may be sure you have run into a lie factory in some
engram. The wrong  way to go about correcting this is
communicating  it to the preclear. The right way to go
about it is to find the lie factory, an engram containing
such a remark as, "Tell me anything! Tell me anything.
1 don't care so long as you say something. But for God's
sakes don't tell me the truth, I can't stand it!" Or,
"You can't tell him the truth. It would hurt too much."
There are a thousand forms of lie factory. And they are
not too uncommon.
   Never  tell the preclear why you  are looking for
anything. If you  say you  want  a lie factory, the lie
factory will make up a lie factory. If you say you want
an emotional charge, you will inhibit any emotional
charge from discharging. Simply make a quiet estimate
of the situation, reduce everything which seems valid
and keep on trying to get the reason why the case is not
functioning as well as possible.
   The  test for validity of an engram is not plot. Plot is
worthless. Engrams  are just collections of remarks
contained in periods of "unconsciousness." It makes no
difference whatever whether these remarks agree with
the way the auditor thinks a life should be run or the
109. voodoo: a form of religion based on belief in witchcraft and
magical rites, practiced by some people in the West Indies and
America.
                           549
                 L. RON HUBBARD

way  a preclear should look up to his parents. Plot is
something writers put in stories. Auditors have nothing
to do  with it. An engram   is basically illogical and
irrational; don't try to read rationality into one! If the
parents were known to be fine, upstanding members of
the community and the engrams seem to indicate that
Mama   nightly played the prostitute, accept the en-
grams.
   Validity is very simply established. Ask these ques-
tions of the engram:
   1. Does it have a somatic?
   2. Does  the somatic  undulate, which is to say,
      undergo a running change?
   3.  Does it reduce? (If it does not, the content the
      preclear is running is wrong or the engram is
       way up the chain and has others before it.)
   4. Does  the engramic content agree with the pa-
       tient's aberration?
   5. Does  the somatic agree with psychosomatic ills
      the patient is known to have had?
   6.  Does  it bring relief to the patient? And this last
       is more important than all the rest.
   Because  mental healers of the past have grandly
said, "Oh, this does not fit with my idea of how life is
run" is no reason an auditor should run Dianetics off
the rails. Mental  healers of  yesteryear did  not get
results. Dianetics gets results: and one  of the most
important reasons why Dianetics gets results is that it is
not trying to warp life to fit Dianetics but is applying
Dianetics to life. Many new  and startling things will
come  to the notice of the auditor. His motto, as seen on
an ancient English crest where a ninety-foot raven stood
upon a castle, could read, "Be surprised at nothing."
   The  Kinsey  report did not begin to tell the story
you, as an auditor, will get in Dianetics. Because the
mother, by herself, is neither the face she showed Junior
                          550
    MECHANISMS AND ASPECTS OF THERAPY—PART Two

nor the face she showed society, and because Mother
and Father, by themselves, do not conduct themselves as
they might  be supposed  to have done  in society is
insufficient reason to force a preclear to go on being an
aberree.
   Continually in the psychiatric texts we come upon
patients who  tried to tell psychiatrists about prenatal
life and who were told, with droll"0 solemnity that the
incidents were imaginary. Patients who had been given
up on  all fronts by all existing schools because their
data was not tailored to fit the belief of those schools
have recovered fully and achieved optimum mental con-
dition, well above that of their former mentors, with
Dianetics, partially because Dianetics does not set itself
above the facts of life. He not only requires the patient
to face reality by running the engrams  but he  also
requires himself to face reality by accepting the fact that
whatever the content, if it fits any of the above condi-
tions listed, it is valid in therapy.
   Auditing means to listen; it also means to compute.
Computing  on a case consists of establishing where the
patient departs from optimum rationality in his conduct
of life but, more important, where physically painful
and painful emotion engrams exist and how they can be
approached and reduced.
   Patients discover some astonishing things about their
parents and relatives when they are in therapy. Often
they discover, like one patient who had believed he had
daily been  beaten by  his father that life was actually
much better than it had seemed.
   Premarital conception cases are very common, with
the patient yet unborn discovering himself at his par-
ents' wedding. And  these cases are often very difficult
to resolve since they contain so much secrecy in their
engrams.

110. droll: amusing in an odd or ironic way.
                            551
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   The  lie factory mechanisms will often try to give
Mama  extra lovers and try to make Papa into a raving
beast, but  a lie factory  is very  easy to  detect: the
incidents brought forth do not run like engrams: the
second time over their content is widely changed, they
do not have somatics and their content is not aberrative.
   In short, the test is whether or not one has an actual
engram, not whether or not the engram makes sense.
For Father could well have  been a raving beast in a
boudoir1" and Mother could well have had coitus with
the boarders: and Father could well have been a tame
lamb for all the reputation Mother gave him postbirth
and Mother  could well have been a frigid prude despite
the wild tales the preclear might have heard. The truth
will come out in the reduction but its truth is no concern
of the auditor's beyond getting up engrams.
   First, last and always, get engrams, get them as
early as possible for pain, later for emotion, get them,
erase them, discharge them, clear them! That they did
not compute as true data was what drove the aberree
into being an aberree. Leave plot to writers: our task is
therapy.
   But don't "buy garbage": ask for the somatic, see if
it varies as  the preclear  utters the words.  Test  for
engrams. And devil take the plot.
 111. boudoir: a woman's bedroom, dressing room or private
sitting room.

                           552
                     CHAPTER TEN
 Dianetics—Past and Future
           The  History of Dianetics
   The  history of Dianetics would be the history of a
voyage  of discovery, of an exploration into new and
nearly uncharted1 realms, terra incognita, the human
mind, a land which lies an inch behind your forehead.
   The voyage has taken many years and the labor has
been long, but we have charts now and can go and
return at will.
   Observations  of savage and  civilized races in this
and far climes2 formed the foundation for the anthropo-
logical3 research: the writings of a few men in the last
four thousand years formed  the scholarly pilots. The
ancient Hindu writings, the work of the early Greeks
and Romans  including Lucretius, the labors of Francis
Bacon, the researches of Darwin and  some of the
thoughts of Herbert Spencer compose the bulk of the
philosophic background. Inevitable absorption from our
current culture provided much unnoticed information.
The remainder has been what the navigator calls, "off
the chart."
   In 1935 some of the basic research was begun: in
1938 the primary axioms were discovered and formulated.
1. uncharted: not shown  or located on a map; unexplored;
unknown.
2. climes: regions or realms, especially with reference to their
climates.
3. anthropological: pertaining to anthropology, the science that
deals with the origins, physical and cultural development, biolog-
ical characteristics, and social customs and beliefs of human-
kind.

                            553
                 L. RON HUBBARD

For the next several years these axioms were tested in
the laboratory of the world. The war  interrupted the
work, as wars  will, being chaos, but shortly after the
cessation of actual hostilities, research was renewed.
Within a year the fundamentals of this science as they
applied to the human mind had been integrated. They
were tested on a long series of random patients and each
test further refined the  work,  but each  application
brought specific results.
   Five years after the initial resumption of labor, in
1950,  the work  was  prepared  for release, all tests
having brought forth the conclusion that Dianetics is a
science of mind, that it does disclose hitherto unknown
laws about thought and that it has worked on every type
of inorganic mental and organic psychosomatic illness.
Further, in the refinement of form  attained, it was
proven possible for the work to be used easily by people
not lengthily trained.
   The goal we have here reached is a science which is
workable and which  can be worked  with success by
briefly taught individuals. This goal has not hitherto
been attained or even approached.
   Once one has gained a foothold on unknown lands,
more things become known to him and with each new
datum  his horizon further widens, including broader
bodies of knowledge. Dianetics cures, and cures with-
out failure. And there are further goals.
   Education, medicine, politics and art and, indeed,
all branches of human thought, are clarified with Dia-
netics. And even so that is not enough.
   Dianetics  has, as yet, a brief history: it has a strong
youth: it forecasts a better tomorrow. Before it is much
older it will have included even more within its scope.
The history of Dianetics is scarce begun.
   Plan  A  included the perfection of the science, its
                           554
             DIANETICS—PAST AND FUTURE

testing on patients of all kinds and, finally, the dissemi-
nation of Dianetics as pertaining to therapy. That plan
ends with the release of this book.
   Plan  B includes a further research into life force, an
attempt at resolution of some of the ills not yet em-
braced such as cancer and diabetes, and the perfection
of techniques discovered and their dissemination. That
will end Plan B.
   Plan  C includes an effort to discover a higher ech-
elon of universal origin and destination, if the problem
is one of origin and  destination, and the factors and
forces involved to the end of securing a better under-
standing and  useful application of the knowledge so
gained, if gained, and if so gained, its dissemination.
   A  portion of Plan B is the organization of a founda-
tion so that the research can be more swiftly accom-
plished.
   The history of Dianetics has just begun. What other
things begin with the origin of a science of mind only
tomorrow can tell.

               Judiciary Dianetics
   This brief summary   of Judiciary Dianetics is in-
cluded in this present work as an aid to the auditor.
   Judiciary Dianetics covers the field of adjudication4
within the society and amongst the societies of man. Of
necessity it embraces jurisprudence5 and its codes and
establishes precision definitions and equations for the
establishment of equity. It is the science of judgment.
   Jurisprudence and  its adjudications are constructed
on the cornerstones of right and wrong, good and evil.
Definition of these is inherent in Dianetics: by these

4. adjudication: (law) the act of a court in making an order,
judgment or decree.
5. jurisprudence: the study of law or of a particular part of law.
                            555
                 L. RON HUBBARD

definitions a correct solution can be reached with re-
gard to any action or actions of man.
   The  fundamental test of rationality is the ability to
differentiate right from wrong. The fundamental factors
in establishing censure are good  and  evil. Without
precision definition of these four factors any structure
of law or judgment is rendered forceless and becomes
involved through  its introduction of arbitrary factors
which seek to adjudicate by introducing errors to nullify
errors. Penal codes which will answer all needs can
only  be written when  precision, scientific definitions
exist for the four factors, and civil equity which will not
lead  to injustice can only  then be  established and
formulated.
   The  problems of jurisprudence and, indeed, all
judgment, are inextricably interwoven with the prob-
lems of behavior.
   An  ideal society would be a society of unaberrated
persons, Clears, conducting their lives within an unab-
errated culture: for either the person or the culture may
be aberrated. The  aberrations of the culture enter into
the equations of conduct as irrational factors both from
the door of education and of social customs and juris-
prudence. It is not enough that an individual be himself
unaberrated, for he discovers himself within the con-
fines of a society which  itself has compounded its
culture into many unreasonable prejudices and customs.
   The establishment of actual source for wrong and
evil is a fundamental problem of all jurisprudence. The
actual source unfortunately  lies in the irrationalities of
those in past generations who, working  with limited
knowledge  and  oppressed by their environs, sought
solutions with equations  which  contained false and
indefinite factors. These generations, long entombed,
cannot be  brought to bar.6 We are the heirs to all the

6. brought to bar: held accountable.
                           556
             DIANETICS—PAST AND FUTURE

ages of the past and that is good: but we are heirs as
well to all the irrationalities of the past and that is evil.
Under such circumstances and in the absence of broad
reason, adjudication by the auditor of the preclear as
relates to evil or wrong actions cannot be performed
with accuracy. The criminal and the insane, the hypo-
chondriac  and the  wife-beater, the merciless dictator
who seeks to shake the world and the street cleaner who
only sits and weeps  are all, each one, gripped and
driven by their own sources of unreason, by the world
which has entered into the hidden depths of their pain-
wracked minds and which, in the form of social aberra-
tion, pounds against them from without.
   The  auditor is interested in what has been done to,
not done  by his patient; for whatever the patient has
done is forever beyond recall and was not the source but
was only the manifestation of his griefs.
   Given  a society of  unaberrated persons, given  a
culture from which has been deleted all unreason, then
and only then can man be truly responsible for his acts,
then and only then. But we must take the shadow of the
responsibility now for the fact of it. A man does not
have to surrender to his engrams.
   Perhaps at some  distant date only the unaberrated
person will be granted civil rights before law. Perhaps
the goal will be reached at some future time when only
the unaberrated person can attain to and benefit from
citizenship. These are desirable goals and would pro-
duce  a marked  increase  in the survival ability and
happiness of man.
   Even  now the codes of jurisprudence can be re-
formed and it can be ascertained with precision whether
the act which brought the individual before law was an
aberrated act, or stemmed from  an aberration of cul-
ture, or was an act which was committed to the detri-
ment  of another or of society. Surely the process of
                           557
                 L. RON HUBBARD

punishment can be refined so as to sentence the individ-
ual not to further aberration as a prisoner or a ruined
man  but to a higher plane of reason through the deletion
of the aberration.
   The past acts of an individual who has been cleared
should be stricken from his record even as his illnesses
have been, for with the cause removed there can be no
point in retribution unless society itself is so aberrated
that it desires to operate on sadistic principles.* There
is more than idealism here, for it can be shown that
aberration in individuals and the society rises in pro-
gressive ratio to the amount of punishment employed.
   Efforts to resolve problems of jurisprudence which
yet did not embrace precision definitions for right and
wrong, good  and evil, had recourse only to a principle
known  in Dianetics as the introduction of an arbitrary.
Broad, unchangeable rules were thrust into problems in
an effort to resolve them and yet each new rule further
drove reason aside so that more rules were needed. An
arbitrary structure is one in which one error has been
observed and an effort has been made to correct it by
introducing another error. In progressive complexity,
new  errors must be introduced to nullify the evil effects
of old  errors. A culture, to say  nothing of jurispru-
dence, grows complex and unwieldy in progressive ratio
to the number of new evils it must introduce in an effort
to nullify old evils. At last there can be no reason; there
can be but force and where there lives no reason and yet
lives force, there is naught but the maelstrom of an
insane rage. Where  there dwells an insane rage, still
* Our  present society is not aberrated in this respect: the
insane  man  is not held guilty or responsible for his acts.
Lacking  definition of a precise scientific nature for insanity
and failing to recognize that all irrational acts are temporary
insanity, -the society has not  been  able to  carry out  its
fundamental intention. —LRH
                           558
             DIANETICS — PAST AND FUTURE

unresolved, there must at length come  apathy; and
apathy, dwindling down, inevitably reaches death.
   We  are here at a bridge between one state of man
and a next. We are above the chasm which  divides a
lower from a higher plateau and this chasm marks an
artificial evolutionary step in the progress of man.
   The auditor is at that bridge; when cleared he will be
at its higher end. He will watch much traffic cross. He
may  see  customs, laws, organizations and societies
attempt to avoid the bridge but, being swept along,
tumble into a nothingness below.
   In his attitude toward his preclears or toward society
at large, he can gain nothing by  reprimanding and
judging past error in the light of current sentience. Not
only can he gain nothing but he can inhibit progress. It
is a remorseless fact that the attack upon unreason has
begun. Attack unreason, not the society or the man.

             Dianetics and War
   The  social organisms which we call states and na-
tions behave and react in every respect as though they
were individual organisms. The culture has its analyti-
cal mind,  the combined  sentience of its citizens in
general and  its artists, scientists and statesmen in par-
ticular. The social standard memory bank is the data
accumulated along the generations. And the social or-
ganism  has as well its reactive mind as represented by
the prejudices and  irrationalities of the entire group.
This  reactive mind is served by  an engram  bank
wherein lie past painful experiences and which dictates
reactive action on certain subjects whenever those sub-
jects are  restimulated in  the society. This,  all too
briefly, is an analogy used in Political Dianetics.
   The social organism behaves in a manner which can
be  graphed  on the  Tone  Scale; it has its survival
dynamic  and  its suppressors, its internal suppression
                           559
                 L. RON HUBBARD

due to engrams  and  its urge toward an infinity of
optimum  duration. Criminals, traitors and zealots con-
stitute, for instance, internal engrams which suppress
the survival potential on the Tone Scale.
   There  is a precision definition for each social level
as related to the Tone Scale. A free society working in
complete cooperation toward common goals would be a
tone 4 society. A society hindered  by arbitrary restric-
tions and oppressive laws would be a tone 2 society. A
society managed and dictated to by the whims of one
man  or a few men would be a tone 1 society. A society
governed by the mystery and superstition of some mys-
tic body would  be a tone 0 society. The potential of
survival in each case can be seen anywhere in history.
Any  golden  age is a  tone 4. Oppressive  practices,
individual greeds and miscalculation in general reduce
the society by introducing into it dissatisfied elements.
To cope with these, in the past, further oppression has
been used. The survival of the society reduced further.
With more oppression came new engrams and so down
the Tone Scale slipped the chances of long survival.
And  with this reduction of potential came pain as the
lower zones were entered.
   Societies rise and fall on the Tone Scale. But there is
a danger point below which a society cannot go without
reacting as would  an  individual so suppressed: the
society reaches a break point and goes mad. This point
is around 2.0.
   The  quarrel  of society with  society, nation with
nation, has many  causes, all of them more  or less
irrational. There have been many times when one soci-
ety was forced to crush another less sentient than itself.
But with each clash, new engrams were born both in the
international scene and within the societies themselves.
   War  is an international tone 1. It is no more rational
than  any individual who,  reaching a  general and
                           560
             DIANETICS — PAST AND FUTURE

chronic tone 1, is placed in an institution or, tempo-
rarily tone 1, commits some crime and  is thereafter
imprisoned. But there is no gaoler7 to societies; there is
at this time only death and so they die and so they have
died.
   Before this time no tool could be employed by a
nation but force when faced with another nation gone
mad.  By  contagion of aberration, both nations then
went mad.  No nation ever fully won a war. No nation
ever finally triumphed by force of arms. No nation ever
averted war by posing threat or exhibiting defense.
   Man  is now faced, by these pyramiding8 hatreds,
with weapons so powerful that man himself may vanish
from the Earth. There is no problem in the control of
these weapons. They explode when and where  man
tells them to explode. The problem is in the control of
man.
   There  is no national problem in the world today
which  cannot be resolved by reason alone. All factors
inhibiting a solution of the problem of war and weapons
are arbitrary factors and have no more validity than the
justified explanations of a thief or murderer.
   The farmer of Iowa9 has no quarrel with the store-
keeper of Stalingrad.10 Those who  say such quarrels
exist lie.
   There are no international concerns which cannot be
resolved by peaceable means, not in the terms of supra-
national" government, but in the terms of reason.

7. gaoler: jailer.
8. pyramiding: increasing rapidly and on a widening base.
9. Iowa: a north central state of the US; its chief products are
agricultural.
10. Stalingrad: former name of Volgograd, a city on the Volga
River in the Soviet Union.
11. supranational: of, for, involving or over all or a number of
nations.
                           561
                           L. RON HUBBARD

*•            Jockeying12 with  indefinable ideologies,'3 playing
           with mass  ignorance, nonexistent entities like night-
          mares march the world in the form of the gods of Ism.'4
             No  self-interest can be so great as to demand the
         slaughter of mankind. He who would demand  it, he
          who  would  not by every rational means avert it, is
           insane. There is no justification for war.
             Behind  the curtains of language and different cus-
          toms, populaces are taught to recognize no kinship with
          other populaces. Taught by their own terrors and gov-
          erned by their own aberrations, leaders hold up other
          isms as detestable things.
              There is no perfect political state on Earth today,
           there is not even a good definition of a perfect political
          creed. States are the victims of internal and external
           aberrations.
 '            Dianetics addresses war because there is in fact a
         race between the science of mind and the atom bomb.
          There may be no future generation to know which won.
             Rationality alone can guide man past these threats to
           his extinction.
             Insanity does not exist without a confusion of defi-
          nitions and purpose. The  solution to the international
          problem does not lie in the regulation or curtailment of
          weapons  nor yet in the restraints of men. It lies in the
          definition of political theory and policy in such terms
 ,        that there can be no mistaking  the clear processes; it
          lies in the establishment of rational goals toward which

            12. jockeying: playing tricks with; managing or manipulating in
             a tricky way.
            13. ideologies: systematic schemes of ideas, usually relating to
            politics or society or to the conduct of a class or group, and
             regarded  as justifying actions, especially those that are held
            implicitly or adopted as a whole and maintained regardless of the
             course of events.
            14. Ism: a doctrine, theory, system, etc., especially one whose
           name ends in -ism.
                                      562
             DIANETICS—PAST AND FUTURE

societies can collectively and individually work; and it
lies in an intersocial competition of gains so great that
none become dispensable to any other.
   Man's primary fight is not with man—that is insan-
ity. Man's primary fight is with those elements which
oppress him as a species and bar his thrust toward high
goals. Man's fight is with the elements, with space and
time, and with species which are destructive to him. He
has hardly begun his conquest. He is just now armed
with tools enough and science enough to make good his
conquest of the universe. He has no time to bicker and
indulge in tantrums and yah-yah15 across back fences
about atom bombs.
   The harnessing of atomic power puts other worlds
within his reach. Why   haggle for this one? The  late
discoveries in the field of photosynthesis  bid  fair16 to
feed and clothe him royally even though he number a
thousand times his present two billions on Earth. For
what reason can he quarrel? Why?
   Two  rational men will enter into a contest of gain
and worth  and production. Are these mighty nations,
these powerful, fearful, thundering "giants," actually
small and  poorly  educated, barely sane little boys
screaming insults at each other over the possession of a
dead cat? What of armies? Armies die. If might makes
right, then Rome still rules the world. Who fears now
this archaeological" curiosity that was Rome?
   There  is a higher goal, a better goal, a more glori-
ous  victory than gutted towns and  radiation-burned
dead. There is freedom and happiness and plenty and a
whole universe to be won.

15. yah-yah: slang term for bickering.
16. bid fair: seem likely (to be or do something).
17. archaeological: of archaeology, the scientific study of the life
and culture of ancient peoples, as by digging up the remains of
ancient cities, etc.
                           563
                 L. RON HUBBARD

   He who  would not see it is far from worthy to rule.
He who  would indulge his hates is too insane to advise.
   How  much can man conquer? He loses if he con-
quers man. He wins if he conquers his own fears and
conquers then the stars.
   Attack the natural enemies of man,  attack them
well, and war of man with man cannot thereafter be a
problem. This is rationality.
   Dianetics is not interested in saving the world, it is
interested only in preventing  the world  from  being
saved. One more time would be fatal! Dianetics is not
against fighting; it defines what may be fought. Those
things include the sources of man's travail within the
individual, within the society and the enemies of all
mankind. Man,  bewildered, has not known his ene-
mies. They are visible now; attack!

           The Future of Therapy
   In twenty or a hundred years the therapeutic tech-
nique which is offered in this volume will appear to be
obsolete. Should this not prove to be the case, then the
author's faith in the inventiveness of his fellow man will
not have been justified. We have here something which
has not before existed, an invariably working science of
mind. The application methods cannot but be refined.
   All sciences begin with  the discovery of basic axi-
oms. They progress as new data are discovered and as
the scope of the science is widened. Various tools and
techniques rise up continually, improved and  reim-
proved. The  basic  axioms, the initial discoveries of
Dianetics, are such solid scientific truths that they will
be  altered but little. The data  discovered  by those
axioms is already large and daily expanding. The tech-
niques of using that data as represented in this volume
will, before much more time elapses, be modified and
improved. Their virtue just now is that these techniques
                           564
             DIANETICS — PAST AND FUTURE

work and produce  good, solid, scientific results.
   Once upon a time somebody set up the basic princi-
ples which had  to do with fire. There had not been
controlled fire before. Cooking,  heating and  finally
metallurgy18 made a new  culture. The basic principles
of fire are not much altered. The techniques employed
in handling fire soon after it was discovered by man
would be considered somewhat obsolete to us now. We
have matches and lighters and fuels today, but just after
fire was understood and began to be used, the bow-drill
fire-maker19 and flint20 and steel would have been con
sidered marvelous inventions: even so, man was already
using fire and had been using it with profit for some
time both as a weapon and as a household utility when
the bow-drill and flint and steel were  discovered or
invented.
   In the case of the wheel, basic principles were iaid
down  which  have  not altered to this day. The first
workable wheel must  have be *A :• rather unwieldy af-
fair. But compared to no wheel u was a miracle.
   Thus  with Dianetic therapy. The  basic principles,
axioms  and general discoveries K Dianetic?; form HP,
organization not before possessed by man. Not unlike
the first fires and the first wheels, the therapy technique
can be enormously improved. It works now; it can be
used now  with safety and effectiveness.
   There  are two definite drawbacks to this present

18. metallurgy:  the scientific study of the properties of metals
and alloys, the art of working metals or of extracting them from
their ores.
19. bow-drill fire-maker: an ancient device for making fire by
friction. It consisted of a stick resting in a hollow in a piece of
wood  which was given a sawlike motion by a loop in a little bow,
producing glowing wood dust.
20. flint: a fine-grained, very  hard  rock, usually  gray, that
produces  sparks when  struck with steel, and that breaks into
pieces with sharp cutting edges.
                            565
                         L. RON HUBBARD

         technique. It demands more skill of the auditor than
         should be necessary and it is not as swift as it could be.
         The auditor should not be required to do any computing
         whatever and, indeed, a therapy technique could be
         envisioned where no auditor at all was necessary, for he
         is vital at the present time. A complete Clear should
         take but a handful of hours. The problems here are
         those of improvement in terms of less skill required and
         less work.
            One  might say that it is an imposition21 upon a
         mathematician and  philosopher to require him to re-
         solve all the problems  himself and to put  forth all
         improvements. Indeed, it is an imposition that he be
         required to develop any technique of application at all,
         for there should be in any society an apportionment of
         labor.
           When  the basic axioms and computations were fin-
         ished, it was impossible to release them for there were
         none to whom   such research could be  released for
         application. Thus the work had to be carried out to its
         furthest extent of not only  experimentation but the
         development and proof of the techniques of application.
            One might here use an analogy of bridge engineer-
         ing. Let us suppose that two plateaus exist, one higher
         than the other, with a canyon between them. An engi-
          neer sees that if the canyon could be crossed by traffic,
|        the hitherto unused higher plateau, being much more
it       fertile and pleasant, would become the scene of a new
 i        culture. He sets himself the task of building a bridge. It
|        had been supposed that no bridge could be built across
is       the canyon and indeed, since those on the lower plateau
|         could not see  the higher level, the existence of the
If        higher plateau itself was denied. The engineer, by evolv-
i         ing new  principles of bridge building  and discovering

;|J        21. imposition: a burden imposed unfairly.
I                                     566
             DIANETICS — PAST AND FUTURE

new  significance in his materials, manages to throw a
bridge across the canyon. He himself crosses and he
inspects the  plateau carefully; others cross  over his
bridge and examine  the new  terrain with delight. Still
more  and more  cross the bridge. The bridge is solid
and, if not wide, can yet safely be negotiated. It has not
been  built for heavy, fast traffic. But it contains the
basic principles and axioms by which the canyon can be
spanned again and again. Many  people begin to ap-
proach the canyon and look up.
   What  sort of an opinion would you have of the
society on the lower plateau if they but moaned and
wept and argued and gave no hand at all in the matter of
widening the bridge or making new bridges?
   In this handbook we have the basic axioms and a
therapy which works.
   For God's sake, get busy and build a better bridge!
                           567

                        APPENDIX
   Dianetics: The Bridge
          to Clear
   It all began with one man and his book—one which,
year  after year, continues to prove its extraordinary
importance to man and society.
   In the opening pages of Dianetics, L. Ron Hubbard
unveiled his breakthroughs, not with superfluous fan-
fare, but with this clear and  simple challenge to his
reader: "You are beginning an adventure. Treat it as an
adventure. And may you never be the same again."
   He closed, not with a customary "The End," but by
issuing yet another challenge: to "get busy," apply the
basic axioms of Dianetics by which the canyon of human
 travail can be spanned, "and build a better bridge!"
    Both in terms of practicality and popularity, no other
book has created the impact Dianetics has.
    Forty-plus years and more than fifteen million copies
sold since its release in May of 1950, Dianetics' enor-
mous  and ever-growing readership continues to astonish
even  the most unflappable of publishing industry ob-
servers and  the most skeptical of book critics. It is the
only  self-improvement book  in publishing history to
 consistently reign at the top of bestseller lists interna-
tionally almost a half-century  after its initial publica-
 tion. (Even the feat of rocketing to the top of bestseller
 lists when it was first released is eclipsed by the amaz-
 ing fact that Dianetics today sells more copies in one
month  than it did in all of 1950.)
    But to millions of readers whose lives have been im-
proved  through the practical wisdom embodied  in this
 book, there could be no lesser course for Mr. Hubbard's
                          569
   DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH

work. Throughout  the world people are achieving greater
self-respect and a  more  positive attitude by reading
Dianetics and  applying its techniques. They are daily
gaining  the self-esteem, confidence, trust and belief in
themselves that comes with moving toward the state of
Clear.
   Through  Dianetics auditing, the goal of Clear has
been achieved by tens of thousands of people. You will
find Clears literally everywhere these days. They  are
teachers, businessmen, doctors, housewives, attorneys,
engineers, nurses, construction workers, celebrities, mili-
tary personnel, marketing and administration person-
nel,  secretaries, athletes, civil servants, etc. Clearing
knows  no  social caste, income class, race, color or
creed.
   Dianetics' unparalleled emergence began a year be-
fore the book's release with Mr. Hubbard's manuscript,
 "The Original Thesis" (today entitled The Dynamics of
Life). This was a compilation of his sixteen-year study
of the human condition. He gave a few copies to friends,
and  they promptly made duplicates and sent it to their
friends who,  in turn, copied it and sent it to others.
Passed hand  to hand, the basic breakthroughs of Dia-
netics quickly became  known  the world over. Word
began  to spread: the source of human aberration had
been  discovered and  a technology of the  mind  that
worked had been developed.
    The first published  article on  Dianetics, entitled
 "Terra Incognita: The Human Mind," appeared in the
 Winter/Spring 1949-1950 issue of the Explorers Club
Journal.  While also  writing essays on  Dianetics for
other publications, Mr. Hubbard soon found his time
consumed  with letters to answer and a steadily increas-
ing flow of requests for more information flooding his
office and home.
                            570
            DIANETICS: THE BRIDGE TO CLEAR

   The response validated what he had long recognized:
for eons man has possessed the most sophisticated com-
puter in existence—the human mind—yet man's concept
of it was barbaric. Never before had a popular text on
the mind been written for the people. No owner's man-
ual existed to unleash the mind's true power and ca-
pability.
    Thus his decision: he would write, for broad public
consumption,  a book detailing his discoveries and the
technology he  had developed.  With the release of his
book, Dianetics, every man and woman  would soon
have such an owner's manual for their personal use.
   In January  1950, renowned syndicated columnist
Walter Winchell heralded what was to become known
simply as "The Book": "There is something new coming
up  in April called Dianetics," he wrote. "A new science
which  works with the invariability of physical science in
the field of the human mind. From all indications, it will
prove to be as revolutionary for humanity as the first
cave man's  discovery and utilization of fire."
    Winchell's prescience was undeniable. The world's
response to the May 9 Dianetics release was both instan-
taneous and overwhelming. Overnight the book became
a  nationwide bestseller, with twenty-five thousand let-
ters and telegrams of congratulations pouring in to the
publisher. The book hit the New York Times bestseller
 list where it remained week after week, month after
month.
   By  late fall of 1950, there were 750 groups across
 the country applying Dianetics techniques, while news-
paper headlines proclaimed, "Dianetics Taking US by
Storm," and "Fastest Growing Movement in America."
    Then, more increasingly came headlines reporting,
 "Husbands Are  Auditing Their Wives; Neighbors Form
Discussion  Groups"  and   "Dianetics Fans  Deluge
 Schools," the latter referring to the influx of Dianetics
                            571
   DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH

readers  into Elizabeth,  New  Jersey, site of  the first
Hubbard  Dianetics Research Foundation.
   An early Dianeticist who was among the first wave
into Elizabeth, recounts her first experiences with Dia-
netics, starting in May 1950:
   "I read all of Dianetics and insisted that my friends
read it also. A friend of mine audited me literally out of
the book.
    "The first session was fantastic. For the first time in
my life I became aware of the fact that I was and could
become truly free of this mess of pain and confusion and
really live 100 percent. As  a side effect I got rid of
migraine headaches which had plagued me and effec-
tively ruined my life."
   Dianetics' enthusiastic following clamored for coast-
to-coast author appearances. Most  of Dianetics' first
year saw Mr.  Hubbard lecturing, demonstrating Dia-
netics auditing and assisting in the servicing of the tens
of thousands of enthusiasts beating a path to Foundation
doors nationwide.
   By year's end, more than 150,000 copies of "The
Book"  had been  sold and Dianetics clubs had been
established throughout the US, in Canada,  Finland,
Sweden, England, Germany, Switzerland, South Africa,
Australia, Guatemala and Peru.
   By  its first anniversary in May of 1951, Dianetics
was in its seventh printing. Writing for America's Better
Homes  &  Gardens  magazine, Professor Frederick L.
Schumann  reported "the Hubbard book was a national
sensation," adding detailed personal testimony to the
"flourishing co-auditor's course" that he observed first-
hand at the Elizabeth Foundation.
   Through  the 1960s, Dianetics gained a foothold in
all English-speaking countries. More  than  850,000
hardback  copies had been  sold by the time the first
Dianetics paperback edition was printed in 1968. And,
                           572
           DIANETICS: THE BRIDGE TO CLEAR

with the paperback's printing and worldwide distribu-
tion came a period of tremendous growth for Dianetics.
   By  1977, ten years after the release of the Dianetics
paperback, sales had soared to 2.6 million copies. In the
meantime,  both the number  of Dianetics organizations
(328) and  number  of countries in which organizations
were delivering Dianetics auditing (55) had trebled.
   And, in the late 70s, Mr. Hubbard completed important
technical refinements of Dianetics auditing procedure, ad-
vancing a powerful series of techniques and procedures
called New Era Dianetics. Based on thirty years of experi-
ence and application with the subject, the breakthroughs of
New  Era Dianetics resulted in a vast increase in the speed
and accuracy of Dianetics auditing.
   In the 80s, "Dianetics" became a household word
due  to its sheer popularity and miracle  results. The
book  shot back onto the bestseller lists internationally,
where it remains today. On September 7, 1986, it made
publishing history by returning to the New York Times
bestseller list—36 years after the first copy was pub-
lished. Its stunning rise to number one on the New York
Times  list was accomplished in March of 1987. The
book's  one-hundred-week   stay on  the  Publisher's
Weekly   bestseller list earned for Dianetics  and  its
author the magazine's prestigious Century Award.
   By the end of 1987, purchases of Dianetics passed
the ten million mark, quadrupling 1977's total.
   Through  the years, 22 foreign-language editions of
Dianetics have been published. Each has had their own
stream of successes to parallel—and contribute to—the
book's overwhelming public popularity.
   In 1988,  for instance, the Chinese edition of Dia-
netics received a welcome  reminiscent of the book's
1950s  reception in the West. In the first three weeks on
China's bookstands, more than 120,000 copies of Dia-
netics were sold. By the fourth month,  more than  a
                           573
           DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH

         quarter-million copies were bought. Three printings of
         the book were needed before the year was out.
            As the 90s unfold, more than 1,100 organizations
         exist to provide Dianetics service to an ever-growing
        number  of people. Dianetics, meanwhile, remains sol-
          idly atop bestseller lists worldwide.
            More  countries continue to usher in a new era with
         Dianetics. Released in Japan in June 1991, Dianetics
         enjoyed remarkable success within weeks. It immedi-
, _      ately went to number  one for new  releases on the
iI s.    bestseller list of the Economic Journal, Japan's leading
         business newspaper. Hungary followed suit by selling
         out all 30,000 of its first-run books.
            Today, Dianetics is in every library in the US. The
          US Library  of Congress prides itself in maintaining the
         full collection ofL. Ron Hubbard's works. Leading univer-
          sities and intellectual institutions proudly collect both his
         fiction and nonfiction. The  distinguished Huntington Li-
         brary houses Dianetics and other works by Mr. Hubbard
          along with the Gutenberg Bible and the Canterbury Tales.
            Dianetics is required reading at a major US univer-
         sity's religious studies class and has been among the
        most requested L. Ron Hubbard works by more than 160
         university professors. In 1992, Mr. Hubbard was post-
         humously presented an Honorary Doctorate in Literature
         from  Moscow  State University, where an entire hall of
         the university was  dedicated to him.  There, students
         from around  the world study Dianetics in all its transla-
         tions, along with other L. Ron Hubbard works.
            Press reports tell of Dianetics being recommended in
         reader surveys as a book that the US president and first
         lady should  read, of its being spotted in the office of a
         championship-winning major league baseball manager, of
          its having saved the careers of actors, artists, musicians.
         The list goes on—and grows daily.
                                     574
           DIANETICS: THE BRIDGE TO CLEAR

   But, looking through Dianetics' indomitable publishing
milestones and grass-roots popularity to the real heart of
the subject, one must consider what it takes to build and
maintain such enduring momentum. What is it about Dia-
netics that has created such dedicated excitement?
   A simple answer  like, "Read the book and you'll
understand," would draw little argument from a fellow
reader. But it takes more than the flicker of a reader's
recognition of truth to generate the sustained ardor the
Dianetics adventure has won over the decades. It takes
results that prove, over and over again, the worth of
both message and methodology.
   Roomfuls  of personal testimonials exist in any or-
ganization where Dianetics auditing has been delivered
over the years. Each of these success stories speaks of
an undeniable change for the better in one's life. Some
accounts dramatically detail lifesaving experiences that
would  never have occurred without the application of
Dianetics technology.
   Here is just one example:
    "I was very ill for months in the hospital. I was
under  intensive care for weeks with a  bleeding ulcer
infection and kidney failure. My  heart stopped three
times and I died three times. I also was unconscious for
over a week, and  I basically did not want to live. The
doctors were  going to give up  on me  and  stop the
treatment. The nurses did not expect me to live.
   "My  wife had a very hard  time with it and she
couldn't even call to see how I was doing; she had to
have someone else call for her. She then received some
Dianetics auditing and came to grips with it, at which
point she was able to come into my room in the hospital
and give me some auditing. She came in every day.
    "I soon started becoming more aware of my environ-
ment and had a determinism to survive. It made life bright
enough to live. Many other people helped me get through
                           575
   DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH

it by using L. Ron Hubbard's technology. I am now re-
covered and would not have lived if it weren't for the tech-
nology by L. Ron Hubbard that helped us get through it."
   Here is another example from a Dianetics auditor
who  was able to salvage a friend's marriage:
    "I consider my  ability to help others even more
important than the changes Dianetics has made in my
own  life. What I can confront and handle in a few
minutes would put any psychiatrist to utter shame. I will
briefly describe for you an example.
   "I have a friend whose marriage had gone on the
rocks. He was cheating on his wife, drinking excessively,
taking drugs and, as you may guess, had become very
abusive of her.
    "She, on the other hand, spent tons of money, worked
for one of the top fabric designers in New York and led a
very unhappy  life.
    "She decided at one point a few years ago that she
wanted to handle her side of things and came to Los
Angeles  to receive auditing. She was  very uncertain,
though, about how her husband would respond to this,
and whether he would be able to do the same.
    "I called him on the phone as she was flying back to
New  York.
    "The training I have, although easily learned and in
far less time than that of any psychiatrist, was tested
thoroughly as he screamed at me across the miles. But,
he told me things he never told anyone else; and he flew
immediately  to Los Angeles to handle his life.
    "And, in one forty-five-minute session, he handled
the reason he had become an alcoholic.
    "Two people lead a happier life now—and those who
live around them. I find no greater pleasure than to help
others. It is a pleasure present in all of us who  help
others with the brilliant discoveries of the mind made by
L. Ron Hubbard."
                           576
            DIANETICS: THE BRIDGE TO CLEAR

    Such stories leave long-lasting impressions on both
the individuals involved and their family, friends and
associates who  directly observe its often dramatic ef-
fects.
    Dianetics not only  affects individuals, but society
itself. Through hands-on application and direct observa-
tion, it has increasingly become an accepted methodol-
ogy  in many  spheres of activity. Years after a health
professional's discovery of a workable Dianetics axiom,
it will become noticed by media and tabbed a "new"
breakthrough.
   One  such example is the concept of prenatal influ-
ences, so  integral to the unburdening  of  a case  in
Dianetics auditing. L. Ron Hubbard made key discover-
ies in Dianetics concerning prenatal awareness that are
proven and workable as evidenced by professional opin-
ions on  the subject and testimonies of miracle results
through Dianetics auditing.
    But, before Dianetics, it was unheard of to attribute
certain illnesses to prenatal trauma. As an immediate
result of the book, however, more  than forty articles
appeared in the early 50s supporting the fact of prenatal
experience influencing an  individual after birth. Doc-
tors today commonly  accept the fact that a variety of
conditions such as psychosomatic ills, alcohol abuse and
drug  addiction influence the health and well-being of
the unborn.
   Another  example: the ill effects of utterances made
near an unconscious person. In hospitals throughout the
world, Mr. Hubbard's guidelines regarding silence dur-
 ing operations have been adopted. A  British journal
reports  that three scientists from leading  universities
have found that anesthetized persons can be affected by
what they hear while "under."
   To prevent shocks to a child that could leave perma-
nent damage, Mr. Hubbard in Dianetics advised silence
                           577
   DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH

in the delivery room  and, in subsequent  studies, the
laying of the newborn on the mother's abdomen before
the cord is cut.
   One  of the world's leading obstetricians, Frederick
Leboyer, wrote in 1974, "As for hearing, nothing could be
simpler: be silent . . . This apprenticeship of silence—
so indispensable for mothers—is just as important for
those who  perform   the delivery: the obstetricians, the
attendants."
   In a  natural birth, Leboyer advised, "The  baby
emerges  . . . and we  settle the child immediately on
its mother's stomach. What  better place could there
be?  . . . To sever the umbilicus when the child has
scarcely left the mother's womb  is an act of cruelty
whose  ill effects are immeasurable."
   When  a  Dianeticist asked Leboyer for a quote to
appear in a book she was  writing on pregnancy and
childbirth, he responded, "I shall feel most honored
being quoted together with Ron Hubbard, whose work I
greatly admire."
   With Dianetics, Mr. Hubbard has resolved problems
of the human mind on  both an individual and societal
level. Yet still unanswered by Dianetics  were many
questions that people had been asking about the nature
of man since the beginning of recorded history.
   Particularly with respect to the mind's mental image
pictures, the question was posed: Who was looking at
these mental  image pictures and being  adversely af-
fected by them?
   Mr. Hubbard  set out to answer this question and, in
1951, demonstrated that man was neither his body nor
his mind, but a spiritual being. One doesn't have a soul
or spirit, he concluded. One is a spirit.
    This life force is the source  of all that is good,
decent, creative and beautiful in the world: the individ-
ual being himself. Although he has a mind and a body,
he is himself a spiritual being.
                           578
            DIANETICS: THE BRIDGE TO CLEAR

    These breakthroughs form the basis of the religious
philosophy of Scientology, of which the Dianetics tech-
nology  is a vital and basic branch. Contained  within
Dianetics and  Scientology is an exact route to higher
levels of ability. Through study of materials on all aspects
of life itself and through auditing addressing the mind and
the spirit, greater states of existence are possible.
   The  development and codification of both Dianetics
and  Scientology can now be found in scores of books,
more  than fifteen thousand pages of technical writings
and more  than six thousand taped lectures—all by Mr.
Hubbard.  This extraordinary collection of materials is
available to anyone  in the world through  their local
Hubbard  Dianetics Foundation or Scientology church or
mission.
   Standard delivery of Mr. Hubbard's precision tech-
nology is the hallmark of these Dianetics and Scientol-
ogy  groups. These organizations help each student to
fully understand and apply the principles found in Dia-
netics and  subsequent materials. They provide audio
and video tapes of Mr. Hubbard's lectures and auditing
demonstrations. They  train today's auditors to profes-
sional standards  and they deliver Dianetics auditing
daily. These organizations are where Clears are made.
   Today the door is wide open to Clear, no matter how
remote one may seem from the nearest Hubbard Dia-
netics Foundation.  In the US, one  call to the toll-free
Dianetics information  line (see listing in the pages to
follow) can guide you to your next step.
   In a troubled world searching for answers, Dianetics
provides them—and more. It spells hope for man and a
technology for a better world.
   By  reading Dianetics, you have walked the first step
to Clear. By all means, take your next.
   "And may you never be the same again."
                           579
Glossary
Aberration: a departure from rational thought or behavior. From the Latin, aberrare, to wander from; Latin, ab, away, errare, to wander. It means basically to err, to make mistakes, or more specifically to have fixed ideas which are not true. The word is also used in its scientific sense. It means departure from a straight line. If a line should go from A to B, then if it is "aberrated" it would go from A to some other point, to some other point, to some other point, to some other point, to some other point and finally arrive at B. Taken in its scientific sense, it would also mean the lack of straightness or to see crookedly as, in example, a man sees a horse but thinks he sees an elephant. Aberrated conduct would be wrong conduct, or conduct not supported by reason. When a person has engrains, these tend to deflect what would be his normal ability to perceive truth and bring about an aberrated view of situations which then would cause an aberrated reaction to them. Aberration is opposed to sanity, which would be its opposite. This is the most fundamental level of aberration: "If the food smells good, go away from it!" This is directly against the survival intention of the organism.
aberree: aberrated person.
aborigine: any of the first or earliest known inhabitants of a region; native.
ahreact: (psychoanalysis) release (repressed emotions) by acting out, such as in words, action or the imagination, the situation causing the conflict.
Achilles' heel: a portion, spot, area or the like, that is especially or solely vulnerable. In Greek mythology, Achilles was an illustrious Greek warrior. He had been dipped in the river Styx (one of the mythological rivers of hell) by his mother, which rendered him invulnerable except in the heel by which she held him. He was fatally wounded by an arrow in that heel.
599
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
ACTH: a hormone that was sometimes used to combat symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis; it stimulates the production of other hormones in the body.
acupuncture: Chinese practice of pricking the tissues of the body with fine needles to relieve pain or as a local anesthetic.
acute: brief and severe.
ad absurdum: to the point of ridiculousness.
adjudication: (law) the act of a court in making an order, judgment or decree.
adrenaline: a hormone secreted by the adrenal gland, that stimulates the heart, increases muscular strength, etc.
Aesculapian: of Aesculapius, the god of medicine and healing in ancient Greek and Roman mythology.
affinities: the attractions which exist between two human beings, or between human beings and other life organisms.
affront: open insult.
aggregations: groups or masses of distinct things or individuals.
Alexander: Alexander III, known as Alexander the Great: (356-323 B.C.) king of Macedonia (ancient kingdom located in what is now Greece and Yugoslavia).
algae: a group of plants, either one-celled or many-celled, often growing in colonies. Algae contain chlorophyll (the green coloring matter of plants) and other pigments, but have no true root, stem or leaf. They are found in water or damp places and include seaweed, pond scum, etc.
alloy: to weaken or spoil by adding something that reduces value or pleasure.
ally: in Dianetics it basically means someone who protects a person who is in a weak state and becomes a very strong influence over the person. The weaker person, such as a child, even partakes the characteristics of the ally so that one may find that a person who has, for instance, a bad leg, has it because a protector or ally in his youth had a bad leg. The word is from French and Latin and means to bind together.
ally computation: little more than a mere idiot calculation that anyone who is a friend can be kept a friend only by approximating the conditions wherein the friendship was realized. It is a computation on the basis that one can only be safe in the vicinity of certain people and that one can only be in the vicinity of certain people by being sick or crazy or poor and generally disabled.
600
GLOSSARY
altitude: a difference in level of prestige—one on a higher altitude carries conviction to one on a lower altitude merely because of altitude. The auditor may find himself unable to gain sufficient altitude with some patients to work them smoothly and he may have so much altitude with others that they believe everything he says. When he has too little altitude, he is not believed; when he has too much, he is believed too well.
altruistic: having unselfish concern for the welfare of others.
ambivalent: having two valences (ambi- is Latin for "both"). See also valence in this glossary.
ambi version: a condition or character trait that includes elements of both introversion and extroversion.
ammonium chloride: a white, crystalline compound produced by the reaction of ammonia with hydrochloric acid: it is used in medicine, and also in dry cells, dyes, etc.
amniotic fluid: the fluid surrounding the embryo or fetus.
amniotic sac: the membrane sac enclosing the developing fetus and amniotic fluid.
amour: (French) love.
amulet: something worn on the body because of its supposed magic power to protect against injury or evil; a charm.
analogue: thing or part that is similar or comparable in certain respects.
analogy: explanation of something by comparing it point by point with something similar.
analytical mind: the conscious, aware mind which thinks, observes data, remembers it and resolves problems. It would be essentially the conscious mind as opposed to the unconscious mind. In Dianetics the analytical mind is the one which is alert and aware and the reactive mind simply reacts without analysis. Also called the analyzer.
analyzer: see analytical mind
anemia: a deficiency in the oxygen-carrying material of the blood resulting in a paleness, generalized weakness, etc.
anthropological: pertaining to anthropology, the science that deals with the origins, physical and cultural development, biological characteristics, and social customs and beliefs of humankind.
antipathy: a strong or deep-rooted dislike.
apprised: given notice; informed; advised.
apropos of: with reference to; in respect or regard to.
601
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
arbitrary: based on one's preference, notion, whim, etc.; capricious.
archaeological: of archaeology, the scientific study of the life and culture of ancient peoples, as by digging up the remains of ancient cities, etc.
Aristotelian logic: Aristotle's method of logic, characterized by the syllogism, an argument or form of reasoning in which two statements or premises are made and a logical conclusion is drawn from them. Example: All mammals are warmblooded (major premise); whales are mammals (minor premise); therefore, whales are warmblooded (conclusion).
Aristotle: (384-322 B.C.) Greek philosopher noted for his works on logic, ethics, politics, etc.
arthritis: a condition causing inflammation, pain and stiffness in the joints.
articulate: well formulated; clearly presented.
asthma: a generally chronic disorder characterized by wheezing, coughing, difficulty in breathing and a suffocating feeling.
astigmatism: a defect in an eye or lens preventing proper focusing.
astral self: also called astral body: a second body, per some forms of philosophical or religious thought, said to belong to each individual, formed of a substance which is above or beyond perception by the senses and which pervades all space. Per these beliefs, the astral body accompanies the individual through life, is able to leave the human body at will, and survives the individual after death. Astral bodies are actually just somebody's delusion. They are usually mock-ups which the mystic then tries to believe real. He sees the astral body as something else and then seeks to inhabit it in the most common practices of "astral walking."
asylums: institutions for the maintenance and care of the mentally ill, orphans or other persons requiring specialized assistance.
atheist: a person who denies or disbelieves the existence of a supreme being or beings.
atom bomb: a bomb that uses the energy from the splitting of atoms to cause an explosion of tremendous force, accompanied by a blinding light.
attention units: quantity of awareness. Any organism is aware
602
GLOSSARY
to some degree. A rational or relatively rational organism is aware of being aware. Attention units could be said to exist in the mind in varying quantity from person to person.
attenuated: weakened or reduced in force, intensity, effect, quantity or value.
attrition: a wearing down or weakening of resistance, especially as a result of continuous pressure or harassment.
auditing: the application of Dianetics processes and procedures to someone by an auditor. To audit is both to listen and to compute.
auditor: 1. a person trained and qualified in applying Dianetics processes and procedures to individuals for their betterment; called an auditor because auditor means "one who listens." 2. a person who is authorized to audit (to check or examine) accounts.
Auditor 's Code: a collection of rules (do's and don'ts) that an auditor follows while auditing someone, which assures that the preclear will get the greatest possible gain out of the auditing he is having.
autocontrol: autohypnosis or an attempt to process oneself without an auditor. If attempted in Dianetics, autohypnosis is probably as close to fruitless masochism as one can get. If a patient places himself in autohypnosis and regresses himself in an effort to reach illness or birth or prenatals, the only thing he will get is ill.
autonomic nervous system: a system of nerves in the body which regulates involuntary action, as of the intestines, heart and glands. Autonomic means "self-ruling" or "independent."
bacillus: loosely, any of the bacteria, especially those causing a disease.
Bacon, Francis: (1561-1626) English philosopher and essayist who insisted that investigation should begin with observable facts rather than with theories.
bank: see reactive mind
banked: (of a fire) covered with ashes or fuel to make it burn long and slowly.
Bara, Theda: stage name of Theodosia Goodman (1890-1955), US actress who played parts of evil women in forty films between 1915 and 1919.
barber basin medicine: reference to the practice of surgery by barbers in earlier centuries. Generally untrained in medical
603
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
procedures, their "treatments" were very painful with severe infections and often death resulting from unsanitary conditions.
Barrymore: referring to the Barrymore family, American actors of English-Irish descent, one of the most famous families in the history of the American stage: Maurice Barrymore (1847-1905) and his three children—Lionel (1878-1954), Ethel (1879-1959) and John (1892-1942).
basic: the first engram on any chain of similar engrams; basic is simply earliest.
basic-basic: the first engram of the first chain of engrams.
basic personality: the individual himself. The basic individual is not a buried unknown or a different person, but an intensity of all that is best and most able in the person.
bastion: something serving as a stronghold.
battery: a group of similar things arranged, connected or used together; set or series; array.
bawled out: (slang) scolded angrily.
bedevilment: the act of plaguing diabolically; torment; harassment.
Bedlam: an old insane asylum (in full, St. Mary of Bethlehem) in London, infamous for the brutal ill-treatment inflicted upon the insane.
beneficent: doing good or causing good to be done; conferring benefits; kindly in action or purpose.
Benzedrine: (trademark) an amphetamine, a drug used as a stimulant.
Bergson, Henri: (1859-1941) French philosopher. Awarded Nobel Prize for literature (1927).
beset: encompassed; surrounded; assailed; possessed detrimentally: said of the difficulties, perils or obstacles which surround an action, work or course.
bid fair: seem likely (to be or do something).
biochemistry: the chemistry of living organisms.
blasphemy: abuse of or contempt for God or sacred things.
blithely: in a manner without thought or regard; in a carefree way; heedlessly.
Blood and Sand: title of a silent movie featuring Rudolph Valentine.
boarders: people who regularly get meals, or room and meals, at another's home for pay.
boil-off: becoming groggy and seeming to sleep. This manifestation denotes that some period of the person's life
604
GLOSSARY
wherein he was unconscious has been slightly restim-ulated.
bona fide: authentic; true.
bootleg: made, sold or transported unlawfully. The term arose from the practice of hiding a liquor bottle in the leg of one's boot.
bootstraps: means of advancing oneself or accomplishing something.
bosun: a ship's petty officer in charge of rigging, boats, anchors, etc.
boudoir: a woman's bedroom, dressing room or private sitting room.
Boulder Dam: officially Hoover Dam, one of the highest dams in the world, on the Colorado River between the southern tip of Nevada and Arizona.
bouncer: an engramic command (such as "Can't stay here" or "Get out!") which sends the preclear up the track toward present time.
bow-drill fire-maker: an ancient device for making fire by friction. It consisted of a stick resting in a hollow in a piece of wood which was given a sawlike motion by a loop in a little bow, producing glowing wood dust.
bowlers: stiff felt hats with rounded crown and narrow brim, worn chiefly by men. Also called derbies.
brace and bit: a tool for boring, consisting of a removable drill (bit) in a rotating handle (brace).
bracketed: of a target, having had its range determined by placing shots both short of the target and beyond it. Used figuratively.
brackish: somewhat salty, as the water of some marshes near the sea.
British Guyana: country in northeastern South America: formerly a British colony, it became independent and a member of the Commonwealth in 1966.
brought to bar: held accountable.
bubonic plague: a very dangerous contagious disease, accompanied by fever, chills and swelling of the lymphatic glands. It is carried to humans by fleas from rats or squirrels.
Bund: a street running along the waterfront in Shanghai (a seaport in eastern China).
buoyant: lighthearted, cheerful.
bursitis: inflammation of a bursa, a pouch between joints or
605
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
between muscles or skin, etc., and bones, for lessening friction.
Caesar, Julius: (1007-44 B.C.) Roman general and statesman. As part of his military conquests, he invaded Britain in 55 and 54 B.C. Became Roman dictator in 49 B.C.
calculus: (mathematics) a method of calculation in higher mathematics; a way of making calculations about quantities which are continually changing, such as the speed of a falling stone or the slope of a curved line. Calculus measures little bits of things in order to find out what the whole thing will do. That is the whole theory of calculus.
Caligula: (A.D. 12-41) Roman emperor (37-41). His reign was marked by extreme cruelty and tyranny.
caliper: a compass for measuring the diameter of tubes or of round objects.
canceller: a contract with the patient that whatever the auditor says will not become literally interpreted by the patient or used by him in any way. It prevents accidental positive suggestion.
capricious: characterized by or subject to whim; impulsive and unpredictable.
cargo: load.
carmine: red or purplish red; crimson.
case: a general term for a person being treated or helped. Case also refers to a person's condition, which is monitored by the content of his reactive mind. A person's case is the way he responds to the world around him by reason of his aberrations.
cataclysm: any great upheaval that causes sudden and violent changes, as an earthquake, war, etc.
catalyst: a person or thing acting as the stimulus in bringing about or hastening a result.
catarrhal: having to do with inflammation of a mucous membrane, especially of the nose or throat, causing an increased flow of mucus.
caustic: severely critical or sarcastic.
censure: criticize severely.
cervix: a neck-shaped, anatomical structure, as the narrow outer end of the uterus.
chain: a series of incidents of similar nature or similar subject matter.
chain fission: (fission means a splitting apart, dividing) larger atoms such as atoms of uranium can fission (split) into
606
GLOSSARY
smaller atoms such as atoms of iodine and bromine. This process can be designed so that each fission will cause another fission, thereby setting off a chain reaction. The atomic bomb is an example of a chain fission. Used figuratively.
charge: harmful energy or force accumulated and stored in the reactive mind, resulting from the conflicts and unpleasant experiences that a person has had.
charlatan: an assuming empty pretender to knowledge or skill; a pretentious impostor.
chary: cautious, wary.
chastened: restrained; subdued.
chattel: slave or any movable possession (as opposed to a house or land).
Cheops: king of ancient Egypt for 23 years (around 2900 B.C.). Cheops was famous as the builder of the Great Pyramid in Egypt, which is one of the Seven Wonders of the World. Egyptian pyramids were built as royal tombs: each monarch built his own pyramid.
chess: a game of skill played on a checkered board by two players, each possessing an initial force of 16 pieces, including a piece called a "king." There are individual rules of movement for each different kind of piece. Players make alternate moves, each seeking to attack the other's king in such a manner that no escape or defense is possible, thus ending the game.
chloroform: a colorless liquid with a sharp, sweetish smell and taste. Chloroform evaporates quickly and easily. When its vapor is inhaled, it makes a person unconscious or unable to feel pain.
chronometer:  an instrument for measuring time precisely; highly accurate kind of clock or watch, as for scientific use.
cinch: (colloquial) a firm grip.
circuit: a part of an individual's bank (a colloquial name for the reactive mind) that behaves as though it were someone or something separate from him and that either talks to him or goes into action of its own accord, and may even, if severe enough, take control of him while it operates.
clairvoyance: the ability to perceive things that are not in sight or that cannot be seen.
Clear: the Clear is an unaberrated person. He is rational in that he forms the best possible solutions he can on the data he
607
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
has and from his viewpoint. The Clear has no engrams which can be restimulated to throw out the correctness of computation by entering hidden and false data. Clear is the goal in Dianetics therapy, a goal which some patience and a little study will bring about.
climes: regions or realms, especially with reference to their climates.
coach-and-four: a coach pulled by four horses.
cohabit: live together in a sexual relationship when not legally married.
coitus: sexual intercourse.
colloquial: characteristic of or appropriate to ordinary or familiar conversation rather than formal speech or writing; informal.
comatic: of a coma (a period of deep, prolonged unconsciousness usually resulting from a severe injury or illness).
combat exhaustion: (psychiatry) a neurotic condition in which one is anxious, irritable, depressed, etc., often as a result of having been in combat or battle for a long time.
compulsions: irresistible, repeated, irrational impulses to perform some act.
concourse: concurrence in action or causation, cooperation; combined action.
condenser: a device storing a charge of electricity. Also called a capacitor.
confounded: damned; a mild oath.
Confucianism: the system of morality taught by Confucius, a Chinese philosopher (5517-479? B.C.).
conjunctivitis: inflammation of the conjunctiva, the mucous membrane lining the inner eyelid and part of the eye.
consecrated: set apart or declared as holy.
consternation: a sudden, alarming amazement or dread that results in utter confusion; dismay.
constitute: establish or set up; make (a person or thing) something.
contaging: a verb coined from the word contagious, describing the act of spreading or tending to spread from person to person.
cordite: a smokeless explosive used as a propellant in bullets and shells.
corn: (informal) old-fashioned, trite or mawkishly (weakly emotional) sentimental material, as a joke, a story or music.
608
GLOSSARY
corn-and-games: reference to the practice in ancient Rome of feeding people and providing official public amusement (circuses in the arena) in an attempt to prevent unrest. Also known as "bread and circuses."
corner: a monopoly acquired on a stock or a commodity so as to be able to raise the price.
coronary: of or pertaining to the human heart, with respect to health.
corporal punishment: (law) physical punishment, as flogging, inflicted on the body of one convicted of a crime: formerly included the death penalty, sentencing to a term of years, etc.
counter-checking: controlling or confirming by a second check.
cowed: subdued by frightening with threats or force.
craven: cowardly.
crazy house: a fun house: an attraction at an amusement park consisting of a series of rooms and passageways with sloping or moving floors, distorting mirrors and other devices designed to surprise or amuse.
credence: belief as to the truth of something.
crocheted: done in a kind of needlework in which loops of a thread or yarn are interwoven by means of a single hooked needle.
crow: boast in triumph; exult.
cry, a far: only remotely related; very different.
culpable: deserving blame; blameworthy.
cyanide: a very poisonous chemical substance.
cytology: the scientific study of cells.
Dalton, Jack: member of an outlaw gang in the nineteenth-century American West; also a character in early westerns.
Dante: originally Durante, Alighieri: (1265-1321) Italian poet. Wrote Divina Commedia, recounting an imaginary journey by the author through hell, purgatory and paradise.
Dark Ages: the Middle Ages, especially the earlier part from about A.D. 476 to about the end of the 10th century: so called from the idea that this period in Europe was characterized by intellectual stagnation, widespread ignorance and poverty, and cultural decline.
debauchery: indulgence in harmful or immoral pleasures.
decks: decorates; dresses up.
decried: spoken out against strongly and openly; denounced.
deep analysis: depth therapy: a form of psychotherapy that
609
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
attempts to work through unconscious conflicts to resolve problems in behavior.
demon: a mental mechanism set up by an engram which takes over a portion of the analyzer and acts as an individual being. A bona fide demon is one who gives thoughts voice or echoes the spoken word interiorly or who gives all sorts of complicated advices like a real, live voice exteriorly.
denyer:  a species of command which, literally translated, means that the engram doesn't exist. "I'm not here," "This is getting nowhere," "I must not talk about it," "I can't remember," etc. A command which makes the pre-clear feel there is no incident present.
derangements: disturbances of the functions of the mind; mental disorders; insanities.
derelict: neglectful of duty; delinquent; negligent.
derided: laughed at in contempt or scorn; made fun of; ridiculed.
dermatitis: inflammation of the skin.
dervish: a member of any various Moslem orders of ascetics (ones who lead a life of austere self-discipline, especially as an act of religious devotion or penance), some of which employ whirling dances and the chanting of religious formulas to producer collective ecstasy.
descriptic: representing or delineating by a picture or figure.
designing: crafty, conniving.
devil take the ____ : a phrase used as a curse, wish of evil or the like.
diabetes: a disease in which sugar and starch are not properly absorbed by the body.
Dianetics: Dianetics spiritual healing technology. It addresses and handles the effects of the spirit on the body and can alleviate such things as unwanted sensations and emotions, accidents, injuries and psychosomatic illnesses (ones that are caused or aggravated by mental stress). Dianetics means "through the soul" (from Greek dia, through, and nous, soul). It is further defined as "what the soul is doing to the body."
dime-store: of or purchased at a dime store or five-and-ten-cent store—a store that sells a wide variety of inexpensive merchandise, originally with many articles priced at five or ten cents.
dipsomaniac: a person suffering from an uncontrollable craving for alcohol.
610
GLOSSARY
direful: dreadful; awful; terrible.
disavow: deny any knowledge or approval of, or responsibility for; disclaim; disown.
dismembered: divided into parts; cut to pieces; mutilated.
disposition: state of mind regarding something; inclination.
Dixie, whistle: engage in wishful thinking. Dixie is a lively song about the Southern states of the United States, written in 1859 by Daniel D. Emmett (1815-1904). It was used to build enthusiasm for the South during the Civil War.
doilies: small mats, as of lace or paper, put under a dish, vase or the like, as a decoration or to protect a surface. Named after a 17th-century draper (dealer in cloth and dry goods) whose name was Doily or Doyley.
donjon: the fortified main tower of a castle.
dopey: tired, sleepy, foggy (as though doped).
douche bag: a small syringe having detachable nozzles for administering a douche: a jet or current of water, sometimes with a dissolved medicating or cleansing agent, applied to a body part, organ or cavity (such as the vagina) for medicinal or hygienic purposes.
dramatis personae: the characters in a play or story (used here to refer to people present in the engrams of the aberree).
dramatization: the duplication of an engramic content, entire or in part, by an aberree in his present time environment. Aberrated conduct is entirely dramatization. The degree of dramatization is in direct ratio to the degree of restimula-tion of the engrams causing it. When dramatizing, the individual is like an actor playing his dictated part and going through a whole series of irrational actions.
dranuner: humorous spelling of drama, a series of events so interesting, vivid, etc., as to resemble those of a play.
droll: amusing in an odd or ironic way.
dross: inferior, trivial or worthless matter.
Drunkard: a play written by William H. Smith and "A Gentleman" in the late 1800s, a moral domestic drama of American life.
DTfc: delirium tremens: a violent delirium (temporary state of extreme mental excitement, marked by restlessness, confused speech and hallucinations) resulting chiefly from excessive drinking of alcoholic liquor and characterized by sweating, trembling, anxiety and frightening hallucinations. Delirium tremens comes from Latin, and means literally "trembling delirium."
611
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
dub-in: the manifestation of putting, unknowingly, perceptions which do not in actual fact exist, in the environment. (It is a phrase taken from the motion picture industry, meaning to record dialogue and various sounds and then integrate them into the film after it has been shot. This is done for scenes where the original recording is faulty, for scenes where it is simply more convenient to add dialogue and other sound later, and for films playing abroad which require new dialogue in the native language of the host country.)
dynamic: i. the tenacity to life and vigor and persistence in survival. 2. the urge, thrust and purpose of life— Survive;—in its four manifestations: self, sex, group and mankind.
dynamic principle oi' existence: survival. The goal of life can be considered to be infinite survival. Man, au a life form, can be demonstrated to obey in all his actions and purposes the one command "Survive!" It is not o. new thought that man is surviving. It is a new thought that man is motivated only by survival.
dynasties: successions of rulers who are members of the same family.
eccentricity, unusual or odd behavior, or a peculiar habit.
ectoplasm: the luminous substance believed to emanate from a spiritualistic medium.
effusion: a pouring forth.
egocentric: viewing everything in relation to oneself; self-centereu.
Einstein, Albert: (1879-1955) German physicist, US citizen from 1940; formulated the theory of the conversion of mass into energy, opening the way for the development of the atomic bomb.
EUis, Henry flavelock: (1859-1939) English criminologist and psychologist who conducted studies in psychology and sociology of sex.
embroil: throw into confusion; complicate.
embryo: 1. an early or undeveloped stage of something. 2. a child in the womb in the first eight weeks of its development.
Emersonian: of Ralph Waldo Emerson: (1803-1882) American essayist, poet and lecturer. Emerson was part of the tran-scendentalist movement, which advised people to look for God-given power within themselves. His best-known essay
612
GLOSSARY
is "Self-Reliance." Many in the nineteenth century took inspiration from Emerson, especially through his brief and pointed sayings and urgings, such as "Hitch your wagon to a star."
encysting: enclosing in or as if in a cyst or sac.
endocrine: designating or of any gland producing one or more internal secretions that are introduced directly into the bloodstream and carried to other parts of the body whose functions they regulate or control.
engendered: brought into being; brought about; caused; produced.
engrain: a mental image picture which is a recording of an experience containing pain, unconsciousness, and a real or fancied threat to survival. It is a recording in the reactive mind of something which actually happened to an individual in the past and which contained pain and unconsciousness, both of which are recorded in the mental image picture called an engram. It must, by definition, have impact or injury as part of its content. These engrams are a complete recording, down to the last accurate detail, of every perception present in a moment of partial or full unconsciousness.
engram command: any phrase contained in an engram.
enjoin: order, command.
ensigns: in the US Navy, commissioned officers of the lowest rank.
equilibrium: mental or emotional balance; evenness of mind or temper; composure.
equipage: a carriage drawn by horses and attended by servants.
equivocal: questionable; suspicious.
erase: cause an engram to "vanish" entirely by recountings, at which time it is filed as memory and experience.
erudition: exhibition of knowledge not easily understood by the average person.
estrogen: a sex hormone or other substance capable of developing and maintaining female characteristics of the body.
et al.: and others.
ether: a drug used to produce anesthesia, as before surgery.
evolutes: evolves; develops.
excreta: waste matter excreted from the body, as sweat or urine.
exodontistry: the extraction of teeth.
facetious: joking or trying to be jocular, especially at an inappropriate time.
613
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
facile: acting, working or done easily, or in a quick, smooth
way; fluent; ready. faculty: an ability, natural or acquired, for a particular kind of
action. fan: (Western US, chiefly cowboy use) slap the flanks (of a horse
or other animal) repeatedly with a hat to get it to move or
move faster. fan-tan: a Chinese gambling game in which a pile of coins,
counters or objects is placed under a bowl and bets are
made on what the remainder will be after they have been
counted off in fours. Farragut, David Glasgow: (1801-1870) US admiral who won
the battles of New Orleans and Mobile Bay for the Union
in the US Civil War. feigned: pretended, simulated; sham. fetishes: objects, ideas, etc., eliciting unquestioning reverence,
respect or devotion. fetus: in man, the offspring in the womb from the end of the
third month of pregnancy until birth. fidelity: accuracy; exactness. file clerk: Dianetic auditor's slang for the mechanism of the
mind which acts as a data monitor.  Auditors can get
instant or "flash" answers direct from the file clerk to aid
in contacting incidents. Technically the name of the file
clerk might be "bank monitor unit" but that phrase is too
unwieldy. fireplugs: street hydrants to which hoses can be attached for
fighting fires. flash answer: the first thing which comes into a person's head
when a question is asked of him. flint: a fine-grained, very hard rock, usually gray, that produces
sparks when struck with steel, and that breaks into pieces
with sharp cutting edges. flippant: joking or trying to be funny when one should be more
serious or show more respect. flounder, out like a: in a faint; unconscious. (Flounder is a
slang term for the corpse of a drowned man.) flushed: revealed; brought into the open; driven out. foibles: minor weaknesses or failings of character; slight flaws
or defects. forebear: ancestor. forgetter mechanism: a forgetter mechanism is "Put it out of
my mind," "If I remembered it I would go mad," "Can't
614
GLOSSARY
remember," and just plain "I don't know," as well as the master of the family of phrases, "Forget it!" Any engram command which makes the individual believe he can't remember.
fostered: helped to grow or develop; stimulated; promoted.
frigid: habitually failing to become sexually aroused, or abnormally repelled by sexual activity: said of a woman.
fuse: a wire or strip of easily melted metal, usually set in a plug, placed in a circuit as a safeguard: if the current becomes too strong, the metal melts, thus breaking the circuit.
Galen: (ca. A.D. 130-200) Greek physician whose works were for centuries the standards for anatomy and physiology. Though Galen gave good descriptions of some of the human body's different parts and their functions, his observations and conclusions on the circulation of the blood were far from correct.
galvanometer: an instrument for detecting and measuring small electric currents.
gamut: the entire range or extent, as of emotions.
gaoler: jailer.
garners: acquires; gathers or collects.
Gaslight: a play by Patrick Hamilton (later called Angel Street) in which a man tries to drive his wife insane.
gauge: thickness or diameter, as of sheet metal or wire. A #12 gauge copper wire is approximately three thirty-secondths of an inch thick.
Gauls: any of the Celtic-speaking people of Gaul, ancient region in western Europe consisting of what is now mainly France and Belgium.
Gay Nineties: the 1890s, a period of sudden affluence in the US brought on by the industrial revolution.
genesis: the way in which something comes to be; beginning; origin.
genetic: of or having to do with genetics, the branch of biology that deals with heredity and the way that animals and plants pass on to their offspring such characteristics as size, color, etc.
Genghis Khan: (1162-1227) Mongol conqueror of much of Asia and eastern Europe. He and his armies were totally ruthless in their actions and were said to have killed over a million people in one city alone.
615
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
geometric progression: a sequence of terms, such as 1, 3, 9, 27, 81, etc., each of which is a constant multiple of the immediately preceding term.
germane: closely or significantly related; relevant; pertinent.
glad-hander: one who is demonstrative in his personal contacts; one who acts more friendly or more optimistic than necessary; one, as a politician, who pretends friendliness.
gnome: (folklore) any of a race of small, misshapen, dwarflike beings, supposed to dwell in the earth and guard its treasures.
godhead: godhood; divinity.
golden age: the period in which a nation, etc., is at its highest state of prosperity, or in which some human art or activity is at its most excellent.
Goldi:  a people, traditionally hunters and fishermen, who inhabit the valley of the Amur River in southeastern Siberia and northeastern Manchuria (a region and former administrative division of northeast China).
gold panning: separating (gold, etc.) from gravel by washing it in a pan.
gonads: bodily organs that produce gametes (mature sperm or eggs capable of participating in fertilization).
Goodwife Sofie: made-up name for a woman who was the mistress of a household. Goodwife is an archaic title of respect for a woman.
Grand Coulee Dam: a large, concrete dam located on the Columbia River in central Washington.
gregarious: living in herds or flocks.
grippe: influenza.
grist to (one's) mill: something employed to one's profit or advantage, especially something seemingly unpromising.
grizzly: short for grizzly bear: a large, ferocious, brownish, grayish or yellowish bear of western North America, having a shoulder hump and long front claws.
grouper: species of command which, literally translated, means that all incidents are in one place on the time track: "I'm jammed up," "Everything happens at once," "Everything comes in on me at once," "I'll get even with you," etc.
G-2: military intelligence section of the Army or Marine Corps.
gyrations: actions of turning round, wheeling or whirling.
hallowed: regarded as holy; honored as sacred.
Hamlet: hero of the play Hamlet, a tragedy (first printed 1603)
616
GLOSSARY
by William Shakespeare. Hamlet is a young prince who avenges the murder of his father.
harlot: a prostitute.
harridan: a scolding, vicious woman; hag; shrew.
harrowing: extremely disturbing or distressing; grievous.
Harvey, William: (1578-1657) English physician and anatomist, discoverer of the mechanics of blood circulation.
havoc, cry: sound an alarm. Used figuratively.
hawk: make an effort to raise phlegm from the throat; clear the throat noisily.
hazarded: offered (a statement, conjecture, etc.) with the possibility of facing criticism, disapproval, failure or the like; ventured.
"Heads I win, tails you lose": descriptive of a one-sided arrangement. The phrase comes from a game of flipping a coin into the air and betting on which side will land uppermost. Heads refers to the side of a coin bearing the date and the main design (often a representation of a head); tails refers to the reverse side of a coin.
hebephrenia: (psychiatry) a form of aberration characterized by childish or silly behavior.
Hegelian: of Hegel (Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel [1770-1831], German philosopher) or his philosophy. Hegel put forth a philosophy based on the principle that an idea or event (thesis) generates its opposite (antithesis) leading to the reconciliation of opposites.
helium: one of the chemical elements, a very light, inert, colorless gas; it is used for inflating balloons, etc.
Hercules:  a mythical Greek hero of fabulous strength and courage who, after completing 12 heroic feats assigned to him (including killing several legendary monsters), became immortal.
hew: to chop or cut with an ax or sword, etc.
hexed: bewitched; practiced on by witchcraft.
Hindu: of Hinduism, a religious and social system which developed in India about 1400 B.C. , with belief in reincarnation, worship of several gods, and the caste system (rigid, hereditary social classes) as a basis of society.
Hindu trinity: Hindu representation of the three manifestations of the Supreme Being—Brahma, Vishnu and Siva—each with a specific cosmic function: Brahma was associated with creation; Vishnu was associated with preservation and renewal; and Siva with destruction and disintegration.
617
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
Hippocrates: (4607-370? B.C.) Greek physician, known as "the father of medicine."
histamine: a substance released by the tissues in allergic reactions: it dilates blood vessels, stimulates gastric secretion, etc.
holder: any engram command which makes an individual remain in an engram knowingly or unknowingly. These include such things as "Stay here," "Sit right there and think about it," "Come back and sit down," "I can't go," "I mustn't leave," etc.
hound: hunt or chase with or as with hounds; chase or follow continually; nag.
hubbub: tumult; uproar.
Hurne, David: (1711-1776) Scottish philosopher and historian. Hume was known for his skepticism. He maintained that all knowledge was based on either the impressions of the senses or the logical relations of ideas.
hurrah's nest: state of utmost confusion; a mess.
hyacinth: a plant of the lily family, widely cultivated for its cylindrical cluster of fragrant flowers in a variety of colors.
hydraulic rams: devices by which the energy of descending water is utilized to raise a part of the water to a height greater than that of the source.
hyoscine: same as scopolamine, an alkaloid used in medicine as a sedative, hypnotic and sometimes with other drugs to relieve pain.
hypnoanalysis: (psychoanalysis) the use of hypnosis or hypnotic drugs in combination with psychoanalytic techniques.
hypochondriac: a person who continually shows unnecessary anxiety about his health.
hysterical: (psychiatry) of or characteristic of hysteria, a psychiatric condition variously characterized by emotional excitability, excessive anxiety, sensory and motor disturbances, or the unconscious simulation of organic disorders, such as blindness, deafness, etc.
iatrogenic: means illness generated by doctors. An operation during which the doctor's knife slipped and accidentally harmed the patient might cause an iatrogenic illness or injury since the fault would have been with the surgeons.
ideologies: systematic schemes of ideas, usually relating to politics or society or to the conduct of a class or group,
618
GLOSSARY
and regarded as justifying actions, especially those that are
held implicitly or adopted as a whole and maintained
regardless of the course of events. idiosyncrasy: a characteristic, habit, mannerism or the like that
is peculiar to an individual. idyllic: pleasing and simple; pastoral (characteristic of rural life,
idealized as peaceful, simple and natural) or picturesque. ilk: class; kind; sort. impaction: the action of becoming, or condition of being,
impacted (pressed closely into or in something) or firmly
fixed in. impasses: situations offering no escape, as a difficulty without
solution, an argument where no agreement is possible,
etc.; deadlocks.
impedimenta: things which impede or encumber progress; baggage. imponderables: things that cannot be conclusively determined
or explained.
imposition: a burden imposed unfairly.
incontrovertible: not open to question or dispute; indisputable. Indian rope trick: a magic trick in which the magician makes a
rope seem to suspend in midair and either goes up the rope
and disappears or sends other things up which disappear. indolence: the quality or state of disliking or avoiding work;
idleness; laziness.
inductive: of or using induction, logical reasoning that a general law exists because particular cases that seem to be
examples of it exist. inextricably: in a way incapable of being disentangled, undone,
loosed or solved.
infame: very bad reputation; notoriety; disgrace; dishonor. infidelity: unfaithfulness or disloyalty to another; especially,
sexual unfaithfulness of a husband or wife; adultery. injunctions: orders or commands that something must or must
not be done.
in kind: in proper or good condition. in re: in regard to. insidious: spreading or developing or acting inconspicuously
but with harmful effect. instanter: immediately; at once. insulin shock: a state of coma resulting from reduced blood
sugar when insulin (a substance which helps the body use
sugar and other carbohydrates) is present in excessive
619
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
amounts. Insulin shock is used by psychiatrists as one form of shock therapy in "treating" mental illness.
intelligence officer: a military officer responsible for collecting and processing data on hostile forces, weather and terrain.
intimation: hint; indirect suggestion.
introvert: look in on oneself.
inversion: acute awareness of self.
Iowa: a north central state of the US; its chief products are agricultural.
Ism: a doctrine, theory, system, etc., especially one whose name ends in -ism.
jauntings: trips; excursions.
jettison: throw off (something) as an obstacle or burden; discard.
Jimmie the Cob: a made-up name for a criminal. Cob is British dialect for "leader; chief."
jockeying: playing tricks with; managing or manipulating in a tricky way.
jog: stir or jolt into activity or alertness, as by a hint or reminder.
jub-jub bird: imaginary creature from the poem "Jabber-wocky" by Lewis Carroll.
jurisprudence: the study of law or of a particular part of law.
Keats, John: (1795-1821) English poet, considered one of the greatest English poets. His poems are unequaled for dignity, melody and richness of imagery.
keep: the strongest, innermost part or central tower of a medieval castle.
key in: make active. A key-in is a moment when the environment around the awake but fatigued or distressed individual is itself similar to the dormant (inactive) engram. At that moment the engram becomes active.
key out: cause an engram (or engrams) to drop away without being erased.
Kinsey, Alfred Charles: (1894-1956) American scientist who investigated the sexual behavior of men and women. In 1947 and 1948, he published books on his findings— Sexual Behavior in the Human Male and Sexual Behavior in the Human Female—popularly known as the Kinsey Reports, which shattered existing conceptions of the nature and extent of American sexual practices.
620
GLOSSARY
kleptomaniac: a person suffering from an uncontrollable tendency to steal things, with no desire to use or profit by them.
Korzybski, Alfred: (1879-1950) American scientist and writer; developed the subject of general semantics, a methodology that attempts to improve human behavior through a critical use of words and symbols.
Kraepelin, Emit: (1856-1926) German psychiatrist; divided mental disturbances into various classifications.
Krafft-Ebing, Baron Richard von: (1840-1902) German neurologist and author of works on sexual pathology.
latitude: freedom from narrow restrictions; freedom of opinion, conduct or action.
leads: electrical conductors (usually wires) conveying current from a source to a place of use.
leprosy: a chronic, infectious disease caused by a bacterium that attacks the skin, flesh, nerves, etc.: it is characterized by ulcers, white scaly scabs, deformities and wasting of body parts.
lesbianism: homosexual relations between women.
Lesbos: Greek island in the Aegean Sea. The word lesbian derives from the ancient Greek name of this island, from the eroticism and homosexuality attributed to Sappho (ancient Greek poetess) and her followers.
Leucippus: Greek philosopher of the fifth century B.C.
lichens: any of a large group of plants that look somewhat like moss and grow in patches on trees, rocks, etc.
lick: overcome or defeat, as in a fight, game or contest.
lie factory: technically, a phrase contained in an engram demanding prevarication (the telling of lies)—it was originally called a fabricator.
liner: a steamship, passenger airplane, etc., in regular service for a specific line.
llamas:  South American animals related to the camel but smaller and without humps: the llama is used as a beast of burden and for its wool, flesh and milk.
lock: an analytical moment in which the perceptics of the engram are approximated, thus restimulating the engram or bringing it into action, the present time perceptics being erroneously interpreted by the reactive mind to mean that the same condition which produced physical pain once before is now again at hand.
621
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
Locke, John: (1632-1704) English philosopher who argued against the belief that human beings are born with certain ideas already in their minds. He claimed that, on the contrary, the mind is a tabula rasa (blank slate) until experience begins to "write" on it.
"loop": literally, a length of film or magnetic tape whose ends have been joined to form an endless strip, so that continuous repetition of the recording is made possible (e.g., in rehearsing the synchronization required for dubbing a foreign-language soundtrack). Used figuratively.
Lorentz-FHzGerald-Einstein equations: mathematical equations developed by Hendrik Lorentz and George Francis FitzGerald, closely related to the work of Einstein. These formulas, also known as the Lorentz-FitzGerald contraction, contain the hypothesis that a moving body exhibits a contraction in the direction of motion when its velocity is close to the speed of light.
Direction of Motion
Low Speeds	Approaching Speed of Light
"loud": (colloquial) too vivid; flashy.
loused up: botched; spoiled; ruined.
Lucretius: (987-55 B.C.) Roman poet who was the author of the unfinished On the Nature of Things, a didactic (instructional) poem in six books, setting forth in outline a complete science of the universe. The purpose of the work was to prove, by investigating the nature of the world in which man lives, that all things—including man—operate according to their own laws and are not in any way influenced by supernatural powers.
lugubrious: very sad or mournful, especially in a way that seems exaggerated or ridiculous.
622
GLOSSARY
Lysol: (trademark) a brand of clear, brown, oily solution used as a disinfectant and antiseptic.
Macbeth: title character of a play by Shakespeare, tortured by his guilt for murders he committed rising to power in Scotland.
maelstrom: an agitated or tumultuous state of affairs.
malignant: causing or likely to cause death, especially by spreading unchecked through the body.
maligned: spoken evil of; defamed; slandered.
mange: a skin disease affecting hairy animals, caused by a parasite and characterized by intense itching, scabs and loss of hair.
manic: having or characterized by abnormal excitability, exaggerated feeling of well-being, flight of ideas, excessive activity, etc.
manic-depressive: (psychiatry) having a mental disorder marked by alternating extremes of excitement and depression.
marijuana: the dried leaves and flowers of the hemp plant, used in cigarette form as a narcotic or hallucinogen.
masochistic: of, concerning or pertaining to the getting of sexual pleasure from being dominated, mistreated or hurt physically or otherwise by one's partner.
Matterhorn: a mountain on the border of Switzerland and Italy.
Mauser: a brand of military or hunting rifles.
maw: anything thought of as consuming, devouring, etc., without end.
mawkish: sentimental in a tearful way, so as to be sickening.
Maxwell, James Clerk: (1831-1879) Scottish physicist, responsible for the theory that electricity and light are the same in their fundamental nature.
Mazda and Ahriman: the deities in Zoroastrianism, the religious system of the Persians before their conversion to Islam. Mazda is the spirit of universal good and Ahriman is his archrival as the spirit of evil.
media-media: average.
melancholy: a gloomy state of mind, especially when habitual or prolonged; depression.
mellerdrammer: humorous spelling of melodrama, any sensational writing, speech or action with exaggerated appeal to the emotions.
memory: anything which, perceived, is filed in the standard memory bank and can be recalled by the analytical mind.
mentors: wise and trusted counselors or teachers.
623
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
Mesmer, Franz Anton: (1734-1815) Austrian physician who developed the practice of mesmerism—hypnotism.
metallurgy: the scientific study of the properties of metals and alloys, the art of working metals or of extracting them from their ores.
metaphysics: a branch of philosophy that deals with the nature of existence and of truth and knowledge.
meted: distributed or apportioned by measure; allotted; doled (usually followed by out).
mien: a person's manner or bearing.
migraine: a type of intense, periodically returning headache, usually limited to one side of the head and often accompanied by nausea, visual disorders, etc.
militate: are directed (against); operate or work (against or, rarely, for): said of facts, evidence, actions, etc.
misdirector: any engram command which makes the patient move in a way or direction on the track which is contrary to instructions of the auditor or the desires of the analytical mind of the patient.
Moloch: in the Bible, an ancient god of the Phoenicians, etc., to whom children were sacrificed by burning. Moloch has come to mean anything demanding terrible sacrifice.
monomanic: one who suffers from an obsession with one idea or interest.
moored: fixed firmly; secured.
mores: the customs, or customary practices, rules, etc., regarded as essential to or characteristic of a group.
morning sickness: nausea occurring in the early part of the day, especially as a characteristic symptom in the first months of pregnancy.
morphine: a drug made from opium, used for relieving pain.
motif: dominant idea or feature.
motor strip: the mind's control system through the motor controls. There are two panels on each side of the skull, one on top of the other, and they control opposite sides of the body. One of the panels on each side is where the thoughts register, and the other panel is where the muscle control is set up.
mumbo jumbo: senseless or pretentious language, usually designed to obscure an issue, confuse a listener or the like.
myelin sheathing: the fatty layer of tissues coating the nerves.
myopia:  inability to see clearly what is far away—near-sightedness.
624
GLOSSARY
mysticism: the beliefs or practices of those who claim to have experiences based on intuition, meditation, etc., of a spiritual nature, by which they learn truths not known by ordinary people.
Napoleon: Napoleon Bonaparte (1769-1821), French military leader and emperor of France (1804-1815). He led a brilliant campaign of French domination in Europe but ended in ruin, spending the last years of his life as a prisoner on a lonely British island.
narcosynthesis: the practice of inducing sleep with drugs and then talking to the patient to draw out buried thoughts.
Nation, Carry: (1846-1911) American temperance agitator, famous for her use of a hatchet to break up saloons.
nebulously: hazily, vaguely, indistinctly or confusedly.
neurology: the science of the nerves and the nervous system, especially the diseases affecting them.
neurons: the main units that make up the nerves. They consist of cell bodies with threadlike parts that carry signals to and from the cells.
neuroses: emotional states containing conflicts and emotional data inhibiting the abilities or welfare of the individual.
neurotic: one who is insane or disturbed on some subject (as opposed to a psychotic person, who is just insane in general).
Newton, Sir Isaac: (1642-1727) English mathematician and natural philosopher. One of the greatest geniuses the world has known, he made three scientific discoveries of fundamental importance: first, the method of change in varying quantities, which forms the basis of modern calculus; second, the law of the composition of light; third, the law of gravity.
Nineveh: capital of the ancient empire of Assyria, situated on the east bank of the Tigris River, opposite modern Mosul, Iraq. Nineveh contained magnificent palaces and sculpture, which have been unearthed in archaeological excavations.
nirvana: in Buddhism, the highest state of consciousness, in which the soul is freed from all desires and attachments.
nitrous oxide: a colorless gas that dulls pain, and in some patients produces exhilaration and occasionally uncontrollable laughter; laughing gas. It is used as an anesthetic.
nomenclature: the set of terms used to describe things in a particular subject.
625
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
nonpartisan: not an adherent or supporter of a person, group, party or cause; objective.
obstetrical: of or regarding obstetrics, the branch of medicine concerned with the care and treatment of women during pregnancy, childbirth and the period immediately following.
occasioned: given occasion or cause for; brought about.
ocularly: of or relating to the sense of sight.
odor: repute; esteem.
ogreish: like or having the characteristics of an ogre: (in folklore and fairy tales) a man-eating monster, usually represented as a hideous giant; hence, anything likened to such a monster in appearance or character.
Old Man of the Sea: character in the story of "Sinbad the Sailor" in The Arabian Nights. A seemingly harmless old man, he climbs onto the shoulders of the obliging Sinbad and refuses to get off. He clings there for many days and nights until Sinbad escapes by getting him drunk.
olfactory: of or relating to the sense of smell.
Olympian: of, resembling, characteristic of or suitable to the gods of Olympus (mountain in northeastern Greece); majestic or aloof.
omnipresent: present everywhere at the same time.
opium: a drug made from the juice of certain poppies, smoked or chewed as a stimulant or narcotic, and used in medicine as a sedative.
opossum playing: pretending to be dead, a trick used by opossums (small, tree-dwelling mammals which are active at night) to defend themselves from predators.
opportunism: the policy or practice, as in politics, business or one's personal affairs, of adapting actions, decisions, etc., to expediency or effectiveness regardless of the sacrifice of ethical principles.
orthopedics: the branch of surgery dealing with the treatment of deformities, diseases and injuries of the bones, joints, muscles, etc.
pagan: non-Christian; refers to those peoples who worshipped many gods, such as the Greeks and the Romans.
pain-drive theory: the theory that pain, deprivation or other unpleasant consequence imposed on or experienced by an organism responding incorrectly under specific conditions establishes, through avoidance, the desired learning or behavior.
626
GLOSSARY
pallid: lacking in spirit or vitality; dull.
palsy: paralysis, especially with involuntary tremors.
panacea: a remedy for all kinds of diseases or troubles.
pandering: ministering to others' passions or prejudices for selfish ends.
paragon: a model or pattern of excellence or of a particular excellence.
paranoid-schizophrenic: (psychiatry) of or concerning a mental condition resembling paranoia (form of psychosis in which a person imagines that he is being persecuted or that he is very great or important) but also characterized by autistic (concerning a state of mind characterized by daydreaming, hallucinations and disregard of external reality) behavior and gradual deterioration of the personality.
parathyroid:   a hormone important in controlling of the calcium-phosphate balance of the body.
Parcheesi: a trademark for a board game in which the moves of pieces on a board are determined by the throwing of dice.
paresis: a brain disease of syphilitic origin, characterized by mental deterioration, speech disturbances and progressive muscular weakness. See also syphilis in this glossary.
Pasteur, Louis: (1822-1895) French chemist and bacteriologist; he proved that decay and putrefaction are caused by bacteria and developed serums and vaccines for such diseases as cholera and rabies.
Pasteuretta pestis: organism causing bubonic plague. See also bubonic plague in this glossary.
paternity: the state of being a father; fatherhood.
pathologically: in a manner caused by or having to do with disease. See also pathology in this glossary.
pathology: the science or the study of the origin, nature and course of diseases.
patter: the special vocabulary of a particular activity.
Pavlov, Ivan Petrovich: (1849-1936) Russian physiologist; noted for behavioral experiments on dogs.
pedantic: having unnecessary stress on minor or trivial points of learning; displaying a scholarship lacking in judgment or sense of proportion.
penicillin: a very powerful drug for destroying bacteria.
penis envy: (psychoanalysis) the repressed wish of a female to possess a penis.
peptic ulcers: open sores in the stomach.
perceptic: any sense message such as a sight, sound, smell, etc.
627
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
percepts: recognizable sensations or impressions received by
the mind through the senses. phenobarbital: a medicinal drug used to calm the nerves and
induce sleep. Philip: Philip II: (382-336 B.C.) king of Macedonia, father of
Alexander the Great. phlebotomy: the act or practice of bloodletting as a therapeutic
measure. photosynthesis: the process by which green plants use sunlight
to convert carbon dioxide (taken from the air) and water
into complex substances. pilloried: held up to public ridicule or scorn. pine tar: a thick, dark liquid obtained by destructive distillation
(decomposition by heat in the absence of air) of pine
wood, used in ointments, tar paints, etc. Pittsburgh: city in southwest Pennsylvania. pituitrin: the various substances secreted by the pituitary gland,
located at the base of the brain, which have important
influences on growth and bodily functions. placate: stop from being angry; appease; pacify; mollify. plankton: the small animal and plant organisms that float or
drift in water, especially at or near the surface. Plankton
serves as an important source of food for larger animals,
such as fish. platitudes: flat, dull or trite remarks, especially those uttered as
if they were fresh or profound.
polarity: (figurative) the possession of two opposite or contrasted principles or tendencies. polysyllables: words having several, especially four or more,
syllables.
portends: is an indication of; signifies. post: the starting gate at a racetrack. postulates: things assumed to be true, especially as a basis for
reasoning. poultice: a hot, soft, moist mass, as of flour, herbs, mustard,
etc.  Sometimes spread on cloth, applied to a sore or
inflamed part of the body. preclear: from pre-Clear, a person not yet Clear; generally a
person being audited, who is thus on the road to Clear; a
person who, through Dianetics auditing, is finding out
more about himself and life. predisposition: a state of mind or body that renders a person
628
GLOSSARY
liable to act or behave in a certain way or to be subject to certain diseases.
prefrontal lobes: portion of the brain directly behind the forehead.
prefrontal lobotomy: (psychiatry) an operation in which the white fibers joining the prefrontal and frontal lobes to the interior region of the brain are severed.
prenatal: existing or taking place before birth.
prerelease: any patient who is entered into therapy to accomplish a release from his chief difficulties, psychosomatic or aberrational.
prescience: knowledge of events or actions before they happen.
present time: the time which is now and becomes the past as rapidly as it is observed. It is a term loosely applied to the environment existing in now.
press-agentry: publicity produced by a press agent's work or skill, especially in making a person or thing seem more desirable, admirable or successful.
preterm: before the end of the period a pregnancy normally lasts.
procreation: bringing living things into existence by the natural process of reproduction.
progeny: children, descendants or offspring collectively.
promiscuous: having sexual relations with many people.
provisos: stipulations or conditions.
pseudo-: combining form meaning "closely or deceptively similar to (a specified thing)," as in pseudonurse, pseudomother, pseudofather, etc.
psychic: of or pertaining to the human soul or mind; mental (opposed to physical).
psychometry: measurement of psychological variables, as intelligence, aptitude and emotional disturbance.
psychoses: severe forms of mental disorder; insanities.
psychosomatic: psycho of course refers to mind and somatic refers to body; the term psychosomatic means the mind making the body ill or illnesses which have been created physically within the body by derangement of the mind.
punk water: another name for spunk water, rainwater that collects in hollow tree stumps, popularly thought to be a cure for warts.
pygmy: a very small person.
pyramiding: increasing rapidly and on a widening base.
629
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
Q: symbol used to represent an undefined, but observable as existing, form of energy or force.
quinine: a bitter medicinal drug used to treat malaria and in tonics.
rationalization: justified thought—the excuses one makes to explain his irrational behavior.
reactive mind: a portion of a person's mind which works on a totally stimulus-response basis, which is not under his volitional control, and which exerts force and the power of command over his awareness, purposes, thoughts, body and actions. Stored in the reactive mind are engrams, and here we find the single source of aberrations and psychosomatic ills. Also called bank.
recalcitrant: disobedient, resisting authority or discipline.
recourse: a turning or seeking for aid, safety, etc.
recriminative: accusing in return.
red herrings: things intended to divert attention from the real problem or matter at hand; misleading clues.
reduce: take all the charge or pain out of an incident. This means to have the preclear recount the incident from beginning to end (while returned to it in reverie) over and over again, picking up all the somatics and perceptions present just as though the incident were happening at that moment. To reduce means, technically, to render free of aberrative material as far as possible to make the case progress.
remonstrated: presented and urged reasons in opposition or complaint; protested.
Renaissance: the great revival of art, literature and learning in Europe in the 14th, 15th and 16th centuries, based on classical (Greek and Roman) sources. It began in Italy and spread gradually to other countries and marked the transition from the medieval world (from about A.D. 500 to 1450) to the modern.
repeater technique: the repetition of a word or phrase in order to produce movement on the time track into areas of disturbed thought containing that word or phrase. After the auditor has placed the patient in reverie, if he discovers the patient, for instance, insists he "can't go anyplace," the auditor makes him repeat the phrase. Repetition of such a phrase, over and over, sucks the patient back down the track and into contact with an engram which contains it.
630
GLOSSARY
repressions: commands that the organism must not do something.
restimulation: the reactivation of a past memory due to similar circumstances in the present approximating circumstances of the past.
restimulators: approximations of the reactive mind's content or some part thereof continually perceived in the environment of the organism.
retribution: punishment one deserves for a wrong that he has done.
returning: "sending" a portion of one's mind to a past period on either a mental or combined mental and physical basis and reexperiencing incidents which have taken place in one's past in the same fashion and with the same sensations as before.
reverie: the state of reverie is actually just a name. It is a label introduced to make the patient feel that his state has altered and that he has gone into a state where his memory is very good or where he can do something he couldn't ordinarily do before. The actuality is that he is able to do it all the time anyway. It is not a strange state. The person is wide awake, but merely by asking him to close his eyes he is technically in reverie.
reviled: criticized angrily in abusive language.
rheostat: an electrical instrument used to control current by varying resistance.
rheumatic fever: a disease more common among children than adults, characterized by fever, pains in the joints and often damage to the heart.
riding habits: dresses or suits worn by horseback riders.
Rohmer, Sax: pseudonym of Arthur Sarsfield Ward (1883-1959), English author of mystery thrillers, especially a series centering about fictional character Dr. Fu Manchu.
Ross, Ronald: (1857-1932) British physician.
Rousseau, Jean Jacques: (1712-1778) Swiss-born French philosopher, author, political theorist and composer, who argued that nature is good and civilization bad.
sack race: a race in which each contestant jumps ahead while his or her legs are confined in a sack.
sadism: the getting of sexual pleasure from dominating, mistreating or hurting one's partner.
sakes: remembrances.
631
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
salvoed: fired at with a number of guns or artillery pieces at one time.
sanitaria: establishments for treating chronic diseases.
sarcastic: sneering; bitterly cutting; taunting.
scathing: very harsh or bitter.
schematic: of, or having the nature of, a scheme, schema, plan, diagram, etc.
schizophrenic: (psychiatry) person suffering from schizophrenia, a mental illness in which an individual is being two people madly inside of himself. It is a psychiatry classification derived from the Latin schizo, meaning "split," and the Greek phren, meaning "mind."
scholastic: one who narrowly adheres to traditional teachings, doctrines or methods.
school tie: a necktie striped in the colors of a specific English public school, especially as worn by a graduate to indicate his educational background.
Schopenhauer, Arthur: (1788-1860) German philosopher. He maintained that the desires and drives of men, as well as the forces of nature, are manifestations of a single will, specifically the will to live, which is the essence of the world. Schopenhauer asserted that since operation of the will means constant striving without satisfaction, life consists of suffering and that only by controlling the will through the intellect, by suppressing the desire to reproduce, can suffering be diminished.
Scientology: Scientology philosophy. It is the study and handling of the spirit in relationship to itself, universes and other life. Scientology means scio, knowing in the fullest sense of the word and logos, study. In itself the word means literally knowing how to know. Scientology is a "route," a way, rather than a dissertation or an assertive body of knowledge. Through its drills and studies one may find the truth for himself. The technology is therefore not expounded as something to believe, but something to do.
self-determinism: the state wherein the individual can or cannot be controlled by his environment according to his own choice. He is confident in his interpersonal relationships. He reasons but does not need to react.
semantic: of, pertaining to or arising from the different meanings of words or other symbols.
seminal: pertaining to, containing or consisting of semen.
632
GLOSSARY
sensory strip: the sensory strip could be considered the "mental" side of the switchboard, and the motor strip the physical side. See also motor strip in this glossary.
Sententious, Dr.: made-up name for an "authority." Sententious: putting on an air of wisdom; dull and moralizing.
sentient: of, having or capable of feeling or perception; conscious.
seven, gets a: reference to the game of craps (the throwing, or shooting, of dice), in which a first throw of seven wins.
sextant: an instrument used by navigators for measuring the angular distance of the sun, a star, etc., from the horizon, as in finding the position of a ship.
Shakespeare, William: (1564-1616) English poet and dramatist of the Elizabethan period (1558-1603), the most widely known author in all English literature.
shaman: a priest or witch doctor among certain peoples, claiming to have sole contact with the gods, etc.
shift, makes: manages or does the best one can (with whatever means are at hand).
short shrift: little attention or consideration in dealing with a person or matter.
shoulder to the wheel, put a: work energetically toward a goal; put forth effort.
Siberian: of Siberia, a part of the Soviet Union in north Asia, extending from the Ural Mountains to the Pacific.
signal: not average or ordinary; remarkable; notable.
Simple Simon: a foolish character in the well-known anonymous nursery rhyme: "Simple Simon met a pieman, going to the fair; Says Simple Simon to the pieman, 'Let me taste your ware. . . .' "
sinusitis: inflammation of one or more sinus cavities in the skull.
Sioux: of or having to do with a member of a tribe of American Indians living on the plains of northern United States and southern Canada.
soapbox: of, pertaining to, or characteristic of a speaker or speech from a soapbox: any improvised platform used by a person making an informal, often impassioned speech to a street audience, as on a current, controversial issue.
Socrates: (ca. 469-399 B.C.) Greek philosopher and teacher who believed in a "demon" whose voice warned him whenever he was about to make a wrong decision.
633
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
solicitous: anxious and concerned about a person's welfare or comfort.
somatic: bodily or physical. Because the word pain is restimu-lative, and because the word pain has in the past led to a confusion between physical pain and mental pain, the word somatic is used in Dianetics to denote physical pain or discomfort of any kind.
somatic strip: a physical indicator mechanism which has to do with time. The auditor orders the somatic strip. The somatic strip can be sent back to the beginning of an engram and will go there. The somatic strip will advance through an engram in terms of minutes counted off by the auditor, so that the auditor can say that the somatic strip will go to the beginning of the engram, then to the point five minutes after the engram began, and so forth.
sonic: recall by hearing a past sound with the "mind's ear."
sonorous: resonant, giving a deep, powerful sound.
sooth: truth.
Spartans: the citizens of Sparta, a city in ancient Greece, who would permit a child to live only if he showed potential of becoming an asset to the state.
specious: seeming to be good, sound, correct, logical, etc., without really being so; plausible but not genuine.
Spencer, Herbert: (1820-1903) English philosopher. One of the few modern thinkers to attempt a systematic account of all cosmic phenomena, including mental and social principles.
spinbin: (slang) a mental institution.
squalling: the condition or action of crying or screaming loudly and harshly.
Stalingrad: former name of Volgograd, a city on the Volga River in the Soviet Union.
standard memory bank: recordings of everything perceived throughout the lifetime up to present time by the individual except physical pain, which is not recorded in the analytical mind but is recorded in the reactive mind.
stigma: a mark of shame, a stain on a person's good reputation.
stimuli: things that rouse a person or thing into activity or energy or that produce a reaction in an organ or tissue of the body.
stock: cattle or other farm or range animals; livestock.
stogies: long, slender, roughly made, inexpensive cigars.
634
GLOSSARY
Stoics: people who maintain or affect the mental attitude advocated by the Stoics, a Greek school of philosophy, founded by Zeno about 308 B.C. , holding that human beings should be free from passion and calmly accept all occurrences as the unavoidable result of divine will.
strychnine: a bitter, highly poisonous substance, used in very small doses as a stimulant.
suffrage: the right to vote, especially in a political election.
sulfa: any of a group of chemical compounds with antibacterial properties.
suppressor: the exterior forces which reduce the chances of the survival of any form.
supranational: of, for, involving or over all or a number of nations.
surgical: pertaining to or involving manual or operative procedures.
swami: lord; master: a Hindu title of respect, especially for a Hindu religious teacher.
syllogism: a form of reasoning in which a conclusion is reached from two statements, as in "All men must die; I am a man; therefore, I must die."
sylvan: of or characteristic of the woods or forests. Used figuratively, as Rousseau's philosophy of the "natural man."
symbiotic: having to do with the living together of similar or dissimilar organisms for mutual benefit.
symbolic logic: a modern type of formal logic using special mathematical symbols to stand for propositions and for the relationships among propositions.
syphilis: a contagious venereal disease affecting first some local part, secondly, the skin and mucous membranes and, thirdly, the bones and muscles and brain.
tabloid: a newspaper usually half the normal size, with many pictures and short, often sensational, news stories.
tacit consent: in the case of two preclears working on each other, each one assuming in his turn the auditor's role, a condition can arise where each prevents the other from contacting certain engrams. This is tacit consent. A husband and wife may have a mutual period of quarrels and unhappiness. Engaged upon clearing each other, working alternately as auditor, they avoid, unknowingly, but by reactive computation, the mutual period, thus leaving in place painfully emotional engrams.
635
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
tactile: of or using the sense of touch.
talisman: an object supposed to bring good luck.
tapped: penetrated, opened up, reached into, etc., for the purpose of using something or drawing something off.
technology: the methods of application of an art or science as opposed to mere knowledge of the science or art itself.
telepathy: communication from one mind to another without the use of speech or writing or gestures, etc.
temporize: effect a compromise; negotiate.
tenderfoot: a raw, inexperienced person; novice.
termagant: boisterous, quarrelsome, scolding; shrewish.
terra incognita: an unknown land; a region or subject of which nothing is known.
testosterone: a male sex hormone.
test tube: a tube of thin, transparent glass closed at one end, used in chemical experiments, etc. Used figuratively.
thalamus: the interior region of the brain where sensory nerves originate.
6: theta, the eighth letter in the Greek alphabet. Greek for thought or life or the spirit.
three-thousand-cycle note: a ringing sound with three thousand vibrations, or cycles, per second.
thyroid: a hormone that regulates the body's growth and development.
tidings: news; information.
time track: the time span of the individual from conception to present time on which lies the sequence of events of his life.
token: a very special kind of restimulator; any object, practice or mannerism which one or more allies used. By identity thought the ally is survival; anything the ally used or did is, therefore, survival.
tomes: large or scholarly books.
Tone Scale: a scale which shows the emotional tones of a person. These, ranged from the highest to the lowest, are, in part, serenity (the highest level), enthusiasm (as we proceed downward), conservatism, boredom, antagonism, anger, covert hostility, fear, grief, apathy.
tongue, slips of the: mistakes in speaking, as inadvertent remarks.
tonnage: weight, measured in tons.
topectomy: (psychiatry) an operation which removes pieces of brain somewhat as an apple corer cores apples.
636
GLOSSARY
Torquemada, Tomas de: (1420-1498) first Grand Inquisitor of Spain. The Spanish Inquisition, established under Ferdinand and Isabella in 1478, was centralized by Torquemada after his appointment in 1483 as Grand Inquisitor. He gained the reputation, partly deserved, partly exaggerated, of great cruelty in his conduct of the Spanish Inquisition, which reportedly was responsible for the burning of some two thousand persons between 1481 and 1504.
track: see time track.
tractability: state of being easy to manage or deal with; docility.
transcends: goes beyond the limits of; oversteps; exceeds.
transference: (psychoanalysis) the process in and by which a person's feelings, thoughts and wishes shift from one person to another, especially this process in psychoanalysis with the analyst made the object of the shift.
transorbital leukotomy: (psychiatry) an operation which, while the patient is being electrically shocked, thrusts an ordinary dime-store ice pick into each eye and reaches up to rip the analyzer apart.
trauma: a painful emotional experience or shock, often producing a lasting psychic effect and, sometimes, a neurosis.
travail: (figurative) trouble, hardship or suffering.
treats: deals with a subject in writing or speech; speaks or writes (of).
tripe: (slang) anything worthless, offensive, etc.; nonsense.
truck: dealings; business.
trundle bed: a low bed moving on small wheels. It can be pushed under a regular bed when not in use.
tuberculosis: an infectious wasting disease affecting various parts of the body.
uncharted: not shown or located on a map; unexplored; unknown.
undimensional: without measurable extent or limit.
usurps: appropriates wrongly to itself (a right, prerogative, etc.).
Utopian: of or like a Utopia, any idealized place, state or situation of perfection.
vacillation: a wavering in mind or opinion.
vain: without sense or wisdom; foolish; senseless.
valence: personality. The term is used to denote the borrowing of the personality of another. A valence is a substitute for
637
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
self taken on after the fact of lost confidence in self. A preclear "in his father's valence" is acting as though he were his father.
valence shift: getting the preclear moving around from one valence to the other.
valence wall: a sort of protective mechanism by which the charge of the case is compartmented to permit the individual to work at least some of the time.
vector: a physical quantity with both magnitude and direction, such as a force or velocity.
^feda: the most ancient sacred writings of the Hindus.
veritable: having all the qualities or attributes of the specified person or thing.
vignette: a short description or character sketch.
virus: a microscopic agent that can reproduce only within the cells of living hosts—mainly bacteria, plants and animals.
visio: recall by seeing a past sight with the "mind's eye."
vivisecting: cutting into or dissecting.
volatile: moving suddenly and often from one idea, interest, feeling, etc., to another; changeable.
volley: (figurative) a noisy, rapid outpouring or burst of many things at once.
voodoo: a form of religion based on belief in witchcraft and magical rites, practiced by some people in the West Indies and America.
wash, conies out in the: is revealed; becomes known.
wax: grow bigger or greater; increase.
WCTU: Women's Christian Temperance Union, an organization that campaigns against alcohol use.
weather-vaning: acting like a person or thing that is changeable or inconstant, especially one who veers easily to conform to the prescribed attitudes or popular beliefs of the moment.
well-nigh: very nearly; almost.
welter: a jumble or muddle.
whet: make keen or eager; stimulate.
whip hand: the position of advantage or control.
without: on the outside; outside.
wits: persons characterized by the ability to make lively, clever remarks in a sharp, amusing way.
wreaks: inflicts; causes.
yah-yah: slang term for bickering.
638
GLOSSARY
"Yanks are coming, The": line from the refrain of the song "Over There" by George M. Cohan (1878-1942), American actor, songwriter, playwright and producer. The song is about the American troops sent to Europe to fight in World War I.
yardsticks: standards of measurement or judgment.
Zamba, Dr.: a made-up name for a doctor.
zealot: an excessively zealous person; fanatic.
zombiism: existence as a person who seems to have no mind or will, taken from the voodoo word for a corpse said to have been animated by some power and made to obey commands.
Zulu: a member of a large, formerly warlike, Bantu people of southeastern Africa.
zygote: the first cell of a new individual.
639
Index
AA, see attempted abortion	Alexander the Great, 330-331;
A = A = A, 92, 258	see also manic
aberrated personality, AP, 178;	allergy(ies), 75, 133, 380
see also aberration; aberree	ally(ies), see also ally
aberration(s), see also insanity;	computation
neurosis; psychosis	antagonist vs., 483-484
attempted abortion	auditing with valence shift, 415
and, 190	childhood losses of, 359
classification of, 255-256	denial bv- 353
contagion of, see contagion of	departure of or
aberration	from- 352- 383
defined, 61, 147	formation during prenatal
diagnosis, 265-266, 273	Period- 226-227
educational institutions	pseudoally approximates, 343
and> 475	tokens and, 490, 491-492
hypnotism and, 97-98	allv computation, 3'38-344; see
parts of 85	also ally; c°mPutation
preclear' and, see preclear	Achilles' heel of, 356-357
source of, 61, 80	attempted abortion
aberree(s), 19, 110; see also	, _an<!' ^L"342
aberration; preclear	defmed' 3*L
,    ..            ' f      ,  .	genesis of, 343
abortion, see attempted	resjstive cas£         5QO
abortion
..	suppressors on time
accident-prone, 220-221	track, 425
aches, 133; see also pain;	tadt consent andi 44]
somatic	when to suspect, 351-352, 354
ACTH, 131, 140; see also drug	altitude, defined, 475
adrenaline, 138	ambivalence, defined, 379; see
affinity, 152-153; see also	also valence
emotion	ambiversion, 535
breaking of, 214	amnesia, 80
defined, 153	amnesia trance, 136, 502; see
law(s) of,	also hypnosis
has been aberrated, 340	analytical mind, see also "I";
hypnosis and, 136	mind
restimulation and, 95	analogy as a computing
strengthening of, 432	machine, 65
alcohol, 505	attenuated, 61
640
INDEX
analytical mind, (cont.)	assist, 245-246
basic personality	"assist" engrain, 329; see also
and, 178	engram; manic
body and, 70-71, 165	associative restimulator, 337,
computes in	490; see also restimulator
differences, 464	asthma, 75, 133, 182, 215
defined, 60	».   . ,   1C~
,        .         .  _„	atheist, 152 dynamics and, 72
incapable of error, 66	attempted abort,on(s) AA,
justification and, 115, 309	n190; see ah° Pre"ata' ,  ...
monitor and, 65	^ c°mPuta"°n and' 341^-343
necessity level and, 160, 486	baslc-basic earlier than, 399
nonanalytical moments, 105	chmn ^P68' 417
parasitic demon and, 125	common, 225
remaining unaberrated, 214	indicators of' 19°- 342-343
shutdown,	murder and action, 190
autocontrol and, 508	mutual AA' defined, 344
drug hypnosis and, 207	attention units, 281
standard memory banks	auditing, 350-352; see also
and, 67	therapy
time sense, 78	defined, 551
training pattern	auditor(s),
and, 61, 71-72	advice to, 236, 273-274, 525
analyzer, see analytical mind	ally of pc, 262
anesthesia, anesthetic(s), see	attitude, 250, 388-389
also drug; hypnosis	defined, 235
all anesthetics are poisons, 105	don'ts, 418-420; see also
hypnotics and anesthesia	Auditor's Code
confused, 502	bully patient, 394
used in operations, 86,	force computation on pc, 548
194> 516	use command phrase, 389
anger, 162	duty, 250-251
anger-sympathy	errors of, 235, 248, 254, 361,
dramatization, 167	398, 447, 548
AP, see aberrated personality	evaluation, 253, 265, 548
apathy,	gifts to, 427
in engram, 170, 402	goals of, 245, 281
no interest in engrams,	impediment of, 261-262
433, 435	must(s),
propitiation and, 426, 429	keep temper, 393
succumbing to engram is, 250	not reveal confidential
arbitrary, introduction of, 120	matter, 436
arbitrary structure,	relative of pc, 394
defined, 558	restimulation of, 406, 537
Aristotle's pendulum, 277, 465	role of, 248-249
arithmetic, 466; see also logic	tools, 392
arthritis, 75, 133, 142, 272	well-trained, 543
641
DIANETICS: ThE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
Auditor's Code, 252	black panther mechanism, 212
break, 252, 253, 418, 536	body,
remedy, 447, 499	analytical mind and,
Clear and, 252, 537	70-71, 165
why important, 264                   ,	effect of engram on, 345-346
autocontrol, 432, 507-508	pc outside his body, see
autogenetic illness, 132; see also	exteriorization
psychosomatic	resistance to disease, 145
autohypnosis, 509; see also	boil(ing) off, 301, 421, 479; see
hypnosis	also unconscious
awareness, see also conscious	bouncer, see also command
acute awareness of self, 324	phrase
center of awareness of	defined, 298, 300
person, 65	examples of, 300, 454,
level of, 286	460-461
mind and, 235	inK^ regulated by, 317
bank, see reactive mind;	use Of_ 388
standard bank	Bp xe basic L
bank monitor, defined, 279-	brain   141> 509  514
280; see also file clerk	brjd      m   559 56?
bas,c, 452; see also cham;	bu
engram
basic area, 290, 293, 316; see	Caesar, 56, 76
also chain; prenatal; time	calcium deposits, 20
track	Caligula, 76
basic-basic, 351; see also chain;	canceller, 282
engram	cancer, 134
auditor tries to reach,	case(s), see also preclear
290-291, 351, 387, 398	classifications, 386
case resolution and, 251	computing on, 551
defined, 183	delay, 436, 536
basic personality, UP, see also	entrance, see case opening
personality	history, 516, 521
defined, 178, 544-547	improvement ratio, 348
file clerk is sample of, 288	Junior, see Junior case
stopping therapy and, 544-547	opening, see case opening
basic purpose, 330, 334; see	type, case type,
also dynamic	chronic doubter, 472
behavior, see also aberration	combat exhaustion case, 530
dynamics and, 55	"death instinct" case, 381
irrational, 61	"different" case, 395
rationalization and, 365	foreign-language case, 437
birth, see also engram	high euphoria case, 327
engram, 182, 186, 196, 215	incapable of holding
in cleared mother, 231	opinion, 478
prenatal experience and, 176	institutionalized, 530
reduction of, 389	Junior, see Junior case
642
INDEX
case(s), (com.)	chloroform, 503; see also
type, case type, (COM.)	anesthesia
manic case, 327-328	circuit(s), 77, 124-126, 287; see
psychotic case, 527	also demon circuit
resistive case, 500	Clear(s), see also Release
sonic and visio shut-off	ambiversion, 535
without "dub-in," 272	compared to contemporary
stuck in present time, 396	norm 243
case opening, 236, 346-347,	defined, 16, 161, 242
386; see also case	eccentricity and, 498
cell(s), cellular, 73; see also	ethica, leve, of> 537
°°dy	gOal jn Djaiietic therapy, 29
engram and, 104, 183	has no -mental voices," 125
organism and, 101	imagination, Clear uses, 25
chain(s) (engram chains), see	inversion in, 324
also basic; engram	length of time ,0 c]ear a
cross engram and, 207	person  541_543
first incident on, 452	te  Qn Auditor-s Code
types of, 416-418	252  53?
word chains, 451-452	act's ^ 558
charge(ed)(s),	perception in, 17
electrical charge	a,          m ^   ^
(analogy), 358	sod      amj   ,99_20()
emotional charge, «» emotion	k           flto d   ^    2nd
how to get rid of, 390	,   .   .          .,,
...                .  „„„	chain types, 416
pc advance in therapy and, 332	,   .    lv               „,._  „,
iT-u    1.-U                I    r »	during pregnancy, 207, 226,
child, children, see also fetus;	TV?  -jos
prenatal	,    zz/'  ^   .     .
accidental mishaps of, 210	lan«uage durm|'s
birth,,,, birth	engram,c,226
"child wonder," 333	cold' common cold' 75' 133
clearing and, 201, 222	colorblindness, 17
dub-in recall, 437	comatic reduction, 423; see also
engrams, 145, 222, 487-488	boil(ing) off
feebleminded, 191	commanded action, 89, 298
healthiest, 231	command(s), engramic, see also
illness(es), 145, 222, 489; see	command phrase
also illness	anesthesia and, 386
losses of allies, 359	boil-off and, 301
marriage and, 431	effect on pc, 316-317
not possible to spoil with love,	engram, command value
152, 202	of, 128-129
prenatal child, see fetus	explained, 293
punishment of, 201, 213	more important than action in
restimulators of, 201, 215, 217	engram, 369
self-determined, 202	suppressors by way of engram
childhood, 171-172, 190-191;	command, 425
see also child	time track regulated by, 317
643
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
command phrase(s), see also	Darwin, Charles, 73, 553
bouncer; command,	data, datum,
engramic; denyer; grouper;	analytical mind and, 60, 65,
holder; misdirector	113,154
classes of, types of, 300,	correctness of, 548
458, 480	engram filing system, 445-446
|;                    don't use command phrases in	evaluation of 469
patter, 389	file clerk and' 280, 459
compulsion^), compulsive, 83,	f|asn answer and, 413
93' 429	from relatives, 543
computation(s)(al),	"held-down seven" and, 28
ally computation, see ally	intelligence and, 60
computation	true daturn> doctrine of,
analyzer and, 160	154—155
rational, 473	deMt  dea(J> se£ alsg succlunb
reactive mind computation, 91	a,,    ,QSS rf 352  353
secrecy and, 501	..^ ^      „ 3g,
conception  183	fai]ures         59
"conditioning^)," 71-72,	moments of 362
	urge is away from, 34 confusion, 463,470, 562	*.JL,.       40
conjunctivitis, 182	.             .   .    ,__
.     ,      ,          ,	deep analysis, 177
conscious! ness), see also	...      ;
awareness; unconscious	delirium tremens, DTs, 505
analytical mind and, 86	demon(s), 120; see also circuit;
depth of, 165	demon circuit
engram and, 113	classes of' 123
posthypnotic suggestion below	denned, 124
the level of, 93	demon circuits), see also
constipation, 138, 416	circuit; demon
contagion of aberration, see	analyzer set up as, 125
also aberration	bypassed in narcosynthesis, 178
defined, 193-194	handling of, 352
in birth, 1%	parasitic quality of, 328
in education, 476	denyer, see also command
in family, 201	phrase; forgetter
in politics and war, 198-199	mechanism
source of, 193-194	action on time track and, 317
contraceptive, 190, 417	canceller and, 283
coronary trouble, 75; see also	defined, 300, 301
heart	examples of, 300, 369,
covert hostility, 429	459-460
cowardice, 250	repeater technique on, 310-311
creative imagination, 26	depressive, 84, 169; see also
criminal(s), 211, 560	manic
criticism, 262	derailer(s), 463, 480; see also
Dark Ages, 42	command phrase
644
INDEX
derangement,	disease(s), 143-144; see also
of body, 142	illness; psychosomatic
types of, 147	causing organic mental
dermatitis, 133, 272	alterations, 510
diabetes, 134	8erm and nongerm theory
diagnosis, 255	of' 132
auditor and, see auditor	doctor(s),
computing on a case, 551	contagion of aberration
description of Dianetic, 273	from' 196
"imaginary" pains, 481	Dianetics and< 42°
insane patient, 529	en.Sram cham ^P6' 417
IQ is no great factor in, 274	misapprehension of bram
pc's talk about own	function by, 510
engrams, 535	recommending abortion, 190
perceptions and, 265-266	^pey, feeling» 109' see als°
primary factors in, 265-266	boil(ing) off
rule in, 261	doubter, 472, 475
Dianetic, Dianetics,	douche(s), douche bag, 190,
abbreviation Dn,	227, 417
auditing, goal, 29, 391	dramatic personnel, 117
branches of, 219	dramatization(s), dramatize(d),
defined, 239	aberree and, 451
diagnosis, described, 273	accidents and, 133
don'ts, 418-420; see also	anger-sympathy, 167
Auditor's Code	breaking of, 118
first aid, 515	caused by engrams, 115 fundamental and primary error         contagion of, 193-194
in practice of, 248	defined, 115-116
history of, 553	example of, 116, 368-369
how to run, 392-394	people under stress and, 194
hypnotism and, 283-284, 509	valence, 115, 116-117, 170
is a parallel to thought, 252	dream(s), 293, 421
Judiciary Dianetics, 555	drug(s), 501; see also
legislation and, 240	anesthesia; hypnosis
main emphasis of, 274	causing organic mental
other practices and, 235, 238,	alteration, 510
394, 420	hypnosis, drug, 177, 207
past and future, 553	hypnotics and anesthetics
philosophic background	confused, 502
°f. 553	mind's protection and, 235
Preventive Dianetics, 219	patient who pleads for, 284
research on, 179, 469, 483	psychosomatic ill and, 156
routine, rehearsal of, 285	reason for uncertain effects
simplicity of, 247	of, 140
war and, 559	tests on drugged
who can practice, 239	patients, 135
645
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
dub-in, see also imagination	emotion(al), see also affinity;
case, 396, 475	tone
imagination dubbed in for	captured units of, 525
recall, 266-267, 386	charge, emotional charge(s),
lie factories and, 273, 440	see also charge
sign of secrecy imposed on	location of, 425
child, 437	not displaying itself, 383
testing recall for	somatic strip and, 451
dub-in, 270	defined, 61
dynamic(s), 51; see also	discharge, 362-363, 390
survival	dynamics and, 158
behavior and, 54-55	engram(s) and, see engram
blocked dynamics, 151, 191,	laughter and, 174
214 335  369	'oss' emoti°n °f> 171, 354, 525
defined' 59 '	painful, see painful emotion
emotion and, 158	Plus and minus' 158
engrams and, 60	r°le inf**%»> ™f
intelligence and, 60	shut-°^s' 442~443
spectrum of, 277	state, 173
strength of, 53	endocrine   138
survival dynamic, 39, 53, 161	«>»g™n,(S)(,c), see also basic;
.        ...   co	basic-basic; command,
dynamic, 1st, 53	engramic; command
dynamic, 2nd, see also	phrase; pain; unconscious
child; sex	aberration and, 396
blocked, 191	analytical mind, analyzer, see
defined, 53	aiso anaiytical mind
deviation in, 149-151	justification of engram, 309
dynamic, 3rd, 53	power has nothing to do
dynamic, 4th, 53; see also man	with, 223-224
dynamic principle of	reaction of analyzer to, 262,
existence, 32	298, 301
education(al),	aPathy case and> 433- 435
analytical thought and, 115	approach to, 236-237,
contagion of aberration	249-250
and 476	"assist" aspect, 329
faulty educational	bank- see reactive mind
system, 471	basic engram> see basic;
valid method of therapy, 216	basic-basic
Educational Dianetics,	^irth' see bir*
defined, 219	bou"cer' see bo""cer .  ^
	break engram, defined, 207 ejector, see bouncer	chronic  152
elan vital, 320	coitus 370
electric shock, see shock	command(s) in engrams, 298,
electroencephalograph, 320	458; see also command,
embryo, 188, 227; see	engramic; command phrase
also fetus	in chronic restimulation, 316
646
INDEX
engram(s)(ic), (cont.)	engram(s)(ic), (COM.)
command(s) in engrams, (cont.)	primary engram, 181
more important than action	prosurvival engram,
in it, 369	335-336, 370
not computable, 293	reduction of, 307
sleep commands, 422	shocks and operations, 512
command value of, 128-129	suppressed by other data, 449
common denominator	surrender engram, 142
of, 107, 399	sympathy engram, see
contrasurvival engram,	sympathy, sympathy engram
214> 335	talking out of, 257, 301
Achilles' heel of, 357	thought (engramic), 91,
defined, 90, 367	306-307; see also think
restimulator for, 490	three-day aspect of, 541
cross engram, defined, 207	(one va,ue ^  m cycle of action of, 134
"development," 309, 540	engram-denyer, *, denyer
dramatization of, see	engram-grouper, see grouper
dramatization	engram lock chain, 112; see
dynamics inhibited	als° chain; lock
by, 60, 335	environment(al),
emotion and word content	approach on asthma case, 215
of, 371	change of, 215, 534-535
emotionless engram, 352	danger or sympathy in, 165
filing system, 445-446	restimulative, 216-217, 534
habit and, 61	erasure, erase, 432; see also
illness, precipitated by, 145	reduction
intelligence inhibited by, 60	defined, 290, 401
Junior case engram, 295	reduction and erasure, 393
key-in, keying in engram, see	escape mechanism, 448
key-in; lock	estrogen, 138
language and, 297	ether> 503
late engrams, 453	euphoria, 141, 327, 541; see
locks, see lock	fl/JO manic
memory and  88	evil, «* ate good
necessity level and, 160	and ^
organic mental alterations	.   .        .         ,_,
6     ,   „„	jurisprudence, 555
and, 509	f „,.  „,„
. , .'      ..	man and, 29, 210
painful emotion engram, see	,..       ,      ,     .,„.„,
painful emotion	war of   good and evl1'   484
percepts and, 106	evolution, 73 phrase(s), see command phrase       exaggerator(s), 480, 499
power of, 329	excreta, 138
prenatal engram(s), see	exodontistry, 166
prenatal	exogenetic illness, 132; see also
prevention, 221, 225-226	illness
647
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
extended hearing, 135, 183; see	forgetter, forgetter
also sonic                               ,          mechanism(s), 283,355,377;
exteriorization,	see also command phrase
painful emotion and, 360	fourth dynamic, see
prenatal "ESP" and, 442	dynamic, 4th
testing for, 387	function,
views, exteriorized, 360,	always comes before
442-443	structure, 103
exteriorly determined,	8raPh of mind functions,
defined, 322	286-287
»•      r^n	imagination, function of, 160
extrasensory perception, Ear,	.   , r      •          •        r
/no AAn	mind function, axioms tor
Qyy—44U	,.         . f.
• h    IQ on	auditor, 464
eyesight, 19-20	word causing pnvsicai function
fabricator, see lie factory	to change, 136
faith healing, 246	future, 25, 160
fate, 220	gallbladder trouble, 272
fear, 162, 163	galvanometer, 405
fear paralysis, 162, 191	"garbage," 552
feebleminded(ness), 191, 512	genetic insanity, defined, 193
feeling, 340, 442; see also	germ(s), 132, 145, 146, 193; see
perception; shut-off	als° disease; illness
fetus, see also prenatal	gerontology, 139
coitus and, 207, 226	&****' 19720
has no ESP, 439, 440	<*** «f»f ™an' 10
high blood pressure and,	8°°d' l4'*5'??'™ a'S° 7"
372-373	grouper, 300, 461-462; see also
injury to, 224	command phrase
records in womb, 183-184	don ' use °n Pre^ar' ff
recovery qualities of, 189	dine trade and  301   317
	words in, listed, 454
'^       '      ™,	habit, 61
addressing  281	happiness, 60, 203
auditor and, 281, 314, 317; see	^™         mfcrrine, 133, 314,
also auditor	372-373
basic personality and 288  544	he           2Q   183_lg4 26?. ^
data not given forth by, 459	,         .
defined, 279-280	hear!   ,36 B7
don t try to command 291	held.down seven, 28i 323; see
emotion in bank impedes, 445	^ aberration
graph of position of, 286-287	ho,der(s)? see also command
laws of returning and, 316-317	phrase
finger snap, 285; see also flash	action of time track and) 3]7
answer	canceller prevents installation
flash answer, 393, 411-413	of, 283
foreign-language case, 437; see	defined, 300, 460
also case	don't use on preclear, 389
648
INDEX
holder(s), (cont.)	identity(ies), (cont.)
example of, 369	thought, identity thought, (cont.)
finding in therapy, 393	examples of identity
repeater technique and, 304, 451	thinking, 91, 294
words contained in, 454	Junior case, 295-297, 424
homosexuality, 149	key-in and, 94
hypnosis, hypnotism,	illness, ills, see also disease;
hypnotic,	psychosomatic; somatic
aberration and, 97-98	aberration and survival value
autohypnosis and, 509	of. 486
defined, 136, 531	breaking dramatization
drug hypnosis, 177, 207; see	and, 118
also narcosynthesis	delay between restimulation
forgetter mechanism and, 355	and, 525
laboratory tool, 82	delirium of, 86
manic installed during, 169	precipitated by, 145
posthypnotic suggestion, see	psychosomatic, see
suggestion	psychosomatic
revivification and, 21	types of, 132
semblances of insanity and, 84	imagination, imaginary, see
sleep and, 109, 177-178,	also dub-in
283-284; see also sleep	creative, 26
unwarranted in Dianetics, 509	defined, 25
hypochondriac, 84, 147, 380	diagnosis and, 265-266
"hysterical" blindness,	therapy using pc's
deafness, 267	"imaginings," 482
"I," see also basic personality;	immorality, 40-41
file clerk	immortality, 34, 59; see also
defined, 126	survival
drugs and, 136, 502	individual(s), see also dynamic,
file clerk feeds memory	1st; preclear
to "I," 280	location on survival
graph of "I," 286-287	spectrum, 160
nature of "I," 65-66	optimum, 16
reduction of awareness	self-determined, 199
of "I," 68	injury,
things hidden from "I," 127	Dianetic first aid, 515
iatrogenic illness, 240, 245,	pain of, 86
274, 510-512	prenatal injuries, 224
identity(ies),	silence and, 169, 226,
derailers and identity	227, 230
confusion, 463	insanity, see also aberration;
reactive mind thinks	irrationality; psychosis
in, 294, 464	confusion and, 562
thought, identity thought,	defined, 42, 527
associative restimulators	diagnosis of, 529
and, 490	genetic insanity, defined, 193
649
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
insanity, (com.)	lock(s), see also engram;
organic, 245, 274	key-in; restimulation
semblance of, 84	alleviation of, 446-447
temporary and chronic, 110	defined, 98, 154, 423
Institutional Dianetics, 245,	engram lock chain, 112
529; see also Dianetics	hypnoanalysis and, 177
insulin shock, 511	primary lock, defined, 423
intelligence, 60, 129	logic, 339, 466, 485
inversion, defined, 324	iovej ioving, 223, 427-428; see irrationality, 27, 147, 465-466,            also affinity
525; see also aberration;	children, 152, 489
insanity; rational	propitiation and, 427
Judiciary Dianetics, 555; see	man  mankind, see aiso
also Dianetics	dynamic, 4th
Junior case, 295, 424, 454; see	basic nature of> 14
also case; valence	behavior of, 52, 54-55
key-in, see also lock;	evil portion of 29, 210
restimulation	goal of 3,
defined, 94	in affinity withj 50, 153
delayed character of, 525	self-determined organism, 47
mechanics of, 107-108,	. , ^           ,     .
203-204	manic(s), see also depressive
moments of loss and, 358	ali8n^ ™* basic PurP°se-
prevention, 221-222	. c330,  ,,'
key-out, 216	defined, 327
i •     »i.   •    ^o	euphoria and, 327, 541
(anesthesia, 68	.      „  , .   ,         .       „.
	installed in hypnotism, 84 language, see also word factor in engramic	manic-depressive, 169, 180; see
thinking, 297	also dePressive; engram;
foreign-language case, 437	manic
homonymic language, 89	Manichaeus, cult of, 151
in engrams, !28, 294	marriage, see also dynamic,
potential madness and, 100	2nd
word combinations and	contagion of aberration in,
aberrations, 256	195-196
laugh, laughter, 174-175, 448	propitiation in, 427
lesbianism, 149	"reactive mind
lie factory, 271, 480, 549; see	partnership," 428
also dub-in	memory(ies), see also
life,	remember; standard bank
goal of, 32	defined, 89
is a group effort, 45	deranged by electric
life force,	shock, 441
engrams disperse, 60	difference between engram
mechanical theory of, 326	and, 88, 290, 401
therapy and, 172, 348	spectrum of, 278
650
INDEX
mental, see also mind	norm, 100, 244
conditioning, 80	nymphomaniac, 381
healing, 235	occlusion, occluded, see also
illness, see also insanity;	circuit; shut-off
psychosis	emotion, 398
ancient treatments for, 9-10	life periods and people,
inorganic and organic,	167, 425
203, 275	person, occluded, defined, 354
organic mental alteration, 509	shut-offs and occlusion
voices, 125	demons, 126-127
Mesmer, Franz Anton, 355	operation(s), surgical, 235, 511;
migraine headaches, 133,	see also engram
314, 372-373	absolute silence should
mind, see also analytical mind;	attend, 168-169
reactive mind	anesthetics used in, 516
analogy of, 559	contagion of aberration in, 194
characteristics of, 235	should be run as engrams, 512
function of, 59-60, 464	optimum solution, 54-55, 58
major divisions, 65	pain, physical pain, see also
mind knows how the mind	engram; painful emotion;
operates, 254, 546	unconscious
parts of, 286-287	analytical mind and, 79, 104
protection, 235	cells record, 184
time, time track and, 315-316	commands, 479-480
unconsciousness and, 79-80	death and, 34
misdirector, 301, 393, 409, 462;	defined, 34, 36, 59
see also command phrase	engram contains, 99, 147
monitor, 65; see also file	reactive mind and, 60
clerk; "I"	shut-off, see shut-off
monologuing, 224, 293, 444	pain-drive theory, 50, 209
morning sickness, 224, 225, 417	painful emotion, see also
morphine, 502; see also drug	emotion; engram; pain;
motor strip, 405; see also	sorrow
somatic strip	commands, 480
Napoleon, 55, 76	distorts the bank, 363
narcosynthesis, 169, 177, 501;	exteriorized views and,
see also drug; hypnosis	360, 442-443
nervous system, 79, 139-140;	laughter and, 175
see also brain	prenatal and later-life, 357
neurosis(es), neurotic, see also	palsy, 191
aberration; irrationality	paralytic stroke, 510
example of, 83	parasitic circuit(s), see circuit
Institutional Dianetics and, 245	parent(s), see also child
working a neurotic case, 392	animosity toward, 425-426
nitrous oxide, 166, 503, 528;	contagion of aberrations
see also anesthesia; drug;	of, 194
hypnosis	paresis, 275
651
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
pathology, 132, 146	preclear(s), pc(s), (cont.)
patient, see preclear	indicators and
pc, abbreviation, see preclear	manifestations, (cont.)
perceptions), see also senses	engramic command in awake
u     t.           j «.	speech of preclear, 317
can be obstructed by	.     /I     .,,. 1,_.
.           ,.-      }	laughter, 174-175
demon, 127	„?    ,      , ....            . .„
, ,.    .    '	offhand and flippant, 448
defined, 17	>.   A-         •
.«,„_,,	pretending pain or
d,agnosis and, 265-266	wounds, 482
differences of, 18	shut-offs, 480
engram includes all	introversion of, 535
percepts, 106	opposition by, 262, 545
extrasensory perception, 439	optimum pc, defined, 272
personality, 117, 288; see also	relative of auditor, 394
aberrated personality; basic	responsibility and, 536
personality; valence	shying away from engram> 36i
pleasure, 34, 36, 40, 48-49,	somatic strip and, 406
59; see also pain; survival	prefrontal lobotomy, 141, 217,
is permanent, 154	275  511
life force augmented by, 332	pregnancy, 225-227
poison(s), 105, 510; see also	prenatal(s), prenatal
anesthesia; drug	engram(s), see also engram;
Political Dianetics, 219, 242,	fetus
559; see also Dianetics	acceptance of, 185
positive suggestion, see	area, 357-358
suggestion	different from prenatal
posthypnotic suggestion, see	memory, 187
suggestion	keyed in by moment of
potential value, of an individual	'oss' 358
or group, 61	living conditions, 444-445
preclear(s), 'pc(s), see also case	more serious &*"
aberration pc will hold to, 338	postnatal, 223
advance in therapy, 332	prerelease, defined, 250; see
cannot see his own	als° P«clear; Release
aberrations, 249	present time, see also time;
classes of, 527	time track
contacting engram, 301	bouncer and, 301
defined, 250	defined, 411
emotional upset in pc's life	misdirector and, 463
current with therapy, 500	"stuck in present time,"
exteriorized views, 360	388, 396
hiding something in his life	test of Pc being in, 393,
from the auditor, 436	411-412
indicators and manifestations,	Preventive Dianetics, 219; see
ally computation, 352	also Dianetics
ashamed of past, 436	propitiation, 426-427, 429
652
INDEX
prosurvival engram(s),	rational(ity), (com.)
335-336, 370; see also	irrationality and, 465-466
engrain	self-determinism and, 199
ally computation and, 343	survival conduct pattern
become chronic, 152	and, 55
defined, 90, 343, 370	test of, 468, 556
pseudoally, 343, 353-354, 492;	what rational computation
see also ally	depends upon, 473
psychosis(es), psychotic, 527;	rationalization, 365
see also insanity	reactive mind(s), see also
"organic psychoses," 509	analytical mind; engram;
produced by hypnosis, 83	mind
psychosomatic(s),	cells and, 104, 184
psychosomatic ill(ness)(es),	defined, 60
131; see also disease; illness;	dreams and, 414
pain; somatic	electric shock and, 441
alleviation of, 186	file clerk and, 280, 317
autogenetic illness, 132	habit and, 61
chronic, 152, 336	how best attacked, 251
classes of, 142	hypnotism and, 531
defined, 131	literalness of, 129
fluid flow and, 142	mechanisms of protection
is the former injury, 273	of, 525
occur when engram	operates on two-valued
keys in, 189	logic, 339
pc continually holding to, 338	painful emotion distorts, 363
source of, 61, 100, 203	possessed by everyone, 75
punishment,	punishment feeds, 211
contagion of aberration	source of psychosomatic
and, 197-198	ills, 203
corporal punishment of	thinks only in identities,
children, 201	60, 294
does no good, 209	reactive thought, defined, 115
society and, 115, 197-198	reality,
puns, 293, 414	"facing reality," 325
purpose,	perception and, 17, 23
aberree's purpose, 332	subjective, 544
basic purpose, 330	reason, 558, 561; see also
of therapy, 283	rational
"push button(s)," 108, 322,	recall(s), see also memory;
491; see also key-in	remember; return
"rapport," between auditor and	basic personality and, 178-179
preclear, 432	classes of, 527
rational(ity), see also	diagnosis and, 265-266
irrationality; sanity	imagination and, 265-266
can be studied in cleared	optimum, 23—24
person only, 27	shut-off of, 513
653
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
recall(s), (cont.)	restimulation, restimulative,
standard banks and, 69	restimulate, (cont.)
testing, 270	chronic, 109-110, 316
recession, 403; see also	environmental, see
reduction	environment
reduction, reduce, see also	example of, 95
erasure; recession	marriage and, 429
defined, 400-401	mutually restimulative,
erasure and, 393, 400-401	defined, 538
Tone Scale and, 402, 447	of auditor, 406, 537
when any phrase or word	Pain is restimulative word, 147
in an engram will not	pseudoally and, 492
reduce, 453	restimulator(s), see also push
regression, 21-22, 277; see also	button; restimulation
return	associative restimulator,
Release(s), see also Clear	337' 49°
defined, 242, 434	child lives with- 201
how brought about, 354	defined, 96, 106-107
therapy time to produce, 542	handling by environmental
value of, 243	change- 2I5
.. .       -„  _.._  __„          .	restimulator lag, defined, 526
reliving, 22, 277, 528; see also	6
return	return(ed)(ing), 21-23,
remember(ing), 276-277, 418,	276-277; see also."*all;
498; ** also recall; return	remember; reverie; time
	track repeater technique, 301, 318;	data   jg2
see also technique; therapy	defmed 2,   2?9  3,g addressed only to action, not to         fi,e derk and  2g,
aberra''0"' 3 0	indoctrinating pc into,
cautions, 454, 458	396-397
demotion of, 304-306,	^ for Ml]ty ^ 22
handling shut-offs with, 532	reverie' 509; see also return
if pc does not work well	fixes attention on self and
on, 450	audltor' 386
single word technique, 451	optimum, 282
sucks pc down track, 302,	reveals where one is on
408-409	track' 412
•      j c-    j  -,™	scouting for material in,
replay, defined, 390	350-351
restimulation, restimulative,	use of on lock 445
restimulate, 536; see also	revivification, 2, dramatization; key-in;
restimulator	r'ght' 555-556; see also evil;
artificial, 334	g°od; wronf?
canceller and, 282-283	ringing in ears, 444-445, 507
childhood illness and, 145	"sag," 540
654
INDEX
sanity, see also rational	shut-off(s), (com.)
break engram and, 207	pain shut-off, 386, 442-443,
bridge between insanity	499
and, 181	recall shut-off, 513
defined, 467	somatic shut-offs, 479-480
rationality and, 72	sonic shut-off, 296
relationship to law, 110	sight, 19-20, 265-266; see also
remembering and, 498	visio
schizophrenic, see also valence	silence, 169, 226, 230
defined, 180	single word technique, see
insanities, 83	repeater technique
narcosynthesis and, 177	sinusitis, 75, 133, 380
time track and, 289, 463, 528	^ a^ boi,.off.
second dynamic, see	hypnosis
dynamic, 2nd	analyzer shutdown and feeling
secrecy, 418, 436-437, 501	"sleepy," 109
sedatives, 501; see also	boil-off and, 301, 422
anesthesia; drug	experience occurring
self-determinism, self-	during, 105
determined,	hypnotism and, 109, 283-284
child is entitled to, 202	society,
Clear is operating on, 29	clears and, 199-200
man and, 47, 199, 321-322	contagion of aberration in,
senses, 136, 269; see also	194-195, 197
perception	ideal society, 556
sensory strip, 405; see also	Political Dianetics, 219,
somatic strip	242, 559
sex(ual), 149, 206, 431; see also	primitive, 195
coitus; dynamic, 2nd	punishment and, 115
shock,	tolerance of sexual
accident, shock of, 86	perversion, 150
electric shock,	sodium pentothal, 177, 528; see
cases, 275, 511-512	also anesthesia; hypnosis
effect of, 141, 441, 529-530	somatic(s), see also pain;
shut-off(s), see also command	psychosomatic
phrase	anesthetics and, 502
analyzer, 399	clue to the presence of
case with, 272, 396	any, 479-480
defined, 480	defined, 266
emotion shut-off, 442-443,	file clerk and, 291
480	location, 318
"feeling," 442, 451	reduction of, 402
handling with repeater	repeater technique and,
technique, 397	408-409
indicators of, 479-480, 483	shut-off, 479-480
occlusion demon and, 126—127	strip, see somatic strip
655
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
somatic(s), (corit.)	suggestion, positive
two kinds of, 420	suggestion, (com.)
validity of engram and, 550	sympathy engram, 92
somatic mind, 60	suicide, 153
somatic strip, see also time	suppressors), see also dynamic
track	analytical mind and, 160
emotional charge and, 451	dams up emotion in
handling somatic strip, 388,	engram, 171
405	engram type, 336
repeater technique and, 408	germ acts as, 146
works in all shut-offs, 442	survival suppressor, 42
sonic, see also hearing;	surgery, see operation, surgical
perception	survival, survive, see also
defined, 266	dynamic; succumb
recall(s), 386, 527	conduct pattern, 55, 74
shut-off, 296	depends on right answers, 199
sorrow, 171, 351, 355; see also	descriptic graph of survival, 35
painful emotion	dynamic principle of
split personality, 117; see also	existence, 32, 57
schizophrenic; valence	goal of, 59
stammerers, 230	illness and survival value, 486
standard bank(s), standard	mind and, 464
memory bank(s), see also	pleasure and, 36
analytical mind; memory	potential, 59, 332
basic personality and, 178	spectrum of, 278
content of, 67-68, 290	suppressor, 42
defined, 67	tooth-and-claw, 116
file clerk monitors, 280	symbiote, symbiotic, 45, 53, 58
filing system described, 67-68	sympathy, sympathy engram(s),
potentiality of recall and, 69	see also engram
stimulants, 504	basic pattern of, 336
stream of consciousness, 125;	buried, 377
see also think	chronic psychosomatic illness
structure,	and, 252, 486, 488-489
alteration of, 510	defined, 155
body structure and sympathy	dramatization of, 155-156,
engram, 345-346	170, 492-493
function and, 103, 406	effect of, 344
stupidity computation, 500; see	ESP and, 440
also computation	posthypnotic suggestion
succumb, 212, 250; see also	and, 92
survival	pretends to be prosurvival, 154
suggestion, positive suggestion,	psychosomatics and, 261
see also hypnosis	reluctance of pc and, 338
auditor and, 264, 533	syphilis, 530
denyers and, 355	tacit consent, 441
example of, 81	tactile, 136; see also perception
656
INDEX
technique(s),	time track, track, (cont.)
repeater, see repeater technique	grouper and, 301
single word technique,	late end of, 411
451-452	moving on, 458
steps of, 350-352	occluded areas, 425
types of, 318	off the track, 443, 528
telepathy, 443	prenatal, 357
terra incognita, 1-2	reverie and- 412
testosterone, 138; see also	"stuck in Present time-" 396
endocrine	token<s)' 489-490, 491
j.	tone, Tone Scale, see also
a cardinal principle in, 309	^^"V^T,^
advance in, 332	c?ck of' "»-"?• ™
a fundamental axiom of, 180	engrams and' >™' 353
, .        t r,-,	great loss and, 358
future of, 564	°        .           '
,   _„	reduction or engrams and,
goal>29	402  447
motto which applies to all, 398	. ,   '       .             .    ,
,   -,,-	social organism graphed
mutual, 516	5f          «
pnmary error•* 248	^     3? ^
purpose of 247, 283	tone Q_2  fear            ^ m
starting, 236	tone 0.5, apathy, 402
time in therapy, 541-543	tong „ 6  terrorj ,62
Auditor s Code violations	{one Q_9  fear  162
extend, 536	tQne ,   3?  56Q
esnmation of, 2461 273  543	ton£ ,                 3    4Q2
valid methods of, 215-216	.       , Q  ~Q
	tone i .7, jo think, thinking, thought,	tone 2 3g
analytical thought, 115	analyzer and, 164
identity thinking, see identity	pc in tone 2 area 448
imagination, 25	society in tone 2, 560
reactive mind thinking,	tone 2.5, boredom, 402
112-113	tone3, 38
three types of, 115	tone 4, 38, 448, 560
thyroid, 138	use in diagnosis, 273
time, see also time track	zones of, 37
analytical mind's time	tone-deaf, 75
sense, 78	toothache, 217
equation of optimum solution	topectomy, 275, 511
and, 55-56	training pattern, 61, 71-72,
file clerk and, 291	114; see also circuit
handling pc in time, 315	trance, 283, 502; see also
shift, 318	hypnosis
time track, track,	transference, 284, 547
condition of, 286, 317	transorbital leukotomy, 141,
derailer and, 463	217, 275, 511
engrams and, 208	tuberculosis, 134
657
DIANETICS: THE MODERN SCIENCE OF MENTAL HEALTH
turnabout clearing, 431	vitamin B,, 504-505
ulcers, 133	war, 198, 560-561
unconscious(ness), see also	woman, women,
conscious; engrain; pain	best audited by women, 432
boil-off and, 301-302, 421, 479	Preventive Dianetics
contagion of aberration	an^ 230
and- 194	psychotic women, 208
defined, 61, 68	womb, 183-184, 187-188, 445;
dr"g' 208	see also prenatal
emotions around unconscious	Word(s), see also language
person, 170	aberration and, 256
manifestations of, 421	chains 451
protection mechanism of	contained in engrams can
bank, 525	..     h button" aberree, 491
source of aberration, 80	^ ho        mic word) 480
time track and, 279	T used fa          ms  J2g
valence(s),   15; see also	^^ demon and word
personalty; sch.zophrenic	mjstak     nl
definfd' n?-»7	pam as a word, 147
derailer and, 463	.        wor(J techni        451
dramatization of, 117, 148	, .                   no
.   .    ,   .            ,  .....	you, used in enerams, 128
exteriorized views and, 360	, _         °.   ,_.
multivalence, multivalent, 117,	worry' defmed' 296' 473
180  379	worth, of an individual, 62
picking up a, 165-166	wrong, 555-556; see also right
shift, 414-415, 492	zone(s), see also tone
tokens and, 491	auditor locating pc in, 273
wall between pc and emotional	emotion, relationship to, 158
tone, 353	graph, 35
winning valence, 117, 148, 170	survival zones, 57
visio, 266, 267; see also	zygote, 37, 185, 188, 227; see
perception; sight	also embryo; fetus; prenatal
658